The Nuclear Family:
His Talk, Her Teeth
‘When your mama was the geek, my dreamlets,’ Papa would
say, ‘she made the nipping off of noggins such a crystal mys-
tery that the hens themselves yearned toward her, waltzing
around her, hypnotized with longing. “Spread your lips, sweet
Lil,” they’d chuck, “and show us your choppers!”’
This same Crystal Lil, our star-haired mama, sitting snug on
the built-in sofa that was Arty’s bed at night, would chuckle at
the sewing in her lap and shake her head. ‘Don’t piffle to the
children, Al. Those hens ran like whiteheads.’
Nights on the road this would be, between shows and
towns in some campground or pull-off, with the other vans
and trucks and trailers of Binewski’s Carnival Fabulon ranged
up around us, safe in our portable village.
After supper, sitting with full bellies in the lamp glow, we
Binewskis were supposed to read and study. But if it rained the
story mood would sneak up on Papa. The hiss and tick on the
metal of our big living van distracted him from his papers.
3 12/01/2015 12:06  4
Rain on a show night was catastrophe. Rain on the road
meant talk, which, for Papa, was pure pleasure.
‘It’s a shame and a pity, Lil,’ he’d say, ‘that these offspring
of yours should only know the slumming summer geeks from
Yale.’
‘Princeton, dear,’ Mama would correct him mildly. ‘Randall
will be a sophomore this fall. I believe he’s our first Princeton
boy.’
We children would sense our story slipping away to trivia.
Arty would nudge me and I’d pipe up with, ‘Tell about the
time when Mama was the geek!’ and Arty and Elly and Iphy
and Chick would all slide into line with me on the floor
between Papa’s chair and Mama.
Mama would pretend to be fascinated by her sewing and
Papa would tweak his swooping mustache and vibrate his tan-
gled eyebrows, pretending reluctance. ‘Welllll . . . ’ he’d begin,
‘it was a long time ago . . . ’
‘Before we were born!’
‘Before . . . ’ he’d proclaim, waving an arm in his grandest
ringmaster style, ‘before I even dreamed you, my dreamlets!’
‘I was still Lillian Hinchcliff in those days,’ mused Mama.
‘And when your father spoke to me, which was seldom and
reluctantly, he called me “Miss.”’
‘Miss!’ we would giggle. Papa would whisper to us loudly,
as though Mama couldn’t hear, ‘Terrified! I was so smitten I’d
stutter when I tried to talk to her. “M-M-M-Miss . . . ” I’d
say.’
We’d giggle helplessly at the idea of Papa, the GREAT
TALKER , so flummoxed.
‘I, of course, addressed your father as Mister Binewski.’
4 12/01/2015 12:06  5
‘There I was,’ said Papa, ‘hosing the old chicken blood and
feathers out of the geek pit on the morning of July 3rd and
congratulating myself for having good geek posters, telling
myself I was going to sell tickets by the bale because the week-
end of the Fourth is the hottest time for geeks and I had a fine,
brawny geek that year. Enthusiastic about the work, he was.
So I’m hosing away, feeling very comfortable and proud of
myself, when up trips your mama, looking like angelfood, and
tells me my geek has done a flit in the night, folded his rags as
you might say, and hailed a taxi for the airport. He leaves a
note claiming his pop is very sick and he, the geek, must retire
from the pit and take his fangs home to Philadelphia to run the
family bank.’
‘Brokerage, dear,’ corrects Mama.
‘And with your mama, Miss Hinchcliff, standing there like
three scoops of vanilla I can’t even cuss! What am I gonna do?
The geek posters are all over town!’
‘It was during a war, darlings,’ explains Mama. ‘I forget
which one precisely. Your father had difficulty getting help at
that time or he never would have hired me, even to make cos-
tumes, as inexperienced as I was.’
‘So I’m standing there fuddled from breathing Miss
Hinchcliff’s Midnight Marzipan perfume and cross-eyed with
figuring. I couldn’t climb into the pit myself because I was
doing twenty jobs already. I couldn’t ask Horst the Cat Man
because he was a vegetarian to begin with, and his dentures
would disintegrate the first time he hit a chicken neck anyhow.
Suddenly your mama pops up for all the world like she was
offering me sherry and biscuits. “I’ll do it, Mr. Binewski,” she
says, and I just about sent a present to my laundryman.’
5 12/01/2015 12:06  6
Mama smiled sweetly into her sewing and nodded. ‘I was
anxious to prove myself useful to the show. I’d been with
Binewski’s Fabulon only two weeks at the time and I felt very
keenly that I was on trial.’
‘So I says,’ interrupts Papa, ‘“But, miss, what about your
teeth?” Meaning she might break ’em or chip ’em, and she
smiles wide, just like she’s smiling now, and says, “They’re
sharp enough, I think!”’
We looked at Mama and her teeth were white and straight,
but of course by that time they were all false.
‘I looked at her delicate little jaw and I just groaned. “No,”
I says, “I couldn’t ask you to . . . ” but it did flash into my mind
that a blonde and lovely geek with legs – I mean your mama
has what we refer to in the trade as LEGS – would do the busi-
ness no real harm. I’d never heard of a girl geek before and the
poster possibilities were glorious. Then I thought again, No . . .
she couldn’t . . . ’
‘What your papa didn’t know was that I’d watched the geek
several times and of course I’d often helped Minna, our cook
at home, when she slaughtered a fowl for the table. I had him.
He had no choice but to give me a try.’
‘Oh, but I was scared spitless when her first show came up
that afternoon! Scared she’d be disgusted and go home to
Boston. Scared she’d flub the deal and have the crowd scream-
ing for their money back. Scared she’d get hurt . . . A chicken
could scratch her or peck an eye out quick as a blink.’
‘I was quite nervous myself,’ nodded Mama.
‘The crowd was good. A hot Saturday that was, and the
Fourth of July was the Sunday. I was running like a geeked
bird the whole day myself, and just had time to duck behind
6 12/01/2015 12:06  7
the pit for one second before I stood up front to lead in the
mugs. There she was like a butterfly . . . ’
‘I wore tatters really, white because it shows the blood so
well even in the dark of the pit.’
‘But such artful tatters! Such low-necked, slit-to-the-thigh,
silky tatters! So I took a deep breath and went out to talk ’em
in. And in they went. A lot of soldiers in the crowd. I was still
selling tickets when the cheers and whistles started inside and
the whooping and stomping on those old wood bleachers drew
even more people. I finally grabbed a popcorn kid to sell tick-
ets and went inside to see for myself.’
Papa grinned at Mama and twiddled his mustache.
‘I’ll never forget,’ he chuckled.
‘I couldn’t growl, you see, or snarl convincingly. So I sang,’
explained Mama.
‘Happy little German songs! In a high, thin voice!’
‘Franz Schubert, my dears.’
‘She fluttered around like a dainty bird, and when she
caught those ugly squawking hens you couldn’t believe she’d
actually do anything. When she went right ahead and geeked
’em that whole larruping crowd went bonzo wild. There
never was such a snap and twist of the wrist, such a vampire
flick of the jaws over a neck or such a champagne approach
to the blood. She’d shake her star-white hair and the bitten-
off chicken head would skew off into the corner while she
dug her rosy little fingernails in and lifted the flopping, jit-
tering carcass like a golden goblet, and sipped! Absolutely
sipped at the wriggling guts! She was magnificent, a princess,
a Cleopatra, an elfin queen! That was your mama in the geek
pit.
7 12/01/2015 12:06  8
‘People swarmed her act. We built more bleachers, moved
her into the biggest top we had, eleven hundred capacity, and
it was always jammed.’
‘It was fun.’ Lil nodded. ‘But I felt that it wasn’t my true
métier.’
‘Yeah.’ Papa would half frown, looking down at his hands,
quieted suddenly.
Feeling the story mood evaporate, one of us children would
coax, ‘What made you quit, Mama?’
She would sigh and look up from under her spun-glass eye-
brows at Papa and then turn to where we were huddled on the
floor in a heap and say softly, ‘I had always dreamed of flying.
The Antifermos, the Italian trapeze clan, joined the show in
Abilene and I begged them to teach me.’ Then she wasn’t talk-
ing to us anymore but to Papa. ‘And, Al, you know you would
never have got up the nerve to ask for my hand if I hadn’t
fallen and got so bunged up. Where would we be now if I
hadn’t?’
Papa nodded, ‘Yes, yes, and I made you walk again just fine,
didn’t I?’ But his face went flat and smileless and his eyes went
to the poster on the sliding door to their bedroom. It was old
silvered paper, expensive, with the lone lush figure of Mama in
spangles and smile, high-stepping with arms thrown up so her
fingers, in red elbow-length gloves, touched the starry letters
arching ‘ CRYSTAL LIL .’ above her.
My father’s name was Aloysius Binewski. He was raised in a
traveling carnival owned by his father and called ‘Binewski’s
Fabulon.’ Papa was twenty-four years old when Grandpa died
and the carnival fell into his hands. Al carefully bolted the
8 12/01/2015 12:06  9
silver urn containing his father’s ashes to the hood of the
generator truck that powered the midway. The old man had
wandered with the show for so long that his dust would have
been miserable left behind in some stationary vault.
Times were hard and, through no fault of young Al’s, busi-
ness began to decline. Five years after Grandpa died, the once
flourishing carnival was fading.
The show was burdened with an aging lion that repeatedly
broke expensive dentures by gnawing the bars of his cage;
demands for cost-of-living increases from the fat lady, whose
food supply was written into her contract; and the midnight
defection of an entire family of animal eroticists, taking their
donkey, goat, and Great Dane with them.
The fat lady eventually jumped ship to become a model for
a magazine called Chubby Chaser. My father was left with a
cut-rate, diesel-fueled fire-eater and the prospect of a very long
stretch in a trailer park outside of Fort Lauderdale.
Al was a standard-issue Yankee, set on self-determination
and independence, but in that crisis his core of genius revealed
itself. He decided to breed his own freak show.
My mother, Lillian Hinchcliff, was a water-cool aristocrat
from the fastidious side of Boston’s Beacon Hill, who had
abandoned her heritage and joined the carnival to become an
aerialist. Nineteen is late to learn to fly and Lillian fell, smash-
ing her elegant nose and her collarbones. She lost her nerve but
not her lust for sawdust and honky-tonk lights. It was this pas-
sion that made her an eager partner in Al’s scheme. She was
willing to chip in on any effort to renew public interest in the
show. Then, too, the idea of inherited security was ingrained
from her childhood. As she often said, ‘What greater gift could
9 12/01/2015 12:06  10
you offer your children than an inherent ability to earn a living
just by being themselves?’
The resourceful pair began experimenting with illicit and
prescription drugs, insecticides, and eventually radioisotopes.
My mother developed a complex dependency on various drugs
during this process, but she didn’t mind. Relying on Papa’s
ingenuity to keep her supplied, Lily seemed to view her addic-
tion as a minor by-product of their creative collaboration.
Their firstborn was my brother Arturo, usually known as
Aqua Boy. His hands and feet were in the form of flippers that
sprouted directly from his torso without intervening arms or
legs. He was taught to swim in infancy and was displayed
nude in a big clear-sided tank like an aquarium. His favorite
trick at the ages of three and four was to put his face close to
the glass, bulging his eyes out at the audience, opening and
closing his mouth like a river bass, and then to turn his back
and paddle off, revealing the turd trailing from his muscular
little buttocks. Al and Lil laughed about it later, but at the time
it caused them great consternation as well as the nuisance of
sterilizing the tank more often than usual. As the years passed,
Arty donned trunks and became more sophisticated, but it’s
been said, with some truth, that his attitude never really
changed.
My sisters, Electra and Iphigenia, were born when Arturo
was two years old and starting to haul in crowds. The girls
were Siamese twins with perfect upper bodies joined at the
waist and sharing one set of hips and legs. They usually sat and
walked and slept with their long arms around each other. They
were, however, able to face directly forward by allowing the
shoulder of one to overlap the other. They were always
10 12/01/2015 12:06  11
beautiful, slim, and huge-eyed. They studied the piano and
began performing piano duets at an early age. Their com -
positions for four hands were thought by some to have
revolutionized the twelve-tone-scale.
I was born three years after my sisters. My father spared no
expense in these experiments. My mother had been liberally
dosed with cocaine, amphetamines, and arsenic during her
ovulation and throughout her pregnancy with me. It was a dis-
appointment when I emerged with such commonplace
deformities. My albinism is the regular pink-eyed variety and
my hump, though pronounced, is not remarkable in size or
shape as humps go. My situation was far too humdrum to be
marketable on the same scale as my brother’s and sisters’. Still,
my parents noted that I had a strong voice and decided I might
be an appropriate shill and talker for the business. A bald
albino hunchback seemed the right enticement toward the eso-
teric talents of the rest of the family. The dwarfism, which was
very apparent by my third birthday, came as a pleasant sur-
prise to the patient pair and increased my value. From the
beginning I slept in the built-in cupboard beneath the sink in
the family living van, and had a collection of exotic sunglasses
to shield my sensitive eyes.
Despite the expensive radium treatments incorporated in his
design, my younger brother, Fortunato, had a close call in
being born to apparent normalcy. That drab state so depressed
my enterprising parents that they immediately prepared to
abandon him on the doorstep of a closed service station as we
passed through Green River, Wyoming, late one night. My
father had actually parked the van for a quick getaway and
had stepped down to help my mother deposit the baby in the
11 12/01/2015 12:06  12
cardboard box on some safe part of the pavement. At that pre-
cise moment the two-week-old baby stared vaguely at my
mother and in a matter of seconds revealed himself as not a
failure at all, but in fact my parents’ masterwork. It was lucky,
so they named him Fortunato. For one reason and another we
always called him Chick.
‘Papa,’ said Iphy. ‘Yes,’ said Elly. They were behind his big
chair, four arms sliding to tangle his neck, two faces framed in
smooth black hair peering at him from either side.
‘What are you up to, girlies?’ He would laugh and put his
magazine down.
‘Tell us how you thought of us,’ they demanded.
I leaned on his knee and looked into his good heavy face.
‘Please, Papa,’ I begged, ‘tell us the Rose Garden.’
He would puff and tease and refuse and we would coax.
Finally Arty would be sitting in his lap with Papa’s arms
around him and Chick would be in Lily’s lap, and I would lean
against Lily’s shoulder while Elly and Iphy sat cross-legged on
the floor with their four arms behind them like Gothic struts
supporting their hunched shoulders, and Al would laugh and
tell the story.
‘It was in Oregon, up in Portland, which they call the Rose
City, though I never got in gear to do anything about it until
a year or so later when we were stuck in Fort Lauderdale.’
He had been restless one day, troubled by business boon-
doggles. He drove up into a park on a hillside and got out for
a walk. ‘You could see for miles from up there. And there was
a big rose garden with arbors and trellises and fountains. The
paths were brick and wound in and out.’ He sat on a step
12 12/01/2015 12:06  13
leading from one terrace to another and stared listlessly at the
experimental roses. ‘It was a test garden, and the colors
were . . . designed. Striped and layered. One color inside the
petal and another color outside.
‘I was mad at Maribelle. She was a pinhead who’d been
with your mother and me for a long while. She was trying to
hold me up for a raise I couldn’t afford.’
The roses started him thinking, how the oddity of them was
beautiful and how that oddity was contrived to give them
value. ‘It just struck me – clear and complete all at once – no
long figuring about it.’ He realised that children could be
designed. ‘And I thought to myself, now that would be a rose
garden worthy of a man’s interest!’
We children would smile and hug him and he would grin
around at us and send the twins for a pot of cocoa from the
drink wagon and me for a bag of popcorn because the red-
haired girls would just throw it out when they finished closing
the concession anyway. And we would all be cozy in the warm
booth of the van, eating popcorn and drinking cocoa and feel-
ing like Papa’s roses.
13 12/01/2015 12:06  14
2
NOTES FOR NOW
The Joy of the Worm
Now Crystal Lil holds the phone receiver clenched against her
long flat tit while she howls up the stairwell, ‘Forty-one!’,
meaning that the red-haired, zit-skinned, defrocked Bene -
dictine in room Number 41 has another phone call and should
come running down the three flights of stairs and take this
intruding burden off Lil’s confused mind. She puts a patented
plastic amplifier against the earpiece when she answers the
phone and turns the knob on her hearing aid to high and
screams, ‘What! What!’ into the mouthpiece until she gets a
number back. That number she will shriek up the mildewed
staircase until someone comes down or she gets tired.
I am never sure how deaf she is. She always hears the ring
of the pay phone in the hall but she may pick up its vibration
in her slipper heels. She is also blind. Her thick, pink plastic
glasses project huge filmy eyes. The blurred red spurts across
her whites like a bad egg.
Forty-one rattles down the stairs and grabs the receiver. He
14 12/01/2015 12:06  15
is in constant communication with acquaintances on the edge
of the clergy, cultivating them in hopes of slinking back into
his collar. His anxious muttering into the phone begins as
Crystal Lil careens back into her room. She leaves her door
open to the hallway.
Her window looks onto the sidewalk in the front of the
building. Her television is on with the volume high. She sits on
the backless kitchen chair, feels around for the large magnify-
ing glass until she finds it on top of the TV, and then leans
close, her nose scant inches from the screen, pumping the lens
in and out before her eyes in a constant struggle to focus an
image among the dots. When I come through the hall I can see
the grey light flickering through the lens onto the eager blind-
ness of her face.
Being called ‘Manager’ explains, for Crystal Lil, why no
bills come to her, why her room is free, and why the small
check arrives for her each month. She is adamant in her duties
as rent collector and enfeebled watchdog. The phone is part of
the deal.
When Crystal Lil howls, ‘Twenty-one!’, which is my room
number, I stop by my door to grab the goat wig from its nail
and jam it onto my bald pate before I take the single flight of
stairs in a series of one-legged hops that is hard on my knees
and ankles but disguises my usual shuffle. I pitch my voice high
and loud, an octave into the falsetto. ‘Thank you!’ I shriek at
her gaping mouth. Her gums are knobby and a faintly irides-
cent green – shiny where the teeth were. I wear the same wig
when I go out. I don’t trust Lil’s blindness or her deafness to
disguise me completely. I am, after all, her daughter. She might
harbor some decayed hormonal recognition of my rhythms
15 12/01/2015 12:06  16
that could penetrate even the wall of refusal her body has
thrown up against the world.
When Lil calls, ‘Thirty-five!’ up the stairwell, I wobble over
to the door and stare one-eyed through the hole drilled next to
the lock. When ‘Thirty-five’ comes hurtling down the staircase,
I get an instant glimpse of her long legs, sometimes flashing
bare through the slits in her startling green kimono. I lean my
head against the door and listen to her strong young voice
shouting at Lil and then dropping to its normal urgency on the
phone. Number Thirty-five is my daughter, Miranda. Miranda
is a popular girl, tall and well shaped. She gets phone calls
every evening before she leaves for work. Miranda does not try
to disguise herself from her grandmother. She believes herself
to be an orphan named Barker. And Crystal Lil herself must
imagine that Miranda is just one more of the gaudy females
who trail their sex like slug slime over the rooms for a month
at a time before moving on. Perhaps the fact that Miranda has
lived here in the big apartment for three years has never
penetrated to Lil. How would she notice that the same ‘Thirty-
five’ always answered the call? They have no bridge to each
other. I am the only link between them and neither of them
knows me. Miranda, though, has far less reason to remember
me than the old woman does.
This is my selfish pleasure, to watch unseen. It wouldn’t give
them pleasure to know me for who I am. It could kill Lily,
bringing back all the rot of the old pain. Or she might hate me
for surviving when all her other treasures have sunk into mold.
As for Miranda, I can’t be sure what it would do to her to
know her real mother. I imagine her bright spine cringing and
slumping and staying that way. She makes a gallant orphan.
16 12/01/2015 12:06  17
We are all three Binewskis, though only Lily claims the
name. I am just ‘Number Twenty-One’ to Crystal Lil. Or
‘McGurk, the cripple in Twenty-one.’ Miranda is more color-
ful. I’ve heard her whispering to friends as they pass the door,
‘The dwarf in Twenty-one,’ or ‘The old albino hunchback in
Twenty-one.’
I rarely need to speak to either of them. Lil puts the rent
checks in a basket just inside her open door and I reach to get
them. On Thursdays I take out the garbage and Lily thinks
nothing of it.
Miranda says hello in the hall. I nod. Occasionally she tries
to chat me up on the stairs. I am distant and brief and escape
as quickly as possible with my heart pounding like a burglar’s.
Lily chose to forget me and I choose not to remind her, but
I am terrified of seeing shame or disgust in my daughter’s face.
It would kill me. So I stalk and tend them both secretly, like a
midnight gardener.
Lillian Hinchcliff Binewski – Crystal Lil – is tall and thin. Her
breasts hang in flaps at her waist but her carriage is still erect.
She had the long-faced, thin-nosed stamp of the Protestant
aristocrat. She never goes out without a hat, usually a tweed
hiker with the brim pulled so far down over her pink glasses
that she is forced to throw her head up and back to catch what
faint light and movement her eyes are willing to deal with.
Draped with a few dead rodents she could slip unsuspected
into cucumber luncheons.
Following Lily is easy. Her long Bostonian body lurches
from one touch point to the next at an impressive clip. She is
suspicious and fearless and her progress is alarming. She never
17 12/01/2015 12:06  18
passes any vertical shape without grabbing it and feeling it to
make sure what it is. Telephone poles, stop signs – she runs at
them, catches hold as though just saved from falling, gives
them an exploratory rub with each hand, and then, tossing her
head back, pushes off toward the next upright shadow that
smears across her eye. Lily also uses humans this way. I have
seen her move through twenty blocks of crowded noontime
sidewalks, swinging from one startled pedestrian to another,
grabbing one by a shoulder, parting in examination, while
stretching out an arm to snatch at the breasts of the next one
in her path. When someone takes offense, snaps or swears or
pushes her away, she reels only momentarily before the next
body presents itself and she hurtles on, using body after body
as handholds through the air.
I toddle along behind. Twenty feet between us is complete
protection from her noticing. It intrigues me to see people
pause and stare after her as she lunges on her desperate way.
Some wide-minded type with a text-book under his arm, sur-
prised at his own stifled impulse to backhand her for using him
as a trapeze, a little ashamed, gawks in her wake. Then he
turns and sees me, humping along and looking directly into his
eyes. The double image scares him. My mother, on the street
alone, can be written off with the gentle oddities of rambling
mumblers, drunks and beggars, but when I come twenty feet
behind, there is an ice moment. Even the smug feel it. They go
home and tell their wives that the streets of Portland are filled
with weirdos. Their dreams weave a bent linkage between the
wild old woman and the hunchbacked dwarf. Or they think
we are residents of an institutional halfway house, or that the
circus is in town.
18 12/01/2015 12:06  19
A few times a week, apparently convinced that she is in
Boston, Crystal Lil struggles up the hill to a big house on Vista
Avenue. She runs at the wrought-iron fence, galloping her
hands along it, searching for something. Then she stands with
her mouth hanging open, an elastic strand of spittle bridging
her jaws, and waits on the sidewalk in front of the door.
Probably she can’t actually make out the shape of the dormer
windows, but she waves at them. Occasionally she grabs a
pedestrian and shouts, ‘I was born there! In the Rose Room!
Mama gave us tea in the solarium!’ When her captive escapes,
she lapses into murmuring. She doesn’t register that the
Georgian brick is now an expensive condominium. She waits
for some old dog or servant to wander out and discover her
with tears of joy, the prodigal come home after all these years.
Maybe she dreams she’ll be taken in and cosseted by her own
mother, tucked up cozy in a virgin bed. Only the slim profes-
sional men go in and out, sidestepping her skillfully. Eventually
she wanders back down the hill to her room on Kearney
Street.
Crystal Lil, her door propped open, sits in front of the televi-
sion with a pan in her lap, a brown bag at her feet. She takes
long green beans out of the bag and snaps them into inch-long
chunks that drop into the pan. I pause on the stairs, marveling
at how she came by those green beans.
Lillian in the supermarket, terrified and angry, her long hands
running over shelves, knocking down cans, grabbing at last a
box and muttering, reaches out to grab an innocent shopper,
thrusts the box into the woman’s face, shrieking. ‘What is this!
19 12/01/2015 12:06  20
Tell me what this is!,’ until the shopper, in irritated charity,
says, ‘Cornflakes,’ and shakes loose.
Lily in summer, with the street dirt rising into the thickening
heat, lifts her window and shoves two grimy geraniums from
the inside of the window to the outer sill. Later that afternoon,
Crystal Lil rushes down the sidewalk, grabbing every moving
human by the collar, caterwauling, ‘Thief! Little bastards! Stole
my plants! Thief!’ And sure enough the pots are gone, only
two faint rings left in the dirt on the sill.
Jingle of keys. High-pitched burbling in the hall. Lillian deliv-
ering the mail. She is supposed to leave it on the table in the
downstairs hall. Or, at most, slip it under the doors. Sometimes
she uses it as an excuse to come into the rooms.
Once Miranda, frenzied on the floor with her lover, did not
answer Lil’s knock. The two, beneath a sheet in the brick heat
of summer, sweating into each other, lay still, hushed them-
selves, and were shocked when the door opened and Crystal
Lil staggered in, touching walls, grabbing tables, making her
way to the heaped sheet itself, where it tented in the middle of
the floor, patting the edges, barely missing the tangled legs of
the lovers, who lay silent, watching her greedy investigation.
After making a complete round of the room she found the
table again, put the envelopes on it, and groped her way out,
closing and locking the door. Miranda told me this when she
was trying to befriend me in the hall, trying to talk me into
posing for her drawings.
Miranda seems preoccupied with deformity. She has lured
the fat man from the corner newsstand up to her rooms several
20 12/01/2015 12:06  21
times to model for her. There is no obvious reason for such
a fascination in her own life, even if her living does depend
on that tiny irregularity of hers. She is strong and straight.
Her spine and legs are as long as history. It may be that the
impressions of her infancy are caught somehow in the pulp of
her eyes, luring her. Or there may be some hooked structure in
her cells that twists her toward all that the world calls
freakish.
Miranda is hard to follow. Her stride is as long as Crystal Lil’s
but without the detours and distractions. She is also alert and
mine is not an inconspicuous figure. I usually lose her within
a few blocks. Either she leaves me choking in the dust or I have
to duck and hide from her swiveling face. I’ve managed to
follow her all the way to work twice in the three years she has
lived in this building.
One evening, leaving the radio station, where I had worked
later than usual, I saw her at an intersection. She was wearing
dark green, a cocktail dress and jacket. She wears simple
clothes to her classes at the art school so I was struck by the
difference. Her makeup was dramatic and her body moved
strangely, unfamiliarly in high-heeled sandals with only thin
gold chains to keep them on. I followed her without thinking
about it. Of course I would lose her but I took pleasure in the
eyes of men on her body. She was apparently going to work.
I trailed along all the way down to the Glass House Club. She
was slower in her high heels. I watched her pick up an enve-
lope from the doorman. She went around to the employees’
entrance and I slipped into the club itself.
21 12/01/2015 12:06  22
The ceiling was an enormous mosaic of mirrors. The walls
and carpet were dark. Small islands of light from the table
lamps fractured and multiplied in the reflections. The room
was large and crowded. There were a few women, but mostly
men, several hundred, the tables filled, and the aisles between
filled with people standing with glasses in their hands.
I stayed at the back of the room, slid onto a chair against
the wall, and only stood up for the show.
A very thin girl was first, her skin tight to her bones with as
little muscle intruding as I’ve ever seen on someone who could
still sit up. She pranced around in a gauze veil and undid a few
beads as the band concentrated on their bass line. The finale of
her act was to pull a comb out of her tightly rolled hair and let
it fall shimmering pale down her back, give it a shake, and
turn around so we could see that it hung down to the floor
(whistles). Then she ground her hips around until she faced us
and undid the bead that held her G-string in place. Her pubic
hair began to unroll in the same way, a crisp version of her
head hair (table pounding), until a soft cloud of nearly white
hair billowed out from her crotch, waving all the way down to
her knees, the crotch hair and head hair blending. I wondered
if she had to depilate the rest of her body. The bald man was
chanting into the microphone, ‘Yes, it’s real, folks, give it a tug
there, Denise. We’d let you come up on stage and pull the little
lady’s hair for yourselves, boys, just to verify it’s genuine, but
state law forbids, and you’ve got to admit, a few souvenir
hunters could put poor Denise out of business.’ She swayed in
her hips and the long hair flicked from side to side. ‘How do
you find her in there? I want to know?’ and Denise sauntered
smiling offstage, more or less to the beat.
22 12/01/2015 12:06  23
Paulette, the pre-transsexual, was beautiful and slender,
with perfect breasts. Paulette’s act flourished until the removal
of her G-string revealed a shriveled penis and scrotum. The
boos drowned the bald man’s announcement that Paulette
would be leaving for Tangier the following month and would
return in December as a real girl.
Miranda was last. The band went steamy and grinding.
She came out in long white satin. My dove. My eyes hurt for
her, a scorch along the nerve string to the brain. The men in
front of me stood up, leaning forward, slapping each other’s
shoulders and sending out the high-pitched long-toned
soooooo-eeeeee’s of pig callers. I stepped on my own hands
getting up onto the table so I could see. Her long arms were
lifted, her hair snapped with light. A young blonde in silver at
a table just ahead of me glowered at the backs of the men who
were with her as they leaned toward the stage. Miranda with
the Binewski cheekbones, the Mongol eyes. Wide-mouthed
Miranda, the dancer on long legs. The chill wash of joy hit
me: my daughter. She was good. Not great, but good. What’s
bred in the bones, when you have bones, comes through. And
they looked at her, watched her, wanted to squirt her full of
baby juice.
Electra and Iphigenia were high-powered performers, they
wrung your heart, cramped your brain, brought silence on
thousands for half an hour at a time. And the crowds that
watched Arturo were funneled out of themselves, pumped
into the reservoir of his will. Though I am her mother, I knew
that Miranda’s little act, her clever little strip with its dignity
and timing, was paltry compared to the skill and power I had
watched in my other loved ones. But it was strange and
23 12/01/2015 12:06  24
different to me, watching these people watching her. Because
they thought she was pretty, because they thought it would be
good to grab her ass and pump jizz into her. Their bodies
lifted up, clean and simple to her in the clear, unconscious
awareness of each of their cells’ sensing that she would grunt
out strong young.
She was down to her G-string with the fluffy lace plume on
her rump, she had her thumbs hooked in it, looking over her
shoulder at the crowd, she was waving her ass in a slow sem-
aphore of invitation. The frowning blonde at the table had her
chin in her hand. The men were hooting and grunting and
watching with smiles. I held my breath, blinked, and she pulled
the plume down, unsnapped the G-string and whipped it off
with a flourish, waving her ass still, her head tipped up and an
unmistakable giggle bubbling out of her as she revealed the
thin, curling tail that jutted out from the end of her spine and
bounced just above her round buttocks.
The second time – the last time – I simply followed Miranda
to work. I walked out the door at Kearney Street fifteen sec-
onds behind her and tagged her easily enough through a heavy
rain. She never looked out from under her umbrella until she
stamped her boots at the back door of the Glass House. I went
in the front entrance and left my umbrella in a glass stand. I
moved carefully toward one wall and slid along until I was
fairly near the curtained stage at the end of the room.
There was a commotion in front of the stage. A big tuxe-
doed man with a glistening bald head was giving orders in a
harsh whisper. I wasn’t tall enough to see who he was speak-
ing to.
24 12/01/2015 12:06  25
Suddenly he jumped onto the stage. There was a crash from
the drummer. A cone of light appeared around the bald man.
There were whistles in the crowd, laughter, sporadic hand-
clapping.
‘Gentlemen and jokers! Lively ladies!’ The bald man stuck
his long-corded microphone between his legs and wiggled its
silver knob. The crowd chuckled. ‘The Glass House proudly
presents its Tuesday-night feature! On Stage Topless Audi tions!
Any member of the audience is welcome to step up to the stage
at this time and try out for a topless position here at the Glass
House – with the Glass House orchestra! Under authentic con-
ditions! A ten-dollar prize to each and every contestant! Ladies
and gentlemen, step up and test your talent! . . . And here they
come folks! . . . ’ A scramble of flesh hit the stage. The crowd
cheered, hissed, whistled, laughed. Five bodies, bare from the
waist up, snarled around the bald man and then tapered out in
a line facing the audience. I began to sweat. A fat woman with
her blouse hanging from the waist of her skirt stood nearest to
me, blinking at the audience. Her breasts had fallen, thick and
long, mixing with the rolls of fat that hung puffily over her
belly. Her arms had the same texture and shape as her breasts
and belly. She crossed her arms over her chest in an instant of
shyness and then let them drop, forgetting.
Two middle-aged men wore matching red plastic jeans with
broad leather belts strapping their adjacent legs together. Their
thin white arms wrapped around each other’s shoulders and
matching ostrich plumes curled up out of their thinning hair.
Their raddled faces wrinkled unnervingly beneath an expert
Oriental makeup, and their bone-riding nipples were enlarged
and glowing with red gel.
25 12/01/2015 12:06  26
A fat man in a glitter jockstrap had little eyes flicking in his
pillow-creased face, as his booze buddies belched his name in
unison from the front tables.
And the startled young girl was blushing beneath her awk-
ward Pan-Cake, her lips drawn lush, her scared eyes outlined
in black, her tiny breasts thrust out on her long, prominent
ribs. She wore her lewdest panties and a pair of pirate boots,
but she wasn’t drunk like the rest. She must have thought she
was actually auditioning for a job here.
A bear baiting. The band is brassy spunk. The bald master
of ceremonies spanks his hands at the edge of the stage and
hollers into the mike as the line pumps and jiggles. I lean my
chin on the stage itself, watching the wave of flesh reveal a sur-
prise of blurred nipple every third beat as the fat woman
throws her shoulders forward to toss her tits out of their usual
resting place beside her sagging navel.
The young girl tries to look professional in the confusion of
wobbling red thighs and waving ostrich and the fat man’s
patch of chest hair. Confusion is burning her. She knows she
has been taken, and has wandered into the wrong and maybe
the worst place.
The noise is suffocating and I have to squint to see in the
strange light. Then cold air hits my scalp and a hand is thump-
ing my hump in an investigative way. ‘You forgot one!’ is the
shriek. My wig is dangling high above my head in a wavering
hand. My dark glasses are snatched away and the light sears
in at me.
The bald man is staring into my eyes as big hands lift me,
my own mouth opening though silent and the music beats into
my face and the pinching, bruising fingers trap my jerking
26 12/01/2015 12:06  27
arms and legs and breath. There is a shout – many-voiced –
and the bald man is coming toward me with a smile and the
flabby woman is grabbing at my coat and yanking at the but-
tons and shrieking, ‘Little pink eyes!’ and the red pants hop
toward me, their crotches bobbling at my eye level, the thick
buckles that hold them threatening to kneel in my face. My
coat is being pulled away, my big blouse, which is cut with
deep darts for my hump and hangs flat to my knees in front,
tears in an explosion of buttons that ricochet around the stage
without sound because there is no room in this big sound for
the little sounds of buttons hitting.
They have come to my chest harness now, thick strips of
elastic stretched above the hump and below it to hold a solid
band across my ragged dugs and their grey nipples. The bald
man is talking to me in a confidential way without his micro-
phone and I feel the movement of his lips and the hot wet of
his breath in my ear but I cannot hear him as the harness slides
off, scraping my hump, raking my ears, blinding me for a
second. I kick as they lift me in the air to pull off my elastic-
waisted skirt and wave me upward to the yellow spotlight and
bring me down with my shoes hitting the stage and my white
underskirt riding up over my crouching knees.
I am standing alone in the light and the big bodies have
fallen back from me. The college girl, dumbfounded, is still
pumping away with her mouth open, her knees and arms still
following an odd order to dance, as her mind is pummeled by
what I am, and what they have done to me, and wondering
if I am in on it. The crowd is standing up and beating the
tables. The laughter is fierce and the band is loud, but barely
loud enough, as I lift my thin arms and waggle my huge
27 12/01/2015 12:06  28
hands and bob to the light, and my knees begin to shift in
what my body calls dance, waving my hump at the crowd, the
light warming my scalp and burning into my unprotected
eyes. My big shoes thump at the ends of my little legs, and I
am proud with my arrow tits flapping toward my knees, and
the fat lady standing on my coat is staring, with spittle across
her cheek, and the fat man with his electric G-string pumping
at his invisible crotch and laughing, and the shouts coming
up, ‘Christ! It’s real!’ The twisting of my hump feels good
against the warm air and the sweat of my bald head runs
down into my bald eyes and stings with brightness and the
spirit of the waggling hump moves over the stage and catches
red pants, hairy bellies, and all, while I stamp on my button-
less blouse, slide on the tangled elastic harness, and open my
near-blind eyes wide so they can see that there is true pink
there – the raw albino eye in the lashless sockets – and it is
good. How proud I am, dancing in the air full of eyes rubbing
at me uncovered, unable to look away because of what I am.
Those poor hoptoads behind me are silent. I’ve conquered
them. They thought to use and shame me but I win out by
nature, because a true freak cannot be made. A true freak
must be born.
There wasn’t any graceful way to end it. The band stopped,
the bald man shouted, ‘Let’s give ’em a hand, folks.’ There was
a surge of catcalls. We all scrambled around for our clothes,
clutching them to our chests as we hurried down. Of course
there was no dressing room. The restroom was on the other
side of the club, so we huddled down in front of the stage tug-
ging awkwardly into clothes. I slid my blouse on inside-out, as
28 12/01/2015 12:06  29
I discovered later, put on my coat and wig and glasses imme-
diately, and stuffed the chest harness into a pocket.
The bald man was doling out five-dollar bills like stale
cookies. He handed two to me. The shame had already started
icing up my valves, and those five-dollar bills were the clinch-
ers. It had been a long time since I had blushed, not since
Arturo, maybe. But the hot blood scorched me then.
‘What’s your name? Can we get you to come down regu-
larly for audition nights? That’s a lot of potential you’ve got.
We could work up a nice set using you. We’d up the ante a bit,
make it twenty bucks for a turn. We do two auditions a night
between the regular acts. You could pick up an easy forty.’ He
was being perfectly pleasant about it. My wig wasn’t fitting
and I couldn’t make out why. I kept pulling at it until I noticed
that it was on backward. I turned it around and made for the
door. Sidling through the crowd, I crammed my brain with
static to prevent myself from hearing what they were saying.
Run hide quick, I thought, scuttling down the street.
I paced and thumped up and down my room all night. I
couldn’t lie down at all for fear of Arturo and Papa and my
own terrible pride.
29 12/01/2015 12:06  30
3
NOTES FOR NOW
Meltdown, Diving into Teacups
from the Thirteenth Floor, and Other
Stimulating Experiences
Miranda is talking on the phone as I come in from work. She
lolls against the wall, one long bare leg jutting out through her
green kimono. She has a towel turbaned over her fresh-washed
hair and she hangs up the receiver as I close the door behind me.
‘Hi. Got time to come up for tea?’
‘No. Thank you.’
Miranda is a student at the Art Institute. Her aim is to illus-
trate medical texts. She wants me to pose for her drawings. I
never accept her offers of tea. I proceed toward the stairs while
scrabbling to hang on to my books and papers. She purses her
mouth elaborately.
With a grip on the banister and one foot on the first step I
can’t keep from pausing, from looking at her. She drops her
lids halfway and eyes me in a deliberately speculative fashion.
A small glitch in my gizzard warns me that Arturo used his
30 12/01/2015 12:06  31
eyes this way. His eyes were, like hers, long, slanted almond
shapes, though of course Arty didn’t have the lashes and brows
that Miranda does.
Smiling weakly – does she know or is this just her usual badg-
ering revenge when I refuse her invitations? – I climb the stairs
with her eyes following me.
Olympia Binewski, aka Hopalong McGurk, the Radio
Story Lady, is hunched over a book in the glass-walled record-
ing booth at Radio KBNK, Portland. The molasses voice that
has earned her living for decades pours into the sponge ear of
the microphone and is transformed into silent, pulsing waves
that radiate over a hundred miles. She is deep in a dramatic
rendition of that speculative classic ‘Pit Might.’
In the story the mind-souls of three theoretical physicists
find themselves reincarnated (after dying hideously during
their search for Schrödinger’s demon cat) in the bodies of itch
mites inhabiting the pubic hair of a particularly obtuse Los
Angeles policeman.
McGurk’s eyes twitch up from the book regularly to check
the engineer on the other side of the soundproof glass. He
watches meters and the clock. He signals two minutes left and
McGurk storms into the climax. The theme music comes up
and McGurk signs off, ‘Until tomorrow . . . ’ Falling back from
the microphone, McGurk stretches to ease the ache in her neck
and looks through the glass.
Miranda is smiling in the engineer’s booth. McGurk drops
the book onto the floor instead of into her briefcase. The engi-
neer is propped on the control panel sporting a paralytic grin,
his eyes clamped on Miranda’s thorax.
31 12/01/2015 12:06  32
Miranda waves and Hoppy McG. nods, forgetting to put
any expression on her face.
I, Hoppy-Olympia, the invisible mom, sit frozen, watching
as the engineer talks to Miranda. His hands in the air make
typing motions and jerk a thumb in my direction. Miranda
nods. The engineer turns to me, walking two fingers in the air.
They slip away through the door.
The engineer gives Miranda a tour of the station while I
type up the royalty credit for that day’s program. My skull
oozes sweat. A vacancy behind my eyes makes me nauseated.
What is wrong? Why is she here? Why would she suddenly
appear at the workplace of a neighbor who barely acknowl-
edges her ‘Good mornings’ in the hall? Could that senile slut
of a nun have broken her word after all these years and told
the girl the truth?
I’m in the front office buttoning my coat when they come
back. I’ve just remembered reasons she might be in this radio
station that have nothing to do with me. She is visiting a
friend, applying for a job, or taping an interview as guest strip-
per on the Night Train Hour. It is coincidence, I decide, and I
am getting old and batty, thinking the universe revolves
around me.
‘I’m taking you to lunch,’ she chirps at me, as though we did
this all the time. I slide into the elevator and lean against the
back wall. She follows me, saying, ‘Thank you so much,’ as the
doors snuff out the engineer’s anxious grin.
Miranda turns her brights full on me. ‘I hope you’ll excuse
me showing up here. I knew where to find you because I
listen to your program. I recognized your voice when I first
heard you talking to Looney Lil in the hall. I knocked on your
32 12/01/2015 12:06  33
door this morning but you’d already gone. I need to talk to
you.’
The phrase ricochets in my skull. ‘Need to talk.’ All these
years of silence. I have intended, and do intend, to dog
Miranda until my dying day, but I never meant to talk to her.
My heart tries to climb out through my ears. She pinks up –
flustered at what must be a mild glare behind my blue lenses.
The elevator gapes in front of us and I dart through the slow
legs of the lobby loiterers and into the faster legs of the midday
sidewalk. I feel her behind me, threading the crowd after me,
shortening her stride to accommodate me, coming up beside
me at the corner.
Sucking air noisily, I lean forward to discourage conversa-
tion. She is wearing dark green, her heels bouncing impatiently
beside me. There is no pleasure in having her so close. What
does she want?
‘How about the grill at the Via Veneto? They do a lunch
buffet. Miss McGurk?’
I can’t look at her. I try to civilize my voice. ‘I don’t eat
lunch.’
The light changes, trapping us on an island in the wide
street. The cars swarm around us in a sea of stink. She’s caught
me on this concrete knob and her harpoon is suddenly
revealed, her eyes, her words ripping out of her. ‘Look, forget
that you don’t know me. There are two things. First, you’ve
got to model for me.’ Her sweet-simp guise is gone. She is
green fire above Binewski cheekbones. She means to convince
me. The heat of her intention has my throat melting. I want to
hold her face in my hands and push her strange hair back from
her Binewski forehead. The faces behind the windshields save
33 12/01/2015 12:06  34
me. A Binewski never disintegrates in front of the ticket
holders.
She is burning away at me, talking fast, her eyes demanding.
The anatomy competition is coming up. She had already won
two years in a row. The judges will be reluctant to give it to her
again. She needs something special, something hot . . . Art
school. She is talking art school and she is talking to me. These
two facts amaze me.
‘The first year I went to LoPrinzi’s gym and did a series on
a body builder. Technical, illustrative, and predictable. Last
year I went to the medical school and did a flayed, emaciated
cadaver. Classic and totally predictable. I’ve got to show more
than a technician’s skills this time. I’ve got to rock them. I’ve
got to yank their hearts out.’
Her urgency has my stomach cringing, trying to crawl down
my leg. Is this an accident? Is it coincidence that she comes to
me? All this time of silent watching, my secret care. My anony-
mous arm holding the invisible umbrella. Could she know? Is
this her way of opening me? Slipping in like the knife that
unlocks the oyster? Or does some pulse in her bones, some
twist in her genetic coil, lean toward me in a blind craving?
The light changes.
‘Look, there’s a bus bench. Come sit a minute.’ She sails
past revving machines in the intersection, collapses onto the
bench and waves me up beside her as she yanks a sheaf of
papers from her bag.
‘Reduced copies. You don’t get the full effect but you can
see that I’m serious.’
The top sheet shows a hip socket, lushly washed, the hard
lines impatient and powerful. The second sheet is exposed
34 12/01/2015 12:06  35
abdominal muscle, fiercely striated. Then come loving portraits
of callused arthritic hands and bunion-twisted feet, a flayed
jaw, a joyous nude of the blobby news vendor from the corner.
He is hunched on a stool, pudgy hands propped on knees like
sagging pumpkins, his acorn head thrown back in surprise on
what passes for a neck. I don’t understand the drawings, or
why they move me. I want to cry, loud and wet with the pain
of love. The drawings are as mysterious to me as the school
report cards that the Reverend Mother mailed dutifully every
few months. No Binewski ever made pictures. I never had a
report card. But I saved Miranda’s, stacked and wrapped with
a rubber band in the biggest of the old trunks.
Her long hand taps at the dangling ink scrotum, the nearly
invisible penis of the news vendor. ‘Characteristic of the fat-
storing pattern in males,’ she’s saying, ‘the belly seems to
swallow the penis from the roots up, literally shortening
it . . . ’
‘Disgusting!’ snaps a voice behind me.
‘Fuck off!’ yells Miranda. The critic sniffs away toward the
corner. Just a passerby. Miranda lays an arm over my hump
to protect me. Pointing at the line depicting a rumpled but-
tock drooping from the stool, she giggles. ‘One of my teachers
says I draw like a mass murderer. I hate that ditsy crap,
though. Inchy little lines like the hesitation cuts on a suicide’s
wrist.’
I loll in molten idiocy. All this time of not speaking I had fig-
ured her for silly, for toad-brained, because she is so near
normal. All the years of watching have taught me nothing, and
I laugh. Leaning back against her arm, tipping my head as the
fat man’s head tips, laughing voicelessly and weak.
35 12/01/2015 12:06  36
She grins at me. ‘That one works, doesn’t it?’
I’m laughing despite myself. ‘You seem such a nice girl, too.’
‘Ho!’ she barks. ‘Don’t be deceived. I’ve got a tail.’
Something in my face stops her. Her face is suddenly careful.
‘That’s the other thing I want to talk to you about.’ She
watches me. ‘There’s a story, naturally a long one. But the first
and last is that I was born with a tail, like a lot of people, but
I didn’t get it nipped off when I was a baby. I still have it. It’s
not a big tail, less than a foot long. But most people don’t have
any bone in their tails. Mine is actually an extended spur of my
spine. That’s why I always wear skirts.’
I am helpless, pinned by her arm and her eyes until she
looks away.
‘It’s going to rain,’ she says. The air is heavy and grey. ‘Want
to go? Come up to my place? I’ll give you lunch and draw you
and bend your ear and beg advice.’
‘O.K., of course.’ I scrabble numbly for my briefcase.
She jounces up, arms wheeling against the sky. ‘All right.’
I would die to make her smile that way, would whittle my
fingers and toes away if only it could make her long Binewski
eyes light this way forever. I jump down to the pavement and
dive after her through the swirling bodies. Her dark drawings
are still in my fist. I stuff them into my briefcase with a pang.
Hide them.
Turning the corner into our block Miranda skips once to
keep in step. Across the street, high up in the third-story gable
of the wood Victorian, a painter leaning off his scaffold to
reach the trim watches us, freezing one hand to the wall, his
brush hand poised against the blue air.
Am I contaminating her? Polluting my silence? Obliterating
36 12/01/2015 12:06  37
my anonymity? Dangling the ax of my identity over her whole
idea of herself?
‘You turn high RPMs,’ she says, double-stepping beside me.
‘Slightly more than two to my one. But’ – she laughs once, a
fox bark against the mist – ‘I’m catching on.’ My blankness
shows and she tosses her shoulders and arms in a classic
Binewski apology. ‘Strides,’ she says.
Our old house, with its front steps propped like elbows on
the sidewalk, looks warm for once. The bottom front win-
dows, Lil’s, show a yellow glow. The fourth floor front,
otherwise known as Number 41, or The Attic, is lit. Its small
dusty window shields the Benedictine on his bed in solitary
combat with the rule book. Miranda’s windows, third floor
front, are white above the blank-eyed vacant room below her.
My room on the second floor is at the back, invisible. My view
is the dust-blind rear of the warehouse that squats across the
alley. Just below my window, like an Oriental pond, the flat tar
roof of the square garage is filled with water and moss because
of blocked drains.
Lil is standing at attention in her doorway as we enter. Her
old face tilts back to stare at our shadows. ‘Who is it?’ she
shrieks.
‘Thirty-one,’ yells Miranda. Then louder, ‘Thirty-one!’ and
Lil steps back to let us pass.
Miranda talks me past my room. I’m ready to panic and
quit, dodge in through my door and apologize as I close her
out. She is telling me we should go for walks together, that she
often has to dance with shorter people and has no trouble
adjusting the length of her stride.
It’s been three years since I saw her rooms. Before she came
37 12/01/2015 12:06  38
from the train station, still smelling of nuns, I cleaned. It took
days, sponging the ceilings, the green wallpaper with its huge
white roses like fetal aliens. These were her rooms long before
she came here. The first time I visited the building with the fas-
tidiously courteous agent, the big front room, twenty by forty
feet, with its tall windows in a row, was marked for her. The
bedroom was more normal. The windowless bathroom was
claustrophobic. The kitchen was familiar, as though it had
been surgically transplanted from a trailer house.
I scrubbed windows and woodwork and the endless cup-
boards built into the walls. I pounded and vacuumed the heavy
stuffed furniture. Everything normal for the almost normal
girl.
She was so tall, I thought, she wouldn’t mind the distance
to the ceilings. With such long arms, I thought, she will like the
big room to stretch in.
The day she arrived I stayed close to my spyhole all morn-
ing. It was nearly noon when she came, thundering with two
other students up the stairs and past the door where my eye
was fixed to the hole.
‘You got the place free. Who cares what it looks like,’ came
a young voice. The jumbled baggage and bodies clattered
upward. My ear flattened to the door, trying to sift out which
voice was Miranda’s. If she hated the house, the smells, the
soggy slump of the neighborhood, what would I do?
She didn’t have much. The three carried all she owned up
the stairs in that one trip. All the evidence of her eighteen years
on the planet. Twenty minutes later they rushed down again,
to register for classes at the art school.
Now beside me in the gravy-dark hall she pushes the door
38 12/01/2015 12:06  39
away from her, open, a soft white light sweeps out to swallow
me. Her shadow blinks across me as she disappears into the
light.
The room is gauze-bright from the four tall windows. The
light comes through thin white curtains, cool onto grey walls,
simple onto the dark gleam of the bare wood floor.
She tosses her purse, drops her sea-green coat, abandons her
tall heels in the middle of the empty floor.
‘There used to be furniture,’ I say in shock. Where does she
sit? eat? sleep? I thought I had provided for her.
‘It was awful.’ She pauses, arms half cocked above her head,
pulling at her sweater. She disappears in a wrestling frenzy,
reappears breathless, hurling the sweater at a distant empty
corner. ‘It’s all scattered in other rooms in the building.’
The room is bare. Not a stick. Not a single nail protrudes
from the grey walls. Only her clothes trail across the black
floor like a love romp. Looking rail-thin in the blouse and
skirt, she jerks open a white door hiding canvas chairs folded
neatly against the back of the closet. A thin-legged folding
table. She whips them out and up, furnishing the place. ‘Wait
till you see my tea cabinet,’ she says, slapping the swaying loop
of canvas meant to cradle an ass. ‘I’ve been collecting for
weeks.’ Through another white door to the tiny kitchen stands
the old refrigerator, no taller than I am.
‘Vine leaves.’ She snatches out jars and plastic dishes.
‘Artichoke hearts. Do you like olives?’
The kettle is on the stove, blue flame curling its bottom. She
reaches, her long body high above me and her ribs sliding
under thin cloth, upward. ‘Strawberry, jasmine, mint.’ Tea
boxes rain onto the counter. ‘This is all for you.’ She is huge.
39 12/01/2015 12:06  40
Her heat beats through the inch of air between us. ‘I have no
idea what you like so I’ve been on the watch for anything
really special. Just in case you ever came to visit. Now I’m
going to get you a dressing gown and you can change in the
bathroom.’
The dream lasts only an instant, but in it I have fallen into
the cat cage and the tigers are sliding by me, brushing their
whole hot length against me. But it is this Miranda, moving
liquid past me and out into the big room, miraculously whisk-
ing her dropped belongings out of sight, pulling out white
painted drawers and doors, allowing glimpses of hidden para-
phernalia as she skates, chattering about food, again and again
to the resurrected table suddenly crowded with ominous del-
icacies heaped in small bowls.
A final armload slides onto the table, sketch pads, pencils,
a sinister-looking camera. Then she takes half a step back and
looks at me through half-closed eyes. A flicker of her father’s
deliberate calculation passes across her face. An ice knife sticks
in my chest.
‘It’s not cold in here, is it?’ she asks.
‘No.’
‘Good.’ She moves to the drawers in the wall. ‘I’ll do some
photos first, while you’re fresh, and then sketch until you get
tired or fed up.’ She flips her voice over her shoulder while
bent, rummaging to avoid acknowledging my jitter of fear. She
is holding me to my promise.
‘The photos will make it easier on you. It hurts to hold a
pose for a long time.’
She presents me with a green pajama top and, as I grasp it,
she swings open the bathroom door, flicks the light switch,
40 12/01/2015 12:06  41
saying, ‘There are hooks on the door for your clothes . . .
whoops! There’s the kettle boiling.’
In the tall bathroom I stand staring at the door. I can hear
her moving on the other side. The pajama top trails on the
floor beside me and she is whistling in the kitchen. Suddenly
the staggering love bursts away from me like milk from a
smashed glass. She is manipulating me. Pushing me around as
though I were nothing but a mobile stomach like the news
vendor. She fancies she has me under control. Red anger blis-
ters my guts. She doesn’t see me at all. She doesn’t know who
she’s dealing with. I am the watcher, the mover, the maker. She
is just like her father, casually, carelessly enslaving me with my
love. She doesn’t know the powers that keep me here. She
thinks it’s her charm and guile.
‘Tea’s ready,’ she calls.
I answer thinly, ‘Coming,’ but whirl in a frenzy, shoving the
grit of the green pajama into my mouth and biting down to
keep from bellowing.
Her drawing is suddenly in front of me, framed and glassed
on the grey wall beside the sink. The darkness is ink and the
eyes and teeth come out of the dark and the screaming chicken
is bulging vainly away, caught as the teeth close tearing into
exploding feathers and black blood behind its desperate skull.
Drawn with a bullwhip at thirty paces. Quietly, in the white at
the bottom, her penciled hand has scrawled ‘ – by
M. Barker.’
I take off my clothes. I can’t reach the hooks on the door. I
drape the clothes over the toilet tank, drop the wig on top, and
stand my shoes on the floor beside it. The pajama top hangs to
my ankles.
41 12/01/2015 12:06  42
I sit. She draws. Wearing only my blue glasses I am not cold
but my skin rises against exposure, rough as a cow’s tongue.
The cups steam upward into the pale air. Our island is the size
of two canvas chairs and a small cluttered table. We are
marooned in the breathing bareness of the room. Darkness
rolls out around us, seeping into the distant softness of the grey
walls. The curtains shift slowly in their own whiteness, as
though the light pouring through them has a frail, moving
substance.
She is gnawing an olive pit and frowning at the sketch pad
in her lap. The wild hair torching out of the edges of her face
mesmerizes me. The millions of hairs in a dozen smoldering
tones are as alien as her size, the outrageous length of her. My
mother, Lillian, is seventy inches high. I am thirty-six inches
high.
‘How tall are you Miranda?’
She looks up to focus on my chin, frowning, and says, ‘Six
feet,’ mechanically before her eyes twitch back to the paper in
front of her.
Watching her work is comfortable. I feel invisible again, as
though she had never spoken to me beyond ‘Good morning.’
She is not interested in my identity. She doesn’t notice it. Her
eyes flick impatiently at me for a fast fix – a regenerative fusing
of the image on her retina, the model she inflicts on the paper.
I am merely a utensil, a temporary topic for the eternal dis-
cussion between her long eye and her deliberate hand.
Downstairs in the first floor front, Crystal Lil sits sliding the
magnifying glass back and forth in search of the focal point.
The walls around her are slathered with the crumpled glitter
of the old carny posters. A dozen glossy young Lilys smile,
42 12/01/2015 12:06  43
kick, and reach for the curving gold name, ‘Crystal Lily,’ that
arches against midway blue above her. Dressed in white, a
paper Lil arches her back against a blue-green sky spangled
with stars. Strips of arsenic-green wallpaper peep between the
posters.
In my room everything is just as I found it when I moved in.
The stuffed furniture molders against the cabbage wallpaper.
My real life sits in boxes and suitcases behind cupboard doors.
My real bed is not the creaking acre of springs in the corner,
but the dark nest of blankets on the floor of the cupboard
beneath the kitchen sink.
Miranda rips out the  she has been working on and
absently sails it over her shoulder while she eyes a jar bristling
with pens. The  settles, belly up on the dark floor, as she
begins dashing ink at a fresh sheet of paper.
‘What made you,’ clearing my throat, ‘decide to be an
artist?’
Her eyes flick at my feet under frowning brows. ‘No, no. A
medical illustrator. For textbooks and manuals . . . ’ Her
tongue sneaks out at a corner of her mouth as she slaps stroke
after vicious stroke onto the defenseless . ‘See, photo-
graphs can be confusing. A drawing can be more specific and
informative. It gets pretty red in there. Pretty hot and thick.
But the bastards claim I’m undisciplined, too flashy . . . ’
Whatever she is doing to the innocent sheet has nothing to do
with me. She rips it out and drops it, starting immediately on
the  beneath.
‘There’s something I want to talk to you about.’ She tries to
make it casual.
The bite of fear – ‘She knows!’ – grabs my chest and then
43 12/01/2015 12:06  44
relaxes. No. I’ve been sitting here bald and naked for an hour.
Too late for that.
She stops chewing her thumb and asks, ‘Have you ever been
to the Glass House?’ At my nod she drops the pen, picks up
her tame tool, the pencil, and begins work on a fresh sheet of
paper.
‘Then you know,’ eyes on paper, ‘that the dancers, all of
us, aren’t there for our dancing skills or even our looks,
but . . . ’ rubbing her thumb vigorously across the ,
‘because we each have something odd. We call them our
specialities.
‘What the Glass House calls “Exotic Features” are all in the
back room. You know. Separate cover charges for private
shows and private parties. Blondes with Dobermans. Group
acts. They stage requests, too, for fancy prices. There are one-
way mirrors in the peeper booths and special insurance policies
for domination or S&M. That’s where the girls make money.
The club too.’
Her mouth screws up tight as she squints at her sketch.
‘Well, there’s a regular customer. Not frequent but regular.
Once a month or so she comes in for one of the specialty
shows. Maybe twice a year she’ll foot the bill for a request. At
first I thought she was a standard S&M dyke. Now I think it’s
not pain that she’s interested in. She’s interested in changing
people.’
Something in Miranda’s tone catches me. A swirl of famil-
iar fear starts in my gut. She feels it too. I see a bewilderment
strange to her face.
‘The lady’s rich. She pays. She likes transvestites if they want
to become transsexuals. If they want to go all the way, she’ll
44 12/01/2015 12:06  45
pay for all treatments and surgery. That’s how Paulette could
finally afford it. He could have gone on strapping his balls up
tight for the rest of his life if it wasn’t for her. The Glass House
keeps hiring transvestites and she keeps shipping them off to
get real. But she watches. That’s part of the deal. She goes
along and watches the operation. And it isn’t just sex changes.
She actually prefers other things.’
A cold thought sinks quietly through me. Again? Miranda
draws and talks, looking at my elbows, forehead, knees, tits,
anywhere but my eyes.
The long-haired blonde, Denise, who unfurled her pubic
hair and danced on her head hair, had furnished one of the
recent command performances. They stretched her out on a
chrome table in one of the back rooms, and gave her local
anesthetics while they burned all her hair off. They set the fire
and then ducked back into the glassed-in booths to escape the
smell as the girl shrieked in fear if not pain, and the master of
ceremonies, in a gas mask and flameproof suit, stood by with
the fire extinguisher.
‘The dame paid Denise’s hospital bills and went to visit her
all the time. I went to see Denise the day before she got out.
She looks bad. The roots were destroyed and the hair will
never grow back. There are a lot of scars on her face. She’s
not allowed to have any plastic surgery. That was in the con-
tract she signed. You wouldn’t believe it but Denise is happy.
She says Miss Lick, that’s the lady’s name, paid her so much
she’ll never have to work again. Denise says there have been
others from the Glass House. One redhead with enormous tits
who had them amputated and went to college and is a doctor
now!’
45 12/01/2015 12:06  46
My daughter is staring at me. Her eyes are looking
anxiously at my eyes. The point is coming. I feel it speeding
toward me as she searches my face for a reaction. Any
reaction.
‘The reason I’m droning on with this silly stuff is that Miss
Lick came back to the dressing room after the show last Friday
night and asked to talk to me. She’s gruff and gross and when
she isn’t being extremely dignified she’s being what she calls a
“straight shooter.” That means the first thing she said to me
was, “Look, I’m not going to make a pass at you, so relax.”
Maybe it’s nuts but I liked her. She took me out for a fantas-
tic dinner, though she didn’t eat. She drank the whole time. She
pumped me for my life story and, being the shy, reserved type,
I spilled the works. The poor orphan brought up in the con-
vent school. The mysterious trust fund covering my art-school
tuition and the permanent rent on this place. I had a glass of
champagne and colored the whole yarn a glorious purple. She
was fascinated. And what it comes down to is, she isn’t after
my ass, she’s after my tail.’
‘Ah,’ I say. My mouth stayed open.
Miranda leans forward, eager. ‘Yes. This is the tale of the
tail that I threatened you with, and I figure you will under-
stand what I’m talking about.’
The sketch pad lies unmolested across her knee. One long
leg hooked over the chair arm, she looks at me. Her hands are
still. Her face is just young now, all the cleverness washed
away.
‘I was ashamed of it. You know, as a kid. The nuns would
tell me it was a cross to bear and a punishment for my
mother’s sins. I want to just tell you the truth, not purple it up
46 12/01/2015 12:06  47
this time. The nuns were good to me. I loved them. In a funny
way the fact that the religion never quite took in me has to do
with the tail. It’s hard to explain. Maybe I don’t even
understand it yet. My one prayer was that I’d wake up and my
tail would be gone. My backside would be smooth like the
others.’
My mouth twists wryly. ‘You hated it?’
‘Sure.’
I sit, coolly naked, examining her racehorse legs and the jut
of her calf out of incredibly thin ankles and remembering my
first sight of her head, emerging blood-smeared and dark from
between my legs. Her small rumpled face jerked to the side
with a profile like a turtle.
And later, with Lil beside me, stretching out the tiny folded
arms and legs by gently pulling on her hands and feet, and
finding nothing. Nothing but that little pigtail coiled over her
buttocks. And Lil’s voice, not broken or shrill in those days,
saying, ‘Well, remember Chick. He didn’t look like much
either. Go ahead and love her. We’ll see.’
Months later she was crawling and learning to stand up,
and was getting too big to sleep in the cupboard beneath the
sink with me. Her father, whose wide mouth and almond eyes
are Miranda’s now, looked at her one day when she had
tripped and fallen and split her lip on the floor of the trailer
and was crying and bleeding, and he said, ‘Get rid of her.’ And
I cried and begged and yanked down her diapers to remind
him of that tail, pink and charming, and he sneered and said,
‘Get rid of her or I’ll give her to Mumpo for supper, stuffed
and roasted!’
Now, twenty years later, in this huge room, with Lil
47 12/01/2015 12:06  48
downstairs watching a TV screen through a magnifying glass,
her mind steeped in the amnesiac vapor of her own decay, and
Arty’s wonderful face gone to worms despite me, I sit here
looking at the full, ripe flesh of this almost normal young
female and for a single satisfying instant see her on a platter
with a well-basted skin crackling to the touch.
‘You say you hate your tail.’
‘I did. Then I heard about the Glass House, where they
weren’t interested if you were just pretty and could dance but
wanted something spectacular. It was a joke to audition. Or an
experiment. A different approach to my tail. But since I’ve
been working there I don’t feel the same way about my tail.
Now I think, in a way, it’s kind of marvelous.’ Her eyes are
questions. Is it sane to like my tail? she is asking.
I am too old for this roller coaster. This much anger and this
much pleasure should not be crowded into two short hours.
My liver, or whatever it is that’s trying to crowd its way into
my left leg, can’t take it.
‘This must bore you. It must seem pretty silly.’
‘No, I’m just resting my eyes. What does she look like, Miss
Lick?’
‘Mary Lick. She’s forty or something, six feet two, maybe
two hundred forty pounds. Short sandy hair. I wasn’t sure you
were an albino until you took off your shades. This is the first
time I’ve seen you without them. You have a fascinating orbital
ridge; I’m just going to get a quick sketch. The deal is that Miss
Lick has offered to pay me to have my tail amputated. She’ll
pay all expenses, recovery as well as surgery. She swears the
best surgeon. Plus she’ll pay me ten thousand dollars in cash.
I don’t know what to do. Miss Lick isn’t what you’d think.
48 12/01/2015 12:06  49
She’s rough, but when I was telling her about being an orphan
she kept saying, “Keerist,” and I could tell she was wrapped up
in it. When we left the restaurant, which is out of town a ways,
she backed out of the parking lot and into a ditch. There we
were with the rear wheels stuck in the mud. She sat there star-
ing out the windshield in the dark. She said, “I’ve been here a
hundred times and this never happened. I’m fucked up. But I’m
not drunk. It’s that convent, your tail.” Then she got out to
push and I steered and we got back up on the road. She drove
me home and I felt right then that I’d give her my tail or any-
thing else she asked for just because she cared.’
My eyes pop open to the sight of Miranda’s increasingly
familiar frown. ‘Did you tell her that?’
‘No. She wanted me to think about it. She’s going to stop by
the Glass House tonight for my answer. She says if I decide to
do it I should wait until school ends and I have the summer to
recover from the surgery.’
‘Very considerate.’ The light is the color of dust now as it
catches her hair and the side of her cheek. It leaves her dark
eyes in shadow.
‘Have you talked to your friends at the club?’
‘They’re all wild about it. They’d jump at it . . . but they all
hate their specialties. And I’m not sure I do anymore. That’s
why I wanted to talk to you. You understand living with a spe-
cialty. Better than any of us. I don’t know how old you are . . . ’
‘Thirty-eight,’ I say, and her face shows she thought I was
older. I was barely seventeen when she was born. But dwarfs
age quickly.
‘What I’m asking is, am I crazy to have this liking for my
tail? Am I just covering up something else? If I turn this chance
49 12/01/2015 12:06  50
down I’d probably regret it for the rest of my life. You must
have wished a million times to be normal.’
‘No.’
‘No?’
‘I’ve wished I had two heads. Or that I was invisible. I’ve
wished for a fish’s tail instead of legs. I’ve wished to be more
special.’
‘Not normal?’
‘Never.’
‘No shit! That’s astounding! Tell me . . . ’
‘I have to leave.’ Reaching down for the pajama top,
uncramping my legs to climb down to the floor, padding
toward the bathroom door.
‘Hey, I’m sorry, I’ve taken most of your afternoon, you must
be beat . . . You’ll come again, won’t you? How about tomor-
row? I’ll work up some of these sketches and be ready for
some more-developed stuff tomorrow.’
Alone in my room with the door finally closed I stand
gaping blankly at the grimy window. I had no right to pretend
surprise. The nun told me when I first took her there. Horst
the Cat Man was leaning on the fender of his van at the gate
and I was inside in the visitor’s room. I sat hugging Miranda,
the toddler – not yet a year old – still in roomy diapers. Trying
to talk through my tears to this clean-faced nun, who had
seemed so warm and reassuring over the phone.
‘What do you mean, a tail?’ Her eyes cooled instantly. She
tugged at the back of Miranda’s diaper. ‘Is she retarded?’
Miranda clouded at the strange touch, looking anxiously at
me. When the diaper dropped to her pudgy knees she closed
her eyes and opened her mouth and began to cry.
50 12/01/2015 12:06  51
‘Just a little tail,’ I was saying.
The nurse came in, chipper, with a clipboard full of forms.
She held Miranda expertly, dancing her on a chair while I
sniffed and scratched at the forms. The nun muttered softly to
the nurse. The nurse sang ‘The Itsy-Bitsy Spider Climbs Up the
Water Spout’ and peeked surreptitiously down the back of
Miranda’s diaper.
We went to the infirmary, where the nurse chattered rhymes
as she stripped the oblivious and chortling Miranda. Probing,
listening, peering with tiny flashlights, counting digits, and
finally tickling the curl in the tail until Miranda laughed out
loud and I turned to grey stone.
‘It is not simple surgery in her case, but it would make her
life much easier,’ the nurse was soothing me. ‘You must imag-
ine what her life among normal children would be like. She
will shower and dress and swim in a group setting where it will
be impossible to hide. Children can be very cruel.’
‘No,’ I snapped. ‘She keeps it. You won’t touch it.’
They asked me again five years later as I stood watching
Miranda through the window of the visitors’ room.
‘She prays to be rid of it. How can you deny your own child
a chance at a happy, normal life?’
I stared in silence as Miranda swooped, shrieking, down the
playground slide, searching to see alive in her all the dead love
in me. ‘She’s happy,’ I said. ‘You’ve told me so and I see it. She
keeps her tail.’
But she hated it.
I crawl into my cupboard, pull the door shut, and lie curled
in the dark, thinking about Miss Lick. I’ve seen hobbies like
hers before.
51 12/01/2015 12:06  52
It is dark when I wake up. I stick my head under the cold-
water tap for a while. Then I put a sweater on, then my coat,
and a wool watch cap on over my wig, and stump out past the
TV voice from Lily’s door to catch the Number 17 bus for
downtown.
Huddled under the sick fluorescent glare of the empty bus,
I stare at a cardboard warning tucked into the rack above the
windows. It says, ‘Don’t get too comfortable.’
The doors sigh to let me out on the echoing mall. I head
north toward Old Town and the Glass House. I make one stop
in a phone booth. There are several Licks in the books but no
Mary or M. It’s probably a fake name anyway. Nobody who
can afford her kind of hobby could afford to have it known.
The neon clock in the window of the tattoo parlor says
nine. Two blocks later I am scouting doorways across from the
Glass House parking lot. A shut-down leather shop on the
corner gives me a view of the parking lot and the side door as
well as a long angle on the front entrance. A heap of garbage
bags at the front waits for the morning pickup. Five steps lead
up to the door. I sit on the top step and watch the lot fill up
slowly. The cars spew out cheerful groups and giggling pairs.
Mostly men. I count. Sixty going in before one comes out.
None of them is Miss Lick.
The cold wraps me. It isn’t real rain, just the heavy mist that
takes its time soaking through. The clouds hang low, picking
up a dull bruise color from the lights of the city. The flesh-
toned office tower known as Big Pink haunts the sky above the
crabbed three-storey horizon of Old Town. The tower dis -
appears occasionally in a gust of darkness. My legs begin to
ache.
52 12/01/2015 12:06  53
Who do I think I am? What in the name of creeping Jesus
am I going to do? The only answer is the sneer from the region
of my hip sockets. I go on sitting, watching, feeling like a rat’s-
ass fool.
Two hours later Miss Lick shows up. She’s easy to pick out.
Six foot two and 240 pounds in a grey business suit. Her high
heels are each big enough to bury an Egyptian in. She trots
alone across the parking lot, hunched under an umbrella, and
slides into the side door of the Glass House. My pulse whips
high at the sight of her but drifts back down to a rhythmless
funk as the door stays closed.
It’s another hour before she steps out into the harsh light of
the parking lot. She looks up and decides against opening the
umbrella. She lets the door sink back behind her and stands,
head up, mouth open, fumbling in her pockets. I get up. My
knees are stiff and unreliable. I shake my feet trying to get
some juice into my joints. The blood begins its burn back to
life as she starts her march across the lot. She is too discreet to
leave her car that close to the place. She’s on the corner, turn-
ing. I trot down the dark side of the street. A small bar is
evicting scum, and the drunken banter covers my shuffle
briefly. Three blocks from the Glass House the big woman
climbs into a sleek, dark machine parked in front of the blood
bank. I write the license number on my wrist with a felt-tip pen
and feel as though I’ve conquered Asia.
Miranda won’t get off work for another two hours. She’ll
take a cab home. I stump over to the bus mall, so delirious
with relief and cold that I hallucinate Miranda on every corner.
Sitting by the glare-blackened window on the Number 17, I
rewrite the license number on an old receipt from my purse.
53 12/01/2015 12:06  54
The figures on my wrist are already smearing blue from the
mist and my sweat.
I go in to work early the next morning. As I climb onto the
bus, a small genderless child lurches in its mother’s arms,
pointing at me and crowing, ‘Little Mama!’ The woman hold-
ing the child goes a sudden hot red and grabs at the tiny hand,
shushing. I turn and hop back down the steps and wave the
driver on. I walk to the radio station.
By the time I get there I’ve decided that the license number
has nothing to do with Miranda’s Miss Lick. How many big
women use the side door of the Glass House? I could be tag-
ging lumpily after a convincing middle-aged transvestite. If
Lick is a phony name for subterranean use, I could trail an
irrelevant specimen for weeks and never know it.
I slide a license trace request into the newsroom, make two
fifteen-second commercial spots for Stereo Heaven and Sun
River lunchmeat, and then tape the third installment of
Beowulf for the Blind. I wait until after the Story Hour to
check my message slot, and find the computer printout of the
trace. It is Mary T. Lick. She hasn’t changed her name for the
Glass House. Her address is a tony high-rise condo in the West
Hills, just below the Rose Garden.
In the elevator it occurs to me that Miranda might be wait-
ing for me in the lobby, hoping to guile me into another
drawing session. I hold my breath as the doors open, but she
isn’t there.
I cross the bridge over the concrete river of the sunken high-
way and walk down to the library. Lincoln High School is
directly behind the station and the students on their lunch hour
crowd the sidewalks. Two shrill-voiced girls argue hideously
54 12/01/2015 12:06  55
on the Charles Dickens bench outside the library. I swim
through the heavy doors and up the curving white marble
stairs to the index files.
Mary T. Lick has a card of her own, just before Thomas R.
Lick, her father. They are both buried in microfilm. I go up
another two flights to the periodical room and stake out a
viewing machine in the most obscure corner. I camp there with
a stack of film reels of old newspapers.
There she is, not smiling, in the society columns. A younger
Mary Lick is not smiling at the Hunt Club Opera Benefit.
Mary Lick is trapped gloomily between two vivacious gar-
goyles at the City Club. Mary Lick, standing uncomfortably
next to the deep V neckline of a Rose Princess, frowns at the
crowning of the Rose Festival Queen. A much younger Mary
Lick stands glumly, behind a bald and furious-faced man billed
in the caption as Thomas R. Lick, at the ribbon cutting for the
Thomas R. Lick Swimming Pool at the TAC Club.
The text skates over guest lists, wardrobes, and buffet
menus. There is no comment on Mary’s wardrobe, which is
the same in all cases, a dark featureless business suit.
Thomas R. is referred to variously as the Lickety Split Food
king, mogul, or tycoon. The grimmest and most recent photo
of Mary Lick shows her staring moodily at a Salvation Army
truck loaded with cardboard boxes. ‘24 Lickety Split
Thanksgiving Dinners.’ The caption calls Mary ‘The Lickety
Split Food Heiress,’ suggesting that Thomas R. has passed on
to the obituary , probably with a ‘Lick Splits’ headline.
There she is. The old man is spread out on the worm buffet
and Daughter Mary is dumping hundreds of Lickety Split din-
ners into socially unacceptable hands. The seven-year-old item
55 12/01/2015 12:06  56
comments that this is the first contribution in the history of the
Lickety Split Corporation, but says, coyly, that it might ‘signify
a new role for the company in the future.’
I cram the copies into my bag and chug home. There’s a
note under my door. A pencil smear from Miranda. ‘Come up
and let me draw you.’
When I knock, her door explodes inward, her huge frame
surrounded by light. ‘Finally.’ Reaching for me.
‘I can’t today. I have some work to do.’ Her face falls into
conventions masking disappointment. My chest lurches.
‘But how did it go with that woman, about your tail?’
She flickers for the connection. Not thinking about it.
‘Oh, there’s no hurry. She says it’s fine to wait until the
semester ends.’
‘To decide?’
‘No. To do it. Have it done.’
‘You decided.’
‘What the hell. It’s silly not to.’
Her insolent look. The careless smirk. She is punishing me
for being unavailable. I turn away, sick, and feel my way back
down the hall.
She calls after me.
‘When can you sit for me again? Tomorrow? The after-
noon? Miss McGurk?’
I wave and go downstairs to my room and shut the door
behind me and lock it.
Pacing and grinding my teeth. Throwing my wig on the
floor and stamping. Why does she make me so angry? My rage
terrifies me. I am a monster. I would rip her to shreds. I would
swing her up by her round pink heels and snap her long body
56 12/01/2015 12:06  57
until that bright, hairy head smashed against the wall. Falling
on my knees, shaking. Tangling my hands to keep from break-
ing something. Sudden gratitude for the nuns, realizing that if
she had stayed with me all the years of her growing up I would
have murdered her – the arrogant, imbecile bitch, my baby,
beautiful Miranda.
I end up curled on the floor, blubbering and gasping. No one
comes to comfort me. I lie there until I’m bored and embar-
rassed at having dried snot streaks crackling on my cheeks. I
get angry so rarely. Now twice in two days at Miranda.
I take a shower, get into a flannel nightgown, make instant
coffee with hot water from the sink, and push the window up
so I can see through. The streak of sky visible above the alley
is heavy. I sit on the sill drinking death’s-head brew and
watching the shadow creep higher on the blind wall of the
warehouse across the way. I can hear the pigeons fuddling in
the eaves. Rain begins to splat a shine over the puddle on the
garage roof below me.
Downstairs the phone rings and then stops. Lil’s voice
comes, shrill up the staircase, ‘Forty Wuunnn,’ and from far
away a door slams and the redheaded defrocked Benedictine
begins his desperate avalanche down the stairs. The pipes
gurgle. The heat is coming on.
I drag the big old costume trunk out of the closet and
open it. The Miranda Box I call it, though there is little
enough of her in it. The shallow tray in the top of the trunk
holds it all. School photos. The stack of report cards. The
bundled letters from Sister T. that came four times a year for
sixteen years. Progress reports: ‘Miranda is reading two years
beyond her grade level. Her disposition is cheerful but marred
57 12/01/2015 12:06  58
by stubbornness and a disruptive tendency.’ The test scores.
The list of inoculations. The chicken pox report. An indignant
letter folded around a printed form crawling with the results
of a medical examination.
She was fifteen that year and had ran away and hooked up
with an occult guitarist moonlighting as a United Parcel deliv-
ery driver who hid her in his ‘bohemian’ – as the report called
it – apartment for three weeks until she got bored and strolled
back to the school. She was indifferent to repentance, accord-
ing to the nun, and far from a virgin, according to the doctor.
Heavenly Mary had prevented her from getting pregnant or
diseased. They threatened to throw her out or to turn her over
to the juvenile authorities. In the end my monthly payments
increased by 50 percent and she stayed.
Fingering the blistering letter, I remember precisely the
hoops my heart went through over the incident. I was terrified
for her, but strangely delighted, as though her wildness were a
triumph of her genes over indoctrination. I lay the thin sheaf
of drawings she gave me on top of the rest, and then lift the
tray out and set it aside.
The body of the trunk is crammed with clipping books,
thick stacks of paper wrapped in black plastic. Photographs.
Sound tapes. A tight roll of posters held by dry and brittle
rubber bands.
This fragile, flammable heap is all that’s left of my life. It is
the history of Miranda’s source. She soars and stomps and
burns through her days with no notion of the causes that
formed her. She imagines herself isolated and unique. She is
unaware that she is part of, and the product of, forces assem-
bled before she was born.
58 12/01/2015 12:06  59
She can be flip about her tail. Or she can try. She is ignorant
of its meaning and oblivious to its value. But something in her
blood aches, warning her.
I slip the topmost poster from the roll. The paper is stiff,
wanting to break rather than tear. Carefully spreading it,
uncoiling it, sliding plastic-wrapped bundles onto the corners
to hold it down, I open it on the musty carpet.
The Binewskis are revealed, dressed in glittering white,
enchanted against sea greens and blues, smiling, together still
on wide paper. The poster has a fountain format with the
whole family spewing upward from Chick, during his brief
‘Fortunato – The Strongest Child in the World’ period. Papa
killed this poster, along with Chick’s act, before the public saw
either of them. But it is my favorite family portrait. Chick, six
years old and golden, is smiling at the bottom, his arms
straight up with his parents standing on his hands. The beau-
teous ‘Crystal Lily’ in an openly amorous pose, one leg kicking
high out of her dance skirt, wrapped in the arms of the hand-
some ‘Ring Master Al,’ our Papa, Aloysius, in high boots and
chalk jodhpurs – their smiles leaping upward in yellow light
toward our stars, our treasures – ‘Arturo the Amazing Aqua
Boy,’ afloat with his flippers spread angelically in hinted liquid
in the upper right corner, his bare skull gleaming and haloed.
In the left corner, at a cunningly suggested keyboard swirling
out of the blue, ‘The Magnificent Musical Siamese Twins,
Electra and Iphigenia!’ Elly and Iphy with their long hair
smoothed into black buns, slim white arms entwined, pale
faces beaming out in shafts from their violet eyes.
And I am there also. ‘Albino Olympia,’ viewed from the side
to display my hump, bald nobbly head tilted charmingly,
59 12/01/2015 12:06  60
curtsying with one arm pointing at the glorious Chick and his
miraculous burden. Chick was six and I was twelve but he
loomed a full head taller. The arched banner across the top in
joyous glitter, ‘The Fabulous Binewskis.’
The wallet-sized school picture from Miranda’s senior year
shows her face the same size as the Binewski poster faces. I
slide the photo around, next to Chick, to Arty, to Papa Al. It
is Arty she looks like. Those Binewski cheekbones and the
Mongol eyes. Would she see it?
60 12/01/2015 12:06  61
BOOK II
Your Dragon – Care, Feeding
and Identifying Fewmets 12/01/2015 12:06  62 12/01/2015 12:06  63
4
Papa’s Roses
The Olympia McGurk profile in the personnel computer of
Radio KBNK lists my training as ‘Elocution and diction, and
microphonic presentation as taught by Aloysius Binewski,’
which I wrote calmly and confidently into my résumé as
though every well-trained voice would recognize the name of
the master.
That was Papa, sitting in the back of the tent at the sound-
board, wearing headphones and glaring at me as I stood on
one foot on the stage with the old ragged microphone waving
aimlessly near my mouth. Papa, hollering, ‘Boring!’ at my fifti-
eth delivery of ‘Step right this way, folks!’ or mimicking
cruelly, ‘Ya-ta, ya-ta, ya-ta!’ if I fell into a repetitive rhythm on
‘From the darkest mysteries of science, a revelation of poetic
grace.’
‘Move your lips, for shit’s sake!’ howled Papa, or ‘Stop with
the mouse farts and project!
‘That’s a double-reed instrument! It is called a voice! It is
63 12/01/2015 12:06  64
not a comb wrapped in waxed paper! I gave it to you from the
love in my guts for your scrawny and unmarketable carcass, so
be kind enough to use it properly!’
And me all the while having to pee – coughing into the mike
when my throat was tired and raw – eyes stinging and lips and
chin crumpling in grief at his anger. The sweet tinkle of Electra
on the bass and Iphy on the treble with Mama’s voice count-
ing, ‘One and two and . . . ’ as the twins had their piano lession
inside the trailer. The gurgle and hum of the pumps that fil-
tered my brother Arty’s ‘Aqua Boy’ tank. And the dim round
moon of baby Fortunato’s face peering at me from the dark of
the risers above Papa.
If I finally did it right and got all the way through from ‘Step
up, friends’ to ‘A vision of the miraculous extravagance of
Nature for the same simple price as an overcooked hotdog’
without a single bellow of rage from my beloved papa, then he
would swoop me up in huge arms and tuck me onto a
shoulder, where I could grab his astounding hair in my fists
and ride high through the tent flaps into the light, with
Fortunato’s golden head chugging along far below, and we
would parade the long street of booths with me laughing down
at the red-haired girls who sold the candy and at the toothless
wheelman and Horst the Cat Man all nodding at Papa’s
instructions, and hearing, feeling his huge voice rumble out
from beneath my legs, ‘This little beetle did her lessons just
right today.’
It’s funny, in a dingy way, that I make my little living by read-
ing. I have to smile because I used to avoid reading. It scared
me.
64 12/01/2015 12:06  65
It never bothered Arty. He read constantly – anything – but
his favorites were ghost stories and horror tales.
When we were still children I was the one who turned his
s. He’d lie in bed reading late when everyone else was
asleep. I lay beside him and held his lamp and turned the
s and watched his eyes move in quick jerks down the
print. Reading was never a quiet pastime for Arty. He rocked,
grunted, muttered, and exclaimed. He was in one of his toilet
phases at that time. ‘Sweet rosy-brown arsehole’ was his
expression of pleasure. ‘Shitsucker’ was the pejorative.
‘Don’t you get dreams?’ I asked him. ‘Don’t you get scared
reading those at night? They’re supposed to scare you.’
‘Hey, nit squat! These are written by norms to scare norms.
And do you know what the monsters and demons and rancid
spirits are? Us, that’s what. You and me. We are the things that
come to the norms in nightmares. The thing that lurks in the
bell tower and bites out the throats of the choirboys – that’s
you, Oly. And the thing in the closet that makes the babies
scream in the dark before it sucks their last breath – that’s me.
And the rustling in the brush and the strange piping cries that
chill the spine on a deserted road at twilight – that’s the twins
singing practice scales while they look for berries.
‘Don’t shake your head at me! These books teach me a lot.
They don’t scare me because they’re about me. Turn the
. ’
Maybe it’s mean to think, but the best time was before Chick
was born. Things were simple. Papa would tell us about the
hard times and explain that Arty had brought success to the
show, and that Elly and Iphy had helped the business and,
65 12/01/2015 12:06  66
because he was a kind man, that even Oly had ‘done her part.’
There was always work but it was good.
Mornings were our time. After lessons and before the stage
shows began at 2 P . M . we were free creatures. Papa connected
two chunks of tire tread with a nylon web, and attached web
straps to fit over Arty’s fore and aft fins. With this rubber-
tread armor on his chest and belly, Arty could slither almost
anywhere.
Papa thought we should be mysteries that the townies
couldn’t see without paying. But, if we were in the country, we
were allowed to ramble as long as we stuck together.
‘Get your asses the hell out of that tree!’
The farmer snapped his belt, doubled against itself, the strap
wide enough to sting the air all the way up beside us among
the Bings. Arty pressed his head back against the trunk and
peered down at the man with the belt. He was old and strong
and his eyes clicked on me as soon as I moved. I dodged out
of sight and the belt snapped again. The leaves quivered above
where Elly and Iphy were perched. They’d been bickering
about how many cherries they could eat without sharing a
bellyache and the runs. It must have been their high voices that
drew this old codger. They were silent now, scared as usual.
‘Come down now, or by all that crackles I’ll be up there
after you!’ He didn’t really sound mad. He’d stopped a ways
out from the tree, too smart to come underneath where things
might drop on him.
Arty’s mouth moved close to my ear. ‘You first, then Elly
and Iphy. He thinks it’s kids.’
I crammed my voice into the top of my mouth and pitched
66 12/01/2015 12:06  67
it silly, ‘We’re coming, mister, don’t hurt us!’ I took my dark
glasses off and poked my head past the edge so he could see
my ears sticking out from under my watch cap. I squinted so
he couldn’t tell the color of my eyes. The farmer’s shrewd eyes
tightened on me. His mouth quirked into one corner for a spit.
‘I’ll hurt you in a minute.’
‘We’ve got to help our brother, mister, just a second.’
Arty stretched his neck and clamped his jaw onto the last
twig of cherries I held as I began climbing out of the tree
crotch. ‘Elly,’ I called deliberately, ‘Iphy, help me get Arty
down.’ A long leg appeared with a crumpled pink sock and a
white sneaker. I peeked at the farmer. He cracked the folded
belt against his high rubber boot. He was watching but he’d
loosened a bit. The girls’ names did that, soft, old-fashioned
things. And the ‘Don’t hurt us’ had him disarmed.
‘Psst!’ Iphy was looking anxiously down at me while Elly
maneuvered the descent. Arty muttered softly up at them, ‘Oly
goes down first. You hand me down to her and then come.’
‘We’re coming down, mister,’ I called, and then slid away
from Arty, down the trunk, gripping with toes and fingers in
the deep cracks of the bark to slip down the easy slope of the
tree on the side away from the brown-faced man with the belt.
When I hit the ground I stepped back, bent forward, and
rubbed my cap off against the trunk. I was reaching up for
Arty when I heard the old bastard grunt. He’d seen my hump
and my bald head. The twins were lowering Arty with three
hands and hugging the tree with the fourth. Arty’s clothes
hissed and snagged on the bark as he slid. I caught his hips on
my chest and he slid down my belly to the ground. The twins
bounced down the trunk, peering from both sides at the
67 12/01/2015 12:06  68
farmer. I turned to look at him. His eyes slit into suspicious
surprise. Arty started humping toward him quickly. I jumped
after. The twins caught up and Elly held my hand as we moved
toward the farmer. He fell down on his butt in the grass. His
belt rolled out flat beside him. We went past him fast and out
of his cherry orchard.
Later in bed I decided Arty was smart. It was the order of
our appearance that got the guy. Here he was cracking his belt
and chuckling inside about another summer’s batch of kids in
the cherry trees. He’d be rehearsing the story already, to tell
his wife over chicken and biscuits in the kitchen, as he sat
with his sleeves still damp from scrubbing and his hat off
showing the pale stretch below his hair where the sunburn
ended.
‘Caught Jethro’s grandkids in the Bings today,’ he’d say, ‘all
up one tree, same as their daddy and his sis twenty years ago.’
And he and his wife smiling at each other and her pouring the
iced coffee and saying she hoped he hadn’t scared them too
much. But while all this was readying behind his eyes we
stepped out and dropped him. First me, twisted under my
hump, the watch cap popping its bald shock, and then the
1.88 seconds for him to register the shape of Arturo and the
way he moved, and, most important, which direction he was
heading. If that had been all he might have taken a pitchfork
to us. But then came the night-haired girls, milk-skinned,
flower-eyed, and their two long legs in the slumping pink
socks. The old man had thirty years of shooing kids from trees
yanked out of him. I wondered if he would say anything at all
about it to anybody.
*
68 12/01/2015 12:06  69
Arty’s head jerked around and his eyes ripped at me. The shad-
ows of sharp bone and muscle strained at his tight skin. Anger.
‘Pick me up. Now. Pick me up.’ He was heavy but I hoisted
him from the middle until he leaned against me, upright, then
crouched and hefted him onto my shoulder. His head and chest
faced the rear, his round butt curving into my arms.
‘I hate long grass. Hate it.’ His voice came into my left ear
as we moved slowly through the field. ‘You try humping along
with your nose in the snakes and cow shit for a block or two.’
Arty always talked to the people. It was a central charm of his
act that, though he looked and acted alien, part animal, part
myth, he would prop his chin on the lip of the tank to talk ‘just
like folks.’ Only it wasn’t quite like folks.
At first, when Arty was tiny, Al was his enthusiastic master
of ceremonies. Arty gradually worked his way in and took
over the talking entirely. Before too long Al just stood out
front and lured the crowd in.
Arty started with explanatory chat about his own physique
but soon discovered the power of piffle and vapor. Greeting-
card sentiments, intoned pretentiously in the stage-lit waver of
the tank by such an intriguing little deviant, packed a surpris-
ing wallop.
Arty and Papa experimented. Arty’s show changed in small
ways – a pink spotlight instead of red – or, occasionally, in big
ways. It was always a sit-down show, a bench-and-bleacher
act. The tank and Arty were the only focus. For a while Arty
made a dry entrance. He came out on the platform above the
tank before diving in. Then he decided that folks wanted to
think that he lived in the water all the time – maybe even
69 12/01/2015 12:06  70
breathed water. After that he always made his first appearance
in the water. He used a screen in the water for a while, hiding
behind it and swimming out into the brightly visible part of the
tank when Papa signaled. Arty got sick of waiting and had a
big tube tunnel run up through the tank floor so he could wait
dry in the back and make a dramatic swoosh entrance when
the lights came up. Arty spewing upward in a burst of lumi-
nescent bubbles with a thrumming fanfare of recorded music.
It got the crowd going.
Eventually Arty grew bored with the Gilled Illusion of Aqua
Boy, and in his Arturan phase enjoyed parading before his
throng (at a distance, in a golf cart) on dry land, but he stuck
to the submarine identity for a long time.
As he bitterly pointed out, he wasn’t extravagant enough
looking to hold a crowd for twenty minutes (the length of the
show in those early days) by just lolling around and letting
them gawk. He had to do something. The seal tricks of his
infancy soon palled on him. Swimming was useful. The bright
tank in the dim tent was a focus. The water and his floating
form were soothing, hypnotic. People stared at the tank and
his undulating figure as they would at a bright fire. The tank
made him exotic but safe. ‘They can relax,’ Arty theorized,
‘because they know I’m not going to jump up into their laps.’
(Arty tended to be snide about laps, not having one of his
own.)
‘It’s a fiendish waste to get ’em into a beautiful sucker zone
of mind and then not do anything with them,’ Arty would
lament. So he learned to talk. He recited rhymes, quoted the
more saccharine philosophers, commented on human nature.
The standard approach, and the line Papa always wanted Arty
70 12/01/2015 12:06  71
to take, was jokes, comedy, a creaking stand-up patter that
would seem unique coming from the Aqua Boy. But Arty
wouldn’t go for it. ‘I don’t want those scumbags laughing at
me,’ he’d snarl. ‘I want them amazed at me, maybe scared of
me, but I won’t let them laugh. No. Oh, a little chuckle
because I’m witty, sure. But not a running line.’
Arty’s few jokes, the brief crackling relief from a mystic
format, were always dry and biting and directed outward,
away from himself.
The misty cauldron of the act was a constant. ‘They want to
be amazed and scared. That’s why they’re here,’ Arty said.
Gradually, inevitably, he discovered the Oracle. ‘The guy
who asks the question and thinks he hears an answer is the guy
who makes an Oracle.’ He’d been reading books on Oriental
philosophy and was spouting it solemnly over the lip of the
tank one day when a pale woman on the bleachers stood up
and asked him whether her fifteen-year-old son, who had run
away months before, was alive or dead.
Without thinking at all, without missing a beat, he whip -
ped out, ‘Weeping at night alone and yearning for you,
working like a man in daylight, silently.’ She burst out bawl-
ing and hollering, ‘Bless you, thank you, bless you, thank you,’
as she crawled out over a row of knees and left snorking into
her hanky.
She must have told her friends because the next two shows
were pimpled with shouted questions from the bleachers and
Arty’s vague, impromptu answers.
He had the redhead who sold the tickets hand out three-
by-five cards for people to write questions on. The act took on
a distinct odor of palm reading and advice to the love-or-
71 12/01/2015 12:06  72
otherwise-lorn. Papa had thousands of ‘Ask Aqua Boy’ posters
printed and slathered up everywhere we went.
I never knew the twins very well. Maybe Arty was right in
claiming I was jealous of them. They were too charming. The
whole crew loved them. The norm crowds loved them. In
towns we passed through regularly pairs of young girls would
come to the show dressed in a single long skirt in imitation of
the twins. Arty wasn’t delighted with their popularity either, of
course. But he had a way of splitting them. To me they were
inaccessible. They didn’t need me to do anything for them.
Iphy was always kind to me. She was kind to everybody. But
Elly was careful to keep me in my place. They were self-
sufficient. They needed only each other. And Elly, rest her hard
and toothy soul, ruled their body.
I remember Lil with a bundle of costumes in one arm and a
bag of popping corn in the other as she stood rigid in the saw-
dust of the midway and lectured me sternly: ‘We use the plural
form, Olympia, whenever we refer to Electra and Iphi genia.
We do not say “Where is Elly and Iphy?” We say “Where are
Elly and Iphy?”’
If you stood facing the twins, Elly was on your left and
Iphy on your right. Elly was right-handed and Iphy was left-
handed. But Iphy was the right leg and Elly was the left leg.
If you pulled Elly’s hair, Iphy yelped too. If you kissed Iphy’s
cheek, Elly smiled. If Elly burnt her hand on the popcorn
machine, Iphy cried also and couldn’t sleep that night from
the pain. They ran and climbed and danced gracefully. They
had separate hearts but a meshing bloodstream; separate
stomachs but a common intestine. They had one liver and one
72 12/01/2015 12:06  73
set of kidneys. They had two brains and a nervous system that
was peculiarly connected and unexpectedly separate. Between
them they ate a small fraction more than one norm kid their
size.
Jonathan Tomaini, the greasy-haired music-school graduate
who became their piano teacher when they had gone past Lily,
claimed that Iphy was all melody and Elly was rhythm exclu-
sively. They were both sopranos.
Arty speculated that their two brains functioned as right
and left lobes of a single brain.
Elly punished Iphy by eating food that disagreed with them.
Iphy would sink into depressed silence, eating nothing. Elly’s
favorite trick was cheese. Iphy hated constipation like cancer.
Elly varied the treatment by gorging on chocolate, even
though she didn’t really like chocolate and it made her chin
break out in zits. Pimples were very obvious on her milky skin.
Iphy loved chocolate and never ate it for fear of pimples. Elly’s
eating the stuff never gave Iphy pimples. The punishment was
that Iphy had to sleep next to Elly’s pimples, had to live within
inches of the molten eruptions.
Iphy felt sorry for everybody who wasn’t a twin. Elly
despised me.
When Chick came along, both twins adored him. He was such
a meek little feather that he worshiped them. Lil and Al were
just loved. But Arty was different. He was separate. He fasci-
nated Iphy and he terrified Elly. Elly’s harshness flared against
anyone who might distract Iphy’s attention from her. The rest
of us were just fantasy opposition. Arty was dangerous. He
flirted with Iphy. He toyed with her.
73 12/01/2015 12:06  74
Elly hated him. She acted, sometimes, as though Arty could
tear Iphy away from her.
The Binewski family shrine was a fifty-foot trailer with a door
at each end and a one-dollar admission price. The sign over the
entrance said ‘Mutant Mystery’ and, in smaller letters, ‘A
Museum of Nature’s Innovative Art.’ We called it ‘the Chute.’
Like everything else in the Fabulon, the Chute grew and
changed over the years. But the Chute had started with six
clear-glass twenty-gallon jars, and those jars – each lit by
hidden yellow beams and equipped with its own explanatory,
push-button voice tape – were always the core.
The Chute was Crystal Lil’s idea, and she supervised it. She
visited the Chute every day before the gates opened and pol-
ished the jars lovingly with glass cleaner. Later, when Al
wanted to put the stuffed animals in, he had to clear it with
Crystal Lil. She insisted on the maze at the entrance so that the
six jars remained the climax of the walk through.
The stuffed animals in their lit glass windows were the usual
humdrum collection of two-headed calves, six-legged chickens,
and the mounted skeleton of a three-tailed cat. The only live
exhibit was a trio of featherless hens that Al picked up from
the chicken rancher who had bred them to save plucking costs
on his fryers. He couldn’t sell them because customers were
used to the pimply ‘chicken skin’ of birds that had their feath-
ers yanked. They didn’t trust the smooth-skinned look. These
three were cheerful, baggy-fleshed creatures with floppy combs
and wattles. They lived for two years before Lil found them,
heaped dead in a corner of their cage, done in overnight by
some microscopic enemy of innovation. Al had them stuffed
74 12/01/2015 12:06  75
and they stayed on in the same cage. One bent over, with head
extended as though about to peck at the straw that would
never again need changing. One stood alert, with its round
yellow eye cocked at the passersby and its right foot curled as
though in the act of stepping forward. The last sat cozily in a
corner with one wing spread and its head tucked underneath,
apparently looking for lice.
Lily would take her pills after breakfast and then go over to
the Chute with her cleaning gear. She left the dark green floors
and walls to the power-vacuum crew but the glass she did her-
self. Sometimes I would help, sometimes the twins. Mostly Lily
did it herself. She would do a quick, decent job on all the glass
windows in the maze, but her true purpose was her visit to the
‘kids’ as she called them. The jars were Al’s failures.
‘And mine,’ Lil would always add. She would spray the big
jars and polish them. She would talk softly, all the while, to the
things floating in the jars or to whoever was with her. She
remembered the drug recipe Al had prescribed for her preg-
nancy with each one, and reminisced about the births.
There were four who had been born dead: Clifford, Maple,
Janus, and the Fist. ‘We always say Arty is our firstborn but
actually Janus was the first,’ Lil would say as she peered into
the fluid that filled up the jar, examining the small huddled
figure that floated upright inside.
Janus was always my favorite. He had a down of dark hair
curling on his tiny scalp and a sweet sleeping face. His other
head emerged on a short neck at the base of his spine, equally
round and perfect, with matching hair. This rear brother
squinted in perpetual surprise at the tiny buttocks under its
nose. The four sets of minuscule eyelashes fascinated me and
75 12/01/2015 12:06  76
I wondered how the two would have gotten along if Janus had
lived. Would they have bickered like Elly and Iphy? They could
never have seen each other except sideways in a mirror.
Probably the top head would have controlled everything and
made his poor little butt-brother miserable.
Lil always fussed over Maple, who looked like a big rum-
pled sponge. Maple had two eyes but they didn’t relate to each
other. Lil said Maple had no bones. She and Al had decided
Maple was female because they couldn’t find a penis. Lil also
clucked and sighed over Clifford, who looked like a lasagna
pan full of exposed organs with a monkey head attached. The
twins and I called Clifford ‘the Tray’ when Mama wasn’t
around.
The Fist wasn’t full term but it was obvious where the name
had come from. ‘I only carried the Fist for five months,’ Lil
said, and that was her excuse for spending a shade less time on
his jar.
Apple and Leona were the two who had lived long enough
to die outside Lily’s belly. Apple was big but dull. She looked
like a Tibetan cherub. Her coarse black hair grew close to her
rumpled eyes. I myself could dimly remember her sleeping in
the top drawer of Lil’s big bureau. She never moved anything
but her lips, her eyelids, and her bowels. Her eyeballs were still
pointing in vaguely different directions. Lil had fed her from
a bottle and changed her, washing her limp body three or four
times a day. Lil would talk to Apple and rub her and move
things in front of her eyes, but there was never any response.
Apple grew fat and there was a smell of old urine around her
and the drawer. She was two years old when she died. A pillow
fell on her face.
76 12/01/2015 12:06  77
Arty always claimed that Al did it. Elly and Iphy would
squeal when he said that, and I would shake my head and
change the subject, but we never asked Lil and we never
brought it up in front of Al.
Leona was the last jar before the exit and had four spot-
lights focused to pierce the formaldehyde in which she drifted.
Lil would linger over the jar and once or twice I saw her cry
as she pressed her forehead against the glass and crooned. ‘We
had such hopes for her,’ she would sigh. Leona’s jar was
labeled ‘The Lizard Girl’ and she looked the part. Her head
was long from front to back and the forehead was compressed
and flattened over small features that collapsed into her long
throat with no chin to disturb the line. She had a big fleshy tail,
as thick as a leg where it sprouted from her spine, but then
tapering into a point. There was a faint greenish sheen to her
skin but I suspected that Arty was right in claiming that Al had
painted it on after Leona died.
‘She was only seven months old,’ Lil would murmur. ‘We
never understood why she died.’
The sign in the jar room was bolted to the wall and had its
own spotlight. It was carefully calligraphed in brown letters on
a cream background. ‘ HUMAN ,’ it said. ‘BORN OF NORMAL
PARENTS.’
‘You must always remember that these are your brothers
and sisters,’ Lil would lecture. ‘You must always take proper
care of them and keep the roughnecks from jouncing the jars
around on the road.’
The twins and I were expected to share responsibility for the
jars if anything happened to Lil. This burden wasn’t even men-
tioned to Chick or Arty.
77 12/01/2015 12:06  78
Yet it was Arty who discovered that the kids in the jars
floated close to the top when it rained and sank down to the
bottom when the sky was clear. Al never went into the Chute
himself, but he would ask Lil for the weather report every
morning when she came back from her visit.
78 12/01/2015 12:06  79
5
Assassin – Limp-Wristed and Shy
Lillian Hinchcliff Binewski, eight months and two weeks preg-
nant with the most extravagant experiment in a flamboyant
series – Crystal Lil – bored with the bigness of her belly and
the smallness of Coos Bay, Oregon, and fed up with the kaput
generator that kept the show closed until a new coil could be
installed that night, sat (Our Lil) in the foldaway dinette of the
thirty-eight-foot Binewski Road King living van and decided to
take a small van and drive over to a shopping center to pick up
some prestitched silver-sequined stretch material to make
matching costumes for the kids. And for herself after her belly
deflated, with a bit of white tulle for a tail.
‘Arty honey,’ she called, and stubbed her cigarette into the
last grime of her breakfast wheat germ where it coated the blue
bowl. Arturo, the Aqua Boy, was in the shower and toilet
room and it took a minute for him to poke the door open.
‘Arty honey. We’re going in to that big shopping center. Oly,
you help him, baby. We’ll all go.’
79 12/01/2015 12:06  80
The pink-eyed Olympia, six years old and bouncy, put
down a copy of National Geographic and climbed up on the
side bunk to take Arty’s Dunlop belly-tread off its hook.
Arturo was murmuring slyly as Lil tore a long pink fingernail
while buckling her sandal. ‘I can’t hear you, Arty. Be sure to
pee before we leave.’
‘I said,’ Arty slithered up to Lil’s foot and lay looking at her
long, elegant toes, ‘do you think it’s a good idea for us all to
go?’
Lil stepped over him and swung open the outside door.
‘Elly-Iphy,’ she shrieked. From the big truck stage next door
came the ripple of ‘Moonlight Sonata’ for four hands and an
answering shout from Iphigenia. ‘Come here, doves!’ and the
sonata cut off as Lil grabbed the ignition keys from the
Buddha ashtray on the bookshelf.
Arty said, ‘I don’t want the tread. I’ll use the chair. It’s easier
in public.’
On that sunstruck, restless day, Vern Bogner filled the pickup’s
fuel tank at the first station down from the camp. He had
stopped there on his way up to buy kerosene for the lantern.
The old man at the pump watched the meter flip over and
hollered at Vern, ‘You’re leaving early! Get your limit already?’
Vern stared grimly through the windshield. The bed of the
pickup was obviously empty. Snotty old cocksucker. Some -
times you just wanted to go up in the woods and sit by a fire
and slip around a few beers in peace.
Vern Bogner had been produce manager at the Seal Bay
Supermarket for five years, and assistant for three years before
that. As Vern explained in detail years later, it was a time when
80 12/01/2015 12:06  81
his whole life had begun to slide. Despite his experience,
oranges had always been hard to stack. He had built mounds
and pyramids of Floridas and tangerines and big and little inny
and outy navels by the million but he had never been plagued
by so many rolls and drops and avalanches as in the past few
months.
His wife, Emily, didn’t like him much lately. And when he
came home from work and said ‘Hi’ to his own kids, they just
snorted and went on staring at the TV. Vern was not at all sure
what was happening to him, but a decade later he could still
describe the moment-to-moment sensations of that morning.
The day was muggy hot and the smell of gas mixed with the
beer in his belly and lifted in a bitter scrape to the back of his
throat. Emily sneered at him too. ‘Oh, Vern’s got lots of tro-
phies – stuffed green peppers, lettuce heads.’ And laughter.
Even this scummy old station jock was noticing, rubbing it in.
Vern turned his head just enough to catch a glint on the barrel
of the 30.06 where it hung on the window rack. He’d been out
with his fifty-dollar license four times this year and hadn’t fired
a shot.
When he saw the tall sign for the new shopping center, Vern
flicked the turn signal. A brand-new supermarket took up one
side of the lot. The dime store and hairdresser and the rest
were on the other side of the five acres. He liked visiting other
supermarkets. He’d take a quick tour of the produce section
on his way to the beer. A couple of travelers would get him
home.
He had parked and was reaching for the keys when he hap-
pened to see a van door open all the way across the lot. A long
and distinctly female leg stretched out. It ended in a shiny red
81 12/01/2015 12:06  82
sandal with a high heel. Vern paused and waited for the other
leg. The legs belonged to an enormous belly, thin arms, and a
pile of whipped-cream-colored hair.
Then the things crawled out of the van and began milling
around the tall pregnant woman. Vern stared as the wheelchair
was unfolded and the small lumpy bald thing helped the limb-
less worm thing up into it. Then he reached back for the 30.06
and smoothly, still staring, pumped a round into the chamber.
Arty’s chair had an extended control arm that he could reach,
but I liked pushing him and he liked having me do it. He said
it make him feel royal. Elly and Iphy each slung an arm over
the other’s shoulder and hopped along, grinning at the old
woman who had stopped to stare at us with her shopping cart
half off the curb. The twins were ahead of Arty and me, and
I could just see Lil’s head bobbing in front of them.
I had just put my head down to push when I felt the sting
on my hump and saw the little rip come into the back of the
chair with a muffled cracking sound. Arty jerked in the chair
and let out a roar. The twins toppled forward and the arm
around Iphy’s neck was spilling red. ‘Gun!’ That was Arty
shouting and I was down on my knees getting a breath to cry
as he flopped out of the chair and rolled crazily under the tail
end of the nearest car. I scrabbled after him, scraping on the
hot pavement, my hump burning. Lil’s voice flipped up in a
quick shriek. I bumped my back on the metal and was trying
to cry but I could see Elly and Iphy, with their arms wrapped
tight around each other, rolling fast and disappearing behind
another car. They left a trail of red blotches where the arm
touched as they rolled.
82 12/01/2015 12:06  83
A car horn blared suddenly and didn’t stop. The flat bleat
floated in a solid layer on the air and human voices popped
and chittered far away. I could feel Arty’s heat against my leg.
I dropped flat and cranked my neck around to look at him. He
was on his belly. Blood was running out of his short shoulder
and smearing across his flipper before it dripped onto the
shade-cool tarmac. His lips were sputtering and big fat tears
were sheeting out of his lower lids while his eyes whipped back
and forth, searching and mean.
My own eyes and nose were running and the burn on my
hump was like a big bee sting flaming poison up through my
neck and all the way down to my butt. It was interesting to see
the tears coming out of Arty’s eyes. I had never seen that
before. I never thought of him crying. My own shaky breath
and the taste of tear snot on my lip were familiar. Easy. Even
the burn on my hump was exactly my size. But Arty’s way of
crying was new to me. His body was crying but his brain
wasn’t. The eyes above his tears were as sharp as ever. The
blood from his shoulder was sliding faster than the clear fluid
from his eyes, but to me the tears were more alarming.
The horn stopped and sirens grew up in its place. Voices
jumped and barked and Arty and I lay pressed to the shade
beneath the brown crust of the car belly until Lil came creep-
ing and sniffling on her knees, peering under all the cars and
calling to us. She couldn’t talk when she found us. She dragged
me out first and I sat quivering on the hot pavement while she
reached far under the car for Arty. The hand that she balanced
on had smears of bright red, drying fast. She tugged Arty into
the light. She hiked him up onto her belly and stood up. I clung
with both hands to the end of her blue blouse and we scuttered
83 12/01/2015 12:06  84
across the wide lane to the next row of cars. Behind a small red
car Elly and Iphy lay flat on their backs with a big grey-
uniformed woman kneeling between their heads. The twins
were puckered and red from crying. They stared at the arm that
the woman was pressing with a white bandage. The woman’s
flat eyes and tight mouth never changed as she moved, wrap-
ping the thin arm. Behind them, on the curb, sat the old woman
who had stopped her shopping cart to watch us. A man in grey
was holding her wrist and talking softly to her. He lifted the
prongs of a stethoscope to his ears and slid the listening bell
into the collar of her dress, but the old woman’s eyes were on
me, and then on Arty as Lil laid him down.
Lil was saying, ‘These too, please. These too, please,’ mean-
ing Arty and me, until more grey uniforms came and put big,
hot hands on us and tore my shirt from the back. The bee sting
on my hump got a breath of clear air and sizzled fresh. I
watched another man put fingers on Arty’s neck and Arty’s
wide lips opened with strings of spit webbing the dark inside
his mouth and a high whine came out while white squares of
gauze were pressed against the blood. Lil sobbed and caught
herself and sobbed again, stroking Arty’s head as he lay on the
pavement with the big hands moving on him.
‘I’m older than I thought,’ said a thin voice, and the old
woman on the curb lay down. The man in uniform crouched
over her and her head turned to stare at us as he lifted her arm
to a needle.
The ambulance was crowded but Lil wouldn’t let them sepa-
rate us. Elly and Iphy were at the head of the cot with Arty at
the other end. I lay on my side on a padded bench and Lil sat
84 12/01/2015 12:06  85
next to me with her long cool hand on my head. The grey-
uniformed woman moved slowly and carefully. She asked one
of the men to stay with her. She didn’t want to be alone in the
back with us. The doors were open and we were still waiting.
I could see through the doors to the other side of the parking
lot where the pickup was parked with the driver’s door wide
open in front of the supermarket. There were four flashing
police cars and the soft distant static of radios talking to each
other. A grey figure came away from them and jogged quickly
toward us. Blond, with a mustache, his uniform starched and
neat. He was grinning and shaking his head as he grabbed a
wing of the rear doors in each hand.
Lil bent over me, toward him. ‘Who is he? Why did he do
that?’ Her voice was rough.
The young man nodded to the woman in uniform who sat
next to Arty but didn’t touch him. ‘Some loony. Just crazy.
He’s moaning that he missed.’ The young man closed one side
of the door. ‘Just rocking in the back of the cruiser saying,
“How could I miss?”’ The last door closed and the scared eyes
of the woman in uniform skittered around at each of us. The
ambulance began to move.
When they dropped and flopped and the wheelchair flipped
over, Vern felt a sudden warm pleasure that slid off into shock
as they fell out of sight. The disappointment was a hot, wet
bladder bursting in his chest. They were lined up. In line. His
old man would have got all of them with that one steel-
jacketed shell. The awful, soggy weep of failure shook him.
He was pressing his face to the smooth rifle stock, oiling it
with tears, when a state trooper grabbed the barrel and yanked
85 12/01/2015 12:06  86
the rifle through the open window and out of his grasp. His
cheek was sliced and bruised by the escaping stock. When the
door squawked open he whimpered at the big gun looking
down at him. The trooper’s boots had the same blood-
mahogany depth that his father had rubbed into the wood of
the 30.06.
He was leaning his forehead against the steel-wired glass that
screened him from the front seat. His hands dangled between
his knees, the cold cuffs clipped into the ring bolt on the floor
of the patrol car. He had fallen into the momentary peace of
blankness. His mind was stretched out flat, featureless. A
trickle of color and motion at the outer edges of his eyes
informed him that the troopers were moving slowly around
the car. There were calm, heavy voices and others lighter, thin,
and fast. Witnesses, he told himself. The police had arrived so
quickly. He was impressed at their efficiency.
Then it occurred to him that a patrol car might have actu-
ally been in the parking lot at the very moment when it
happened. He thought of a trooper in the aisle of the super-
market, buying cookies to eat in the cruiser. A faint bubble of
old resentment rose in him. They were always after sweets.
Few people came to his beautiful fruit bins when they were
after a treat . . .
A dull knocking at the window to his right became insis-
tent. He swiveled his eyes reluctantly, pressing his forehead
harder against the partition. A shopper. Her long face with
incredible peach skin flushed ripe to the dark hairline pursed
and spread its peach-crack lips. The teeth, like sweet corn ker-
nels, whitened at him. The window glass vibrated, telling him
86 12/01/2015 12:06  87
‘ . . . solutely right, right, you were absolutely . . . and she was
pregnant again . . . right . . . you did the . . . decent . . . right’
before a pair of blue jodhpurs appeared behind the face and
the face jerked away and he saw the dimpled arm swing down
over the window beside the distended blouse of the beautiful
pregnant girl. She grasped what must have been the handles
of a baby stroller and disappeared, and he listened to the
rattle of the stroller wheels as the baby and the fetus and their
peach mother huffed away.
The sadness of his bruised and aching cheek began to pen-
etrate the calm flow of his breathing. Vern cried again and it
wasn’t long before the snot hung all the way to his wrists and
eased the rub of the metal cuffs.
The nurses were not as disgusted as the doctors but even they
were giggling at each other and moving jerkily. The policeman
with the thick glasses was sitting in an orange plasti-form chair
and trying to keep his holster and his belt radio from jabbing
him as he wrote down what Lil said. Lil would talk quickly for
a few seconds and then fall silent. Her eyes swiveled frantically
from one sheet-wrapped table to the next as she tried to watch
us all. The young policeman wrote intently on his yellow pad
and then distracted Lil from her surveillance with another
question.
Elly and Iphy took the longest. Arty and I were both lying
on our bellies, each on our own starch-itchy table, watching as
the doctor with the long black braid bent over the twins’
wounded arm. The doctor muttered at the white-faced nurse,
who kept handing over the wrong shiny metal thing. A doctor
with bad skin came back and stood between me and Arty. She
87 12/01/2015 12:06  88
began feeling me all over, tapping, listening through chilly
instruments. She hated to touch me. I could feel it and my
stomach got cold inside. She edged around the table, pushing
her fingers into the sides of my hump but avoiding the thick
bandage at the crest.
An old doctor went up to Lily and began to talk to her in an
earnest way, putting his stethoscope into the pocket of his
white coat and pulling it out and putting it back. Elly and Iphy
were not chattering. They stared at each other and at the arm
between them and at the braid that dipped and swung as the
dark face of their doctor squinted at their blood. Arty was
watching my pimple-faced doctor. I looked at Arty, checking
to see if these goings-on were all right. He licked his lips and
squinted. The bandage started on his shoulder and rode up the
side of his neck. It was hard for him to turn his head. The
sweat was beading out of his scalp. He was staring at the zit-
skinned hands on my hump when he yelled, ‘Leave her alone!
She’s all right!’ and the doctor’s hands leaped away from me.
‘There now, steady, little fella.’ The big nurse leaned a hes-
itant, damp-looking hand on Arty’s back to hold him down.
Arty’s face went into a deep bruise color that he hoarded for
serious tantrums.
He opened his mouth wide – his eyes bulging furiously at
me all the while. ‘Lil!’ he bellowed. ‘Call Papa, Lil! They’ll try
to keep us! They’ll take us and keep us!’
Lil was glaring at the oldest doctor and saying in her proper
Boston, ‘I certainly could not condone such a thing without
consulting their father.’
‘Papa!’ howled Arturo, and the twins began to cry their syn-
copated harmonic wail and I slid off my table and was trying
88 12/01/2015 12:06  89
to get my teeth to grip in the full, tight flesh beneath the fat
pink nurse’s buttock to distract them from Arty, and Arty
curled back to bite the big pink hand as the long braid of the
dark doctor swung like a whip at the sound of the instrument
tray emptying its dozen chrome miracles in a fire rain onto the
tiled floor.
That was when Papa came in with Horst the Cat Man. Arty
shut up and the pink nurse went to wash his hand. The twins
lay back down for the taping to be finished. Papa spoke his
best South Boston and the doctor gave up and said he
wouldn’t be responsible.
Horst scooped the twins up. One of their tear-streaked faces
peeked over each of his shoulders. Papa picked Arturo up very
gently and took my hand. With Lil close behind, Papa led us
all through the swinging doors and past the grey-haired lady
blinking at the desk and out through the emergency entrance
to where the little van was parked.
89 12/01/2015 12:06  90
6
The Lucky One
She is looking. Her fingers skim the red skull, flutter down the
crumpled features, twitch in brief visits to the ears, then slide
down for a brief grasp of the tiny jaw. Both her hands now
spread, touching the tiny arc of the breastbone, clasping the
shoulders tenderly. Lifting the two arms to their bent limit, her
fingers probe the joints, checking the dimpled knuckles, count-
ing, recounting the small larval fingers, reaching for the
thorax, a firm grasp on the concave buttocks that crease into
thin legs, and again the searching repeated. Count of the pea-
sized toes. Her eyes slide up to the flat, hooded eyes of her
husband, my father, the sire and deliverer. He looks away,
picks up damp cloths, busies himself with cleanliness. Her eyes
and hands return to the faintly squirming infant. She flips him
neatly, his chest in her left palm and her right hand now throb-
bing in terrible anxiety over the tiny padded spine.
‘But . . . ’ she begins, turns the babe back to re-examine his
front. ‘But, Al . . . ’ And the tent of wrinkles appears on her
90 12/01/2015 12:06  91
smooth milk forehead, the doubt that I had never seen in her
eyes before. Al turns away and then quickly forces himself to
come back to her. He puts his hands on her cheeks and strokes
softly.
‘It’s true, Lil. There’s nothing. He’s just a regular . . . regular
baby.’ And then Lil’s face is wet and her breath is bubbling
nastily. Al is darting at me where I am holding Arty up in the
doorway, and Elly and Iphy are pulling on my arm, and Al
says, ‘You kids fix some supper for yourselves – get, now –
leave your mom to rest.’ And Lil’s soggy voice is crying, ‘I did
everything, Al . . . I did what you said, Al . . . What happened,
Al? How could this happen?’
Al liked the snaky backroads in the hills. He drove like a rock,
his whole body slumped in a twitchless, nerveless mound. Even
his mustache seemed frozen over his mouth. Only his eyes
flicked constantly and his hands moved the wheel just enough
and no more. Arturo sat in the big co-pilot’s seat, strapped
upright, his eyes flickering like Al’s. I leaned on Arturo, half
dozing in the dark with the color points of the instrument
panel warming my eyes.
Lil hung on the support bar behind us, Her pale hair and
face caught the red glow of the dash lights. She swayed lightly
on the turns.
‘It’s nearly midnight, Al.’ Her voice was a stretched tissue of
sound that meant she was not going to cry, that she was delib-
erately squeezing back the more obvious forms of grief. It was
harder to deal with than her crying. Al’s hand tugged at a
strand of mustache and then returned to the wheel. His eyes
never left the road.
91 12/01/2015 12:06  92
‘We’ll hit Green River in another half hour . . . Did you write
the note?’ His voice was genially matter-of-fact.
Her body swayed behind me and I could smell a heavy wave
of sleep and milk and sweat from inside her robe.
‘I’ve been thinking a laundromat,’ she said. ‘It would be
warm. Women go there.’
The new baby had to be left somewhere. Al sent the rest of
the show east to Laramie. Green River, he said, was a good
town, clean, where a regular boy could grow up well. The plan
was to drive through in the night, leave the baby on a doorstep
where he would be found quickly, and then head out, leaving
no clues to connect him with a carnival hundreds of miles
away. A freighter went past going the other direction. Wind
shook us from the floorboards up. Al waited until the roar was
gone.
‘Lil, honey, this is a small town. The laundromat is most
likely not open twenty-four hours.’
‘I thought we could put him on top of a drier and put in
enough coins to keep it going all night.’ Al was patient, driv-
ing stolidly.
‘We’ll find a place that opens early. A snappy-looking busi-
ness. Owner a local pillar. Not white-collar, though. No
insurance or real estate. I don’t want him brought up by an
office worker.’
Arturo’s ribs swelled against me as he inhaled, then his soft
voice, ‘A gas station, maybe. Sure to be one on the main drag.’
Al took it as though it had come from his own mind. Arty
had that knack.
‘A gas station would be about right. You bundle him up
warm, Lil. They’ll open early to catch the mugs going to work.’
92 12/01/2015 12:06  93
Lil was fumbling in the dark.
‘I can’t find the writing pad,’ she called. Her voice had tears
high up near the surface now. Al’s big hand touched my scalp.
‘Help your ma, Oly.’
I found the writing tablet and a pencil in the drawer. Lil had
gone back to the bedroom. Iphy and Elly were asleep as I slid
by their bunk. I was proud to be up and useful while they
slept.
Lil was propped up on the pillows of the big bed. She was
pulling on the long red gloves that she used for shows. The
baby slept beside her, wrapped tight in the yellow blanket that
had covered each of us in turn. Lil’s face was flat and wet with
pain. I handed her the pad and pencil and climbed up beside
her. She sat up and leaned over the tablet. She gripped the
pencil between her long red fingers and opened the pad to the
blank middle s. She rubbed the  with her gloved
hand, turned it over and rubbed the other side. Then she
turned it back and began printing carefully against the sway of
the van. Some tears came out while she wrote and she tipped
forward so they would fall onto the .
‘Please take care of my baby,’ she read aloud as she wrote.
Signed, ‘Unemployed and unwed.’
She sighed, tore the  out and folded it. She saw me
looking at her. She smiled a weak smile. Her glove came out
and rubbed my smooth head.
‘I signed it that way so the people who find him will think
that is the reason he was left. I said “unemployed” rather than
“out of work” to give people the idea that his parents weren’t
illiterate, anyway. Maybe if they think he came from educated
93 12/01/2015 12:06  94
people they’ll assume he’s got good genetic stock. It might give
him a better chance.’
I put my nose into the palm of her glove. I liked her for
thinking about that. I liked her for grieving over this regular
baby. It made me feel important and loved. I thought she
would have really cried if she’d had to give me up.
The morning before, while the plans were still forming, Al had
checked out the van. Arty crawled underneath and talked to Al
while he cranked the wrenches around. I tried to get close
enough to hear but couldn’t. Later, at the breakfast table, Al
told it as though it had occurred to him without outside help.
‘We could go into a big supermarket and wait in an aisle
until there was no one else in sight and push the cans of beans
aside – you know how deep those shelves are – and lay him on
the shelf at the back and then stack cans in front of him again
and walk away. When he started to cry it would just take them
a few minutes to find him.’
Lil was intrigued, of course, but insisted on stowing her
babe not behind plebeian beans but behind artichoke hearts,
escargots, some comestible expensive and erudite enough to
guarantee that the customer who shoved the cans aside and
discovered this sweet morsel would have a certain cachet of
worldliness and money.
Then Al remembered the surveillance cameras and other
security hardware and discarded the idea. But I knew it had
come from Arty originally. It smacked of him.
So, we were doing what Al referred to as ‘the sensible thing.’
The elderly thin flannel blanket and the kid’s unremarkable
94 12/01/2015 12:06  95
underwear had all been checked for identifying labels, or
floating sequins, that might pin the job on us. Even the card-
board box, an ex-cradle for canned pumpkin, had been
checked. Al phoned a grocery from a booth in our last pit
stop to make sure they had the brand in the area. Standard
brown-paper insulation, layered and crumpled for warmth.
Nothing so foolish as a newspaper from anywhere along the
route.
And the red gloves, the long suede arms reaching past the
elbows, with three cunning buttons at the slit wrist to close
them and the fingers so supple her nails and knuckles showed
through. And the mid- of the writing pad wiped of fin-
gerprints. These minor dodges my parents performed as
automatically as the swallowing of spit. The thinking part
came in avoiding too much thought, in the spontaneous flare
of not scouting ahead – not speeding – and in the care that Al
had taken with the van’s checkup back there in Whore
Meadow, Idaho, where he made sure we would not break
down, run out of fuel, or blow a tire before we were well away
from the last sight of our own castoff perfection. The
Binewskis weren’t crooks, but we had a sense of timing.
I was rustling in the drawer next to the sink for tape. Mama
wanted tape to fasten the note on the baby. It was dark and I
could see Al’s head and shoulders against the bright windshield
when the van slowed. I grabbed the sink edge to balance as we
pulled off into popping gravel. Al doused the lights.
‘Oly, is your mama ready?’ His voice was close to me.
‘Just about, Papa.’
‘Tell her to be quick. We don’t want to stop for more than
95 12/01/2015 12:06  96
one minute and I’m going to make just one pass through town,
so we’ve got to spot the place and decide fast. Tell her.’
I had the roll of tape in my fist. I shut the drawer and
headed for the crack of light showing at the edge of the slid-
ing door to Mama’s room at the end of the van.
She was sitting on the bed with the baby’s cardboard box
beside her. She looked up at me as I whispered Papa’s mes-
sage. She nodded and reached out a red-gloved hand for the
tape. We were moving again. She tore off tape and neatly
plastered the note to the flap of the box. Tears ran quietly
down her cheeks. There was a crackle from the paper in the
box. The baby was moving slightly. Mama’s eyebrows peaked
in a tent above her nose as she looked at me through her red
eyes.
‘He might wake,’ she whispered wetly. ‘He’s been asleep
almost three hours. He’ll be hungry.’ Her voice squeaked out
through the whisper. ‘Tell Papa we have to wait till I can feed
him. Tell him to park somewhere.’ A push in her eyes sent me
back, feeling my way toward the cockpit, with tears coming
out of my own eyes. As I reached for the support bar behind
Papa, the van reeled beneath me and we were turning right
beneath a streetlight into the purple shadows of a three-island,
twelve-pump gas station with its ‘ CLOSED – open again 6 A . M . ’
sign large and pale in the window of the office. On the wall of
the office, a tire with a clock in its center hung numbly, with
one hand drooping to 12:35.
‘Papa,’ I started to say, as he lurched up from the seat and
swung toward me.
‘Gangway, Oly,’ he snapped as he pushed past me, a wave
of heat and cigar smoke and father flesh moving away toward
96 12/01/2015 12:06  97
the open door of the bedroom. Arty smiled at me from the
passenger seat. He reared his head back, baring his teeth to
show me his excitement.
‘No, Al!’ came Lil’s voice from the bedroom.
‘Quick, Lil, get a move on!’ and I could see Papa bending
over the visible corner of the big bed, reaching.
‘Al, I’ve got to feed him! He’s awake!’
But Papa was pulling and the cardboard box slid toward
him with Mama’s long red gloves attached to it.
‘Lily, there isn’t time!’
A thin, monotonous siren wailed from the box as Al lifted
it and the reaching red gloves towed Mama along in her limp
robe. Papa came through the door toward us and put the box
down on the floor next to the side door as Mama rushed
behind him, with the light from the bedroom door shining
through her pale hair. Papa opened the side door and peered
out, and Mama hit the light switch as she leaned over the box.
Her pink robe and red-gloved hands dove toward the wadded
papers that filled the box around the baby.
Papa said, ‘Hand it to me, Lily,’ as he stepped down to the
pavement and turned around to see, as Arty saw, and I saw,
Lily tilting oddly, her head against the door frame, her robe
spreading open around her, her whipped-cream hair jerking
out in thick snakes that tried to escape from her head in all
directions. We heard the ping of hairpins hitting the window,
the floor, the wall, and Mama’s gasp and muffled shriek as she
lifted off the floor and floated, lying on the air while her thick-
strapped brassière stretched away from her with an ugly,
ripping sound, and her feet, in pale lavender socks, stretched
wobbling toward the light in the ceiling, and her hair fell in
97 12/01/2015 12:06  98
coils over her face. ‘Mama! Lil! Mama!’ we all howled, as her
huge blue-veined breasts burst through the brassière and she
dove into the cardboard box, falling with her breasts in the
box as her arms waved and her head lifted against the pull
from the box and her white legs twitched and crawled on the
floor beneath the rucked and flapping robe and one lavender
sock rumpled its way off her foot.
Then Al was on his knees in the doorway, stroking her head
and saying, ‘Sweet shit, Lily,’ through her soft sobbing. Arty
grunted, his head craned around the back of the seat. His eyes
overran his wide face. I sat on the floor against the cupboard
with my mouth and eyes open, and Elly and Iphy sat up in their
bunk with bewildered eyes and wide befuddled mouths saying,
‘Mama,’ in a drawn-out complaint. A painful, thin whine came
out of my own nose and only one voice was silent, only one of
all the Binewskis was not adding to the noise, and that was the
paper-padded morsel in the box, who was invisible except for
one tiny hand opening and closing in a tangled strand of Lil’s
white hair. The baby was not crying anymore. When, for an
instant, we were all silent together, we could hear the chuckling
smack of his lips at the bruised brown nipple.
It was a minute or two before Lily could sneak an arm into
the box and lift the baby up to her as she collapsed onto the
floor, and sat with her feet mixing with my feet. One fat arm
and the fuzzy knot of head buried in her breast were all that
showed of the baby outside his cone of blanket. Al crawled in
and sat on the floor beside her.
‘What happened?’ he asked.
She looked at him with her eyes so wide open that the
whites showed all the way around her wobbling blue irises.
98 12/01/2015 12:06  99
She laughed shakily. ‘I guess he wanted to nurse.’ She looked
down at the little rumpled face and Al stared at a hairpin on
the floor in front of him.
The twins, groggy in their bunk, and Arty with his chin
propped on the back of his seat, and I, slumped in the corner,
sat gawking as Mama’s tired face slowly developed a swelling
over her right eyebrow where she’d banged her head on the
wall when she dove into the box. She shifted slightly to get
more comfortable and her robe slid away from her knees.
They were scraped raw, with beads of blood swelling out
through the pores.
‘Are you saying,’ Al stretched out a hand and carefully
picked up the hairpin, ‘that the baby did that? Hoisted you up
like that?’
Mama’s eyes snapped with anger. ‘I told you he was
hungry!’
The tiny fist, like a spider on a sand dune, clenched and
opened and clenched against Mama’s breast. The suckling
sound went on.
Papa was staring at that hand. His lower jaw looked oddly
soft and slack beneath his mustache. He got slowly up on his
knees and picked up two more hairpins. He found another pin
on the windowsill and stood up, looking at the hairpins in his
hand. Mama concentrated on the small face at her breast. She
seemed calm, forgetful of the tears and the ragged, dangling
remains of the brassière.
‘Well,’ Papa cleared his throat, ‘we need to think a little bit,
Lily. I’m going to drive on up the road. We’ll find a rest stop
and pull over for the night.’ Mama nodded peaceably.
*
99 12/01/2015 12:06  100
The twins went back to sleep and I crawled into my cup-
board and Arty humped his way into his bunk and Mama and
the baby went back into the bedroom. Al drove in the dark
until he came to a pulloff surrounded by high black firs. Arty
and I stayed awake for a long time listening to Papa and
Mama in their bedroom. Papa cleaned and dressed Mama’s
knees and put a cold pack on her thick blue eyebrow bruise.
He put the sleeping baby into the crib beside their big bed,
and they sat watching together and saw the thin flannel blan-
ket curl slowly up in a twisted bundle and then push toward
the headboard of the crib, where it lay twitching and scrub-
bing back and forth all by itself while the baby slept. Arty and
I both heard Papa say, ‘He moves things. He moves things.’
We heard Mama start to cry again softly when Papa said,
‘He’s a keeper, darling. He’s the finest thing we’ve done! He’s
fantastic!’
Things were quiet after that, except for what the dark trees
were doing among themselves outside. ‘Poor Arty,’ I thought.
‘He’ll be miserable.’
We stopped on an edgeless plateau that stretched to nothing on
all sides, making the eye desperate, shriveling the brain to dry
hopelessness between the dreary sheets of sky and ground.
Papa climbed out of the driver’s seat, threw back the side door,
and jumped down. Mama was in the bedroom with the door
closed, still sleeping. Elly and Iphy were huddled on their neat
bunk with a puzzle. I was trying to read over Arty’s shoulder
as I turned s for him. None of us looked out the windows.
We all hated the bleak, flat stretches. Papa had left the door
propped open and a rip of wind twisted into the van, mussing
100 12/01/2015 12:06  101
our s and carrying dust and the rough sting of sage with
it. Papa was out there, walking in the desert.
He’d been silent all morning, and excited. He wouldn’t let
any of us sit up front with him. We’d squared away our beds
and the twins put out cold cereal for breakfast and handed a
mug of coffee up to Papa. Arty had been quiet too.
Papa’s boots crunched on the gravel outside and his head
came through the open door.
‘Step out here, dreamlets,’ he said, then disappeared. None
of us wanted to get out into that wind but we went, silently.
Arty came last and just slid down onto the step and lay there
blinking at the grit in the air. The twins leaned on the van and
I stood near them watching Papa. He paced in front of us. Just
a few steps in each direction and then back. The wind
thumped and whacked at his jacket flaps and lifted his black
hair against the grain. He looked away most of the time out
over the plain at the waving stubs of brush and broom. When
he glanced at us, between phrases, his eyes were dangerous.
We listened gravely.
‘Your mama and I have decided to keep the new baby.’
Each of us, he said, was special and unique and this baby
looked like a norm but had something special too. He could
move things with his mind.
‘Telekinetic,’ said Arty flatly.
Yes, telekinetic, Papa said. And he explained that it was a
thing he didn’t know about, that none of us knew about, and
that we’d have to be very careful for a while until we figured
out how to deal with it and what it was good for.
‘We’ll join up with the show by morning and discuss the sit-
uation with Horst. Horst is a trainer and training is what we
101 12/01/2015 12:06  102
need. Horst can also keep his trap shut. Now here’s the impor-
tant thing.’ And he said we were to act as though he were just
a norm baby, even with people in the show who we liked and
trusted.
‘The army will want him,’ said Arty.
‘Well, they aren’t going to get him,’ said Papa.
We all had to stick together like troopers, said Papa, and the
baby’s name was to be Fortunato, which means Lucky.
Though his body did only the normal cherubic things, Fortun -
ato’s effect on the environment at the age of three weeks was
already far beyond that of a hyperactive and malicious ten-
year-old. He had to be confined to the cubicle we called our
parents’ bedroom. Mama moved everything breakable, shred-
dable, or toxic out of her room so the baby wouldn’t destroy
it or himself. Our tidy van became a heaped bunker. Platoons
of makeup bottles and boot-polish cans stuffed the cupboards.
All the sequined clothing hung over the twins’ bunk. Lamps,
clocks, and framed photos littered Arty’s unmade bed. Papa’s
medical magazines and books were stacked everywhere.
Mama’s sewing machine moved under the sink with me. I slept
with my knees touching my chin.
Six of us could live comfortably in the thirty-eight-by-ten-
foot van only by dint of religious housekeeping. The mess
wore us down. We hated it. Obviously training had to begin
immediately for this seventh member of the family.
With some well-placed hints from big brother Arturo, my
ingenious father hit upon the expedient of glycerin and black
tape for wiring Fortunato’s little buttocks to a miniature elec-
tric train transformer and a battery pack. Whenever Fortunato
102 12/01/2015 12:06  103
broke dishes or pulled hair or lifted Lil in the air and held her
against the ceiling, Papa would gently turn on the power. In a
matter of days, however, the precocious Chick, as we called
him, learned to unplug the transformer and whip Papa’s curly
pate with the cord.
Deprivation techniques were substituted, Clyde Beatty style,
but Fortunato had to sleep in a heavy wire cage during that
experiment because, when Lil refused to nurse him, he would
simply yank her toward him and reenact his debut performance.
The raw potential of Fortunato’s abilities spurred my par-
ents to research. By the time Chick was four months old. Al
introduced the behavioral principles of B.F. Skinner and rein-
forcement theory successfully replaced deprivation.
Mama finally dared to bring him out of the Chick-proof
bedroom. It was several weeks more before she could actually
step out of the van with the baby in her arms and walk
through the camp without his moving every bright-colored
thing in sight.
103 12/01/2015 12:06  104
7
Green – as in Arsenic, Tarnished
Spoons and Gas-Chamber Doors
The real trouble, as usual, was Arty. He’d always been jealous.
He didn’t mind me so much because money was the gauge of
his envy and I didn’t make any.
The twins, however, drove him wild. After every show he
would hook his chin over the edge of his tank, spraying me
with the overflow, to demand the number of tickets sold at the
gate. ‘How many?’ he’d holler. But it didn’t matter – thirty in
Oak Grove, three hundred in Phoenix, a thousand in Kansas
City. What he really wanted to know was how he had done
compared to the twins. If they had as many or more in their
audience he was furious.
Sometimes in those days he would flash to the bottom of the
tank and sulk, holding his breath for incredible minutes, eyes
bulging outside the sockets so they hid the lids entirely.
When I was five and first took over the duty of helping him
after his shows, he terrified me with this tactic. He muttered,
104 12/01/2015 12:06  105
‘I’ll die. I might as well,’ and I wailed and hopped in agony as
he sank, staring through the glass.
I ran shrieking to Papa. He clapped his cheek and bellowed
at me not to humor Arty when he was ‘playing prima donna!’
I ran back dithering, chewing my hands in fright, until
Arty finally allowed himself to roll slowly over and drift,
belly up, toward the surface, where my short arms could
reach him with the crook and tow him to the side. I patted
and smoothed his water-swollen scalp and kissed his cheeks
and nose and ears, weeping and begging him not to be dead
because I, useless though I was, loved him. At last he blinked
and sighed and let his breathing become visible and growled
for his towel.
All this over a few tickets one way or another when he was
ten years old. I knew he wouldn’t take to the Chick.
Nearly dawn. The show was closed down. Lil and Papa were
asleep. The twins were snugged in their bunk snoring.
Fortunato, the Chick, lay silent in his crib with the blanket
twitching around him in his dreams. But at this end of the van
twelve-year-old Arty sat propped against the table looking
over the ticket-count sheets. I crouched on the floor with my
back to the cupboard doors. If he was angry I would pop open
one of the doors and creep inside bawling, shut myself into the
blackness and pull my cap down over my eyes so I could cry
into the wool, and pull Lil’s old sweaters over me. He shook
his head. The yellow light gleamed on his skull and I began to
sniffle a little. He threw a look at me – sharp – I gulped down
my snot and grinned at him feebly. He turned back to the
ticket sheets. His voice started slow and soft.
105 12/01/2015 12:06  106
‘Now, you know very well what I’m seeing here.’ He wasn’t
looking at me but I nodded, ready to cry. He was looking at
the papers in a sad, doubtful way. His voice dripped regret.
‘Nobody expects you to bring in the kind of money that I do.’
I shook my head. That would be absurd. ‘Or even,’ he pursed
his mouth, ‘what the twins manage.’ I put my eyes down onto
my knees and sighed, my whole worthless body quivering. ‘It
isn’t your fault that you’re so ordinary. Papa accepts the
responsibility for that.’ The moment of silence told me that he
was looking at me. I could feel his eyes on my hump.
As I cried he pointed out the discrepancies. When I did the
talking for his show the tickets were 15 to 50 percent less than
when Al did it. We both knew that Al only let me do it when
we were in Podunk burntout towns for a quick stopover and
that the sales were down all through the midway in those
places. Still, there was some ghastly truth in Arty’s needling.
Some probing of my guilt that was right no matter how he lied
about it.
Then he would threaten me with the ‘institution,’ which
was the place that I would be sent to if I didn’t shape up. ‘No
matter how generous and kind Papa and Lil are – they
wouldn’t have any choice,’ he would say. His sympathy and
understanding washed around me with razors caught in the
flow. Arty’s depiction of the ‘institution’ scared me more than
death or snakes. The institution was a cross between an
orphanage and a slaughterhouse. Worst of all, it was run
entirely by norms. The word alone would set my chin trem-
bling. I would beg and grieve and he would allow that I
deserved another chance.
*
106 12/01/2015 12:06  107
‘We don’t have to keep new kids,’ Arty sneered. ‘Sometimes we
don’t keep ’em and sometimes they don’t last.’ He was in his
mean lecturing mood, twisting his head to look at me over the
back of his chair as I pushed him through the grey dawn to
visit the dog act. ‘You don’t know about the ones before you,’
he warned. ‘The ones that died. Papa and Mama don’t talk
about them, but I remember.’
‘I help Mama with the jars in the Chute.’ I grunted, shoving
hard to force the chair wheels through the sawdust. Arty
snorted and shook his head. ‘There were three before me and
two more before the twins. There was another one just before
you. That’s why Papa let her keep you, because the other one
died just before. It gets her down. You wouldn’t have been a
keeper if the other one had lived. She gets low when she loses
one and it bothers Papa to see her like that.’
He was trying to make me cry but I didn’t care. I was happy
to have him talking to me. He’d been cranky and sullen for a
long time. He went about his work, did his shows, ate, slept,
read books, and didn’t talk much except when he was laying
weasel trails for Mama and Papa.
‘Which one was it? Just before me?’
Arty rolled his eyes and dropped his voice. ‘Leona.’ He
drew it out like a moan, watching me. I ducked my head and
pushed his chair. Leona with the alligator tail would defi-
nitely have been a keeper. Leona would have had her own
show tent and glow-in-the-dark posters in silver and green.
Arty mused wistfully, ‘Papa was very excited about Leona.
He thought about showing her in a tank. He was hoping
she’d stay hairless but he could have depilated her if she’d
started sprouting. He even thought about putting her in with
107 12/01/2015 12:06  108
me. Papa saw the billing as tadpoles. Different stages of tad-
poles.’
He was light and airy about it. I stopped pushing and
walked around to face him for a minute. He was nodding and
blinking, pretending nostalgia for poor Leona.
‘That must have scared you, Arty.’ I grinned.
A slow smile spread gradually across his rubbery mug. He
wriggled his forehead at me, for all the world like Papa danc-
ing his eyebrows. ‘Poor Leona. She just went to sleep one night
and never woke up. Mama was just about crazy when she
found her the next morning.’ Arty’s round, wide head did its
snake dance, turning on his neck in mock grief, and I knew the
taut slide of his skin over tendon and meat, and loved the
shadow dip of his bones underneath and the wide smooth roll
of his lips.
What I felt was fear. Arty saw it in my face and slid into his
whipmaster act fast. ‘Onward, Jeeves,’ he snapped. ‘To the
dogs!’ I scuttled back to push, wading through the sawdust
and keeping my butt muscles clenched to avoid filling my
pants.
‘Is it O.K. if me and Arty play with Skeet?’ I asked. The dog
reek from the trailer door might have been Mrs. Minuti’s
breath. She swallowed and tried to focus through her hang-
over. Her hair was short and spiky with a clot of last night’s
supper caught above her ear. She pulled her nightgown out
from her chest and belched softly. ‘Sure,’ she nodded. She
didn’t complain about the hour or the fact that Skeet was her
star poodle because we were the boss’s kids and dog trainers
are easy to come by. She disappeared inside the trailer and Arty
108 12/01/2015 12:06  109
stared tensely at the open door. The dog came scratching
around the doorway and jumped down beside me, with his
long leash trailing up to Mrs. Minuti’s shaking hand. She gave
me the leash and told me not to let him wander loose.
I hooked the leash on a back post of Arty’s chair and
wheeled him toward a hard-packed grassless stretch behind the
booths. The dog bounced along nosing everything, pissing ten
times in two minutes.
By the time we got to the clear spot the dog seemed to have
calmed down a little. ‘You just stay close and be quiet,’ Arty
told me. I sat down to watch. Arty called the poodle to him
and the silly dog put a paw up on Arty’s chair and cocked its
ears at him, wagging the pompom on the end of its skinny tail.
Arty hadn’t explained what he had in mind. I sneered, ‘Arty
the wildbeast trainer,’ to myself. On the other side of the
booths the camp was just beginning to wake up. An occasional
trailer door slammed. A voice or two sounded faintly. A
mechanic turned over one of the ride engines and let it sputter
to death.
Arty looked the dog in the eye. The dog sat, obediently
alert, directly in front of Arty, watching his face. Arty froze
with his eyes open, focused on the dog, but his face sleep-
smooth, expressionless. At first the dog was happy as an
idiot – short confidential flips of tail against ground, a swivel-
ing of sharp ears, tongue-dripping grin. Gradually the dog lost
confidence, licking its chops and closing its mouth, tilting those
ears questioningly forward at Arty. An anxious burst of tail
rapping. Then Skeet shoved his nose forward, sniffing wor-
riedly at Arty, letting a thin, high whine out through his nose,
skootching his ass nervously against the dirt. Arty sat with his
109 12/01/2015 12:06  110
fins curled and still, his face thrust slightly forward and down.
The poodle didn’t dare look away from Arty’s face but began
to lick his own nose repeatedly, stand up, then sit down fast
with his tail under him, letting his ears droop. Finally, whin-
ing, ears flattened, head down and wobbling moron eyes
wincing at Arty, the dog slid to the side with a yelp as though
he’d been kicked.
Arty threw himself against the back of his chair, breathing
deeply with his eyes closed. Skeet backed to the end of his
leash and did his best to slink out of his collar. Arty sat back
up and looked around for the dog.
‘Skeet! Come here!’ he ordered. The dog bolted to the end
of the leash, snapping himself into the air. He flopped onto his
back and lay there, belly up, and began to yowl. Arty laughed
a little to himself and said we could take him back. ‘I can prac-
tice my hate thoughts on the norms in the midway, too,’ he
said.
Arty never bad-mouthed Chick openly. Anything that obvious
would have shocked Papa and Mama into the blue zone. But
I knew. I was the one who did the most for Arty. I spent a lot
of time with him and a lot of time thinking about him. I loved
him.
Privately I thought that Mama and Papa loved him only
because they didn’t know him. Iphy loved him because he
wanted her to and she couldn’t help it. Elly knew him and
didn’t love him at all. She was afraid of him and hated him
because she could see what he was like. I was the only one
who knew his dark, bitter meanness and his jagged, rippling
jealousy, and his sour yearnings, and still loved him. I also
110 12/01/2015 12:06  111
knew how breakable he was. He didn’t care if I knew. He
didn’t care if I loved him. He knew I’d serve him absolutely
even if he hurt me. And I was not a rival to him. I didn’t have
an act of my own. I drew the crowds to him rather than to
myself.
I was supposed to listen for Chick. He was asleep on Mama’s
bed and I was supposed to stay inside and wait for his waking
squeak. I would change his diaper and give him some apple
juice and play with him until Mama was finished with the
twins’ piano lesson.
But the sky was blade-blue, the windows were open, and
the redheads were spinning tales just outside. I could hear
them laughing. They were lying on blankets in the sun, drink-
ing soda and slathering themselves with oil. The whiff of
coconut and lanolin came drifting in through the window.
I was supposed to sit inside by myself and read but Peggy’s
soft voice began a story, and the other redheads quieted to
listen. I couldn’t make out what she was saying. I went out
through the screen door and around the van to flop on the
grass beside the blankets. With the window open I thought I’d
hear Chick as soon as he woke. I picked and chewed grass
stems as Peggy talked.
It was about a very young boy, fourteen or so, and Peggy
claimed it was true. He died for love, she said. His family was
poor. He was cut out for heavy work and bad pay, but he was
a sweet kid, and he loved a cheerleader in his school. She
wouldn’t even look at him, of course. Her life was different.
But then she got sick and the doctors said it was her heart. She
would die, they said, unless she could get a new one. The word
111 12/01/2015 12:06  112
went around the school that she was waiting for a donor. The
boy was terribly sad for a while, but then he told his mother
that he was going to die and give his heart to the girl. His
mother thought this was just his sweetness talking. He was
healthy. But a few days later he dropped dead. Instantly. A
brain hemorrhage, they said. Surprisingly, the doctors found
that his bits actually were compatible to the cheerleader’s, and
they transplanted his fresh heart into her. It worked. Now she
dances and cheers again with the poor boy’s heart.
The redheads were impressed. Vicki said it would be weird
to feel your life pumping through this heart that had loved
you. Lisa wondered if the cheerleader would be haunted.
‘He was probably worth three of her,’ said Mollie. ‘A heart
like that.’
Then from the bedroom of the van just behind me came a
single loud slam like a twelve-pound hammer on sheet steel. In
the fading echo Chick was screaming.
I was halfway around to the screen before the redheads even
started telling me that my baby brother must have fallen out
of bed. Peggy and Mollie were up, following me. By raw luck
the screen door latched behind me as I whipped through.
Chick was on the bed, purple-faced and howling. I jumped
up beside him and pulled him into my arms. He was shaking
and gasping between shrieks. He couldn’t make so much noise
if there was anything stuck in his throat. I felt for his diaper
pins. Were they sticking him? Then I saw Arty.
He was crumpled face down on the floor in the narrow
crack between the bed and the wall. He wasn’t moving.
‘Oly, is the baby all right?’ Mollie was rattling the screen
door. ‘Oly?’
112 12/01/2015 12:06  113
Chick subsided to unhappy burbles and hiccups, and I slid
him back onto the blanket. ‘Arty?’ I whispered. No answer.
No movement. At the foot of the bed lay a big rumpled pillow
with a grey spot of dampness in its creased middle. The pillow
had been tidy at the head of the bed the last time I’d peeked in.
Chick could have moved it, but Arty’s talk about Leona the
Lizard Girl hit me again. I knew. Arty had tried to smother the
Chick.
I hung over the bedside, reaching to touch him. ‘Arty?’ His
head was heavy, his fins limp.
Mama and Papa mustn’t find out. I jumped down, grabbed
Arty by the rear fins, and pulled him back down the carpeted
ravine to the bedroom door, and out into the living section of
the van.
‘Oly? Are you O.K., honey?’ Peggy was at the screen door.
‘Is the baby O.K.?’ Mollie called.
Chick was hiccuping in the bedroom. He sobbed occasion-
ally. Arty was very still. I turned his head to the side so I could
see his face. His eyes were closed. A big patch on his forehead
was beginning to turn blue. I took a deep breath and ran to the
door. The redheads stared in at me. ‘I think Chick’s O.K . . .
But Arty . . . ’ I lifted the latch and began to cry.
I huddled on Mama’s bed with Chick during the uproar, and
heard the grownups decide that Arty had climbed up on the
kitchen counter and fallen off onto his head. He was still uncon-
scious when Mama rushed him off to Papa’s infirmary trailer.
Chick sat up beside me, his fuzzy hair frowzled, and patted
my cheeks with his tiny hands. He ran his fingers into my nos-
trils and mouth until I smiled, painfully. Then he smiled too,
with his few teeth all showing in his floppy grin.
113 12/01/2015 12:06  114
Above us on the painted metal wall was a shallow dent the
size of a dinner plate.
‘Oh, Chick,’ I said.
The twins marched in and commandeered the baby. ‘If
you’d been inside where you were supposed to be,’ said Elly,
‘this wouldn’t have happened.’
‘You could have helped Arty get what he was looking for,’
said Iphy.
I hugged my knees and stared numbly at them. The rat was
awake in my belly.
They took Chick out to the dining booth to play with him
and I lay there on Mama’s big lavender bed and thought about
Arty coming in through the screen door and finding nobody
and humping his way back to the bedroom and seeing Chick
asleep on the bed. I saw him push his way carefully up to the
pillows and grapple one onto the baby’s sleeping face, Arty
leaning on it with his whole weight. So Chick woke up and
threw Arty just as he’d thrown a toy or a chunk of banana.
Without touching him.
Mama stayed at the infirmary with Arty but Papa came back
with the news.
‘The poor little apple batted awake and says, “Mama,
Papa,” first thing. I whooped and your mama stopped crying.
He couldn’t remember a thing about it. He’s got a concussion
and a dog hair of a skull fracture, but praise be, he’ll be right
in no time.’
Elly shrugged. Iphy clapped her hands. ‘I’m so glad.’
I laced my fingers over my pointed chest and closed my
eyes, breathing in gratitude that I hadn’t got him killed and
114 12/01/2015 12:06  115
that he’d been clear-headed enough to ‘forget’ what had
happened.
We fed Chick from a bottle until Mama and Arty came
home the next afternoon. He was good about it. But when
Mama noticed the dent in the wall a few days later I told her
that Chick had thrown his bottle at it once while she was gone.
She tsked but didn’t scold him. It was too late, she said. ‘You
have to ‘No’ him just when he’s done it. He wouldn’t know
why I was fussing at him now.’
Arty lay on his bunk in the middle of everything and we
danced to his tune. The twins waited on him and I helped him
to the toilet, and Mama spent all her time thinking of delicate
things for him to eat. He was happy. He was polite. He smiled
and laughed at the jokes we made to amuse him.
He couldn’t read for a while. His eyes wobbled and trying
to focus gave him headaches. I read to him in my slow, stum-
bling way and he corrected and scolded and made me go on
for hours. By the time he could read for himself again, I could
read almost anything, though my pronunciation was still
shaky on words I didn’t know.
Mama did her duty by Chick but fussed over Arty. For days
Chick barely appeared outside the bedroom. Then Mama
brought him out and tucked him in beside Arty ‘to watch
while Mama makes supper for her beautiful boys,’ as she put
it. I felt my stomach claw its way into my throat, but Chick
snuggled up to Arty happily and played with his fin. Arty
blinked for a second and then went along with it.
I secretly swore to make Arty the king of the universe so he
wouldn’t be jealous of Chick.
*
115 12/01/2015 12:06  116
Arty’s big tent stayed folded on the trucks through a dozen
moves. It cut into our take dramatically. Papa tried to keep
Arty from knowing how much money we were losing with
him out sick. When Papa sat late in the dining booth doing the
books, Arty would ask, ‘How’s it going?’ and Papa would sigh
and say, ‘Fine, boychik. Don’t you worry your poor busted
noggin about it.’ This put Arty into a foul mood for several
days. Finally one night, late, he called out from his bunk, ‘I
guess the show doesn’t need me, Papa. You’d do fine with just
the twins if I died.’ Then Papa went and scooped him up and
took him to the table and showed him how the gross had
slipped. Arty was happy again and started going over the
accounts with Papa.
It was more than a month before he tried going back into
the tank at all. His first test trip into the water was a shock.
Papa and I leaned on the tank to watch as he flipped down in
his usual straight-to-the-bottom flow. He burst through the
surface seconds later, gasping. ‘It hurts!’ he puffed. ‘And I can’t
hold my breath.’
Papa was grim and silent as he carried Arty back to our van.
I knew he was wondering what would happen if Arty couldn’t
dive anymore. That afternoon he got a set of weights and a
bench from the storage truck, remnants of an old strongman
act. He set up a gym on the stage behind Arty’s tank. Arty
began working out and was back in the water within the week.
Not long afterward, Arturo the Aqua Boy was back in lights
and packing them in.
116 12/01/2015 12:06  117
8
Educating the Chick
A carnival in daylight is an unfinished beast, anyway. Rain
makes it a ghost. The wheezing music from the empty, motion-
less rides in a soggy, rained-out afternoon midway always hit
my chest with a sweet ache. The colored dance of the lights in
the seeping air flashed the puddles in the sawdust with an oily
glamour.
I sat on the counter of the Marvelous Marv booth and
kicked my feet slowly. No drips came through the green
awning but the air was so full of water that it congealed on my
face and clothes whenever I moved. I was watching the
summer geek boy, a blond Jeff from some college in the far
Northeast, as he leaned on the snack-wagon counter across the
way and flirted with the red-haired girl running the popcorn
machine.
Behind me in the Marv booth, Papa Al and Horst sat facing
each other on camp stools with the checkerboard betwen
them. Marvelous Marv had the afternoon off and Horst’s cats
117 12/01/2015 12:06  118
were fussing and coughing at the damp. The cats’ voices
roared around their big steel trailer but came echoing dimly
through the rain.
Al’s cigar butt arced out over the counter past my elbow,
spitting red as it died in a puddle.
‘Long as you’re playing with your boots instead of your
brains,’ drawled Horst, ‘why don’t we make this next game for
my new tiger cub that I’m going to pick up in New Orleans?
I win, you buy me that cub for my birthday.’
I could hear Papa’s match scraping the stool leg, then the
hiss and a silence that produced a reek of green tobacco from
his new cigar.
‘Hell, Horst. I’ve already gifted your birthdays for the next
ninety years.’
The click of the checkers being laid out for the new game
sounded on top of the thin tinkle of the piano from the twins’
practice session in the stage tent. I tried to hear Lil’s voice
counting shrilly over the treble but the rain didn’t carry it.
‘That baby’s birthday is coming up,’ said Horst.
‘Almost three,’ grunted Papa, ‘and I’m still boggled. Keep
thinking of great things for him to do and then realizing we
can’t have it. Begin to think maybe this little guy is too much
for me to handle.’
‘Nice temper that child has,’ Horst’s careful voice, not push-
ing. ‘Wished I had a cat as willing and sweet as that child.
Wants to please.’
‘All my kids are sweet and willing! Show me a family of
troopers anywhere to beat them!’ Al wasn’t really angry, just
doing his duty by his own. ‘But that’s not the problem,’ he
added. ‘No,’ Horst agreed.
118 12/01/2015 12:06  119
The sound of a checker jumping twice, then a long silence.
Jeff, the geek boy, gave up his wooing for the moment and
slogged dejectedly away from the popcorn counter. The red-
haired girl smiled after him and smiled as she stabbed pointed
sticks into a row of apples dipping in caramel. She began hum-
ming a song I didn’t recognize.
I rolled through the crowd in the midway with my head at the
general crotch level. Music and lights blaring, a thousand arms
sweating around a thousand waists. Children, fussing and beg-
ging and bouncing, hung onto the tall norms. The legs
scissored past me, slowing when they approached me. I was
just walking through, from one end to the other, trying to feel
the instant when the wallet in my blouse front was meddled
with. If I felt anything I would stop and throw my hands in the
air and Papa, sitting up there on the roof of the power truck
with Chick in his lap, would see me and then I’d walk on.
‘Fuckin’ kee-rist! What happened to you?’ asked a knock-
kneed drunk tottering in front of me. I grinned at him and
swerved around, with a little cramp in my lungs. Arty and the
twins couldn’t come out in the crowd like this. Once the gates
opened and the norms trickled through, my more gifted sib-
lings hid. The crowd won’t pay for what they can see free.
There were security reasons as well. They were ‘more obvious
focal points for the Philistine manias of the evilly deranged.’
That’s how Papa put it.
A small child looked into my face and wanted to stop but
his mother dragged him on. Sometimes when I felt the eyes
crawling on me from all sides, I got scared thinking someone
was looking who wasn’t just curious. I knew it was my
119 12/01/2015 12:06  120
imagination and I got used to it, learned to shunt it away. But
sometimes I held on to it quietly, that feeling that someone
behind or beside me in the crowd – some guy leaning on the
target booth with a rifle, or some cranky, sweating father
spending too much on ride tickets to keep his kids away from
him – anybody could be looking at me in the sidelong way that
norms use to look at freaks, but thinking of me twitching and
biting at the dirt while my guts spilled out of the big escape
hatch he’d cut for them. That helpless rasp of death waiting as
he hurt me . . . a feeling like that is special. Sometimes you hold
on to it quietly for a while.
I told Arty about it once. Arty narrowed his long eyelids
and said I was flattering myself and there was nothing about
me special enough to make anybody want to kill me. Arty was
the master deflater, but his reaction convinced me only that he
didn’t want to kill me. Funny how target potential became a
status symbol among us.
At the end of the midway in front of the Ghost Coaster the
wallet was still sweating in my shirt. I climbed the entry ramp
so I could see the top of the generator truck down at the other
end. Papa, with his boots dangling over the roof edge, was
dancing Chick on his knees. I waved. He didn’t see me. I
waited, and waved again. There, he looked. His arm shot
straight up signaling me to come back. Chick would probably
try again while I was on the way. I jumped down and swam
back through the crowd and the music.
The wallet was still in my shirt when I got back to the
power truck. Horst was leaning on the front bumper watching
papa count a wad of greenbacks. I took out the wallet and
handed it to Papa. ‘Why couldn’t he do it?’ I asked.
120 12/01/2015 12:06  121
Papa grinned and jiggled his eyebrows at me. ‘Ah, my
froglet, you haven’t looked inside that wallet!’
I watched as he unfolded it and spread the pocket. Empty.
The sheaf of one-dollar bills he’d put there before I started was
gone.
‘You didn’t feel anything?’ asked Papa. I shook my head,
watching Chick in his coveralls with no shirt and no shoes and
his arms and legs wrapped around Grandpa’s shiny urn,
absorbed in making breath fog on the mirror metal.
Looking back, it strikes me that we never made sensible use of
Chick. I remember when Chick was three or so, helping to get
him dressed, packing a small bag with extra clothes and his toy
bear. Al would take him sometimes for a few days – just the
two of them. ‘The beauty of it is being so totally inconspicu-
ous,’ Al said. ‘A guy with a little kid is more innocent than a
man with his wife on his arm. A man and his wife can get up
to all sorts of shenanigans together, but the world sees a man
with a kid and they figure he’s good guy and has more impor-
tant things to tend to than robbery.’
Those were the pickpocket trips. Al would trundle off in his
quietest suit with Chick in tow, and take train or plane to ‘The
Money Crowds.’ They went to the big horse tracks, to the
summer Olympic games. They spent four magnificently prof-
itable days at the World’s Fair and one topnotch night in the
parking lot of the world’s biggest gambling casino, with the
star-spangled crowd at ringside watching Lobo Wainwright
lose his world middleweight boxing championship to that con-
summate ring general, Sesshu Jurystyf.
All they took was cash. Chick would locate a goodly wad and
121 12/01/2015 12:06  122
extract it delicately from wallet, purse, clip, or money belt, leav-
ing the victim with the wallet or purse intact and unmoved. The
only real problem, according to Papa, was new bills, which tend
to be noisy. Evidently a faint crackle is rarely noticed in a big
crowd, however, and they soon learned to pick loud moments.
The most dangerous phase was as the cash left its container
and drifted away from its original owner. After that Chick
snaked the stuff along close to the floor, winding through legs
and under chairs and so on. Nobody ever noticed. The money
always arrived in a neat bundle, folded flat, and would slither
up Al’s pant leg and snuggle into a pouch sewn onto Al’s
garter.
Later Chick could tell the number and denominations of the
bills but early on he couldn’t count reliably and Al would wait
until they got back to their room at night to slip the bulging
pouch off and tally the loot. It added up.
Al had an eye for clothes and manner and he enjoyed pick-
ing the targets. His argument was that as long as they stuck to
cash they were doing no one a deep injury. ‘Nobody carries
more cash than they can afford to lose,’ Al would say, beam-
ing at us over our bedtime cocoa. ‘Now, if we messed with
their credit cards we might do some damage. But take the cash
from a high roller at 8 P . M . and all he does is rethink a single
evening out.’
In a good crowd, on a good night, they might take ten or
twenty thousand in a few hours. They were careful – a cheap
seat high in the balcony – targets separated from each other,
unknown to each other, and very rarely discovering their loss
until they were away from the place where it happened.
Al came back with great stories and Chick was always glad
122 12/01/2015 12:06  123
to be home. He would arrive looking slightly purple under the
eyes and eager to sit in laps.
We all hated these special trips of his. Not Mama, of course,
but Arty and the twins and I. The show was our world and
Papa’s world. It had always been world enough. None of us
had ever slept in a hotel or eaten in a restaurant or flown in a
plane. Papa enjoyed it all too obviously. And we suspected,
each of us, blackly and viciously, that Papa preferred his norm
kid to us. With Chick he was free to go anywhere. We could
live only in the show.
There were a couple of dozen of these trips after Chick
turned three. Papa was feeling worldly. He bought three-piece
suits and sometimes even wore one of the show lot.
Chick was nearly four on the morning he and Papa left for
a mountain-lake resort that had always refused Binewski’s
Fabulon a permit. We weren’t high-class-enough entertainment
for that set. There was a big poker tournament in the major
hotel there and, in the same weekend, a championship fight.
Papa figured to find a lot of cash in the pockets.
We were set up in the semi-suburbs somewhere and the
crowds for the midway were steady but not phenomenal.
I stuck close by Arty when Papa was away, and Arty was
nastier than usual all day. He spat in my face after his first show
because the twins had sold eighty more tickets than he had.
The last show that night went well for him, though, and he
was already chinning himself out of the tank when I got there
afterward. He’d outdrawn the twins and I was waiting for him
to ask about ticket receipts, but he was thinking about some-
thing else. I wrapped him in a fresh thick towel and put him in
his chair. He had to be tired from the four shows that day but
123 12/01/2015 12:06  124
he seemed sharp and eager. ‘Get me down to that phone booth
on the street.’ We went out the rear entrance and down the
dark side of the midway behind the booths. Just a few yards
away, the simp-twister rides and the games were having their
last spasm of jump on a summer night.
‘Tim’s on the gate,’ I told the back of Arty’s head. ‘He’ll
come with us.’ We weren’t supposed to leave the grounds at all
but I figured the guard would be persuadable.
‘No. We’re going out through the delivery gate,’ barked
Arty. ‘Nobody is going to see us, and nobody is going with us.’
The phone booth near the lamppost had a folding door and a
phone book hanging in shreds on a chain. I was nervous trying
to sidle Arty’s chair into the booth and had to pull him back
three times before I got the wheels centered. ‘Calm down, piss
brain.’
‘I feel like I’ve got hair, Arty.’
‘That’s goose bumps, ass face. You’ve got the yellows at
being out in the big, bad world. Climb up. There’s a coin here
somewhere.’
The coin was wrapped in a slip of paper.
‘The number’s on that paper.’
I stood on his chair and examined the phone.
‘Hand me down the receiver.’
He tucked it between his ear and his shoulder while I cau-
tiously droped the coin in and began to dial.
‘I’ve never used a phone, Arty. Have you?’
‘Pay attention to the numbers.’
Then I heard the ringing start.
*
124 12/01/2015 12:06  125
A half hour later Arty was scrubbed and pink and stretched
out on his belly on the rubbing table. I trickled oil into the
flesh rolls on the back of his neck and rubbed it up onto his
smooth, round skull and down into the diamond-dented mus-
cles of his shoulders and spine. His eyes were wide, staring at
the wall.
‘Who were you talking to? What’s it about?’ I asked.
His fins spread slightly and his shoulders twitched in a shrug
that came up through my hands.
‘Never mind, anus. Just rub.’
We had recently bought a big new living van. For the first time
the twins and Arty each had a small room. Chick slept on a
built-in sofa-bunk. The cupboard beneath the sink was bigger
than in the old van and Mama had painted the inside a deep
hot blue called ‘Sinbad.’
I suppose the van was part of the profit from Papa’s trips
with the Chick, but the show was growing and doing well too.
Every town we played seemed to spill out some new act that
would appear on our doorstep begging papa for an audition.
The new van came equipped with a maroon leather rubbing
table in Arty’s room. He insisted on having his walls covered
with matching wine-colored cloth. I wondered where he’d got
such an idea.
Papa and Chick arrived in a taxi the next day as Mama was
fixing lunch. It was a hot Saturday and the midway was going
full blast. Papa looked tired and angry. Chick sat in the twins’
lap and ate peanut butter and jelly. Papa took only iced tea.
‘Now, Al, whatever happened?’ Mama pressed.
125 12/01/2015 12:06  126
‘Bastardly thing, Lily.’ Papa shook his head. ‘I don’t know
what to make of it. We’d checked in and I went to take a look
around while Chick napped in the room. Then I take him
down to the restaurant and we’re just about to order when
three of the hotel dicks and an assistant manager jump us and
walk us to an office off the lobby and ask for ID. They’re very
polite and I’m carrying on like the bewildered but cooperative
citizen when the head of security slides in. He fixes me with an
eye like a mackerel’s ass and says, ‘We’ve heard about you, sir.
We’ve heard a great deal.’ They check me out of the hotel right
then and tell me I am not welcome in any of their nine hun-
dred branches of coo-coo-prick flophouses, ever. How do you
like that? They didn’t seem to tumble to the Chick at all, but
they had me figured for a pickpocket using the kid as a front.
I’ve slipped somewhere, but damned if I know how.’
Arty listened with a concerned wrinkle above his nose but
stayed quiet. He didn’t need to say a thing.
It was the end of Chick’s career as a pickpocket. Papa set
himself to ‘think again,’ as he put it.
It was a while before Papa got back to thinking seriously about
Chick. One of the swallowers got an infection from the burns
in his mouth and Papa spent weeks in his little trailer work-
shop improving a burn salve.
The twins had begun writing music and they did a lot of
pouting because Papa wouldn’t let them play their own songs
in their act.
‘Classics. That’s what people want. Stick to classics,’ Papa
would say. ‘You play something they’ve never heard before,
how should they know whether you’re playing well or not?’
126 12/01/2015 12:06  127
Horst bought a new cat just to distract Elly and Iphy from
their hurt feelings. It was a scabby leopard cub rescued from
some roadside zoo, and Chick and I and the twins all got ring-
worm from playing with it. Papa had a wonderful time curing
the stuff but Arty wouldn’t come near any of us. He used the
ringworm an an excuse to abandon his new room and to start
bunking in the dressing room on the stage behind his tank. He
never moved back into the family van. He ate with us once the
ringworm was gone, but his real life became private. He spent
his time ‘backstage’ as he called the room behind the tank.
Papa put a guard on the place and complained about the
added expense.
Mariposa, the jaw dancer from the variety tent, had been with
the Fabulon since I was a baby. She did gymnastics while hang-
ing from her teeth on a twenty-foot pole fastened to the
harness of a cantering white horse named Schatzy. Mariposa
had a pug nose and a wide grin and Crystal Lil liked her.
When Mariposa stuck her head in through the open van
door while we were eating lunch, Mama called to her to come
in and join us. The jaw dancer refused, saying she was rehears-
ing something new. ‘But I want you to come and look at my
four-o’clock turn, Lily. Tell me what you think.’
Mama and Chick and I slipped into the tent toward the end
of the show when the Strauss waltz was introducing Schatzy
and Mariposa, and we stood in the aisle between the banks of
bleachers. Schatzy was old but proud and light-footed. She
arched her neck and hiked her tail into a banner as she lol-
loped around the ring.
High up near the lights and rigging, Mariposa, in a flame-red
127 12/01/2015 12:06  128
costume, stretched and contorted and spun, dangling by her
teeth as she and the pole rocked scarily with Schatzy’s gait.
I climbed onto a prop box to watch and Mama hoisted
Chick up to straddle her hip so he could see. Though we had
a clear view when Mariposa fell, we were never sure exactly
how it happened.
She started to swing her legs, setting up to slip into a hand-
stand on top of the pole. Either her timing was off by a flicker
or else Schatzy broke stride. Suddenly the flame-colored figure
was loose and hurtling downward. She flopped onto the back
of the still-cantering Schatzy, drilling the horse to the ground.
In the instant’s silence of indrawn breath as the crowd pre-
pared its roar, Chick’s voice shrieked out. Schatzy’s long, proud
head screamed hideously into the sawdust.
Mama pushed Chick into my arms and ran for the ring.
Papa was already there, crouching over the bodies in his chalk-
white jodhpurs. I wanted to see but Chick, beside me on the
box, filled my arms and my face with his howling. His mouth
hung loose and his closed eyes sheeted clear fluid and his ter-
rible voice went on and on. People were pushing past us to
leave the tent, the crowd evacuating the scene. In the noise I
didn’t even hear the bullet that finished Schatzy, but I knew
that it had happened because Chick stopped his siren screech
and fell into simple broken sobs. ‘It hurts,’ he cried. ‘It hurts,’
I got him down off the box and rushed him, sobbing, through
the press of legs and out of the midway to our van.
Mariposa had cracked her pelvis and one ankle but
Schatzy’s spine snapped irrevocably. I crawled into Chick’s
bunk with him and held him while he cried. He was still crying
when I drifted off for a nap.
128 12/01/2015 12:06  129
That night and all the next day, Chick wouldn’t talk. He
wouldn’t eat. He wouldn’t get out of bed or dress or do his
chores. He lay curled under his blankets, facing the wall. If
Mama turned him over and held his face to talk to him, he
started to cry. If Papa picked him up and rocked him, his tears
started. When Arty came in and sneered at him, he stared
hugely and silently until even Arty was embarrassed and went
away.
Two days after Mariposa’s fall, Papa decided Chick needed
a dose of Binewski’s Beneficent Balm and made Mama hold
him while the black spoonful was thrust between his teeth.
Late the next day, while the rest of us were working in the
midway, Chick finally told Mama that he could have held
Mariposa up when he knew she was falling. He had let her
drop because he was scared Mama would be mad if he moved
a person. Mama gave him permission to save anybody from
pain or accidents. Chick drank some fruit juice then, and even-
tually began to eat again. But he would never eat meat after
that. No meat at all.
When Chick was five he lived on corn, and peanut butter and
he understood more English than he could use. He learned fast
and his coordination for moving things was much better than
his actual physical ability. He couldn’t tie his shoes with his
hands but he could do all of Horst’s fancy sailor knots – from
a Turk’s head to a monkey’s fist – just by looking at the cord.
‘My fingers don’t do what I want them to,’ he told me. He
was trying to write ‘Love, Chick’ on a horrible water-paint pic-
ture of a tiger that he’d made for Mama. She always liked it
when he did things with his hands. Arturo jeered at him for it.
129 12/01/2015 12:06  130
Arty figured he should use his hands only when there were
strangers around. Arty’s line was ‘You’re acting like a fucking
norm.’ The twins didn’t jeer. They doted on Chick, and taught
him to read.
It was becoming apparent that Chick himself had only one
ambition and that was to help everybody so much that they
would love him. That’s where my problem began. Chick left
me chewing dust in the slave-dog department. He could do
everything better than I could and he never made snide
remarks. He was a lovely brat.
That winter was a slow time for the show. Business was steady
but we all had time to think and doze around. Giving Papa
time to think, as Arty put it, was like pumping random rounds
into a fireworks factory. The odds favored dramatic results.
Arty was hanging upside down from his exercise bar doing
smooth, steady curl-ups.
‘Papa and Horst are teaching Chick to gamble,’ I
announced. Arty did two more curl-ups before he said, ‘What
games?’
‘Roulette and craps.’
Arty grinned at his own navel. He was deep in his workout,
covered with fine sweat. He made one final reach upward and
grabbed the grip on the bar with his teeth, coiling himself
tightly so his shoulder fins could delicately manipulate the
buckles that held his hips in the harness. He swung out, let go
of the bar, and landed rolling.
He wriggled to the weight bench and, hooking his hip flip-
pers under the straps, leaned back, tensing his belly as the
130 12/01/2015 12:06  131
flippers alternated flexing and relaxing to lift the weights on
each side. He started to chuckle out loud, watching the weights
rise and fall at the end of his blue-veined, white-tendoned
flippers.
‘We’re lucky, you know,’ he laughed, ‘that Papa has such a
small potato brain.’ He laughed deliberately, timing his breath-
ing with the lifts. I watched his corrugated belly do its
seductive ripple, complicated by the added rhythm of the
laugh.
‘Papa’s a genius,’ I said stoutly. This was Binewski doctrine.
‘Heh heh heh,’ went Arty’s belly. There was scorn in his
eyes. It was familiar enough on his wide mug, but not toward
Papa. He was trying to shock me.
‘If Papa had discovered fire,’ Arty sighed to the beat of his
lifts, ‘he’d think it was for sticking in your mouth to amaze a
crowd . . . If Papa had invented the wheel . . . he’d have laid it
flat . . . put a merry-go-round on it . . . and figured that was as
far as it went . . . If he’d discovered America . . . he would have
gone home and forgot about it . . . because it didn’t have any
hot-dog stands.’
I sat with my hump propped against the back of Arty’s big
tank. The clean chlorine smell of the water of the water drifted
in and out of my lungs.
Al figured six to eight weeks was enough to get Chick started
as a bigtime gambler. The two of them spent hours every day
with Horst – our resident encyclopedia of worldliness – and
Rudy the Wheelman. Rudy’s experience supposedly encom-
passed a stint as a professional contract-bridge player that had
ended when his wobbly ethics were revealed and he was
131 12/01/2015 12:06  132
informed that, if he ever picked up a deck of cards again, he
would lose both his hands. Rudy had taken refuge in the obscu-
rity of the Wheel Booth and the comfort of his small, cheerful
wife. Mrs. Rudy was dedicated to folding sheets of paper into
birds, fish, giraffes, and other intriguing forms. She could not
work the midway because she modestly refused to dye her
mousy hair red, but she helped around the lot in many ways.
Obviously Chick couldn’t crawl into a rental tux and sip his
chocolate milk from highball glasses in the mirror-ceilinged
casinos of the planet. This, like pocket picking, was supposed
to be done long distance. I don’t know the procedure. Papa
wasn’t secretive about it, he just never went into detail. Papa
had a tiny lapel microphone hooked to a transmitter and
Chick had a receiver so Papa could give him instructions.
Practice time for Chick and Papa was early, just after break-
fast, which cut into my voice lesson, or eliminated it. I had a
tape recorder to use when Papa couldn’t make it, but I knew
the tapes were piling up in a cigar box in his desk and Papa
never got around to listening to them.
Chick knew I was upset, and that Arty was thoroughly
pissed. But he couldn’t help being happy at all the time Papa
spent with him, and he did his best to make it up to us.
He discovered a new way to clean Arty’s tank. Instead of
watching a pair of brushes and a sterilizer hose go over the
drained tank, Chick stood in front of the full tank and took
out every cell, probably every molecule, that wasn’t supposed
to be there. The green on the glass disappeared in broad,
straight swaths like wheat in front of a mower. When Chick
was finished the tank was so clean it was almost invisible. A
round greenish cloud hung above it. Chick blinked at the
132 12/01/2015 12:06  133
cloud and it sailed dreamily across the stage toward the open
door of the toilet. There was a faint splash and then the toilet
flushed.
Arty and I were sitting on the exercise bench to watch
because Chick had come chirping about his ‘new way!’ My
mouth hung open as I thought about setting the Chick on my
own cleaning chores. Arty looked steadfastly at Chick, whose
proud grin began to weaken and slide off into doubt. ‘Show-
off,’ said Arty quietly.
Chick’s face crumpled. ‘I didn’t mean it, Arty. I’m sorry.’
Arty dropped to the floor and crawled into his room, thump-
ing the door shut behind him.
For obvious reasons ‘show-off’ was no insult in our family,
but Arty had a way of turning ‘sweetheart’ into a thumb in the
eye.
I sat looking at Chick. I knew what he felt. The huge buoy-
ant air sack of love that filled his body had just exploded and the
collapse was devastating. Poor little stupe. He was just a baby.
He hunkered down against the tank with the side of his soft face
against the cool glass for comfort. He didn’t dare look at me for
sympathy. He didn’t cry. He just crouched there and ached.
I squinted at Arty’s door. He had his radio turned up loud.
I got up and walked over to the Chick. His eyes swiveled at me
in fear. He thought I was going to pinch him or say something
nasty. That proved he couldn’t really read minds. I put my
arms around him. I rubbed my cheek against his curly ear. He
slung an arm around my neck. I whispered, ‘It’s a great way to
clean.’
‘Truly?’ he whispered. I could hear the tears in his throat.
*
133 12/01/2015 12:06  134
The dumb little fuck was supposed to be so goddamn sensitive,
how come he couldn’t figure it out? All he had to do to make
me like him was need me. All he had to do to make Arty like
him was drop dead.
Papa and Chick left with great fanfare. We all went along
when Horst drove them to the airport. I can’t remember where
we were except that it was not Atlantic City, because that’s
where Papa and Chick were going. They were planning to stay
for five days – a long trip but Papa wanted to break Chick in
to the game slowly and delicately. Chick had heard that there
was a swimming pool in their hotel. Chick was sure he was
going to learn to swim like Arty. Arty was utterly charmed to
hear this, of course.
That night the show closed down peacefully, but when Lil
went to give out the tills the next morning she discovered that
the entire take from the two days before – around $20,000 –
was gone. The alarms had been cut at their source and the
safe – a silly, tinny affair anyway – had been popped open like
a melon on pavement. Old-fashioned plastique, Horst said,
and crudely handled.
Horst went out to the airport for Papa and Chick early on the
morning of the sixth day. Papa had looked bad the last time
he’d come home from picking pockets. This time he looked
like death’s rectum. He hugged us all fervently, which was
awkward because he wouldn’t let go of Chick and carried him
the whole time. Chick himself was white and still and didn’t
smile.
Papa collapsed into his big chair with Chick in his lap. We
134 12/01/2015 12:06  135
children arranged ouselves discreetly while Mama fussed in the
refrigerator and Horst lit his pipe.
‘You both look worn to shreds,’ Mama was clucking.
Papa gave a walleyed look around at our waiting faces and
I was afraid he was going to send us out so he could talk to
Mama and Horst. The clink of ice cubes distracted him, and
then Mama handed him a tall glass of her famous lemonade.
‘Al, I want Horst to explain about the safe,’ Mama began.
Horst actually reached to take the pipe out of his mouth but
Papa cut them both off.
‘Lily, I gotta tell you. Horst, I got to get this out. I don’t
know what in creeping Jesus to think.’
Horst waved his pipe, but Mama twisted her hands, anx-
ious. ‘Are you ill? Whatever happened?’
‘I came within a gnat’s ass of losing Chick,’ Papa said.
‘That’s what happened.’ Chick whimpered on Papa’s chest and
got a pat. ‘No. I wouldn’t really lose you, honey. It’s OK.’
I grimaced at Arty but he was hunched over in his sofa-
bunk, watching Papa, and didn’t notice.
It took a while for Papa to get it all out. He hadn’t got it
organized as a story yet. At first, he said, they’d taken it slow
and easy.
‘I didn’t lay any bets at all the first night. Just watched and
had him practice. Gave wins to the good faces and grief to the
apes and assholes. It was fun, sending some poor hack driver
on the roll of his life with his skinny wife hanging on his arm
in a faint, thinking ‘Shoes for Junior.’ Then watching their eyes
as they stood under the chandelier and I say ‘Red 26’ into my
button and pay off their mortgage, and whisper ‘Red 19’ and
send their baby to college with twenty minutes at the wheel.
135 12/01/2015 12:06  136
‘The fat pricks with the diamond teeth are going off in fits.
I was there awhile and then all of a sudden we went dead.
Scared the crap out of me. Nothing. I turned in to a quiet
corner and I’m practically screaming into the mike, but the
wheel goes its own merry way. I go running for the elevator
thinking the receiver’s broke or he’s sick or he’s been playing
with matches. A million things. But the little turd is crapped
out in his chair with the receiver buzzing in his lap. Asleep. I
got him into his jammies and tucked him into bed and he
didn’t peep. With the trip and everything he was just burnt
out. He’d never done that before . . . ’
They had done well for a couple of nights.
‘I’m percolating with forty thousand in the kick, and
Chick’s eating big soft pretzels and floating in the pool every
day and learning to paddle a little. Then, by the fourth night,
I’m down the strip. This is no shit, Horst, three blocks. Three
from the hotel room and the kid’s still got it. No problem. I
took him there one time only and he had no problems. Not
with the crowds or the distance or anything else.
‘So I’m leaning on the table doing a quiet gosh-and-golly
hick routine over my roll, when this punk in a red sweat suit,
carrying a tennis racket, comes up beside me. He’s been there
awhile, just watching, and I swear I was smooth as glass,
Horst. Slicker than snot on a rock. Nobody would guess. Well,
this punk in the sweats could have been a boxer to look at
him. Broad on top, narrow ass. Skinny legs. He lays a hand on
my arm and says, ‘You’re doing very well tonight, Mr.
Binewski.’ He’s calling me Binewski when I’m traveling as
Stephens. A young guy. Clean-looking. Short hair, face like a
baby’s butt. Blond. You tell me, Horst, what the fuck should
136 12/01/2015 12:06  137
I have done? Am I supposed to say, “You must mean some
other guy. I’m Stephens”? He’s easing me away from the table,
his hand on my arm, out to the lobby saying, “Wonderful run
you’ve been having, Mr. Binewski.” And I’m thinking it’s
another house-dick roust. The crew from Tahoe must have fin-
gered me to every hotel on the planet. He says, ‘How’s your
little boy?’ Cyanide-sweet, leading me along. Out by the door
I finally ask him for bona fides. I say, “Are you with the
casino?” He says, “No, I’m with a larger organization.” It’s
not clear, you see, Lily? When the house dicks jumped me
before there was nothing mysterious about it.’
‘But I don’t want to talk tough or panic because the Chick
can maybe hear me and get scared. Then the guy asks where
Chick is. Taking a nap, I say. This guy says, “Are you sure?”
‘I just took off running – out the door, three blocks – left my
chips on the table. Had nine heart attacks getting back to the
room, but there’s Chick, calm in front of some old movie on
the TV, eating a cucumber sandwich on wheat, and the
receiver in his lap dead and cold.
‘I just about died of relief. Give the kid a pat and sit down
to look at my transmitter. Finally figure out the thing is dead.
Something’s wrong or been done to it. I’m diddling with it
when Chick looks at me and says, “Those other guys are
coming,” through his mouthful of sandwich. And I say, like a
numbnuts, “What other guys?” And the door opens and three
guys come in. Chick ignores them and starts eating the carrot
slices off his room-service plate.
‘These guys were crazy young. The kind that show up in the
spring to hire on and swear they’ll stay forever but they speak
good English and their teeth are straight and you know they’ll
137 12/01/2015 12:06  138
go back to college in September but you hire them anyhow,
even though they make stupid mistakes and wallop their own
feet with the mallets, and every other year or so one of them
decides to unionize the ride jocks and tries to go out on strike.
But they work hard and they’re lively and they keep the red-
heads sparkling.’
Papa took a deep breath and stopped. Horst grunted
encouragingly around his pipe stem, and Mama got up to refill
the lemonade glasses. Papa sipped and sighed.
‘I was six kinds of jerk-off not to take you with me, Horst.
These guys amble through the door looking like college kids
and one of them has a handgun that looks like the CO 2 pistols
we used to use on the neighborhood cats. He levels this thing
at me and I’m sitting there like a geeked capon, my mouth
flopped open, and Chick crunching carrots beside me. The one
with the gun starts some “Hey, Mr. B.” kind of street snot, and
one of the others goes into the bathroom and turns the water
on in the tub, hard. The third guy takes the transmitter out of
my hand and rips the mike cord out of my shirt and walks me
over to the wall to splay out so he can feel me down.
‘The other guy comes in, the guy in the red sweats from the
casino, and Chick turns up the TV volume. I guess he couldn’t
hear with all the fuss. And I’m still spread out, hands on the
wall, looking over my shoulder. The one little asshole has a
hand in the small of my back to keep me there and the punk
in red nods and goes to the bathroom door and the water quits
and he and the guy from in there come out and he nods at
Chick.
‘This guy in red has a little popgun and he leans on the wall
near me while the other fucker picks up Chick, just like that,
138 12/01/2015 12:06  139
and I turn around yelling and the other two grab me and slam
me against the wall. That’s when Chick noticed there was
something wrong. He yelped and they covered his mouth. This
one bastard loops a belt over my elbows behind my back and
cranks it tight, and the other cocksucker crams a pair of my
own socks in my mouth while he holds the popgun to my
head. They shove me over to the bathroom door and the guy
in red gives an order, and the guy holding Chick puts him into
the full bathtub, clothes and all. There’s a rag tied around
Chick’s mouth and . . . ’
Papa stopped to gulp lemonade and then sop the sweat
from his nose and forehead and cheeks. Mama is frozen, star-
ing at him.
‘So Chick’s up to his neck with his eyes bulging at me over
the gag and the guy in red leans close to me and says, “Now,
Mr. B., this is just to let you know how very sincere this mes-
sage is,” and he tells me to keep out of the gambling joints.
That I’m treading on staked turf and I should go home and be
nice. Then the creeping little reptile says, “Now we’re going to
show you how it could be if you didn’t understand us.” And
he nods and the guy who’s clamped onto Chick starts pushing
him under. Chick is looking at me and kicking and splashing
and I jump, and I don’t know what happened. I must have
bumped the guy because he fell over the tub and bounced off
the wall. Chick went to the bottom and the bastards were
clubbing and clawing me.
‘Next thing, I’m sitting in the tub yanking Chick out of the
water while one fucker leans over me with a wet gun. His two
buddies are worried over the guy on the floor, the one who
pushed Chick under. He’s out cold and there’s blood running
139 12/01/2015 12:06  140
out of his ears and nose. They haul him out through the door
and the one with the gun backs out after them. Last thing he
says is, “Take it to heart, Mr. B. Not betting games. Not here.
Not anywhere.”
‘The bastards got my kick, too. Found it in my socks. Didn’t
even bother with my wallet. They knew I wouldn’t call the
cops. Chick cried all night.’
Papa closed his eyes and smoothed both big arms around
the now sleeping Chick. Mama’s voice was hoarse and puz-
zled. ‘Chick wasn’t afraid of them?’
Papa didn’t answer. I watched Arty, who was staring at the
ceiling in ferocious concentration. I knew it as though I’d been
there. Chick had cried not because he was afraid, but because
he’d moved the guy and hurt him, cracked him against the
wall.
Mama sent us all out so Papa could nap.
It was an iron-grey morning with a low sky. By the time I
pulled a sweater over my head, Elly and Iphy had Arty strap -
ped into his chair and were pushing him down the row behind
the midway, talking at him. I ran to catch up. Elly was
demanding, in a hard voice, ‘How did you do that to them,
Arty? I know you did it. I want to know how.’ Arty wagged his
head in denial. Iphy leaned forward, touching Arty’s neck
gently. ‘Arty, the Chick looked terrible. And Papa. Why do you
hate the Chick? You mustn’t . . . ’ Elly slapped Iphy’s hand
back.
Catching up, I grabbed an arm of the chair and trotted
along as it trundled down the dirt track. ‘It’s not Arty’s fault,’
I protested.
140 12/01/2015 12:06  141
Elly snorted at me, pushing the chair faster. Iphy shook her
head mournfully, ‘You don’t know, Oly.’
‘For shit’s sake!’ Arty snapped. ‘Oly, call Papa. Go get
Papa!’
‘Don’t you dare bother Papa now,’ Elly drilled at me. I
hopped along beside them in dithering bewilderment. Arty
stretched his chin toward the chair’s motor-control stick, but
Elly’s hand whipped to his shoulder and yanked him sharply
back, holding him. ‘Just sit still. We’re taking you for a ride.’
‘Morning, kids!’ hollered the point guard. ‘Morning,’
chirped Elly. The show was sluggish in stirring this morning.
It might rain and the redheads were yawning in their wagons.
‘Take me to my stage,’ Arty ordered, his eyes flicking at
me.
‘This way, Elly, Iphy,’ I pointed, trotting back a few steps to
lead the way. Elly pressed her lips and walked faster in her
own direction with Iphy, sadly determined, pushing beside her.
When I caught up again they were on the rear ramp of the
deserted Mad Mouse roller coaster. Arty twisted in his straps
to glare at the twins. ‘You stupid shits!’ he snarled.
Elly grinned. ‘Are you scared, Arty?’
‘Elly, don’t,’ I wailed. ‘Iphy, don’t let her.’
The wheels of Arty’s chair were on the rails that the Mouse
cars rode. Elly and Iphy, planting their white sneakers on the
ties between the rails, bent their backs and pushed as the chair
slid up the tracks, climbing the steep slope.
The Mouse cars hooked onto a chain-driven winch that
ground its way up the center of this slope and brought them to
the highest dropoff point, where gravity would carry them and
their whooping, screaming cargo down through steep-banked
141 12/01/2015 12:06  142
turns with the customers’ hands glommed sweating onto the
safety bars.
‘Please, Elly!’ I hollered as the damp earth dropped away
beneath me. I couldn’t stand up on the tracks, but crept
upward on all fours, shaking as I stared down past the black
oiled chain with its heavy prongs to the flattened grass and
mud below. I imagined the twins’ sneakers above me, slipping
tripping, tangling, and the twins crumpling to the rails and
losing their grip on the chair, which – in my slow-motion
mind – tipped backward over the big rear wheels, toppling
over the sprawling twins and slamming down at the wrong
angle so that its aluminium frame with its hogtied cargo went
shuddering down the now thirty-five, now forty, now forty-five
feet to the clanging smash of the mud.
‘Arty?’ I yelled, with my fists frozen to the rails.
Elly’s hiss sizzled down at me, ‘Shut up.’
I crouched and stared up the rails at the broad pumping
hips and thin legs straining into their sneakers. They were very
close to the top.
‘What do you want?’ Arty’s voice rose sharp and frail in the
grey air. The twins stopped pushing, stood leaning against the
steep slope. Iphy’s voice, pulling air awkwardly from the work,
‘You have to leave Chick alone, Arty.’ And then Elly’s flat tone,
‘You have to realize that things can happen to you, too, Arty.’
‘Stuff you. Both of you,’ he snapped.
‘All right.’ Elly was pushing again. Iphy leaned into the
slope, digging with her toes. The chair creaked on the rails.
‘Get me the fuck down!’ Arty bellowed. ‘You’re dead, Elly
Binewski. Your ass is fucking meat!’ His huge voice floated
thin on the air and all I could see was the edges of the wheels
142 12/01/2015 12:06  143
beyond the twins’ moving legs. They were at the dropoff
point.
‘It’s real, Arty,’ Elly was whispering hoarsely. ‘Iphy couldn’t
stop me and you know it.’ Then Iphy, contradicting, ‘Oh, Arty,
we would never really hurt you. Elly loves you. But you have
to understand.’
‘O.K. I give.’ Arty was too quick. Elly knew him. ‘Not so
easy, brother.’
From my paralyzed station on the rails I saw the Elly half
straighten suddenly, erect, beside the hunched figure of Iphy.
Her arms flew up, as though saluting a crowd. ‘Hang on!’
shrieked Iphy, her hunched shoulders disappearing as the
wheelchair slipped forward and dangled over the edge of the
drop. Only Iphy’s long hands held it now.
‘No! Uncle! I give!’ wailed Arty.
From below and behind us came a horrified bellow, ‘Get the
hell DOWN from there, you stupid little bastards!’ It was the
point guard, Papa’s Marine, gaping at us from the ground in
shock.
Elly’s arms flipped down and she hunched beside Iphy, grab-
bing the back of the wheelchair again. ‘It’s all right,’ hollered
Elly. ‘We’re coming!’
Then one sneakered foot slid, slowly, down a few inches,
then the other, moving toward me. I backed down jerkily, so
relieved I could have puked, while the guard’s huge shoulders
below us bobbed back and forth, his arms stretched out to
catch us if we should fall, his voice rumbling that our old man
would have his ass as well as his job if we dropped off that
goddamn girder while he was on duty and he fucking well
KNEW that we knew better, until we were all on the ground
143 12/01/2015 12:06  144
trundling along in our own sweat, peaceful and relaxed,
nodding at the guard. Arty silent and Elly and Iphy smiling
sweetly.
Arty made me take him to his stage and unbuckle his straps
and leave him alone. He wouldn’t talk at all.
I was furious when I came out and saw the twins strolling
off to rehearse with their sheet music. I stalked up to Elly and
gave her my fiercest glare. ‘You tried to kill him.’
Iphy reached toward me, as if to give me a hug, ‘Oly, she
didn’t tickle me or anything. She just let go.’ Elly dragged her
on, and snapped back at me, ‘You’re just Arty’s dog! He’d kill
us all and you’d stand there holding his towel.’ They sailed on.
Papa took some of Mama’s pills and slept that day and through
the night that followed. The show closed at 9 P . M . and the
camp shut down by 10. Even with my cupboard door shut I
could hear the rattle and gasp of Papa snoring. It seemed piti-
ful. I couldn’t stand hearing it.
I crawled out in my flannel nightgown and went barefoot
through the door and down the hard clay ruts past the dim
grey vans and trailers. There were lights on in the redheads’
windows but I wanted Arty.
The guard at the back steps of his stage truck nodded as I
went in. It was warm and humid in the dark. The heated water
tank kept the backstage tropical.
Arty hollered, ‘Yes,’ when I knocked. He was lying on the
bed with the maroon satin bedspread, reading. I crawled up
beside him.
‘Who do you think it was,’ I asked, ‘the guys who stuck up
Papa?’
144 12/01/2015 12:06  145
Arty squinted at me for a second. I was asking but I didn’t
want to know. Maybe he decided to teach me a lesson.
‘Remember last summer’s geek?’ He pretended to be look-
ing at his book.
‘The yellow-haired boy from Dartmouth?’
‘George. They were his fraternity brothers at college.’
I nodded. Arty tipped his head so he could scratch his nose
with a flipper.
‘The guy Chick moved. Was he hurt bad?’
Arty shook his head slightly. ‘Fractured skull. He’ll be all
right. What bothers me is that they got Papa’s kick. That
means they got paid twice.’
My head did a slow interior waltz and swooped back to the
same word. Twice. So it was Arty who stole the money from
the safe, or arranged it. Where would he get explosives? Or
learn to use them? I stared at him as he lay against the maroon
pillow. He had changed without my noticing. He was thicker.
His neck was heavily muscled and set solidly into his heavy
chest. Beneath the thin, sleeveless shirt his muscle was as
defined as ever but larger, bulkier. Even the wrist joints of his
flippers seemed strong. Where the three long toes of his hip fins
bent to clutch the bedspread, I saw a curling fuzz of hair cloud-
ing the top of each knuckle. I stared. It was the only hair I had
ever seen on his glass-clean body. I knew then that he’d gone
outside and away from me. For the past few months I’d
scarcely seen him. All the hours of every day he had been on
his own – not just escaping the irritations of Chick and the
twins and their rival stardom, but befriending the geek, talk-
ing to people I didn’t know, talking talk I hadn’t heard, making
phone calls without me to dial for him.
145 12/01/2015 12:06  146
I complained, ‘Taking the money was against the family.
Scaring Papa was against the family.’
His eyes stayed closed but his head rolled impatiently on the
pillow, ‘Not in the long run.’
I couldn’t understand that. The angry, weak sounds of
Papa’s story, the way those tinhorn brats had stampeded him,
Papa the Brawl Buster, Al the Boss, the Ringmaster, Papa the
Handsomest Man. I felt robbed. My champion was revealed as
a scam and I was embarrassed at all the years I’d let myself feel
that Papa was any protection at all. It was Arty’s fault.
I opened my mouth to blame Arty, to yell. But there was
something odd about him. He was curling slowly onto his side,
tighter and smaller. His face was stony except for a puckering
twitch beside the long, pale ovals of his closed eyes. A tear
squeezed out from under one lid and disappeared immediately
into the creasing flesh. It was years since I’d seen Arty cry, not
since he abandoned tantrums and went over to the cool, hard
image he admired. But it might not have been a tear. His eyes
opened and stared past me.
‘Elly,’ he said. I’d kill her but the cunt would take Iphy with
her out of spite. And Chick! Can’t anybody but me see what
he is? What he’ll do to us? He’ll end up smashing this whole
family like an egg if we’re not careful.’ His eyes swiveled at me
in a queer begging gesture.
‘You’re jealous,’ I sneered. ‘You want to be the only star!’
He threw himself back on the pillow. On any other face his
expression would have said despair and resignation. ‘Yeah,
you too, I know. He’s cute. Almost like a norm. And he’s inno-
cent. As innocent as an earthquake.
‘Papa gave all those solemn orders of secrecy when he was
146 12/01/2015 12:06  147
born but it’s Papa who brags and puts Chick on jobs outside
where people can see him moving things. There’s nobody on
the lot that doesn’t know! They come on in Pittsburgh, quit in
Tallahassee, and tell all their friends and the lady next to them
on the bus. How long, Oly? How long before the Feds are
tucking us all behind barbed wire in the interests of national
security?’ He’s leaning over, glaring at me, shouting.
‘Oh, Arty.’ It came out soft from my throat. Tired. ‘You’re
just making excuses.’
Now he grew angry, rigidly upright, balanced on his hip
flippers and quivering. ‘Hey! Did you ever think maybe I
deserve what I get? Hey? Elly is nothing. She couldn’t get a job
in a B-bar playing that plinka-plinka crap. All she’s got is Iphy.
Papa gave it to them on a platter.
‘Me? You know what they do with people like me? Brick
walls, six-bed wards, two diapers a day and a visit from a
mothball Santa at Christmas! I’ve got nothing. The twins are
true freaks. Chick is a miracle. Me? I’m just an industrial acci-
dent! But I made it into something – me! I have to work and
think to do it. And don’t forget, I was the first keeper. I’m the
oldest, the son, the Binewski! This whole show is mine, the
whole family. Papa was the oldest and he got the show and
Grandpa’s ashes. Before me the whole place was falling apart.
I’m the one who got us back on the road. When Papa goes it’ll
be me.
‘The twins don’t care if I draw a bigger crowd than they do.
They don’t have to play or dance or sing. They could sit on a
bench and wave and they’d still get crowds. They can afford
to be easygoing. Nobody’s going to upstage them. And Chick!
Of course he’s amazing. That’s my curse. I’m a freak but not
147 12/01/2015 12:06  148
much of a freak. I’m like you, fucked up without being special.
There’s nothing unique about me except my brains and the
crowd can’t see that.
‘You know what I hate? Iphy should have been mine. She
should have been hooked onto me. Papa fucked up there. We
don’t need Elly. If I had been twins with Iphy we would have
had something. We could have done something. But my time’s
coming.’
The flame energy of his anger and disgust flickered. He
eased back onto the pillow and a peculiar childface replaced
his sneer. He was afraid. His shoulder fins reached toward
each other but could never touch, never meet. Falling short,
they lay like a failed prayer across his chest.
He lay there staring at nothing, tired out by the draining of
his own venom. I crawled up behind him and snuggled close,
my belly to his back. This was my reward for endurance. He
would never ask for my arms around him but times like this he
would allow me to warm him, to warm myself against him. I
nuzzled into the back of his neck, breathing carefully so as not
to irritate him. I felt his fin stroking my arm. When he spoke
again I could feel the low vibration of his voice all over my
body. ‘You know, Oly, I’m surprised. I didn’t think Papa would
be so easy to beat. Not this soon. It’s kind of scary.’
148 12/01/2015 12:06  149
9
How We Fed the Cats
Al, the handsomest man, looks bewildered and groggy over his
first cup of coffee. His mustache is sprung and wild to match
his sleep-jagged eyebrows as he peers around the table at us,
asking, ‘What’s this I hear about high jinks on the Mouse Rack
with the wheelchair? Eh, dreamlets?’
We all grin dutifully and Elly does her ‘Oh, Papa!’ routine
to disarm him while Mama blearily hands around filled break-
fast plates, and drags her kimono sleeves through the butter
every time she reaches across the table.
I cut Arty’s meat slowly while my chest fills with a yearning
that would like to spill out through my eyes and nose. It is, I
suppose, the common grief of children at having to protect
their parents from reality. It is bitter for the young to see what
awful innocence adults grow into, that terrible vulnerability
that must be sheltered from the rodent mire of childhood.
Can we blame the child for resenting the fantasy of large-
ness? Big, soft arms and deep voices in the dark saying, ‘Tell
149 12/01/2015 12:06  150
Papa, tell Mama, and we’ll make it right.’ The child, scream-
ing for refuge, senses how feeble a shelter the twig hut of
grown-up awareness is. They claim strength, these parents,
and complete sanctuary. The weeping earth itself knows how
desperate is the child’s need for exactly that sanctuary. How
deep and sticky is the darkness of childhood, how rigid the
blades of infant evil, which is unadulterated, unrestrained by
the convenient cushions of age and its civilizing anesthesia.
Grownups can deal with scraped knees, dropped ice-cream
cones, and lost dollies, but if they suspected the real reasons we
cry they would fling us out of their arms in horrified revulsion.
Yet we are small and as terrified as we are terrifying in our
ferocious appetites.
We need that warm adult stupidity. Even knowing the illu-
sion, we cry and hide in their laps, speaking only of defiled
lollipops or lost bears, and getting a lollipop or a toy bear’s
worth of comfort. We make do with it rather than face alone
the cavernous reaches of our skulls for which there is no
remedy, no safety, no comfort at all. We survive until, by sheer
stamina, we escape into the dim innocence of our own adult-
hood and its forgetfulness.
The shadow stayed in Chick’s eyes, and a dimness, a kind of
fog, settled on him. I think he never quite got over having hurt
the fat goon. Chick was crazy like that. Something in his chem-
istry mixed up with the way the family trained him. He got
twisted so that he was more afraid of hurting someone else
than of being hurt himself, more scared of killing than of
dying. In the numb, dumb way that he knew things, Chick
understood Papa’s disappointment and felt guilty for it.
150 12/01/2015 12:06  151
Papa took to having depressed spells during which he was
inclined to sit alone in odd spots with a bottle. High on a two-
day binge, he ordered posters for a ‘World’s Strongest Child’
act, but he shelved the idea during the hangover. Sometimes
Horst, or the twins or I, would make a suggestion to try to
cheer him up.
‘What about sports?’ I’d ask. ‘What if a pole vaulter got just
a tiny boost from Chick at the right moment and you hap-
pened to have a bet on the guy? What if a ball got a little
nudge toward a goal line?’
But Papa would shake his head and pat my hump. ‘Oly, my
dove, your grandpa told me long ago, and I should have
remembered. He used to say, “If you don’t mess with the
monkey, the monkey won’t mess with you.”’
Al and Horst were going off on business for the day. Al told
Chick to feed the cats and Chick, as usual, bit his tongue,
turned pale, and nodded without saying anything.
Chick bit his tongue more than any kid I ever heard of.
Sometimes Al had to use fire-eater’s salve on the inside of
Chick’s mouth.
After Al left, Chick slid up to me at the sink where I was
doing the breakfast dishes. ‘Come with me, Oly, please?’ The
dishes flew out of the sink in a silent, clatterless flock. They
dipped through the rinse water and dried in the air as they
jumped, ten at a time, to their places in the cupboard. I
laughed and wiped my hands. Arty was holed up with a book
and the twins were practicing piano with Lily.
‘Sure,’ I said, ‘but how come? You’ve fed them lots of
times.’
151 12/01/2015 12:06  152
His soft face rumpled lightly in worry. ‘I know. But I don’t
like it.’ His eyebrows went up in a peak of resignation. ‘I like
the cats. It’s the meat. I don’t like moving it. Just come along,
O.K.?’
Horst always parked the cat van near the refrigerator truck
where the meat was kept. When he fed the cats himself, Horst
would toss a quarter of beef out onto the ground, jump down
after it, slam the truck door, wrestle the beef around by its long
leg and whack chunks off it with a huge cleaver. Horst fed the
cats through the cage doors, but nobody else on the lot felt
comfortable doing that. Horst liked telling stories about how
unpredictable cats are. I always suspected him of doing it
deliberately to keep people from messing with them. If that
was his reason it certainly worked.
The sides of the cat van were hinged at the top and could be
cranked up like awnings, shading the cages. There was steel
mesh outside the bars, and the walls separating the paired
Bengals and lions and leopards were inch-thick plates of steel.
Al tried to get Horst to put clear plate plastic up instead of
bars and the steel screen but Horst said it would ruin the
effect. ‘People think big cats should be behind bars. And the
screen gives them the feeling that they could get their fingers
clawed off if they stuck them through. Besides, the cat smell is
important too, and if I put plastic up I’d have to air-condition
the whole rig.’
When Chick fed the cats he dropped the meat through the
ventilator slots in the roof. We stood outside the refrigerator
truck and watched the big bolt lift and the door swing open.
Chick reached over and took my hand. ‘Is this O.K.? I want to
152 12/01/2015 12:06  153
hold your hand while I’m moving the meat.’ He was looking
pinched. ‘Sure,’ I said. A beef quarter floated off its hook inside
the truck and wobbled out. It flopped onto the big chopping
block. The cleaver came out of its slot in the truck’s tool rack.
Chick worked fast. The blade flashed upward five times quickly
and six chunks of meat sailed through the air with exposed fat
gleaming. The cats were coughing and spitting as the trapdoors
over the ventilator slots lifted simultaneously. The chunks
dropped through with a single thunk to the floor. Another
quarter jumped out on the block and the door shut while the
cleaver was rising and falling. Chick was squeezing my hand
gently. The cleaver dipped its square tip into the cutting block
and stayed there while the chunks lifted, circled like cumber-
some crows, and headed slowly for the flaps in the roof.
‘You could do it without the cleaver, Chick,’ I said.
‘Yeah, but I’d feel the meat more. Can you feel it?’
He was taller than I was and he looked down at me with
such a serious intensity that I felt a small quiver of fear. ‘Feel
what?’
He frowned. Words never came all that easily to him. ‘Well,
how . . . dead . . . the meat is.’
I stuck my tongue out at the corner of my mouth and
squinted at him through my sunglasses. Anybody else in the
family except Lily would be pulling something if they talked
like that, trying to spook me so they could laugh at me later.
Chick was so straight he was simple. He could never really
understand the joke when the rest of us were telling whopping
lies.
‘No,’ I said. ‘I don’t feel anything.’ He pursed his mouth and
I heard the meat land inside the cages and the snarling of the
153 12/01/2015 12:06  154
cats. Chick looked so sad I knew I’d failed him. ‘I’m sorry,
Chick.’
He swung an arm over my shoulders and leaned his face
down against my head. ‘It’s okay. I just thought you might feel
it if I held your hand.’
‘Shit,’ said a clear voice behind us. We wheeled together as
though we were the twins. It was one of the red-haired girls.
She shrugged her round shoulders at us through her peacock
shirt and laughed nervously. ‘I just never get over how you do
that, Chick,’ and she waved gaily and teetered away on her tall
heels.
We watched her go, Chick’s arm still around my shoulders,
my arm around his waist. For one instant my eye escaped and
I could see us as we must have looked to the redhead. Two
small figures, one bent and distorted, shielded by cap and
glasses, and this slim, golden boy-child, several inches taller,
holding the dwarf close while chunks of meat sailed over them
in the air. I hugged Chick. His peach sheek rubbed my fore-
head and nose. I wondered how he did move things and, while
that wondering was creeping into my skull, I realised that I
had never wondered about it before. Had any of us really
wondered? Even Al and Lil? Or had we all been so caught up
in the necessity of training him and protecting him and pro-
tecting ourselves from him and figuring ways it would be safe
to use him and finding out exactly what he could or couldn’t
do that we never got around to wondering?
‘Chick,’ I said to his fine yellow hair, ‘how do you move
stuff?’
His head came up slowly from my shoulder and he looked
surprised. Then his face focused. I was thinking how ridiculous
154 12/01/2015 12:06  155
never to have asked him. He started to blush. He let go of me
and passed his hands over his ears as though he knew I was
making fun of him. ‘Oh, you know,’ he said. The cleaver lev-
ered itself out of the chopping block, flew to the sterilizer hose
hanging from the refrigerator truck, and danced in the white
gush from the nozzle. The hose stopped and the cleaver leaped
toward the truck door, which opened just enough to let it in.
Then the door closed and I knew the cleaver would be settling
into its slot. Chick was bright pink now.
‘No, I don’t know, Chick. Tell me.’
A small rock by the truck wheel began to spin in place. It
flipped over, still spinning, then hopped onto its side and began
to roll in a tight circle. The equivalent, probably, of another
kid scuffing his shoes or twiddling his own ear in embarrass-
ment. He was my little brother, of course, so I got impatient.
‘I’ll pinch you, Chick! Tell me how you move stuff!’ The rock
lay down quietly.
‘Well, I don’t really. It moves itself. I just let it.’ He
looked at me anxiously while I chewed on that and found
it unsatisfying.
I shook my head. ‘Don’t get it.’
‘Look,’ he turned me toward the cats. The side of the van
lifted and the prop poles slid into place so I could see the cats
in the shade. They were all eating, standing over the meat,
wrenching it, or lying with chunks between their paws,
fondling it.
‘You know the water tank at the back?’ said Chick. As I
watched, the small taps over the troughs in each cage opened
slightly and trickles of water flowed. One of the Bengals leaped
at its tap and began batting the stream with its paw. ‘Water
155 12/01/2015 12:06  156
always wants to move but it can’t unless we give it a hole, a
pipe to go through. We can make it go any direction.’ The tap
that the Bengal was playing with suddenly opened wide and a
gush of water splatted into the big whiskers. The cat jerked
back and then lunged forward, pressing his whole face into the
heavy spray, twitching his ears ecstatically. ‘If you give it a big
hole,’ said Chick, ‘a lot comes out. If you give it a pinprick you
get a slow leak.’ He was struggling to make me understand. I
watched the tiger play and felt a thickness between my ears.
‘I’m just the plumbing that lets it flow through. I can give it a
big path or a small one, and I can make it go in any direction.’
His anxious eyes needed me to understand. ‘But the wanting
to move is in the thing itself.’ We started off toward the big
tent.
‘Did I help?’ I asked.
‘Sure,’ he said.
Arty, wheedling from the sofa, called, ‘Chick, I’ll bet there’s a
lot of that roast beef left over from dinner. I sure would like a
sandwich made out of that beef, with mayonnaise and horse-
radish. What do you say? Will you make me one?’
Chick, with a comic book under his arm, having worked for
hours at other people’s jobs and looking now for just an apple
and a visit with Superman – this vegetarian Chick, who will
eat unfertilized eggs and milk but never (no, please don’t make
him) fish or fowl or four-legged beasts or anything that notices
when it’s alive and talks to him about it if he touches it – this
Chick knows Arty is being mean, and will force him to move
the meat rather than using his hands and a knife, and says,
‘Sure, Arty, white or whole wheat?’
156 12/01/2015 12:06  157
He tries. He gets the plate of beef from the refrigerator and
casually grabs a knife from the drawer.
‘Chick!’ snaps Arty indignantly. ‘You’re not gonna use a
knife, are you?’
Caught, Chick admits, ‘I was gonna move the knife.’
But Arty roars, ‘Drop all that norm shit! Why did Papa give
you that gift if you’re going to piss it away like a norm? Move
the meat. Move the meat!’
And so precise leaf-thin s of beef separate themselves
from the pink roast and arrange themselves with a swoop of
mayo and a flip of horseradish on a dancing pair of homestyle
whites, and they all come together on a pretty blue plate that
glides out of the dish rack to give them a ride over to where
Arty is picking his teeth with a fin and watching.
‘There you go,’ says Chick.
‘Thank you so much,’ says Arty, who is perfectly capable of
making his own sandwiches if there is nobody around to do it
for him. Arty clamps a fin on the sandwich and takes an enor-
mous bite, watching Chick’s face as he chews. ‘Dullicious!’ he
mouths around the mess.
‘Good. I’m glad.’ Chick smiles and steps out of the van and
walks around behind the generator truck, where he vomits
painfully and tries to think of something besides what the cow
said to him as he sliced her.
They were fighting and their door was locked. The thumping
woke me. I burst out of my cupboard thinking of elephants or
earthquakes. The thin paneling of their cubicle room thonked
toward me a fraction of an inch. I could hear them gasping. I
ran to their door. The knob wouldn’t turn. The early sunlight
157 12/01/2015 12:06  158
slanted in through the window over the sink. A huge body
slammed against the door on the other side. They’d wake up
Al and Lil. I slid Chick’s door open and his huge eyes were
waiting for me. He was afraid.
‘Help me,’ I whispered. ‘The twins are fighting.’
He rolled out of his blankets and grabbed my arm. His
hand was wet.
‘Unlock it.’
He looked at the doorknob. It turned. The door opened.
They were rolled in a knot on the bed with spider elbows jerk-
ing out and in, a flailing leg whacking a heel into a thin,
pajama-clad back. Their breathing was short and loud and a
hand came out of the mess, pulling a long skein of black hair
up into the light of their small window.
‘Hold their hands.’ I nudged Chick. Two hands spread out
against the pillow and a fist landed with a smack and a squeak.
‘All the hands! All!’ I snapped. Four arms splayed in the air
away from the twisted bundle of pajamas. A leg swung back
for a kick and then froze.
‘Can you hold them?’
Chick nodded, looking at me. His eyes had crusts of sleep
in them. Elly’s face lifted out of a mass of black hair – a red
scratch across her forehead. She drew back on her long neck
and shot forward, whooshing out a phtt of air as she spit into
the tangled hair beneath her.
There was no hiding from Al and Lil. The scratches and bruises
were so visible that the twins couldn’t do their act for four days.
They were sick and sore. They lay in bed with their faces turned
away from each other all that day. Al and Lil were very upset.
158 12/01/2015 12:06  159
‘You must never do that again! You must never fight with
each other!’ The old incantation poured in shocked despera-
tion from the parental mugs. The twins refused to explain
what it was about.
Chick was helping me drain sewage tanks that afternoon.
We were both glum. We stood and watched the gauge on the
pump that emptied our van’s tank into the tanker truck. I kept
thinking about what they’d looked like when Chick had
opened the door. Like a thing that hated itself.
‘They always bicker,’ I said.
Chick nodded, watching the gauge dial. ‘But they were
really trying to hurt each other.’ Chick’s head fell forward, his
chin nearly touching his chest. The back of his neck was so
thin and golden, and his tawny head was so big above his
skinny shoulders. Seeing him hit my lungs like an ice pick
through the ribs. He was pretty.
‘I wonder what it was about?’ I murmured.
Chick sighed. His head wobbled. ‘Iphy said his name in her
sleep,’ he said.
Lil made Ali Baba and Forty Thieves Chicken for dinner. She
was rubbing lemon juice over her hands to get rid of the garlic
smell while we all sat around the table waiting for the oven
bell to sound.
The twins were excited about something, whispering to
each other. Al was talking about an old road manager he’d run
off the midway twenty years before. The guy had shown up
again that day looking for a job.
‘Vicious god, Lil! He looked eighty years old! He looked
like the grave had spit him back up, disgusted!’
159 12/01/2015 12:06  160
Lil tsked over her lemon-juice hands. Arty watched the
twins. Chick and I leaned on Papa from opposite sides, leech-
ing his warmth.
Lily was dishing out the chicken when Iphy finally spoke up.
‘We have a new turn for our show!’ Iphy glowed. It had to
be tricky. Iphy always did the talking if a ‘No’ was possible. It
was hard for anybody to say ‘No’ to Iphy.
‘We do a standing vertical jump onto the piano top and
spring off into a synchronized-swim dance number in the air.
We fly out over the audience and back while the piano goes on
playing the “Corporal Bogwartz Overture”! Doesn’t that
sound great? We practiced this morning! We’ll use pink floods
and three pink spots to follow us over the crowd. Do let us,
Papa! Chick can handle the whole thing so easily. He knows
the music already. He learned it in two sessions! It takes
exactly one and a half minutes and it’ll be our finale. He can
just run in during the last five minutes of each show, stand
behind the screen, and be finished when we touch the stage for
the bow! Please, Papa, Mama? Come and see it after dinner;
you’ll love it!’
Chick was hiding his face behind Al’s arm. Arty’s eyes
stayed on Lil’s big spoon, lifting out chicken and putting pieces
on plates.
Al was laughing. ‘What a picture! Wouldn’t that flatten ’em?
Hey, Crystal Lil! How about these girls? Sharp?’
‘Flying,’ Lil murmured. ‘Mercy.’
Elly was pink with eagerness, her hopeful, fearful eyes fixed
on Arty, who said nothing. He rocked slightly in his chair,
seemingly interested only in the food that was accumulating on
his plate with the help of Lil’s spoon.
160 12/01/2015 12:06  161
It never happened, of course. Arty squashed it. If the outside
world tumbled to it, or even suspected it was not a trick, we’d
drown in power plays for Chick. Stay with the straight path of
what we were each gifted with . . . Did we think Al hadn’t done
enough for us, that we had to monkey with his work? Iphy
was disappointed but willing to understand. Elly never said
anything about it.
We probably looked sweet, the twins and I, in our blue dresses
under the shady apple trees, with big bowls in our laps, snap-
ping green beans on a summer afternoon. But the apples on
the tree were gnarled and scabby and the twins’ glossy hair
and my sunbonnet covered worm-gnawed brains.
‘Arty wouldn’t hurt anybody.’ I was lying vigorously as I
snapped away at the smooth-skinned beans. ‘You’re the one,
Elly. You’re jealous of Arty when he’s just trying to take care
of family.’
‘Oly, you know Chick would be floating in formaldehyde if
it looked like he was going to steal any of Arty’s thunder by
being a big success.’ Her hands ripped the beans to pieces,
dropping the tips and strings into one bowl and the usable
chunks into another. Iphy’s hands did the same task lightly,
delicately.
I pushed on doggedly through my beans. ‘Arty still thinks
Chick can be useful.’
‘Sure,’ Elly sniffed. ‘As a workhorse and a slave. Chick can
save us a lot of money. It takes ten men five hours to put up the
tops that Chick can put up in one hour by himself. And
Chick’s pay is a pat on the head.’
Iphy sighed, ‘You should be kinder.’
161 12/01/2015 12:06  162
Elly muttered at her own fingers. ‘I’m just taking care of
you and me. That’s all I’m thinking about. He hates us. He’s
selfish.’
‘Not selfish! Scared! He’s scared all the time, Elly! You
know it!’ Iphy’s hand lifted in fright, demonstrating Arty’s
terror. I shrugged off goose bumps, thinking, I’m scared too.
Because I know Arty. I know him better than either of you
do.
‘Let him be a preacher. Let him have all those creeps suck-
ing around him. They’ll puff him up. But he’d better leave us
alone, and Chick too. And you can tell him that, Oly. There,
take all these beans to Mama!’
‘Be nice, Elly,’ I pleaded. ‘Just be nice.’
‘I’ll be nice, she muttered dangerously. ‘You’d both let him
cut your throats before you’d complain!’
Without any of the family taking much notice, Arty became a
church. It happened as gradually as the thickening of his neck
or the changing of his voice. From time to time one of us
would remember that things hadn’t always been that way. It
wasn’t that Arty got a church, or created a religion, or even
found one. In some peculiar way Arty had always been a
church just as an egg is a chicken and an acorn is an oak.
Elly claimed that it was malice on Arty’s part. ‘He has
always had a nasty attitude toward the norms. Iphy and I like
them except for the hecklers and drunks. They’re good to us.
Papa tends the crowds like a flock of geese. They’re a lot of
work and bit of a nuisance but he loves them because they’re
his bread and butter. Mama and Chick – and you too, Oly –
you three don’t even know the crowds are there. You don’t
162 12/01/2015 12:06  163
have to work them. But Arty hates them. He’d wipe them all
out if he could, as easy as torching an ant hill.’
‘Truth’ was Elly’s favorite set of brass knuckles, but she
didn’t necessarily know the whole elephant. If what she said
about Arty was ‘true,’ it still wasn’t the whole truth.
Arty said, ‘We have this advantage, that the norms expect us
to be wise. Even a rat’s-ass dwarf jester got credit for terrible
canniness disguised in his tomfoolery. Freaks are like owls,
mythed into blinking, bloodless objectivity. The norms figure
our contact with their brand of life is shaky. They see us as cut
off from temptation and pettiness. Even our hate is grand by
their feeble lights. And the more deformed we are, the higher
our supposed sanctity.’
The first time I remember him talking like this was the one
very rare night when he had an ear infection and couldn’t do
his act. I stayed with him while the rest of the family worked.
He sat on the built-in couch in the family van surrounded by
the popcorn he’d spilled, the kernels getting smashed into the
upholstery as he bounced around talking and dipping his face
into his bowl of popcorn and nipping at hot chocolate through
his straw. I laughed because he had butter smeared around his
eyes as he pumped this piffle at me.
I was crushed when Arty ousted me from the Oracle. Orig -
inally, I had been the one who sorted through the question
cards and actually went on stage to press the face of the
chosen card against the side of the tank while Arty hovered,
bubbling on the other side, to read it and then shot to the sur-
face to give the answer. Then Arty decided he wanted a
redhead to do it. He had them parade in a giggling line outside
their dorm wearing shorts and bras so he could choose the best
163 12/01/2015 12:06  164
figure. he said the crowd would have more respect for him if
he was waited on by a good-looking redhead. ‘They’ll wonder
if I’m balling her, decide that I am, and think I must be a hell
of a guy if this gorgeous gash puts out for me even though I’m
so fucked up. If it’s Oly waiting on me, they figure it’s just
birds of a feather.’
I still took care of him after each show, but for a long time
I sulked and ignored the act.
The Aqua Boy changed again. For a while, he answered only
generic questions distilled from the scrawled bewilderments
and griefs that piled up on the three-by-five cards. Then he
stopped answering at all and just told them what he wanted
them to hear. Testifying, he called it.
What Arty wanted the crowds to hear was that they were all
hormone-driven insects and probably deserved to be miserable
but that he, the Aqua Boy, could really feel for them because
he was in much better shape. That’s what it sounded like to
me, but the customers must have been hearing something dif-
ferent because they gobbled it up and seemed to enjoy feeling
sorry for themselves. You might figure a mood like that would
be bad for the carnival business but it worked the opposite
way. The crowd streaming out from Arty’s act would plunge
deeper into the midway than all the rest, as though cantan-
kerously determined to treat themselves to the joys of junk
food and simp twisters to make up for the misery that had just
been revealed to them.
Arty thought about the process a lot. Sometimes he’d tell me
things, only me, and only because I worshipped him and didn’t
matter.
164 12/01/2015 12:06  165
‘I think I’m getting a notion of how to do this. O.K., a car-
nival works because people pay to feel amazed and scared.
They can nibble around a midway getting amazed here and
scared there, or both. And do you know what else? Hope.
Hope they’ll win a prize, break the jackpot, meet a girl, hit a
bull’s-eye in front of their buddies. In a carnival you call it luck
or chance, but it’s the same as hope. Now hope is a good feel-
ing that needs risk to work. How good it is depends on how
big the risk is if what you hope doesn’t happen. You hope your
old auntie croaks and leaves you a carload of shekels, but she
might leave them to her cat. You might not hit the target or
win the stuffed dog, you might lose your money and look like
a fool. You don’t get the surge without the risk. Well. Religion
works the same way. The only difference is that it’s more
amazing than even Chick or the twins. And it’s a whole lot
scarier than the Roll-a-plane or the Screamer, or any simp
twister. This scare stuff laps over into the hope department
too. The hope you get from religion is a three-ring, all-star
hope because the risk is outrageous. Bad! Well, I’m working on
it. I’ve got the amazing part down. And the scary bits are a
snap. But I’ve got to come up with a hope.’
Arty had the advance men make up special flyers to hit certain
churches. ‘Refuse!’ they blared. ‘Arturo, the Aqua Boy!’ and
then a list of our dates and sites. Though Arty never mentioned
anything resembling a god, or an outside will, or life after
death, church groups started showing up. In the grim blasted
regions where the soil had failed or the factories were shut
down, whole congregations would drift through the gates,
ignoring the lights and sights of the midway, and find their way
165 12/01/2015 12:06  166
to Arty’s tent. They paid their price and sat numbly in clumps
on the bleachers waiting as long as it took for his show to
begin. When it was over, they would leave the grounds
together, ignoring everything.
‘Too poor to play,’ Papa said.
‘The one buck they’ve got, I’ll get,’ said Arty. But it wasn’t
the money that excited him. It was that those who never would
have come to the carnival came just for him.
Mama was dreamily pleased. ‘Arty’s spreading his wings,’
she said, nodding to herself. But his wingspread took in more
than the bleachers in his own tent. And all the time he was
taking over more and more control of the carnival itself, and
becoming more obvious in the orders he gave.
166 12/01/2015 12:06  167
10
Snake Dance – Immaculate
I was eleven years old that year. Chick turned six and the twins
were approaching their fourteenth birthday. Arty was sixteen
and in a hurry.
He got his own big van with a platform to connect it to
the family van. No fuss about it. Papa just shrugged when
Arty had him write out the check. The guards lugged the fur-
niture from the dressing room behind Arty’s stage, and I
arranged it. Mama busied herself moving Chick into Arty’s
long- abandoned cubicle in the family van.
As Arty got stronger, Al and Lil wilted. Each week they
seemed softer and browner at the edges. Lil was scatty and
vague more often. You could catch her any hour of the day
with her collection of pills and capsules shuttling in and out
of the handbag she kept by her. She did her work but she got
thinner and her breasts began to droop. Her clothes didn’t
hang on her in the old smooth way. Her makeup was a little
blurry to begin with and tended to slip by lunchtime. Long
167 12/01/2015 12:06  168
before closing each night the mascara and rouge would slide
into thick smudges. There was something missing in her
eyes.
This was the year she decided she had taught the twins all
that she was able, and hired the fancy piano man to teach
them. Arty claimed that this was the cause of her frail weep-
ing. The twins said it had started after Chick was born and
had simply increased.
We didn’t ask for Papa’s opinion. Al was listless one minute
and irritable the next. He’d go out to give orders in the morn-
ing and find that Arty had already passed the word for the day.
He’d nag and snap and stand over the crews while work was
being done. He took to spending more time with Horst and to
showing up half buttoned into his tailcoat and with his mus-
tache unwaxed for his Ringmaster routines. Then Dr. Phyllis
appeared.
Al had always fancied himself a healer. His hobby was
reading medical journals. He collected first-aid kits and drugs.
He was an enthusiastic amateur general practitioner, and as
soon as we could afford it – years before Arturism was in
swing – he bought a small second-hand trailer and set it up as
a little infirmary. His fascination with human mechanics cer-
tainly came before and probably sparked his idea for
manipulating our breeding, and he did have a knack for it. We
thought of it as part of his Yankee spirit. He was enthralled
by medicine but furious with doctors for hogging the glory
just because they’d managed to get a piece of paper to hang
on the wall.
With Al’s hobby, the Fabulon had been nearly independent
168 12/01/2015 12:06  169
of medical folk. Horst was called in as a consultant on veteri-
nary chores, but Al handled anything human himself. The
flame eaters figured him for a genius because he cured the many
blisters on their lips and inside their mouths. Over the years he
set fractures, relocated joints, diagnosed and treated venereal
diseases, and dosed infections from the kidneys to the tonsils.
It was Lil who soothed brows, changed sheets, and read
aloud for the sick, but it was Al who did the flashy stuff. He
lanced boils with a flair, gave vaccinations, irrigated ears,
noses, and rectums with equal zest, and made a grand pro-
duction of extracting a sliver. He was a masterly stitcher –
‘scarless wizardry,’ as he himself claimed. His career triumph
happened the night an elderly lady collapsed in the front row
at her first sight of Arty. Al recognized a heart attack, ripped
her purple cotton dress down from the throat and clapped dis-
posable electrodes to her chest within seconds of her tumble to
the sawdust. He did it right there in front of Arty’s tank with
seven or eight hundred people in the bleachers watching. She
jolted. Her eyeglasses slid off. She voided her colon rather
noisily and was alive again, if not conscious.
It was the custom for the midway folk to appear on Mon -
day mornings at Al’s clinic if they had complaints. A lot of
people said Al ‘should have been a doctor,’ and that his talent
was wasted in the Fabulon. Al didn’t see it that way. ‘I’ve got
a captive practice of sixty souls,’ he’d say, increasing the num-
bers as the show’s population grew to eighty, a hundred and
twenty, a hundred and sixty.
Then Dr. Phyllis arrived. She drove into the lot one morn-
ing and parked thirty yards back from the cat wagon, which
happened to be the last trailer in line that day.
169 12/01/2015 12:06  170
She sat at the wheel and looked out through the windshield
for a while. I saw her because I was stumping around the cat
wagon rehearsing a lead-in talk. I kept on, pretending not to
notice but taking in the shiny white van with a pair of tangled
snakes climbing a staff painted next to the side door. I could
barely see the vague pale figure behind the polarized wind-
shield. We’d been on the lot for two days and were all set up,
so the crews were taking it easy that morning, sitting on trailer
steps talking and drinking coffee.
Horst was shaving beside his living van, using a portable
razor while he looked into the rearview mirror on the driver’s
side. Everybody on the lot saw the van arrive but nobody
reacted. For all we knew it was an act that Al had hired and
not mentioned.
I was thinking she was a snake dancer because of the vipers
on the van. I was morbidly fascinated by snakes. The van door
opened, a pair of steps flopped out, and she appeared.
She was dressed in white – the uniform, the shoes, stock-
ings, gloves, and of course the snug cap and the face mask.
Only her glasses were neutral, clear, the eyes behind them
blurred by their thickness.
She stepped smartly down and strode toward the nearest
guard. It was Tim Jenkins, a big mahogany weightlifter who
had retired from perpetual corporal status in the Marines and
had been taken up by Al while his scalp was still visible under
his military haircut. Tim was serious about guard duty and
clicked his heels as the short, sturdy white figure approached
him.
I’d stopped my pacing and was staring, boggle-eyed, at her.
I knew it was a woman because of the broad hips and bulging
170 12/01/2015 12:06  171
prow. I was figuring her for a Hindu snake dancer – imagin-
ing flame shows with reptiles flickering over her gradually
revealed flesh, slipping up her arms under the white sleeves,
and so on.
I couldn’t hear what she said but Tim nodded and looked at
Horst. Horst had been watching everything in his mirror. He
flipped his razor through the driver’s window onto the seat of
his van and strolled over. Tim was making introductions and
Horst nodded and stuck out a hand. The figure in white point-
edly jammed her gloved hands into the pockets of her white
jacket. Horst let his hand drop and settled back a hair on his
heels. Horst strolled away with the lady in white, toward the
two Binewski vans. I trailed at a distance.
It was a bright, warm morning in Arkansas, I think, or
maybe Georgia. The dust was brick red on my shoes as I
leaned on the generator truck and looked down, pretending to
mind my own affairs. I could have kicked myself for picking
that fender to lean on when I realized that the fractured thrum
of the generator would keep me from hearing any conversa-
tion. The white lady was waiting outside Arty’s van. She was
carrying a thin vinyl briefcase, white. She stood quite still with
no nervous movements. Chick’s small face peered from the
window of the family van.
Arty came out in his chair. His forehead folded down over
his eyes with questions. He doesn’t know her, I thought. He
didn’t send for her. He nodded and said something. She spoke,
her hands on the white case. Arty guided his chair down the
ramp, and she fell in beside him, going slowly away from the
vans, talking. She tucked the case under her arm and jammed
her hands in her pockets again.
171 12/01/2015 12:06  172
The case didn’t stay where she put it but slid out behind her
and floated toward the open door of the family van at an alti-
tude of four feet or so. She whipped around and despite the
mask I could tell she was glaring at the flying briefcase. Arty
looked over his shoulder, stopped, opened his mouth, and
shouted at the van. The case stopped just before it entered the
door, turned in midair and zipped back to the white lady at
twice the speed it had left her. She reached out a gloved hand,
snatched it, and stuck it back under her arm. Arty was talking
to her. She nodded. They turned away and, with him rolling
and her walking, they paraded up and down and around the
lot, talking for a long time.
‘I think she’s creepy,’ said Electra. Iphigenia bobbed her head
gravely in agreement and popped a slice of apple into her
mouth. Arty ignored them both.
‘How is she going to be paid? Percentage? Salary? Only
when somebody’s sick? Or only as long as everybody is well?’
Al slid his eyes nervously, trying to be businesslike. Arty was
forced to abandon his soup and his pretense of oblivion. He
stared around the table at us and then turned to Papa.
‘Don’t worry about her money. I’ll take care of it. She’s got
a lot to offer us. She’s a stroke of luck for this show. She’s not
a school hack, at least. She’s good at what she does.’
Papa looked guiltily into his soup bowl.
Lily smiled dreamily. ‘It will be nice having an educated lady
around.’
Al patted her hand. Arty was concentrating on his soup
again, crossing his eyes to sight down his straw. Chick sat beside
Lil in the back of the dining booth, smiling and watching the
172 12/01/2015 12:06  173
peas lift, individually, from his soup, jerk slightly until the drip
of broth fell back into the bowl, and then swoop down to rest
in a military row on his plate. Chick never did like peas. I
caught Iphy’s eye. She raised her brows and pursed her mouth.
Elly wrinkled her nose at me. We girls agreed, silently, that even
if we had bubonic plague, the lady in white wasn’t going to lay
a finger on us.
Dr. Phyllis cowed Al. After that first day he never questioned
her presence, or her credentials. He wouldn’t even try to ask
where she’d come from or what she’d been doing before she
joined us. He dithered and protested that she was a ‘lady’ and
a good medic, and ‘By the blistered nipples of the Virgin,’ he
didn’t need to know any more than that. The twins and I
shook our heads at how little fight he put up when his private
passion was usurped. I nagged him to ask questions because,
if he didn’t come up with some information, Arty would make
me try. It seemed that despite his long conversation with her
Arty didn’t know much more about her than the rest of us did.
I was putting Arty onto the little elevator platform that ran
up the outside of the family van one morning when he cocked
a wink at me and said, ‘I guess you’ll have to get old Doc P. to
let you look through her microscope.’
I put a foot on the platform beside him, grabbed the lever,
and we went slowly up.
It was a sunny morning. Warm. I don’t know where we
were – a small valley. All around the camp were deep pastures
cut by streams with rough hills beyond. The highway sliced
through and ran toward a small town, whose chimneys we
could see above the trees. There were songbirds racketing in
173 12/01/2015 12:06  174
the scrub oaks on the slopes. The honk of a pheasant drifted
up from the long grass. Arty wriggled off the elevator onto the
roof. He liked to sunbathe up there when he could. Al had put
a low rail around the top of the van so Arty wouldn’t fall off,
at the same time he installed the elevator.
Arty stuck his toe into the elastic of his trunks and worked
them down until they sagged off him. He rolled over and
arched his back, tilting his belly to the sun, stretching lushly.
‘Yep,’ he said, ‘Little Oly had better do her stuff on Doc P.’
‘Here’s your fly swatter.’ I put it beside him with the handle
close to his head, where he could reach it. Arty was, as he
claimed, ‘fly Mecca,’ and he hated them.
‘Don’t ignore me, Oly,’ he murmured as I rubbed suntan oil
on his chest.
‘I won’t do it. I don’t like her.’
‘Oly, you like her. You like her a lot. She’s a fascinating,
intelligent woman and you can learn from her.’
‘Right,’ I said, capping the bottle.
‘Give her an ear to pour into. Nobody does that better than
you.’ He turned his head to watch me step onto the elevator.
‘Don’t piss on anybody from up here,’ I said. ‘Papa got
really mad last time.’ I lowered myself, looking away from
him, looking at the brown creek that eased through the grass
behind the van.
Three hours later I was hauling Dr. P.’s garbage to the camp
dumpster and cursing her and Arty and myself in a thin blue
vapor of rage that hissed through my nose with every breath.
She had accepted my offer of help coldly and stood over me
while I pumped the hydraulic leveler for her van. She gave me
174 12/01/2015 12:06  175
rigid orders about clipping the weeds and grass all around her
van and then made me go over the whole area with a rake for
litter. Then she introduced me to the garbage. She had very
strict ideas about garbage. Each full bag in the can beside her
van had to be slipped inside another bag and wrapped in a
particular oblong shape and tied with string in a proper square
knot. Three of these small parcels went into one large bag,
which was then wrapped and tied with the small knot. Then
the large parcel could be carried to the camp collection.
She considered it proper that I, or someone more efficient,
should be dispatched by Arty to do her chores. She wasn’t at
all grateful.
When I got back to her van the door was closed again. I
hadn’t yet managed to get inside. I pushed the door buzzer.
Her voice scratched out of the speaker, ‘Yes.’
‘I’m finished with the garbage, ma’am.’
‘That’s all for today, then. Have a bath and pay special
attention to cleaning under your nails. Report back tomorrow
morning.’
A month and several towns later I still hadn’t set foot in her
van. I’d filled her fuel and water tanks, emptied her septic
system, gift-wrapped her garbage every day, and in each new
site I’d leveled her van, policed her area for litter, and gener-
ally kissed her cold and pendulous buttocks for nothing.
In the meantime she had taken over Al’s precious infirmary
trailer.
The sick call was cut in half. Al kept up his Monday-
morning exams of the family but they were conducted in our
dining booth. He didn’t have the old zest for it. He went on
175 12/01/2015 12:06  176
tapping and listening and demanding news of our bowel
movements. He still lifted our eyelids and peered into our
throats and ears and scowled at our nails and rubbed blue
gunk on our teeth and, for those of us with hair, checked for
lice and ticks, but he didn’t have his old glow of joy in doing
it. He was sneaking behind her back.
I found this clipping years later in the private papers of the
reporter Norval Sanderson, who joined the show sometime
after Dr. P. Norval had resources that we Binewskis lacked.
When he wanted info on someone’s past, he could tap records
and microfilm files from any newspaper in the country.
(UPI) A coed at the University
of New York was admitted to
St. Theresa’s Hospital today
after having performed
abdominal surgery on herself
in her dormitory room.
University
authorities
reveal ed that Phyllis Gleaner,
22, a third-year bio-chem
major, pressed an alarm
buzzer in her dormitory room,
which summoned the build-
ing’s custodian at 4:30 A . M .,
Tuesday. Res pond ing to the
buzzer, custodian Gregory
Phelps found the student lying
on a sterile table, wrapped in
bloody sheets and surrounded
by instruments.
‘She was weak but con-
scious,’ said Phelps. ‘She told
me not to touch anything in
the room but to call an ambu-
lance. She said the room was
sterile and she didn’t want me
touching anything. She was
very strong on that. I could
see blood all over and from
what I saw in the mirrors
around her I didn’t want to
upset her so I went and called
the emergency number.’
Police surgeon Kevin
Goran, M.D., examined
176 12/01/2015 12:06  177
Gleaner’s dorm room after she
was re moved to the hospital.
‘It was a makeshift but func-
tional oper ating theater,’ said
Goran. ‘She had instruments
for fairly major ab dom inal
surgery, and an ingenious
arrangement of mirrors,
which allowed her to work
inside her own abdominal
cavity.’
Emergency staff at St.
Theresa’s
reported
that
Gleaner was conscious and
coherent when admitted, but
was very fatigued. ‘She was
not really in shock,’ said Dr.
Vincent Coraccio, staff sur-
geon at St. Theresa’s. ‘What
was remarkable was the com-
petence of the work. She’d
gone all the way in and was
finished, evidently, but she got
too tired to close the incision.
That’s when she called for
help. All I had to do was
stitch her up. A very tidy job.’
Gleaner administered local
anesthetics to herself through-
out the surgical procedure.
Her statements to the hospital
staff indicate that Gleaner
believed a remote-control
device had been implanted
next to her liver by an
unnamed undercover organi-
zation. Gleaner believed that
the device was being used to
monitor and direct her act -
ivities. She performed the
surgery in an effort to rid her-
self of the device. No such
device was found by police in
searching Gleaner’s dormitory
room, nor by the medical
staff in treating Gleaner.
The clipping was stapled in Sanderson’s notebook. One
 of his sprawling hand revealed the rest of his Doc P.
research.
In an article appearing two days later, the same reporter
revealed that university officials attempting to contact
177 12/01/2015 12:06  178
Gleaner’s family discovered that the background on file was
fictitious. She had not attended the schools that she claimed.
Her records were forged and falsified. No relatives or
friends could be located in the small Kansas town – Garden
City – she claimed as her home. The university was embar-
rassed, particularly since Gleaner’s academic record at that
institution was brilliant. Her professors acknowledged that
she was a reserved individual and denied any knowledge of
her private life. They affirmed that her work had been con-
sistently excellent. Classmates claimed little knowledge of
Gleaner. She was aloof from everyone.
Gleaner has consistently refused to make any statement
or to answer any questions about her self-surgery or her fal-
sified background. Her only comment, relayed through a
nurse’s aide, was that the university had no cause for alarm
since her tuition and fees had always been paid.
178 12/01/2015 12:06  179
11
Blood, Stumps, and Other Changes
The twins turned fourteen in Burkburnett, Texas, during a
Panhandle sandstorm as red as a drinker’s eye. Birthdays were
the only holidays the Binewskis noticed and we celebrated
them with all the gusto we could muster. But that fourteenth
for the twins was in a rough spot. Wichita Falls had denied us
a permit and the front man – new to the job, and a reptile
anyway – was scared to tell Al. We didn’t find out until the
police met us at the lot and escorted our cavalcade out of
town, with Al cursing melodically all the way to our next
scheduled stop, which was Burkburnett. Burkburnett hadn’t
decided whether we could have a permit or not. We put up in
the rail-yard next to the slaughterhouse and slept with the
whish and thunk of the oil pumps for night music.
There were oil wells everywhere. The soil had been aban-
doned to dust and lizards, and the backyard of every
wind-blistered bungalow in town had thrown over ideas of
shade or geraniums in favor of the whiskey promise in the
179 12/01/2015 12:06  180
mutter of those green grasshopper pumps. Every pump was set
in concrete and snugged in by a barb-topped chain-link fence
eight feet high. There were pumps in the parking lot of the
twenty-four-hour liquor store. There were three pumps on
choice plots surrounded by the artificial turf that covered the
Terra Celestial Memorial Gardens boneyard. A dozen raven-
ous steel insects sucked at the shit-caked loam in the
mile-square meat-field of empty pens where the beeves, when
there were beeves, milled waiting for the knife. The white
board fences of the paddocks were guarding only oil pumps
that week. The packing plant was closed down.
Past our corner of the meat yard the town began, or ended,
in a blasted heap of storefronts leaning on each other to face
a million miles of Texas rushing straight at them over the
mindless, moundless plain.
The twins woke up bickering. I could hear Elly’s harsh whis-
pers behind the screen. Then Iphy, who never really learned to
whisper, ‘Not better than you. It’s different, Elly. Please. Just
for our birthday.’ It was the same old quarrel. Iphy wanted to
sit next to Arty at breakfast. Elly always insisted that they sit
in the left side of the dining booth so that she was between
Iphy and Arty, who always sat in his special chair at the end
of the booth. Elly hated the giggling that hit Iphy when she sat
next to Arty. Arty didn’t seem to care. I was the one who
helped Arty with his food.
I crawled out of my cupboard and tiptoed into the toilet
cubicle. Elly was grumbling. She must have given in. She’d
given in on Arty’s birthday the year before and sulked the
whole day. The pink joy from Iphy’s smiles had twisted me up.
180 12/01/2015 12:06  181
I looked in the mirror trying to see the fear on my face. It was
in my liver and invisible.
Arty would rather have Iphy cut his meat than me. The
blinds squeaked open in the twins’ room. Their voices came
out together. ‘A horse!’ they said, and then a paired sigh, ‘Poor
thing!’
They left the van door open and, when I came out, they were
standing on the bottom slat of the board fence peering
through.
‘Many happy,’ I said, and hugged their long beautiful legs.
Then their hands were pulling me up by the arms and I
grabbed at the top rail and peered over. Iphy said, ‘Hang on to
her,’ and Elly’s arm clamped under my hump.
‘He’s sick,’ said Iphy, who thought all unfamiliar animals
were male. ‘She’s old,’ said Elly, who assumed that all living
things were female until proven otherwise.
The horse had been orange once but a grizzle of white had
paled its coat. Its white muzzle drooped to the ground on a
thin, tired neck. Its ears were loose and hanging. Its eyes were
nearly closed. Bones jutted through spine, ribs, sharp cow
flanks. The tail was so long that it dragged in the muck.
‘The feet!’ said the twins. The horse was not sleeping. It
moved half a step forward. First a rear hoof and then the
opposite forehoof lifted slowly out of the black mud that cov-
ered them to the fetlocks. Then the horse stopped, lifting again
that rear leg, holding it curled so the hoof was above the mud.
The hoof was long and curved forward like a human shoe
worn over on the outside. The legs were muddy to the knee
and bowed oddly.
181 12/01/2015 12:06  182
The sun leaked up over the edge of the plain. The horse
stood in shadow in its tiny pen. ‘Its feet are rotten,’ muttered
Elly. Iphy began to sniff in sympathy.
I could feel the faint thunk in the fenceboards from the
pumps far off in the middle of the tight maze of paddocks. The
sun’s yellow knife slit the air, not yet reaching the ground or
even the fences, but just touching the heads of the pumps as
they rose and then losing them as they bobbed down into the
shadow again. The feeble horse stood sunk into itself. Not an
ear twitched. Not an eyelid flickered. An early-morning fly
crawled over its hanging lips.
‘Happy birthday,’ Arty said.
Iphy sat next to Arty at breakfast. Al had gone to the sheriff’s
office to get the verdict on our permit for Burkburnett. Lil
hugged the twins every time she passed them and made elegant
little melon salads for breakfast. Elly didn’t talk. Iphy mourned
for the horse all through the meal.
‘I want my chair.’ Arty was brisk, up to something. I dragged
the chair outside and set it up in front of the door. He clam-
bered into it from the top step and looked around. ‘Over by
that horse.’ And I pushed his chair through the dust to the
fence. He leaned forward and peered through the slats. The
horse hadn’t moved. Arty’s face rumpled in disgust. He sank
back against the chair and looked at me speculatively. ‘Well.
Go get the doctor. Bring her here.’ I ran.
The doctor’s big van was by itself at the end of the line with
fifty yards between it and the last trailer. She never parked
close to the others. Her blinds were open. The twined snakes
182 12/01/2015 12:06  183
painted on the van’s side held the intercom in their mouths. I
pushed the button. The sun was up now, slanting warm and
yellow over my hands. The intercom speaker hissed and then
her voice came out calmly. ‘Yes.’ I delivered the message. ‘One
moment,’ she said. The speaker hissed again and went silent.
I climbed down off the step block to wait for her. I didn’t like
to think of her door opening too close to me.
The air was still and dry with a musty, thick taste. The only
familiar smell was the faint tang of fuel from the van. We
hadn’t opened up yet. We hadn’t put our mark on the air. I
tried to see past the cluster of vans and trucks and trailers to
home – to the place at the other end where our van sat, with
Arty out front next to the near-dead horse in its pen.
Everything was in the way. I pulled my cap down over my ears
and jigged anxiously in the dust. I didn’t want to look in the
other direction toward the dry slut town with its dark win-
dows shaded against us. I bit my tongue when the door
opened. The antiseptic smell slid out first. Then I saw her
thick-wedged white shoes with the ankles leaping from them.
‘Lead the way, please,’ she said. And she stepped down toward
me. I scuttled.
Dr. Phyllis should have had a nice voice. It was cool and
high and always controlled. She never ran off into the ragged
edges of sharp like Lil or Iphy. But it still wasn’t pleasant. It
was monotonous as a sleep-walker. Her words came out
cleanly, nipped off surgically with a slightly heavy breath
where an r should be. She spoke Lil’s old tongue, the long,
smooth one from the right side of the hill in Boston. Though,
when Lil asked her, Dr. Phyllis said she’d never been there.
That talk made Lil want her to stay. Lil thought it would be
183 12/01/2015 12:06  184
good to have a woman with the show who spoke that way –
as though she and Lil might drink tea in the van and talk
about home. But it never happened. I didn’t mind Lil liking
her. Lil was silly about who she liked. But Arty was different.
The dust puffed up behind me as I ran. I hoped it would
settle on her white uniform. I wished she wasn’t wearing the
mask so she would breathe my dust and cough. But she never
came out without the mask over her nose and mouth. The
white cap was always pulled down tight over her forehead and
completely covered her hair. In between were the big thick
spectacles. She was completely protected. She didn’t speak to
me, and she kept up with me easily, walking fast.
Chick was leaning on the arm of Arty’s chair as we came
up. The two of them were watching something in the dust.
I heard Arty say, ‘Push them together.’ Chick’s head nodded
and a small grey snake rose a foot into the air, suspended from
its middle like a shoestring, and then dropped back into the
dust.
‘They’re not paying attention,’ said Arty.
‘Good morning,’ said Dr. Phyllis in her high, perfect voice.
The snake and a horned toad rose quickly and flew away
together into the desert. Chick hid his head against Arty’s
chest.
‘Doctor!’ said Arty. ‘Take a look at this horse.’
She walked stiffly past me, her hands folded in front of her
crotch. ‘I am not,’ she said calmly, ‘a veterinarian.’
Arty jabbed his chin into Chick’s wheat-colored hair. ‘Scat!’
he snapped. The child jumped away from the chair and turned
to run. When he saw me, he reached out his soft hand and ran
up to me.
184 12/01/2015 12:06  185
‘Let’s go see what Mama’s putting in the birthday cake,’ I
said. He smiled and we climbed into the van.
Chick sat on the counter, still except when his mouth opened
to receive the gobbets of chocolate frosting that would occa-
sionally lift from the bowl that Lil was dipping from. ‘Stop it,
Chick,’ Lil would murmur. And he would smile sweet choco-
late at her, and the curl that dropped in front of her ear would
stretch out in a soft caress over her cheek and then spring
back. I crouched on the floor with my hump against the cup-
board door and watched Arty and Dr. Phyllis through the open
door.
Her white skirt was stretched tight over her thick legs and
square hips. She was pushing her hands deep into her front
pockets and rocking on her wedge heels. She gazed through
the fence at the decrepit horse. Arty leaned back in his chair
and looked up at her, smiling. I couldn’t hear what they said.
A brown blob danced in front of my nose. I opened my
mouth. It dipped, circled in the air, and zipped onto my
tongue. Frosting.
‘Thanks, Chicky,’ I mumbled. My cap slid forward onto my
nose and then back to its original position. Dr. Phyllis leaned
an elbow on the top board of the fence and turned her mask
and spectacles toward Arty. She propped a white-gloved hand
on her hip and nodded. I licked the last of the frosting out of
my teeth and let it trickle down my throat.
‘I wonder where the twins are,’ said Lil. The cake was
beautiful. Lil had cut it into the shape of two hearts that
interlocked.
*
185 12/01/2015 12:06  186
I gave the word to Horst and he went right away. He took a
pair of musclemen along to help pull the little trailer. I sat on
the step of the cat van, smelling the Bengals and waiting for
Papa. There were a few cars moving on the distant street now.
A barbershop had its door open and a curtain of red and white
fly strips hung limp. The guards were drinking from big
Thermoses at the end of the lot. It felt odd to be parked
without the gates and the booths and the tops going up around
me.
After a while Dr. Phyllis marched by, followed by Horst and
the two bullies pulling the covered trailer. She had them park
it next to her big van. Then she went inside her van. Horst
came to me slowly. He dropped heavily onto the step beside
me. ‘Horse thieving now!’ he said.
‘Papa will find its owner and pay for it.’ The men were
grunting and cussing inside the little trailer. The old horse
would not get up.
‘I wouldn’t feed that critter to an alley cat. Grey meat and
little of it.’
One of the young men jumped out and stood at the tailgate
to pull. With his hands wrapped in the dung-fouled tail he
crouched and crab-walked backward. The pale, gaunt flanks
hove into view. The flabby hooves and rear legs fell out onto
the ground. The blond man inside the trailer was pushing from
the other end. The horse rolled out-and lay on the ground. Its
head flopped down on the end of the long neck and lay still.
The white flapping nostrils flared and dropped. The blond
man hopped out of the trailer with a rope hackamore and
fitted it onto the limp head. He clipped a rope to the chin ring
and ran it to the axle of Dr. Phyllis’s van.
186 12/01/2015 12:06  187
The guards were moving slightly, standing up, putting their
Thermoses behind their stools. A big man crossed the street
and walked across the rutted stubble of the lot. Papa. The two
guards walked halfway to the vans with him and then went
back to their posts. Papa came on. He looked angry.
Burkburnett had forbidden our opening on Sunday. We’d have
to wait until the following day. Al was pissed off. He was curs-
ing the cowardly advance man who had done a bunk the first
time he ran into a snag. ‘Missing Friday and Saturday in
Wichita Falls – and having to open on the slowest day of the
week in a town that couldn’t buy a week’s worth of toilet
paper for the crew!’
I told Papa what Arty wanted. Al groused but then went off
to look for the owner of the horse.
At lunchtime, Lil realized she hadn’t seen the twins since
breakfast. She flew into a panic and went jittering around on
her high red heels with her hands clutching her own shoulders.
She teetered from guard post to guard post questioning the big
blank-faced men. ‘Ain’t seen ’em, ma’am. Couldn’t miss ’em if
they’d come this way.’ And they’d switch their chaws and
wobble their eyes anxiously as she skittered away, hoping that
the little freaks hadn’t slipped by them while they were swap-
ping lies about hot nights in Baton Rouge.
Papa was somewhere talking to a man about a horse and I
trailed after Mama piping, ‘Maybe so,’ and ‘Ah, they’re all
right!’ and ‘Maybe they’re buried in the meat yard, shall I get
some shovels?’ in my most reassuring way as she burbled
through her Mom’s-All-Purpose-Adjustable-List-of-Horrors
187 12/01/2015 12:06  188
that might have happened whenever a child is out of sight. Lil
had got to the finger-twisting stage and all the red-haired girls
turned out to look. We opened all the empty boxcars on the
rail siding and examined all the padlocks on the big sliding
doors to the packing plant and were on our way back through
the camp line, stopping at every van, trailer, and truck camper.
The whole show was on hold because Papa hadn’t given the
set-up order yet, and Arty was occupied with something else.
Mama decided the twins were having a nap in their own
room and we were on our way to look when I noticed the sky.
It was a vague milky sheet. Far off at the dull edge of the plain,
a blood-red line lay between the earth and the sky. As I
watched, the red thickened to a bar and then a band, climbing
the sky.
Arty and Chick were next to Dr. P.’s van at the end of the
line. Dr. P. herself, arms cocked to plant her white gloves on
her white hips, stood in front of Arty’s chair nodding her
mummy-wrapped head. Chick looked like he was hiding
behind Arty’s chair.
The wind was picking up. It riffled Chick’s hair and pushed
Dr. P.’s skirt flat against her legs. Off to the side the old horse
lifted its head on a curved and quivering neck, scrabbling at
the earth with its mushy front hooves, trying to get grip
enough to heave itself upright.
Horst trotted by me with the two guys who had moved the
horse. I started to run. I could see Dr. P. opening her van door
and waving for Chick to go in. Chick looked at her but both
his hands were fastened to the arm of Arty’s chair. Arty’s chin
was jerking toward the door and the doctor. Arty was telling
Chick to go with her.
188 12/01/2015 12:06  189
‘We’re gonna shove that maggoty goat back into the little
trailer!’ Horst yelled at me as I passed him. It was too far to
Dr. Phyllis’s van and I was too slow. Her door closed on Chick
and he was inside, alone with her. Arty had the bulb control in
his teeth and was wheeling merrily toward me when I grabbed
his chair arms.
‘What’d you do that for?’ I puffed. ‘What’s she gonna do to
Chick? Don’t leave him with her!’
‘Push me home! He’s all right. Come on! Double it! Run!’
I grabbed the chair handles automatically and slogged
toward his van, still craning my neck to look back at the blank
closed side of Dr. P.’s white van. Horst and his helpers were
torturing the decrepit brute back into the trailer. I stopped
pushing. ‘Arty, what is she doing to Chick?’
His smooth-skinned head bobbed at the side of the chair.
‘Milk and cookies. Teaching him to play checkers. Move it!
Move it! I have to piss so bad I can taste it.’
I threw myself forward, plodding, watching my feet stir the
dust into the wheel ruts and noticing that the odd, thin light
from the sky threw no shadows at all.
Mama was frantic. Papa was trying to tell her about the fat,
bristly tick of a man who owned the horse and had tried to
convince Al it was blood stock and would be a three-year-old
in prime fettle as soon as it got some oats in its belly. Mama
was whipping over every surface in the van looking for a
note. A ransom note from the kidnappers or a farewell note
from the runaway twins. ‘I left a note in my mother’s sugar
canister when I ran away,’ she muttered. Papa followed her,
rambling on about the ‘used cayuse peddler’ and finally noticed
189 12/01/2015 12:06  190
something amiss. Mama turned to him with clenched fists and
a flaming face.
‘Help me find them!’
‘What the . . . ??’ Papa snatched at her wrist, turning her arm
over, checking the number of injection tracks. I saw them top-
pling into anger.
‘Papa, the twins are missing.’
‘Ah, the flabby-gashed mother of god!’ howled Papa as he
sailed out the door trailing Mama. The wind slung the door
wide with a flat whack and rushed into the van. I pushed the
door closed behind me and took the two steps to Arty’s van.
I turned the knob without knocking and slid inside. Silence.
Carpet. The clean, rich room dim except for a yellow pool of
lamplight where Arty lay calmly on a wine velvet divan with
a book. He watched me wrestle his door closed.
‘Do you know where they are?’
He shook his head. ‘But you can soak some towels and pack
the windows and door frame for me. Help keep the dust out.’
His eyes fell back to his book.
I wet towels in the tub, wrung them out, and punched them
into the window frames. Through each window I could see the
crew moving the vans and trailers, turning them end-on to the
coming wind. There was movement in the windows of some of
the other trailers as other hands tucked wet rags or papers
against the cracks.
‘Shall I go get Chick?’
Arty looked at the clock. ‘He’ll be coming here in a few
minutes. He’ll make it before the dust comes down.’
‘There he is.’ I could see him through the window, holding
hands with a red-haired girl as he ran to keep up with her long
190 12/01/2015 12:06  191
legs. They were ducking their heads, hunching into the wind,
the red-haired girl with her free hand holding her high-rise
hair, which blew up and back around her groping fingers.
‘Did you ever wonder,’ Arty asked, in his coolly speculative
tone, ‘why he doesn’t fly? He should be able to.’
I yanked the door open as the pair hustled up the steps.
‘Oly dear!’ said the red-haired girl. ‘Crystal Lil wants you,
honey! Chick found the twins. Come on.’ I was staring at
Chick, looking for bruises, psychic scars, electrodes planted
behind his ears. Nothing. He was caught up in the excitement
of the wind.
‘Leave him with me!’ Arty yelled from the divan. Chick’s
eyes sprang eagerly past me, his face opening, pleased. He trot-
ted in as I pulled the door shut.
The redhead grabbed my hand. Hurrying. The wind push-
ing so I felt my weight lifting away from me. The sky was a
deep rust above us and the shouts of the crew around us were
shredded to yelping bits that flipped past like no language at
all. ‘Where?’ I bellowed.
I thought she said, ‘The Schultzes!’
We blew past the generator truck, the refrigerator truck. I
saw Horst shoving a wad of wet paper into the ventilator slot
of the cat wagon and then the sand hit us. The red-haired girl
screamed a short, high whistle interrupted by coughing, hers
and mine. It was needles from behind, a million ant bites blis-
tering the back of my neck, burning through my clothes. In
front it was worse. A hot cloud of granulated suffocation fill-
ing nose, mouth, and eyes with dry powder that stuck to any
moisture. It liked the roof of the mouth, the caves behind the
nose, and especially the throat.
191 12/01/2015 12:06  192
The refrigerator truck toppled onto its side behind us. We
ran and the wind tried to make us fly.
The ten-toilet men-and-women Schultz was broadside to the
wind. The same heaving gust that flattened the redhead and
me toppled the Schultz off its trailer. On my belly in the dirt
with my face buried in my arms, I felt the crash more than I
heard it. Then a hand was pulling me up, and slipping my
blouse up to cover my nose and mouth. The redhead rushed
me along, her own blouse snugged to her face with the other
hand. The fine dust sifted through the cloth but I could breathe
a little. The wind ripped up my back, raking my hump, claw-
ing at my bare head. My cap had blown away with my
sunglasses. There was no sound – the blank roar of the wind-
borne sand was seamless.
Hands hoisted me at the armpits and I fell, free and blind,
but landed before I could yelp. Inside. Out of the wind. The
redhead had found the door at one end of the Schultz and got
me through it. I sat in the dark, painfully blinking sand out of
my eyes with tears. The deep boom of the wind beat at the tin
wall as I lay against it. A warm body lurched into me, col-
lapsed beside me. A hand felt my head, my hump. The air was
soft and thick with floating dust and the sick, sweet tang of
chemicals and worse. The redhead’s warm voice breathed in
my ear, ‘I’ll bet this crapper hasn’t been pumped since Tulsa.’
It wasn’t actually a Schultz-brand portable toilet. It was a
Merry-Loo in a truck box with five booths on each side, self-
contained cold-water supply for washbasins, MEN on the port
side, WOMEN to starboard. Papa had picked it up cheap with
its own truck trailer. It was built of thin fiberboard and was so
light that a car or a small pickup could pull the whole rig.
192 12/01/2015 12:06  193
‘Yuck! I’m leaning on a slimy urinal!’ The redhead scooted
over, pushing me into the corner. My head banged on some-
thing hard and I reached to feel pipes and chilly porcelain,
dripping. The sink. My eyes were flushing out sand and I
began to see well enough to know that it really was dark in
there.
‘The twins and your mom are on the other side. We’re on
the men’s side. If they’re still there . . . Lil! Lily!’ she shouted.
‘Mama!’ I yelled, and then coughed with the red dust rasping
deep in my pipes. The murk fuddled me. The room was on its
side. The sink above me hung the wrong way. If I turned on
the tap, the water wouldn’t fall into the basin, it would pour
onto my head. We were crouched on a wall with the linoleum
floor at our backs. What little light there was came in a brown-
gravy mist through the plastic skylight in what was normally
the roof but was now the far wall. The sand-heavy wind cast
dark, rushing shadows across it. Just beyond the urinal that lay
beside us, the booths began. The liquid seeping from the cracks
reminded me that all the toilets were lying on their backs.
‘They’re above us.’ The redhead was standing up on shaky
denim legs. ‘Wow! I’m a little woozy!’ Fluid was dripping
down from what was serving as the ceiling. ‘Look, that wall is
popping!’
The tab-and-slot construction of the fiberboard wall was
loose at the corner above us, drooping. ‘Here, climb up and
pull on it.’
She hauled me up by my hands, balancing me as I climbed
to her knee, her hip, her back. ‘I’m gonna stand up now,’ she
warned. I stepped onto her shoulders, propping myself against
the wall, and tore at the loose flap.
193 12/01/2015 12:06  194
‘Mama! Crystal Lil!’
‘Hey,’ from the dark above us.
‘Oly, get out of the way. We’ll lower Mama to you. She’s
hurt. Her chest.’ It was Elly up there in the dark. I gave the
redhead a few extra bruises sliding down. She caught the long,
white legs that slid out of the ceiling. Mama’s favorite yellow-
flowered skirt was torn, and the blue veins on the backs of her
thighs glittered oddly in the dimness. She moaned feebly as she
eased downward. ‘Mama?’ Her arms came last. The twins let
go and she fell jerkily into the corner with a yelp.
‘A light,’ Mama said.
The twins lowered themselves through the hole and
dropped beside me. They were sodden and they stank. Their
hair and clothes were damp with the blue ooze from the chem-
ical toilets.
‘It’s all our fault,’ Iphy whimpered. ‘My fault is what she
means,’ said Elly. They crouched over Mama and the redhead
leaned over her, gently pushing Mama’s shock of white hair
back from her forehead. Lil was wandering in her head.
We stretched her out flat under the sink and the redhead
tore a scrap off the yellow-flowered skirt to lay over Mama’s
nose and mouth so she could breathe in the floating dust.
The twins were filthy. ‘Nothing broken?’ asked the redhead.
‘Then sit over there. That smell makes my sinuses ache.
Crapper dumped on you, eh?’
‘I acts,’ Mama announced calmly from the floor. ‘Me is
acted upon.’ We all looked at her.
‘Is that grammar?’ asked Iphy. Mama laced her fingers
together on her belly as though she were napping in her own
bed.
194 12/01/2015 12:06  195
‘I don’t know. It may just be talk.’ The redhead picked at a
scrape on her elbow. ‘I’ll go look outside in a minute. It might
be letting up.’
The wind was gusting now, taking breathing breaks
between attacks. There was a little more light. The twins
slumped on the floor against the first booth. Their faces were
as blank as uncut pies. Their eyes stayed fixed on Mama.
‘Happy birthday!’ I grinned. Their mouths crimped painfully.
‘Were you in here all morning? Mama was worried.’
The two matching faces nodded slightly. The redhead
chuckled and whacked at the knees of her jeans, shedding
puffs of dust. ‘It’s their first time bleeding. They thought they
were dying.’
Elly glowered, eyebrows bunching downward. ‘We knew
what it was.’ Iphy’s eyes tilted up anxiously in the middle, ‘We
didn’t know it was going to happen to us, though. We don’t
feel good. And it’s scary. Elly didn’t want to come out but I
did. I tried to get her to come out but she wouldn’t.’
Elly shook her head impatiently. ‘How long do these things
last? All night? Or what?’
Lil’s voice came from under the rag, ‘I would have told you
more but I wasn’t sure it would happen to you.’
My heart was beating a panic in my ears, ‘Mama, will it
happen to me?’
Iphy licked at her muddy lips, ‘Elly wouldn’t come out even
when Chick and Mama found us. She wouldn’t let me unlock
the door. Mama told Chick to unlock the door and bring us
out but he wouldn’t. Because we didn’t want to. But it wasn’t
both of us. It was Elly. Our legs went to sleep sitting on that
toilet.’
195 12/01/2015 12:06  196
‘Shut up! Shut up! Shut up!’
‘Ah, Elly, loosen up. Don’t be so crabby,’ groaned the red-
head. She patted my head. ‘Your mama sent me for you so you
could crawl under the door of the booth.’
‘I would have kicked you if you’d tried,’ snarled Elly.
‘For Christ’s sake, girl, why make so much of a fuss?’ The
redhead was exasperated. ‘It happens to every female.’
‘Yeah? Well, it changes things for us. It throws in a lot of
new stuff to think about.’
A truck horn started blaring nearby. Its flat voice, thinned
by the wind, repeated itself monotonously. Mama opened her
eyes. ‘Dear Al is so impatient.’
‘He doesn’t know where you are.’ The redhead stood up.
The whites of her eyes were blatant in her dust-clotted face.
She reached above me to the knob of the horizontal door
and pushed it open. The clogged sand in the sill rained
down. A rip of wind circled the room, rubbing grime into our
faces.
‘All right, ladies, party’s over. Everybody out.’
‘I’m so glad I had that cake in the refrigerator,’ said Crystal Lil.
‘We wouldn’t have had a bite if I’d left it on the counter.’
We were having the twins’ birthday party on Mama’s big
bed. She lay propped mightily on pillows with Papa’s elegant
bandage wrappings showing through the front of her kimono
and her fresh-washed hair frothing like egg whites above her
naked, unpainted face.
We vacuumed for an hour and still the red dust drifted in the
air. But now, having showered in relays, wearing clean clothes,
we could blink our sore eyes and pick the dry, gritty boogers
196 12/01/2015 12:06  197
from our noses in exhausted contentment. Papa, leaning
against the pillows next to Mama, winked his scoured red eyes
at us. ‘You girls look a bit better now. Less like a demon crew
and more like hungover angels.’
Arty and Chick, of course, were clear-eyed and boogerless,
having spent the storm in Arty’s air-conditioned van. We all
ate cake and traded long, absurd, and competitively exag -
gerated accounts of How Terrifyingly Near to Death the
Sandstorm Brought Me. Papa’s version had him wandering
from trailer to van hollering questions against the wind and
getting unsat isfactory answers and ‘wondering where, by the
shriveled scrotum of Saint Elmo, you’d all been blown to.’
He took refuge in the generator truck and got the bright
notion of sounding the truck’s horn, ‘like a foghorn, so, if
you were wandering in that fiend prairie, you could home in
on it.’
‘Save a big piece for Horst,’ Iphy ordered, ‘and one for the
redhead who helped us. What was her name?’
‘Red.’
‘All the redheads are “Red,” scummy! They have regular
names, y’know!’
Arty had soothed and entertained his (newly discovered)
little pal during the storm by letting Chick read aloud to him
from Arty’s ancient greeting-card collection. When the wind
shifted and Arty’s van considered tipping over, Chick pre-
vented it.
Chick did not have a story. Chick did not eat his cake. His
plate sat on his lap as he stared around at each of the fas -
cinating taletellers in turn. He wasn’t enjoying himself but he
197 12/01/2015 12:06  198
didn’t say anything. Only after we’d kissed Mama and Papa
goodnight and were drifting off toward our beds, Chick
caught up with us in the narrow place beside the twins’ door,
looking up at them sadly.
‘What is it, sweets?’ asked Iphy.
‘I knew where you were. I should have brought you out,
huh?’ His eyes were growing in his face like the size of the
question. Elly smoothed a hand across his hair.
‘No, Chicky, you did just right.’
‘If I had got you out like Mama wanted, you would all have
been home like me and Arty. Mama wouldn’t have got a
broken rib. You wouldn’t have got scared.’
I let go of his hand and punched him softly on the arm.
‘Don’t feel guilty about me, I had a great time!’ and I sagged
off to my warm cupboard, leaving the twins to console him or
not.
I was standing on Arty’s dresser polishing the big mirrored
one-way window to the security booth. He was lolling on his
new velvet divan leafing through a torn magazine retrieved
from the pile in the redheads’ trailer.
‘If I were an old-money gent with a career in the family
vault,’ Arty proposed, ‘and heavy but discreet political influ-
ence, how would I dress?’
I looked back over my hump to see if he was pulling my leg.
He had his nose in the magazine so I answered, ‘Quietly.’
‘But what’s quiet for a man with my build?’
‘I don’t know.’ I climbed down and wiped my footprints off
the dresser top. ‘A tweed T-shirt? Gabardine bikini trunks?
Charcoal silk socks?’
198 12/01/2015 12:06  199
‘Socks.’ He stretched his bare hip flippers, flexing each of
the elongated digits separately. He hated socks. ‘But I suppose
they’d be warm.’ he kept turning s. ‘Oh, Toady. Why were
the twins hiding in the latrine?’
So that was it. I dropped my cleaning rag and hopped onto
the divan, grabbing his lower flippers.
‘I’ll tell you if you’ll tell me about Chick and Doc P.’
‘It’s no big deal. She doctors that horse for me, I let her
study Chick.’
‘Study how?’
‘Talk to him. Ask questions. Observe. What about the
twins?’
‘They started bleeding that morning. It got Elly spooked.’
‘Bleeding?’
‘Their first time. Do you think I’ll bleed too?’
He yawned. ‘I’m going to do some work now. You’d better
go.’
Chick’s legs and sneakers were sticking out, toes down, from
under the family van. ‘Whatcha doing, Chick?’
‘Looking at ants.’
I flopped onto my belly and wormed in beside him, careful
not to crack my hump against the van’s undercarriage. A
school of small ants swarmed on a damp lump in the dirt.
‘That looks like cake.’
‘It’s my piece of the birthday cake. They like it.’
‘You were over at Doc P.’s again this morning, weren’t you?
What’s she like?’
His hot pink face flashed at me, smiling. ‘She’s going to
make Frosty the horse well. And she’s going to let me help her.
199 12/01/2015 12:06  200
She’s going to show me how to stop things from hurting. Arty
says it’s good. But today I just moved her garbage out.’
The twins and I were wiping the jars in the Chute with dust
cloths and spray cleaner. I rubbed the big jar hard and peered
through at Leona the Lizard Girl floating calmly inside. ‘Is
Mama sick?’ I asked.
‘She has to sleep,’ said Elly. ‘Papa gave her an extra shot so
she could sleep. It’s good for her ribs.’
They were cleaning both sides of Apple’s jar. Iphy kept one
hand spread across their wide, flat stomach.
‘Does it hurt, Iphy?’ I asked.
Elly snorted. ‘She keeps thinking about it.’
‘Let Oly do the Tray, Elly. I’ll throw up if we have to do the
Tray.’
‘You won’t puke. Close your eyes while I do it.’
‘You think about the bleeding, too,’ Iphy protested.
‘Yeah, but I’m not going, “Ooh, what’s that? Does it hurt?”
every time something rolls over in our belly. I’m thinking what
it means for us.’
I was working on Maple’s jar by then, spraying and wiping.
‘What does it mean?’
Iphy’s eyes were closed as Elly examined the Tray’s jar for fin-
germarks and smears. ‘What if we can have a baby? Don’t you
ever think about what’s going to happen when we grow up?’
Iphy shook her head, eyes closed. ‘Nothing will change.’
‘What will change?’ I was suddenly scared. Elly was impa-
tient with both of us.
‘Stupid! What do you suppose is going to happen when
Mama and Papa die?’
200 12/01/2015 12:06  201
Iphy’s eyes popped open. ‘They’re not going to die!’
‘Arty will take care of us,’ I said, dusting the ‘BORN OF
NORMAL PARENTS’ sign. ‘He’ll be the boss.’ But I was
thinking I’d marry Arty and sleep with my arms around him
in a big bed and do everything for him.
‘Right!’ Elly sneered. ‘We can depend on Arty!’
Iphy tried to be reassuring. ‘I’m going to marry Arty and
we’ll take care of everybody . . . ’
Elly’s spray bottle hit the floor as her right hand closed into
a white fist and sailed in a short, tight hook to Iphy’s mouth,
where it smacked, spreading Iphy’s lips and snapping her oval
head back on her long-stem neck. Iphy tried to stuff her dust
cloth into Elly’s mouth and block another punch at the same
time. They fell, squealing and thrashing, biting and pulling
hair. I stood staring through the green lenses of my huge new
sunglasses at the convulsing tangle of twins on the floor. I
probably could have stopped them, but I didn’t feel like it. I
turned and shuffled out of the green-lit jar room and down the
narrow corridor, leaving the twins to their mutual assault.
We were still in Burkburnett when Dr. Phyllis did the job on
Frosty with Chick to help and Papa joining in for the messy
bits. They did it late one night in a smallish tent that reeked of
antiseptic. The tent was so brightly lit inside that, from the out-
side, it glowed like a damaged moon heaving with shadows.
I sat fifty feet away on the hood of the humming generator
truck and watched their silhouettes. Chick, a tiny motionless
lump at one end of a long dark heap, and the squat, bulging
form of Dr. P., standing for long periods in one place with only
her head and shoulders moving. Al was busy, the large Papa
201 12/01/2015 12:06  202
shadow bending, stooping, rushing from one end of the glow
to the other, seeming to pace nervously.
They made the big table from a pair of sawhorses and a
steel door from one of the vans. The scarcely breathing heap
in the middle was the ancient horse.
While Mama and the twins slept, while all the camp fell
dark and the midway lights cooled in their sockets and the
night guards shifted and spit and sighed at their scattered
posts, I watched, leaning on Grandpa’s urn, feeling its cold bite
working through my hump to my lungs.
A light filtered through the window of Arty’s van but no
movement showed on the glass.
It took a long time. The black sky should have ached with cold
but there was no wind. The stillness was almost warm, almost
comfortable. No frogs, no crickets, no birds sounded. I nodded
off and woke with cramped shoulders and a sprung neck.
The rotten edge of the sky was moldering into arsenic green
when the light in the tent went out. The grey fabric was sud-
denly dull and three shoddy figures crept out through the flap
and trailed away.
I could hear Papa talking in low tones. As they passed me,
Chick reached up to grab Papa’s hand, the small boy figure
drooping sleepily over stumbling legs.
There are parts of Texas where a fly lives ten thousand years
and a man can’t die soon enough. Time gets strange there from
too much sky, too many miles from crack to crease in the flat
surface of the land. Horst theorized that we’d all live longer for
‘wintering in these scalped zones.’ The redheads moaned that
it just seemed longer. As the days and miles went on they
202 12/01/2015 12:06  203
stopped moaning and leaned toward long silences. Their faces
took on the flat, wind-tracked look of prairie. ‘The grave looks
good by bedtime,’ they said, but the complaints lacked their
usual spice and crackle.
We’d holed up near Medicine Mound and were taking fear-
ful advantage of the truckers and riggers and a crowd that had
come down 250 miles from the Indian Nation in customized
maroon buses with fiddle and accordion bands playing next to
the toilets and ice chests full of beer every five seats. The
Indians stopped off to stretch their legs and their eyeballs at
our facilities on their way to the annual stockholders’ meeting
of some oil company.
Horst himself was reminiscing about the Texas town called
Dime Box and the glories of Old Dime Box, which seemed iso-
lated in his eyes to the broad, strong hips of one Roxanne
Tuxbury (pronounced Tewbury) who ran a motorcycle-repair
shop there and was undismayed by the indelible stench of cat
in a man’s chest hair.
Papa was handing out doses of his most rancid tonic before
breakfast. ‘The winter sun is kind of green and doesn’t have
the Go juice. That’s why you get so sleepy.’ Horst was leaning
on the door waiting for his secret spoonful of vile black
Binewski’s Beneficent Balm.
‘Just don’t let Dr. Phyllis know,’ Papa muttered with every
pour from his big bottle of Triple B.
‘Roxanne Tuxbury always rides a kick-start cycle,’ explained
Horst, ‘and the thighs on that woman are as long and strong
as her laugh, which you can pretty much pick up in Arkansas
if the wind is right. She wears a little leather halter three hun-
dred and sixty-five days of every year.’
203 12/01/2015 12:06  204
Papa jammed a big spoonful of Triple B under Horst’s mus-
tache and bent his famous Binewski eyebrows. ‘Too bad Dime
Box isn’t on our agenda this year. Maybe you ought to take a
little van and hop down there for a week. Catch up with us after
you’ve vented your glands or blown your gasket with Roxanne.’
Horst swallowed hard to keep the Triple B down and glared
at Al. ‘Leave the cats? If you had the sense to winter decently
in Florida it’d give a man a chance to . . . ’
The bells started suddenly. Chick and Arty, who’d disap-
peared early that morning, came rolling up fast and shouting,
‘Elly! Iphy! Come out here!’
The twins, bug-eyed and wincing, crawled out of the dinette
where we’d been finishing arithmetic lessons and waiting for
breakfast. Mama forgot her biscuits and I trailed along. Papa
and Horst laughed as we all trooped down along the hard clay
track toward Dr. P.’s. Arty had a tape player in his wheelchair
playing the taped bells loud. The show folk poked their heads
out and strolled along, redheads and roustabouts. The flat grey
of the day crept up our backs as we came to the shabby cov-
ered trailer parked near Dr. P.’s gleaming white mobile clinic.
Arty’s chair stopped and Iphy’s hand was caught tight in
Arty’s shoulder fin as Chick stepped forward. There was a
rustle and bump from inside the trailer, and then the frost-
coated, candy-orange horse stuck his head out the door and
came prancing down the ramp to the ground with his mane
braided in blue ribbons and his eyes rolling nervously as he
arched his thin neck and crow-hopped in the dust. We all
inhaled as we saw the long form of the horse, the Dachshorse,
the chopped and channeled Basset Horse perched on starry
204 12/01/2015 12:06  205
stockings and realized that all four of the mush-boned feet
were gone. The horse had been cut off just below the knees
and was dancing his sprightly senile horse dance on stocking-
covered, rubber-padded half-leg stumps.
‘Ain’t that something?!’ Papa shouted. The redheads
‘wowed’ woftly and clapped, and Horst whistled a knife blast
through his teeth that flattened the old horse’s ears. Arty
grinned and bowed in his chair, and Chick watched the old
horse steadily. Dr. P. did not appear at all.
We all went close to look and pat the sweating, scared
horse, and to examine the sock-covered stumps and admire
how his tail was tied up in blue ribbon so it wouldn’t drag in
the dust. Chick stayed close, holding the halter rope. The twins
stroked the quivering coat of the stunned old beast and
glanced at each other as Arty told them that, though it was
late, this was his birthday present to them.
‘Thank you, Arty,’ they chorused. Papa was praising Dr. P.
and Mama set off running for the home van with a cry of
‘Biscuits!’ and the group shifted and scattered.
Chick let the halter rope slide through his hands and the horse
reached for a surviving clump of grey-green near the trailer wheel
and bumped his jaw on the ground because he wasn’t used to
being so low down. Or that’s what I thought. Arty leaned back
in his chair and looked worriedly at Iphy. ‘Are you glad?’
Elly watched the horse stepping gingerly on his shortened
limbs, his huge body balanced precariously. Iphy took a breath
and patted Arty’s shoulder. ‘But is he okay, Arty? Doesn’t he
hurt?’
Chick interrupted quickly, ‘No, he doesn’t hurt at all.’ And
I, leaning on Arty’s chair arm, wondered if Chick was doing it
205 12/01/2015 12:06  206
all, holding the horse up and making him dance. Elly’s face
turned toward us and she was old. She had sunk into some
dark place behind her eyes, and whatever she was looking at
wasn’t me or Arty.
‘So this is what it’s going to be like,’ she said. Her voice was
as dry as the sand that stretched to the sad edge of the sky.
The twins stayed as far away from Frosty the horse as they
could, despite Arty’s nagging them to ‘visit their pet.’ Chick
took care of the horse. He would probably have croaked when
he first woke up and noticed that his feet were gone if it hadn’t
been for Chick’s literal support. Whether Chick had actually
kept the brute’s heart pumping against his will I don’t know.
Every morning Chick spent a few minutes jollying the horse
into facing another day.
I can’t be sure how much information or help Chick got
from Dr. P. What is sure is that the tyke spent time with the
doctor every day and he wasn’t always taking out her elabo-
rate garbage. All he would say when I grilled him was, ‘She’s
showing me how to stop things from hurting.’
Chick also spent time with Arty. Suddenly Arty’s nasty atti-
tude had switched to fond big-brotherhood. He let Chick do
a lot of work for him – the brand of charity Arty was most
generous in dispensing. Arty also debriefed the kid every time
he came away from Dr. Phyllis’s van. Chick was Arty’s mole in
the doc’s previously impregnable camp. This was clever, con-
sidering that none of the rest of us had even got through her
door, but I figured it for dangerous.
‘What if she decided to dissect him to see how he works?’
I asked. ‘What if she decides to make a big reputation by writ-
ing papers about him for scientific journals?’
206 12/01/2015 12:06  207
‘Naah. She won’t,’ Arty assured me. ‘She wants to keep him
to herself. She’s teaching him to be a painkiller. She says that old
horse would have kicked off right away if she’d dosed it with
drugs to knock it out. She told Chick about the pain dingus in
the horse’s brain, drew pictures, and had him fool around inside
until he figured out how it worked. She says Chick put the horse
to sleep, kept it unconscious, and sat on the pain dingus so the
horse didn’t have any shock reaction at all. She thinks Chick will
help her be a great surgeon. She’s not gonna advertise him. She
knows she’d lose him if she did.’ Arty paused and thought for a
second. He gave me an odd, worried roll of his eyes. ‘She might
decide to take over the planet or something, but I’m trying to
keep a tight rein on that kind of stuff. I think it’ll work.’
Arty was busy. It’s amazing to me even now how much pri-
vacy he had in his own van, how much time he spent seeming
to lounge around, and how much he got done by giving
orders. He was working. His show was changing. He hired his
own advance man – a specialist named Peabody who popped
in once a month for an hour and then drove out again in a per-
petually gleaming sedan. Peabody wore bank-grey suits and an
air of smug humility that clashed with the style of the racetrack
types who did the job for Al. Every town we hit held a larger
crowd waiting docilely for Arty. They weren’t always poor.
They weren’t always old.
News cameras were common enough on the midway. We
were often booked as a feature of some local crawdad festival
or Miss Artificial Insemination ant or whatever, that drew
coverage for us. But the reporters also started doing more
interviews with Arty in his tank.
*
207 12/01/2015 12:06  208
Whatever he was telling them was what they wanted to hear.
We were all running flat out to keep up with the crowds. Papa
trucked in a portable chain-link fence to close off Arty’s stage
exit from the people who wanted to touch him and talk to him
after his shows.
Arty got a golf cart to toot back and forth in. Papa’s guard
crew increased to fifty large men dressed in sky-blue uniforms
with spangled Binewski badges and arm patches. They carried
discreet, telescoping electro-shock sticks and stun-gas spray
canisters.
Arty stopped coming to the family van for meals. Mama
cooked his food and I carried it to him on trays.
The midway jingled with profits from Arty’s crowd. The
twins, the geeks, the swallowers, and every act in the variety
tent bubbled daily with cheerful audiences, but they were
really just waiting for Arty.
Arty was absorbed. Mama treated it as another one of his
growth phases. ‘He’s always been moody, sensitive,’ she said.
Papa strode the line from early to late – ‘working harder
than I ever have!’ – jubilant at the gross and his own roaring
of orders and arrangements. But he was fuzzy behind the eyes
because he was no longer the actual King Cob of all the Corn.
In his dire heart he felt the difference. He wasn’t working for
himself anymore. He was working for Arty. Everything
revolved around Arty, from our routes and sites to the syrup
flavors in the soda fountains.
We were all nervy with an unspoken anticipation. We were
accelerating toward something and we didn’t know what.
208 12/01/2015 12:06  209
BOOK III
Spiral Mirror 12/01/2015 12:06  210 12/01/2015 12:06  211
12
NOTES FOR NOW
Miss Lick’s Home Flicks
The library microfilm spews a stream of nuggets. An announce -
ment of the birth of Mary Malley Lick, eight pounds, nine
ounces, at Good Samaritan Hospital. The obituary of Eleanor
Malley Lick, dead of cancer when her daughter was eight years
old. Mary Lick, an uncomfortable fifteen-year-old in a baggy
sweater, pictured as ‘A sophomore at Catlin Gabel School,
who holds the Oregon State Women’s Handgun Marks man -
ship championship for the second year in a row.’ Thomas R.
Lick cutting the ribbon for the new trophy and smoking room
at the Sauvie Island Gun Club.
Then there are articles about all the Lick enterprises. There
are fifty-one plants nationwide and a flagship tucked into a
bend in the Willamette just north of the Fremont Bridge. The
product is Lickety Split dinners – portable food for airlines and
for institutions, from rest homes to schools, jails to asylums.
Nineteen full menus with special Kiddie, Diabetic, Kosher, and
NMR (No Mastication Required) lines. Everything from three
211 12/01/2015 12:06  212
to six courses in plastic trays with an indentation for each
item. A subsidiary arm leases microwave ovens to clients for
‘on-the-spot warming.’
An item about the failure of a labor strike at the Portland
plant mentions that Lick Enterprises employed close to eight
thousand workers coast to coast and not one of them belonged
to a union. Thomas R. fired all the strikers in Port land and
hired fresh help unpolluted by notions of collective bargaining.
A mug shot pictures prim young Mary, with her spanking
new degree in Business from the state university, recently
named Portland plant manager at the age of twenty-four. The
caption explains that despite her age she was ‘by no means a
novice, having worked in the plant for seven years in various
departments ranging from bookkeeping to sanitation.’
In the old man’s obituary – cancer – seven years later, Mary
is listed as Executive Vice President and sole heir to Lick
Enterprises.
The last item is a tentative mention in the also-ran list
trailing the four hundred richest individuals in the nation.
The dry line beside her name explains that, since all Lick
assets are privately held, only estimates of her net worth are
available.
I take the copies back to my room and read everything
again. There is no mention of relatives, friends, or lovers, no
names or faces recur near Mary Lick. Every photo shows her
isolated even in a group. Her expression is never quite in sync
with the cheer or solemnity of those around her. She is alone.
Just before midnight I go downstairs and listen to Lil
breathing. Then I go upstairs and knock on Miranda’s door.
There is no answer.
212 12/01/2015 12:06  213
After the morning shift at KBNK I hole up in an empty
office at the station and spend the afternoon on the phone. I
enjoy it. I can never be inconspicuous in person. A hunch-
back is not agile enough for efficient skulking. But my voice
can take me anywhere. I can be a manicured silk recep-
tionist, a bureaucrat of impenetrable authority, or an old
college chum named Beth. I can be a pollster doing a survey
of management techniques or a reporter for the daily paper
doing a feature on how employees view their bosses. Anony -
mous, of course – no real names used and all businesses
disguised.
A dozen phone calls into the day I am thinking grimly about
my luck. Mary Lick could have played chess or poker or pool.
She might have been intrigued by dim, cozy porno shops with
black booths for a spy to hide in. It would have been a snap to
get close to her if she were a horticulture type or a dog breeder.
But no. Miss Lick is physical. Her secretary exclaims, ‘She just
couldn’t get from one day to the next without her two-mile
swim in the evening.’
In my family Arty swam and nobody else did. I never
learned. Trudging home it occurs to me that things could be
worse. Lick could just as easily have gone in for jet boat races,
jumping horses, or sky diving. I can learn to swim.
Miranda’s windows are glowing yellow as I come up the
street. I go straight upstairs to her door and knock. She laughs
and takes me in and shoos out a handsome man named Kevin
so she can draw me. I sit naked for hours watching her. She
draws and makes tea and draws and talks. We don’t mention
her tail.
*
213 12/01/2015 12:06  214
The Athletic Club is only a few blocks from the apartment
building where Miss Lick owns and occupies the top floor. The
club is in the same style as the apartment building, a massive
brick-and-glass temple to the joys of insulation. The word is
that Miss Lick’s father was instrumental in having the club
opened to female membership.
‘Of course we have been integrated for more than thirty
years,’ the information girl told me over the phone. I asked
to have the club brochures mailed to me. The pamphlets were
glossy productions with color photos of the Oak Trophy
Lounge (full-service bar), the saunas, dining room, weight
rooms, handball and tennis courts, and the Thomas R. Lick
memorial swimming pool. I invested in the six-week intro-
ductory membership and spent four afternoons loitering in
the five-story parking lot across the street to watch Miss
Lick’s black sedan enter the brick gateway at 5:30 every
evening.
I stand in the middle of the deserted locker room, a ditty
bag in one hand and a combination lock in the other, staring
at myself in the mirror that covers the door. I look old. I have
always looked old. The hump is not a youthful thing and the
nakedness of my scalp and my hairless eyelids and brow ridges
creak of something ancient. I have stuffed my wig into the
ditty bag already, waiting for her. ‘Always remember,’ my
father used to say, ‘how much leverage you’ve got on the
norms just in your physical presence.’ I examine my wide
mouth and pink eyes, and the slope of cheekbones into the tiny
leg that serves me for a jaw and wonder if it will work this
time when I need it to. After all, Miss Lick is not a norm and
for all I know she is immune to the usual tricks.
214 12/01/2015 12:06  215
She comes through the door and it starts – her double-take
stare reassures me instantly. She is not immune. There is the
standard civilized greeting, ignoring the obvious.
‘Perhaps you can tell me which lockers are . . . ’
I hesitate and she drops her purse on a bench and nods at a
row of cabinets against the wall, ‘All those without locks.’
I shuffle, apologetic, catching a sidelong glimpse of my awk-
ward figure moving toward the lockers, my heart bulging wild
in my mouth with fear that I’ve overplayed it.
Her seriousness surprises me – the slow weight of her – the
lack of cruelty imprinted on her big wary face. Bubbling won’t
work on her. I set myself to go straight-faced and slow-
voiced – to gauge words carefully and understate everything.
She skins out of her tweeds and into the big blue tank suit.
Her thick arms and shoulders roll with padded power. Her
hands are short and thick, the nails clipped straight across at
the tips of the fingers.
‘New member,’ she says.
‘Yes, I joined for the sake of the pool,’ I say, looking at the
hooks in the locker as I sling my clothes onto them. ‘My
doctor wants me to learn to swim.’ I can feel her eyes on my
hump – on the rolls of my neck climbing up to my bald pate.
‘Arthritis?’ comes her voice.
‘It goes with the turf,’ I say lightly.
‘So I hear,’ she says, and I keep my back turned long enough
for her to get a good look at me.
Fourth day at the pool.
‘Clever contraption,’ says Miss Lick, as she snaps the elas-
tic band of my swimsuit that crosses my hump. Her voice is
215 12/01/2015 12:06  216
soft and low, at odds with her bigness and her brusque move-
ment. The showerhead suddenly decides on cold and the water
hits my hump and my neck and my whole naked head with a
bright chill.
‘Special tailoring?’ asks Miss Lick. ‘Expensive?’ I smile up
at her. She is vigorously massaging her own arms in the spray
from the next nozzle.
‘Well, it’s orthopaedic,’ I say, bobbing out of the cold water
to stand dripping on the tiles.
‘Ah!’ says Miss Lick. ‘Right.’ She pounds her big solid belly
with both fists. She flicks her short hair briskly, and her mas-
sive jaw wobbles a run of water down onto her chest. I am
pulling the rubber cap down over my scalp, feeling it crumple
my forehead into rolls over my nose. It pinches.
Miss Lick slides an identical swim cap onto her head, puff-
ing, going red at the edges where her face bulges out of the cap
like a ruptured condom.
‘Check your feet!’ whispers Miss Lick cheerily, and I crouch
against the tile bench and dutifully spread my toes and run my
fingers between them. Miss Lick is slamming the fire door
open and propping it with a rubber wedge. Out she bounces
into the shallow footbath that fills the passage between the
shower-room door and the pool door. Miss Lick spends several
minutes in this high-chlorine footbath before and after her
swim. She is concerned about athlete’s foot and other fungoid
growths.
Miss Lick has kindly offered to give me swimming lessons
to counteract the arthritis that is sinking into all my joints.
Miss Lick says that all hunchbacks and dwarfs should swim.
*
216 12/01/2015 12:06  217
I stand knee-deep in the footbath with my nose on a level
with Miss Lick’s bouncing buttocks, as she jogs vigorously in
place in the warm nose-searing chlorine solution. She is look-
ing through the small screened window in the door to the
pool.
‘Christ! She’s there already!’ I splash back a step, startled
because Miss Lick’s side of our conversation has been pretty
spartan up to now. This burst of emotion throws me. Then I
recognise it. Success. Miss Lick’s jaw shoves forward bellig -
erently and her big hands reach back and grasp her buttocks
and begin to knead them nervously through the blue tank
suit.
‘That old nanny goat haunts me.’ She looks back with a wry
grin at my inquiring face. ‘She swims so bloody-arsed slow!
And she never stops. She’s always in my lane and I’m forever
running over her! I tried coming in on my lunch hour. There
she was. I tried running in before I got to work in the morn-
ing and she was here. She’s here every goddamned hour of the
day. And look at her! She swims like the dead!’ Miss Lick
stares out the diamond-shaped window and grabs hard at her
butt. I pull my tinted goggles down over my pink eyes and
close out some of the sting of the chlorine. Her profile blurs in
the green lenses and her muttering goes on.
‘This may seem horrible but I’ve actually considered trap-
ping her in the deep end and holding her under. There have
been days when I wouldn’t have hesitated if I thought I could
get away with it.’
She looks anxiously back at me, her eyes bulging through
the fat pads of her cheeks. I nod my head at her pale green
face. The light moves on the surface of the footbath and
217 12/01/2015 12:06  218
streaks jump in shades of green across her face. ‘Oh, I can
understand that,’ I say, and I grin, nodding.
Miss Lick is doing her third lap of what she refers to as ‘but-
terfly’ stroke. She will do seven more ‘butterfly’ laps before she
reverts to ‘breast’ stroke. She does each lap in one minute,
which means that the pool will be swamped with three-foot
waves and a pounding roar for seven more minutes. Breast
stroke is quiet even for Miss Lick. The very old woman who
does her mile-and-a-half each day in this pool is clinging to the
tile gutter at the side. She will hang there, waiting, until the
butterfly is finished. The other swimmers, the young ones, who
can evidently breathe under water, continue with their laps.
Miss Lick’s enormous shoulders have her whole torso free of
the water before she splashes back. Her buttocks show briefly
like a barrel going over Niagara. I can loll here on the steps at
the shallow end, only my legs in the bath-warm water and
watch.
I’ve taken her on her own hook and I have to be careful. She
thinks she’s adopted me, that she’s doing me a kindness, that
she’s displaying the magisterial stature of her goodness by
spending time with me. I have to watch my ass. She is
hideously lonely.
The whiskey looks like transparent wood in my glass. I hold
it carefully between my eyes and the firelight so the movement
of the red flame casts a grain into the brown liquid. The
whiskey that I have already drunk sits warmly in my gut and
mouth and penetrates the fog in my skull. The corner of my
eye registers Miss Lick’s heavy wool socks pointing at the fire
218 12/01/2015 12:06  219
over her footstool. I am waiting for my palms to dry, breath-
ing slowly until the clammy seep of my nerves sinks back from
the surface of my skin. The whiskey is amazing to me. I
wonder why I never realized that I would like it. I wonder why
I never tried it before. Liking it so much is dangerous now, and
so I hold it and look through it, drinking very slowly.
Miss Lick has the bottle on a tray beside her chair and is
being generous with herself here in the fire dark. She cuts the
wood herself, takes an ax up to the family parkland in spring
and drags a chainsaw into the woods on weekends to clean up
the deadfalls from the winter. One whole storage cubicle in the
basement of the tasteful brick apartment building is devoted to
split cords seasoning in the dry dark with a deep resin odor.
She goes down in the elevator with a canvas sling over her
shoulder and brings up one night’s worth at a time. She kneels
on the flat granite paving stone in the hearth and nicks off tidy
triangular kindling with a hatchet that looks at home in her
hand, ticking the slim sticks off a sixteen-inch chunk that
rotates quietly under her other hand.
The chairs are dark, supple leather, as big as rhinos. The
drapes are a dark plaid in heavy wool. A plaster bust of
Minerva, painted glossy black, sits on the mantel beneath a
rack of shotguns.
‘I used to go for birds with my old man,’ she says.
She talks slowly. Dry barks of laughter punctuate the sad
parts to show that she is not sentimental and is not looking for
sympathy. She had just described her father, her house in the
woods outside of town, her employees, the old but reliable
machinery that poops out 3 ounces of gravy, 1.8 ounces of
niblet corn, 3 ounces of turkey breast, 3.2 ounces of apple
219 12/01/2015 12:06  220
cobbler, each in its proper compartment of the plastic trays.
She is considering a massive retooling.
‘I’ll get more ice,’ I say, with the bucket in my hand, shuf-
fling to the kitchen as she pads heavily toward the brown-tiled
bathroom. The kitchen is blank. Clean and empty. A torn bag
containing two dark chocolate cookies lies abandoned on one
white counter. The refrigerator door yaws outward from its
emptiness. Nothing but a half bottle of ketchup in the door
shelves. The mouth of the bottle is caked with scab, and in the
freezer section are solid stacks of frozen dinners in plastic
trays – unlabeled.
I reach for the lever on the ice-cube dispenser and she is
behind me, her big hand swooping past my head to hoist the
bucket from me, tuck it up under the spout. Ice rattles out.
‘Are these dinners from your plant?’
‘Turkey, dressing, pumpkin custard, whipped spuds, gravy.
I don’t like cranberries.’
‘Thanksgiving dinner.’
‘Twenty-six Thanksgivings in here. That’s all I eat. Nine
hundred calories each. So why am I so big?’
The freezer is sighing out vapor. She slips the door closed
and stands staring at the gleaming cold cooking range with its
dark oven glass.
‘Lately I’ve been eating popcorn instead. Want some?’
She sits on the footstool in front of the fire, long-handled wire
screen basket in her hand. The hard yellow kernels in the
basket are sliding and bouncing as she quivers her wrist delib-
erately. The coals below the big chunks of wood flicker black
and red and a soft glare reaches up to the basket. The first
220 12/01/2015 12:06  221
kernel of corn hisses and jumps, flowering suddenly into a
speck of white, then the birdshot peppering as the rest of the
kernels go. She watches carefully.
She has a two-quart steel bowl full of popcorn in her lap – a
shaker of brewer’s yeast on the tray next to the Irish whiskey.
She is slowly scooping up popcorn in a big soup spoon and
sliding it into her mouth.
‘I use a spoon because the yeast sticks to my fingers,’ she
says. ‘It’s gritty.’
I lift my glass, full again, and stare through liquid at the fire.
She talks. People talk easily to me. They think a bald albino
hunchback dwarf can’t hide anything. My worst is all out in the
open. It makes it necessary for people to tell you about them-
selves. They begin out of simple courtesy. Just being visible is
my biggest confession, so they try to set me at ease by reveal-
ing our equality, by dragging out their own less-apparent
deformities. That’s how it starts. But I am like a stranger on the
bus and they get hooked on having a listener. They go too far
because I am one listener who is in no position to judge or find
fault. They stretch out their dampest secrets because a creature
like me has no virtues or morals. If I am ‘good’ (and they
assume that I am), it’s obviously for lack of opportunity to be
otherwise. And I listen. I listen eagerly, warmly, because I care.
They tell me everything eventually.
The popcorn is long gone, the fire is dying, and she had
decided to show me her life’s work – ‘My real work,’ she says –
and I feel quite calm, carrying my glass and following her. We
221 12/01/2015 12:06  222
have brought the bottle with us but decided we could dispense
with the ice. The room has no windows. We have come in
through the only door, which is disguised as a locked closet in
the bathroom. Only her key will open it.
She gives me the only chair, solid wood, no cushion. A
working chair. The whole room is set up for only one person
to move in. It is small and lined with racks holding film disks
and video cassettes. The screen fills one whole wall. The rest
is a battered desk and a bank of filing cabinets. She plods from
rack to control panel, talking calmly. She has dropped the
rough cheer of her poolside manner. Her tongue is slightly
thick in her mouth but she is, I can tell, herself. Her big somber
face is intent. She talks as she works.
‘People always assume I’m a lesbian. I’m not. I have no sex
at all that I know of. No interest, no inclination. Never have.
But it’s understandable that I give that impression. It doesn’t
bother me.’
The screen fills with the image of a woman bent over a com-
puter panel. She seems unaware of the camera. Her hands
move rapidly over the control board. She picks up a pedestal
microphone and speaks into it. Her face turns toward the
camera eye for the first time. She stares past me. Her face is
puckered with scar tissue, one eye nearly obliterated by the
alien smoothness. Her mouth is distorted into a pulsing gash
on one side of her face. As she turns back to the keyboard I
notice that she has no eyebrows or lashes and she is wearing
a short, curly brown wig.
‘This is Linda,’ said Miss Lick. ‘I went to school with her.
She was pretty. Her family comfortable but not rich. A nice
girl. Miss Popularity. She put everything into baton twirling,
222 12/01/2015 12:06  223
and dates. She was a cheerleader every year from the seventh
grade on. Average student. The boys were all over her. She was
the oldest of five. Her brothers and sisters were quite a bit
younger. She adored them. When we were sophomores she
was a princess for every dance and festival. I wasn’t one of her
good buddies. Never spoke to her. Then one night in the
winter of our sophomore year she was babysitting for the little
ones while her parents went out. They were all sitting in front
of the fireplace in the family room in their nightgowns. They
were roasting marshmallows and telling ghost stories.
‘I’ve thought of this so often, visualized this scene. Linda
had long hair all the way to her ass. They had all bathed and
she was brushing her hair dry and entertaining the little
ones.’
On the screen the woman at the computer reaches for the
spewing readout. The machine is vomiting fold after fold of
perforated paper, thickly printed. She scans it quickly, folding
it in front of her in a mounting pile as it rolls out.
‘Linda’s hobby was sewing. She’d made all the children’s
nightgowns and her own as well. She didn’t use flame-
retardant material. She was young, you know. Not thinking.
Her mother didn’t ask about it. Never occurred to her.’
The scarred woman on the screen rips the end of the print-
out from the computer, picks up the stack, and gets up from
her chair. She turns her back and limps out of the camera’s
range.
‘Well, to shorten the tale, there was a fire – spark caught in
one of the little ones’ robes. Up it went. Linda saved the child,
caught fire herself in the process – ran outside to keep from
lighting up any of the others. Went up like a torch, I understand.
223 12/01/2015 12:06  224
Long nightgown, long robe, her hair. She was in the hospital for
a long time. Lots of grafts. Amazing how much damage was
done.
‘She refused a lot of the plastic surgery. Expensive. She felt
guilty. Her parents had all those little ones to bring up. She
said she’d get it done later when she could earn it herself.
Parents tried to persuade her but she was fierce about it.
When she came back to school she was as she is now, scarred
from stem to stern. Different girl entirely from what she had
been. Old pursuits, interests, wiped out entirely. Friends tried
to be polite but she made them nervous. Boys all gone west as
far as she was concerned. Interesting to see the change. She
seemed to have taken in the situation completely while she
was still in the hospital. Turned her head around. She studied.
All that old energy of hers turned to books. Realized, you see,
that she couldn’t rely on being cute and catching a man – that
the life she’d expected was out of reach. But she didn’t give
up. She made another life – all brain stuff. I admired her. We
got to be friends. Still see her. She’s a chemical engineer. Done
some innovative research. Won prizes. She’s told me time and
again that fire was the best thing that could have happened to
her.’
The camera sweeps over the lifeless computer room.
Another camera takes over. An office. The woman in the wig
faces the camera. She is sitting at a desk comparing the print-
out with another sheet of paper. Her forehead only wrinkles
on one side. Then we are in a kitchen. Same woman without
her white lab coat. She is wearing a bulky sweater, reaching
into an open microwave oven and pulling out a plastic-covered
tray like the ones in Miss Lick’s freezer.
224 12/01/2015 12:06  225
The tape ends and the screen goes to grey static.
‘It’s not surprising when you think about the precedents.’
Miss Lick is philosophical. ‘Crippled painters and whatnot.
Remember the Arturans roaming the country years ago?’
My frozen face doesn’t alarm her. She rolls on expansively.
‘Same thing. People put it down because the whole thing had
that weird end, but it wasn’t too long after Linda’s fork in the
road and I saw the connection, all right. I’d have run off and
joined up with that particular carnival myself if my old man
hadn’t needed me in the business. Do you remember Arturo?’
I can feel my head bobbing slowly up and down. I have no
sense of what my face is doing. Could I be smiling? Does she
know? She flicks a hand at me, inviting a response.
‘So what did you think of all that? Arturo.’
My throat and mouth are crackling dry and painful. My
voice comes out like a rusty chain. ‘I loved him.’
She is delighted. ‘Ha! I thought so. Probably had a little itch
yourself. Wouldn’t have minded tagging along on that comet
tail, yourself?’
I feel myself nodding, helplessly.
‘You’re not in a hurry, are you? I’ll drive you home. I want
to show you another one.’
My eyes pull away from the blank screen. Miss Lick is at
the disk rack. I reach for the bottle on the desk. She is going
to show me the whole thing. The brown liquid runs right up
to the rim of my glass before I can stop it. I set the bottle back
carefully. Two deep breaths. I’m having a little difficulty telling
the difference between the whiskey and my fear. Miss Lick’s
glass is empty. I lift my glass and pour three-quarters of the
Irish into her glass.
225 12/01/2015 12:06  226
‘Oh, thanks. Now this one . . . ’ She is hiking a big hip onto
the desk behind me – reaching for the glass. I turn to watch the
new scene.
Cars blur the screen – windows, door handles streak past.
Then the focus sets. We are across the street from a standard
type-C tenement. Garbage leaning against a rusted scrap of
wrought-iron fence, a bunch of kids loitering on the steps of a
shoddy building. A man wobbles past on the sidewalk, waving
his hands and talking to himself. The lens tightens and closes
in on a girl and boy on the bottom step. The girl is leaning
back against the railing, arching her breasts up at a pimpled
boy with a cigarette in his lips. He is trying to look cool and
aloof. The girl has black hair, rooched cunningly into coils by
her ears. Her face is a Byzantine dream. She purses her lips and
blows a smoke ring into the boy’s face. Her eyes slant nar-
rowly in a hot half smile.
‘This is Carina. Half black, half Italian. Poor as shit. A
dropout but she tested high in aptitudes. Her father dis -
appeared when she was five. Mother a welfare lush picking up
a little extra by peddling ass in the dark to johns too old to
care or too drunk to notice what she looks like. Specializes in
head since she lost her last teeth. She used to refuse dirt track-
ers but she had to give in on that a few years before this film
was taken. Looks like Carina’s headed the same way, doesn’t
it?’
The back of the chair catches my hump wrong and my legs
are going to sleep from dangling over the hard edge of the seat.
I swig at my glass and move my feet tentatively to keep the
blood flowing. The glass is empty. Miss Lick’s huge warmth
moves close to me with the bottle, filling it. I drink again. Miss
226 12/01/2015 12:06  227
Lick is sitting on the desk, tapping her heels against the side.
Her big feet in the thick work socks slide in and out of the cor-
ners of my vision. I’m afraid to look at her face.
The camera is in an operating theater. A lone masked figure
all in white leans over a sheeted body on the table. The camera
zooms toward the face of the figure and then the image skids.
‘We’ll skip to the pertinent stuff.’ Miss Lick is pushing levers
on the control box. The image staggers and then blurs past in
a fizz of color. I run a hand over my face and wipe the sweat
on my skirt. My wig is slipping toward my left eye and I can’t
seem, to straighten it one-handed. The screen settles heavily in
a small bright room. Yellow walls. Lace curtains. A shelf of
books. A desk. The lens slides down to reveal a bed below the
camera. Tidy with cushions, the spread matches the curtains
and a dark-haired girl is sitting on it with a portable console
beside her. She is dictating into a hand mike, using long fingers
to spread the s of the book on her knees. The girl drops
the mike suddenly and flops back against the cushions. She
raises the books and reads. Her face is corrugated with deep
purple gutter of scar. Her lips are twisted, nostrils distorted.
Only her eyes and something in the barely discernible bone
beneath the raddled flesh seem familiar. The film scutter
berserkly. Miss Lick sighs as she pumps the control lever.
‘It was acid. But she was completely anesthetized.’ I am
looking at the dark wood doors of a large chapel. The doors
burst open and girls in graduation gowns rush out, their mor-
tars precarious on soft hair.
‘The day she graduated from college. Me still worried. She
had my heart wrapped in barbed wire.’
A purple face appears in the excited crowd. The gowned
227 12/01/2015 12:06  228
figure comes straight down the steps and reaches up to snatch
off the mortarboard. She marches straight toward the camera.
The focus wobbles as she nears us.
The next view is a drab office with venetian blinds on the
windows. The scar-faced girl is at one of the three desks. She
is holding a sheaf of paper in one hand and a microphone in
the other.
‘She’s a translator. An enormous gift for languages. But she
worked here for a year before I was able to get the camera in.
Intelligence Bureau. Tight security. A slip would have cost her
the job.’
‘It’s Carina,’ I said. The glass was against my lower lip and
the name dropped into it and broke.
‘Yes. She’s twenty-six now. Second in command in her
office. Fluent in five languages.’
The screen is placid and grey. Miss Lick is sliding the disk
back into its file slot. I hold the glass away from me and watch
the level of the liquid. It is quivering but not a lot.
‘You got the idea from Linda?’ I ask it calmly, curiously.
‘From what happened to her. Not her idea. My idea. But it
only clicked because of the Arturans. Not that I’m a disciple.
More of an apostle.’
Miss Lick is firm on this point, shoving all the disks straight
with the side of her hand, tapping them into symmetry.
‘Carina was my first.’ She stops and stares at the wall. I can
see her remembering. Doubt and worry form in faint nostal-
gia between the bulges of her face. ‘She was bitter. Stubborn
for a long time. Despite the money. Despite clothes and school
and private tutors. I did everything I could. I was worried for
years.’
228 12/01/2015 12:06  229
‘What about the mother? Did she . . . ?’ I raise my eyebrows
at Miss Lick over the glass.
She snorts and nods. ‘An annuity. She was delighted. I took
the precaution of collecting a little evidence on her in case she
ever thought she could use more money. I was lucky. Got an
infrared disk of her rolling some poor bastard one night. He
died of exposure. It was January!’
‘I’m impressed with the camera business. Do you handle all
that yourself? Do they really not know they’re being taped?’
She nods, a faint flush rising up her heavy jaws.
‘Old hobby. There’s a lot involved if you want to be unob-
trusive. Interesting techniques for surveillance and plants.’
I want to go home and think. She doesn’t trust me com-
pletely yet. She skipped the operation scene. Didn’t want me to
see the close-ups of the acid working on Carina’s face – the
fuming mist of chemical burn rising from the bubbling flesh.
She isn’t sure I’d understand that, or tolerate her pleasure in
the sight.
But I can’t leave yet. I have to reassure her that she hasn’t
made a mistake by revealing herself to me.
‘You know that all my life I have been in a position to
understand what you are doing.’ I look straight at her – pour
deep honesty out through my pink eyes. Pitch my voice into
the nether regions for her. She is staring at me anxiously. I
smile the smile at her, the warm one. She is lumbering toward
me, her hands stretched out to me like two naked babies, her
great face cracking and melting in relief. She is pumping my
hand up and down in the hot smother of her big paws. I feel
as though my hand is wrist-deep in a fresh-killed chicken.
‘Thanks,’ she is muttering. ‘Jesus.’ She is beaming at me.
229 12/01/2015 12:06  230
‘You’re the first . . . ’ She is wagging her head in wonder. ‘First
time I ever dared show anybody.’ I try to balance the glass in
my free hand but the whiskey sloshes out over the rim and
chills my knees where it falls.
I like Miss Lick. Arty always said that was important.
‘Find a way to like them,’ he said. Like them every minute
that you’re with them. If you can like them they’ll be helpless
against you.’
It’s easy. She is so big and homely and scared. She blushes.
When she dresses after her swim, her hair is too soft to control
and sticks up all over her head in rooster tails until she greases
it and slicks it down. Her eyes are puffy every morning and she
is fragile before she has her coffee at the office. She is honest.
She wants to do good. All her efforts are toward good.
Miss Lick’s purpose is to liberate women who are liable to
be exploited by male hungers. These exploitable women are,
in Miss Lick’s view, the pretty ones. She feels great pity for
them. Linda’s transformation gave her the idea. If all these
pretty women could shed the traits that made men want them
(their prettiness) they they would no longer depend on their
own exploitability but would use their talents and intelligence
to become powerful. Miss Lock has great faith in the truth of
this theory. She herself is an example of what can be accom-
plished by one unencumbered by natural beauty. So am I.
‘You are so lucky,’ she said that night. ‘What fools might
consider a handicap is actually an enormous gift. What you’ve
accomplished with your voice might never have been possible
if you’d been normal.’
Miss Lick, like many otherwise sophisticated people, is
230 12/01/2015 12:06  231
unduly impressed by anything connected with mass media. She
believes my radio programs are major artistic achievements.
She is sure I am a great success.
Miss Lick has already liberated a number of young women.
She never uses force or coercion. She uses money. Carina was
the first and gave her the most trouble. She waited until Carina
had her degree and was settled in her job before she tried again.
‘I had to be sure I was right. It’s not something you can do
carelessly.’
Carina has never yet told Miss Lick that it was ‘the best
thing that ever happened’ to her.
‘I admit that still bothers me,’ says Miss Lick, her forehead
rumpled with worry. ‘But others have said it. Lots of times.
Carina’s stubborn. Damned stubborn.’
After Carina, Miss Lick was tentative, cautious for a while.
‘I stuck with thyroid treatments for the next three. I was
nervous about a more drastic approach.’
The disks flickered over a secretary, a high-school hurdles
runner, a young prostitute – and then their incredible incar-
nations. All three so fat they could barely move.
‘Lulu, the ex-hooker, is my accountant. The secretary is my
office manager.’ Miss Lick shoved her hands deep in her pock-
ets and stared at the last image on the screen. A mound of dark
flesh lies on a pillow. Thin hair straggling in greasy tangles sug-
gests that it is a human head. Finally I see the tiny eyes gleaming
out of dents in what must be a drooping heap of cheeks.
‘This was Vita. She was seventeen when we started. I felt
terrible . . . It was a failure . . . I misjudged. She couldn’t take
it. Tried to kill herself. Pills. She’d been an athlete and this was
the wrong route for her. Absolutely the wrong technique. Acid
231 12/01/2015 12:06  232
would have been O.K., but not this. Made me realize I had to
tailor the treatments. I’ve been working on bringing her back.
Her body is close, now. But her head is . . . And she was sharp.’
Miss Lick’s clenched fists were still against her belly but all the
rest of her shuddered.
‘So she says, “Just give me the money and watch my smoke. I
don’t need the operation.” And I told her, hey honey, that’s
what they all say and maybe you’d get the degree and the job
but the first prick who rubbed your nipples the right way
you’d go down the chute with all the rest. Those forty-fours of
yours are a matched pair of concrete boots and you either
ditch them or stay on here loading bread trucks and wait for
the janitor to get so anxious to bury his face in your fat sack
that he offers to marry you.’
Miss Lick is flushed with the rectitude of her argument. The
blonde on the screen is a cantilevered mammary miracle in a
red T-shirt and tight pants. She bounces majestically as she
reaches for big metal trays of plastic-wrapped wheat bread.
The disk skids.
‘She’s not as smart as I figured. All she’s good for is a
technician.’
A thin-shouldered lab coat with a greasy ponytail turns
toward us holding a pair of test tubes up to the light. A squint-
ing examination of cloudy fluids.
‘She spends all day analyzing horse piss from the tracks. Big
day if she finds a jump drug in a sample. But hell. She’s happy.
Makes a good living.’
The lab coat is flat. No chest at all.
*
232 12/01/2015 12:06  233
‘Damned good surgeon. Made a mistake and landed in my
pocket. He’s lucky to be practicing and he knows it lasts just
so long as I say so. I pay him well for my little jobs and I cover
his ass. He used to balk and squirm about it but he’s been sewn
up for years. He’s got kids, a big house, a country club.
Reliable character. Truth is, I think he gets a kick out of it. I
watch everything. Used to make me sick but I enjoy it now. An
acquired taste but there’s a lot of finesse involved.’
She will not show me the sections of the disks that record the
actual operations.
‘I’ve got several projects going all the time. Prospects that I’m
doing research on. Sometimes after I’ve decided a girl is right
and make the approach, it takes a while for her to come
around. I’ve had a few rejections. A few. I’m careful. Never a
whisper about it though. Never any trouble. I just offer. No
force at all. Nothing to complain about. Nothing illegal. Right
now I’m interested in a kind of progressive procedure. Start
out with a superficial thing – long hair, maybe – and use it as
a kickoff. Bigger rewards dangled in front to keep them
going . . . Interesting. Still experimental, of course, not sure
how it will work out in the long run.’
Miss Lick does not mention the Glass House and neither
do I.
My new room is unfamiliar and chilly. I lie on the bed and try
to learn the way to the bathroom door. A private bathroom
here. It’s a much lusher joint than my room in Lil’s house. No
hazy perambulations down the hall to the shared can in the
233 12/01/2015 12:06  234
middle of the night. But the other is home and I miss it. This
more respectable front is what Miss Lick expects of Hopalong
McGurk, and I hope it will keep her from connecting me with
Miranda. I arrive early at the radio station every day to get my
mail and prevent any accidents from the staff’s trying to reach
me at my old address.
For a while I told myself that all I needed to do was inter-
fere with Miss Lick’s finances. If she were poor, I thought, she
wouldn’t be able to go on with her projects. I looked around
her corporate structure for ways to sabotage her pocketbook.
Nothing. I’m not clever with business. Couldn’t understand
half of it. All I came up with was an idea about incendiary
bombs in each of the factories. But they all work on twenty-
four-hour shifts and they’re too scattered across the country
for me to do it all myself. She’s got her capital snugged away
in safe paper unconnected with the travel-grub business
anyway.
Then, in the pool one day, I saw her watching the children.
Pretty schoolkids training for the club team. They were like
otters, playing around the stodgy lap swimmers. I was lean-
ing on the steps at the shallow end, resting. Miss Lick came to
the wall and stood up instead of doing her usual flip and
push-off. She glared at the girls, her eyes burned red with
chlorine and hatred. Long legs flashed, smooth, angular faces
laughed at each other. Miss Lick’s head jutted forward from
her big shoulders. Her jaw gripped at an odd angle and began
to twitch.
My stomach tried to crawl into my mouth. If she couldn’t
buy them into disfigurement she’d find another way, and in
that minute I realized it was lucky she did have money. I’m
234 12/01/2015 12:06  235
resigned since then. I like her. She doesn’t usually scare me. But
I know what I have to do.
I am driving the golf cart and Miss Lick walks alongside. We
are somewhere past the fourth green.
‘It’s a tax write-off. My girls go down as handicapped. No
trouble establishing fake accident reports. Private nursing. I’m
a bona fide charitable organization with rehabilitation as my
main goal. It’s the truth too.’
I am glad that Miss Lick has made a big campaign out of her
hobby. It gives me more substantial justification.
If Miranda were the only one she’d ever approached I’d do
it anyway – but I would have doubted the propriety of dous-
ing anyone’s lights permanently for the sake of Miranda’s
ridiculous little tail. I’m the only one who sets any real store by
that tail. Anybody else would call it great luck to get paid for
having the nuisance removed.
Sometimes when we’ve been drinking I can’t help smiling at
Miss Lick while I picture myself drilling her through the eye
with her pop’s target pistol. The irony of my killing her right-
eously for doing what she considers righteous – and she,
remember, never killed anyone – is hilarious to me. I must
watch my drinking. I like it too much.
I read nothing but murders lately. Six solid weeks of mystery
stories on my program. The puzzles intrigue me – and the
methods. Surely the simplest way is the best.
I am terrified of trying and failing. The idea of her looking
at me, that great hopelessly rumpled mass of flesh seeing me as
235 12/01/2015 12:06  236
a betrayer – knowing that I am responsible – that I deliberately
led her on and am now hurting her. That image comes to me
horribly in my sleep. I can’t bear for her to live on knowing
that I would try to do that to her. She’d become a real mon-
ster – and my creation. No, it has to be absolutely sure, and
quick. Very quick.
Meanwhile the cheap editions of murder pile higher and
higher in this temporary room. I must be leaving a mile-wide
trail. Hiding my intentions from her will be enough – but it
will be obvious to anyone nosing around after the fact. Still, I
am not as afraid of being caught as I imagined I would be. I’m
only afraid of Miss Lick’s knowing, and I’m afraid of failing.
Knowing Miss Lick has made me think about Arty again.
Wanting to do it didn’t make him evil. Getting away with it is
what turned him into a monster.
Of course I will have to apply this rule to myself eventually.
And I’m glad I’ve discovered whiskey.
I can’t spend much time at Lil’s house for now. I go in every
Thursday night to deal with the garbage and to arrange my
notes with the other papers in the trunk for Miranda. I tell
myself that it matters, and that the relics of my life will miss
me. Sometimes I believe it.
236 12/01/2015 12:06  237
13
Flesh – Electric on Wheels
The guy was obviously sixty but he looked like he’d never
stopped training for some tight and lonesome sport, rock
climbing maybe, or breaking his own long-distance record for
walking on his hands. He sat on the step of Arty’s van with
his sleeves rolled nearly above his elbows and a pair of sus-
penders holding up his shin-length work pants. His shoes
were high button-and-lace combos that must have been forty
years old and made from hand-lasted baby rhino. They had
an odd grey luster about half a century deep in elbow oil. Nice
shoes, and he had them planted firmly under him and his
elbow dug into his knees and his forearms angled up to a peak
where his hands clasped. The muscles cut so solidly away
from each other that my first thought was of old wood and
roof beams.
He had the good sense not to get up when I walked over to
him. He nodded and took off his cap as though he meant to air
his brown scalp rather than honor me.‘My name is McGurk . . .
237 12/01/2015 12:06  238
Zephir McGurk, and I’d like to visit with Arturo . . . your
brother, I think.’
I started my standard routine. ‘Arturo undergoes great
strain during his demonstrations and requires rest . . . ’
McGurk flicked his window-cool eyes at me, quirked one
corner of his mouth and reached down beside him for an elab-
orate leather-bound case with brass clamps. ‘I think I’ve got
something the Aqua Kid would very much like to see. I’m an
electrician and an inventor, miss . . . And I’ve been thinking
about your brother for a solid year – ever since the show came
through here last March. You let me see him. You won’t regret
it. And neither will he.’
The case wasn’t hiding a bomb or a gun. I was sure of that
just looking at the guy. I unlocked the door and took him in.
McGurk stood beside the table and examined the fingernails of
both his hands in a discreet way. I went to Arty’s door and
knocked.
Though he insisted on the charade of attempted privacy,
Arty liked having people clamoring to see him. He swung up
onto his red velvet throne and held his face up for me to wipe
his nose.
‘Stay in the security room,’ he said.
I opened the door for McGurk and introduced him as I slid
out. In the security room I checked the gun and took off the
safety while I slowly opened the ventilator beneath the one-way
glass. McGurk was sitting in the armchair. He was look ing
coolly at Arty’s lower body. After a few seconds McGurk’s eyes
jumped up to Arty’s.
‘Have your testicles descended?’
Arty was used to impertinent questions. ‘Why do you ask?’
238 12/01/2015 12:06  239
‘How can you sit upright without hurting yourself?’
‘I have well-developed buttocks and I wear a rigid cup.’
McGurk nodded and put the case on his lap. He used a
small key to unlock it.
‘I’ve been thinking about your life and I’ve designed some-
thing that may do you some good.’
‘That’s kind of you.’
‘Not exactly. I just couldn’t sleep until I came up with a
solution.’ The case spread open on his knees and revealed an
old-fashioned record player with a chrome bar elbowing out
from a spot near the center of the turntable. A soft thick tube
drooped from the end of the chrome. McGurk looked at the
bed and got up. He set the thing on the bed near the wall and
stretched the shining bar toward the center of the bed. The
tube drooped toward the maroon satin spread.
‘The switch cable is pressure operated.’ He pulled a rubber
ball away from the side and a chrome-wrapped coil followed
it, whirring against the case.
‘You can hold it in your teeth and have complete control,
one click turns it on.’ He pressed and a faint hum pulsed into
the room. ‘You insert your penis in the tube here . . .’, his fin-
gers lifted the flaccid bag until a deep pink mouth showed,
‘and a second click adjusts the clamps to a firm grip.’ The tube
jumped and the mouth took on an O form.
Arty began to chuckle. ‘Clever. But are you sure you didn’t
design this for yourself?’
McGurk’s head swung around to look at Arty. A crease of
irritation flickered between his eyes. ‘You’re what? eighteen or
nineteen years old?’ he said. ‘I kept thinking what things
would be like for you.’ He thumbed a pressure switch in the
239 12/01/2015 12:06  240
rubber ball. The turntable began to spin and the chrome arm
pulled and thrust, pushed and retreated smoothly, with the bag
at the end inflated and Arty stared at the pumping chrome arm
and its full tip. McGurk leaned forward and pushed his thumb
deep into the mouth. The bag sucked and jumped around the
thumb as he watched it. ‘You get thirty-three, forty-five, or
seventy-eight RPMs on this suction tube.’
Arty licked his lips, sniffed carefully to make sure his nose
wasn’t running. ‘Have you tried it out?’ he asked.
McGurk pulled his reddened thumb out of the bag and
pressed the control switch. The chrome arm stopped moving.
My tall stool was cutting off blood to my legs and I
squirmed and craned my neck. Arty was turned away from me,
watching McGurk, who slumped down and sat on the bed. ‘I’ll
show you the lubrication and drainage system, but . . . ’ He
hiked at his trousers until both knees were bare, white and hair-
less. The shoes came up his shins and turned into grey socks.
‘But I guess you want my credentials,’ McGurk said. He
reached up his right pant leg. There was a snap and the shoe
toppled over with the plastic shin and knee sticking out of it. A
dim gleam came from the dark fold of the empty trouser leg.
He slid his hand up the other trouser leg and both legs lay on
the floor with steel shining out of the hollow tops of the knees.
He pulled his pant legs up his thighs and showed the steel caps
on the stumps. There were a groove, a few grip protrusions,
and a number of electrical contact points protruding from each
unit. He looked up, calmly waiting.
Arty pursed his wide lips and rolled them speculatively.
‘Shit,’ he said. Then he sent a long arc of saliva at the nearest
shoe. It hit the laces and trickled down across the holes.
240 12/01/2015 12:06  241
McGurk went on looking at him but there was a deep crease
between his eyes.
‘You figured it wrong. The whole thing,’ said Arty. He
rocked slightly, chuckling. ‘You’ve got yourself a little old dis-
ability there, so you took pleasure in feeling sorry for me. Well.
You figured wrong.’
McGurk was twisting on the bed, reaching his powerful
forearms down for the artificial legs. He straightened and
jammed the steel ends onto his stumps with a clang. The gun
was sweating in my hands.
‘You figured . . . ’ Arty was watching carefully now; his eyes
swung once to the mirror above his bureau that hid me and the
gun on the other side, ‘ . . . figured we had a common set of
interests. Guess you have a hard time with the ladies. Well, I
don’t. I’ve got women mooning around begging to take up my
slack.’
McGurk was folding the chrome arm back over the
turntable, feeding the control cable back into its hole, carefully
closing the case, not paying any attention to Arty. Arty sucked
his lower lip in between his teeth and popped it out again. He
waved his right flipper vaguely. ‘You know you’re taking the
wrong road on those stumps. You’re like a man with a beau-
tiful voice taking a vow of silence. You’re working hard to
pretend they aren’t there and you meet a girl in a bar and don’t
tell her about those knees until you get to take your pants off.
You ought to tan your thighs and walk on them. Wear silver
sequin pads and dance on a lit stage where they can see you.
All those soft girlies come knocking on your door borrowing
sugar in the dead of night and sliming for you. You could have
that. Not as much as I get but plenty . . . You’re just going
241 12/01/2015 12:07  242
along with what they want you to do. They want those things
hidden away, disguised, forgotten, because they know how
much power those stumps could have.’
McGurk was looking now, listening. I could see his eyes
sliding on the console, the velvets, the soft deep carpet. I put
the gun on safety and stuck it back on its shelf. I flicked the
switch as I went out so the lamp on the bureau in Arty’s room
would go out and he would know I wasn’t covering him. I got
a contract and took it to Arty. McGurk was smoking quietly
and staring at the walls. Arty was saying, ‘ . . . a sensible man
doesn’t have to have the top of his head blown off to know the
truth when he sees it.’
McGurk signed on as an electrician. He shook hands with
me because he couldn’t with Arty. Then he went out to sell
everything he owned, say goodbye to the two teenage sons
who lived with his ex-wife, and furnish his station wagon for
temporary living so he could follow the show.
When the blighted stump horse died, our Chick ‘took on
something terrible,’ as Mama said. I came out of the Chute
that morning with my nose burnt from the smell of glass
cleaner, and heard ‘woo-wooing’ of a wet, breathy variety that
seemed familiar. They were up on the generator hood by
Grandpa’s urn. Chick was sprawled out flat with his face
buried in his hands and Elly and Iphy patted him gently while
they looked off in opposite directions at the sky.
I crawled up to help pat Chick. The twins said he’d found
Frosty stiff and flat in his trailer. Talking to the fuzzy blond
back of Chick’s head and the wet pink fist hiding his face, I
said, ‘Shooty-pooty, Chick, it isn’t your fault. He was old and
242 12/01/2015 12:07  243
it was his time and you took such good care of him these past
few months. He was probably happier than he’d ever been in
his whole life.’ But the Chick choked and Elly sniffed and said
they’d already told him that but he loved the horse and had to
cry. I took offense at her snotty ways and told her Chick loved
everything and he was going to be a mess if he cried like that
every time a geranium conked out in the redheads’ flowerpots
or something. But Iphy was dreaming sorrowfully at the low
grey sky and Elly was not be to baited. She just sighed,
‘Probably,’ and went on patting Chick.
I slid down and went off to practice a funeral oration for
Frosty. It wasn’t too bad, though it was never delivered. Doc
P. dissected the horse for educational reasons and then had the
roustabouts haul the remains to an incinerator.
Late. The camp dark. Two hours after closing. The family was
sleeping and I sat in the kitchen sink looking out through the
moon mist at the dark without my glasses. A scraping sound
from outside. A step. It was behind me on the other side of the
van. I slid to the floor, tiptoed to the door in bare feet, peeped
silently through. My breath froze – a movement near Arty’s
door. A tall figure moving there.
Assassin! I thought. In the instant it took me to get through
the door I dreamed a long dream of Arty’s gratitude at my
courageous self-sacrifice in saving him. I saw myself wrapped
in white, propped on pillows. Arty enters, white-faced and
shaken . . . That was about as far as I’d got by the time I locked
my arms around the thighs of the dark shape in Arty’s door-
way and clamped my teeth into a bulge of buttock. The thigh
flailed wildly and started to scream as I growled. Fingernails
243 12/01/2015 12:07  244
whacked and clawed at my head and scraped at my arms.
Breathless shrieks pumped out of the murderer’s throat and
vibrated through my teeth in adrenal heroics that lit my skull’s
interior with an epileptic torch.
The light over the door flashed on and shouts closed over
me. In relief at being rescued before I broke, though wonder-
ing if I would make such a sympathetic figure to Arty if I
wasn’t in traction, I released my aching grip. Cloth pulled out
of my teeth as big arms lifted and held me against a warm
chest and a deep voice cracked, ‘Jeez, Miss Oly!’
A piccolo hysteria behind me in the doorway. Then Arty’s
sympathetic voice, ‘Are you O.K.? Come in here and let me
look.’ My heart turned to steaming oatmeal as I wriggled
around to see his dear worried face and the corpse of the ter-
rorist I had foiled.
Arty wasn’t talking to me. He was in his chair just inside the
door, leaning anxiously to examine a jagged rip in the black
satin rump of a tall young norm woman whose sobbing face
was hidden by a straight fall of blond hair.
‘Killer!’ I bellowed, struggling to break out of the blue-
sleeved arms of the guard who held me. ‘She was breaking into
your place, Arty!’
The big chest against my fists rumbled, ‘Jeez, Miss Oly!’ and
Arty’s chilly white face snapped an impatient look toward me.
His wide lips stretched back over his angry teeth as he
whipped out, ‘A guest. An invited guest simply ringing my
doorbell!’ Then, gesturing the tall, slim girl inside, he backed
his chair away from the door.
The guard in embarrassment at my rigid body in his arms,
was jabbering, ‘Sorry, Arty. I brought the lady to your ramp,
244 12/01/2015 12:07  245
like always, and I’d just got to the other end of the van when
the ruckus started.’
‘Take Oly back to her door, Joe. Goodnight.’ The door
slammed shut.
‘Jeez, Miss Oly,’ said my guard. He turned, opened the
door to the family van, put me down just inside, and closed
the door on my ice-struck face. I crawled into my cupboard
and tried to swallow my tongue or hold my breath long
enough to die. I hoped they might give me a half-pint urn
and bolt me onto the hood of the generator truck behind
Grandpa.
Chick would come to rest his cheek on my cool metal when
he was sad. Mama would polish me every morning before she
went to the Chute and blink away tears remembering my
sweet smile. Then it occurred to me that they might put me in
the Chute in the biggest jar of all and I’d float naked in
formaldehyde and the twins would bicker over who had to
shine my jar. I gave up on dying and went over to blubbering
into my blanket instead – imagining razor-slash scenarios of
what Arty was doing with the norm girl and what an asshole
I was. I went on blubbering until I slept.
I kept the norm girl at Arty’s door to myself. Arty wouldn’t
talk about it. He liked secrets. Without a good reason, Arty
wouldn’t admit that he ate or slept. Information was a mar-
ketable commodity to Arty. The guard may have gossiped but
he would try to keep Papa from hearing about it. Private
arrangements with Mr. Arty didn’t get to Al if a man wanted
to keep his job.
I hung on to it – my embarrassment at being an idiot and
245 12/01/2015 12:07  246
my shame at being a patsy. Idiot for jumping a guest while in
the throes of melodramatic fancy, patsy for being pulped by
pain at Arty’s involvement with a girl, and a norm at that.
I crept out of my cupboard and peeped through the slats of
the louvered window in our door. I couldn’t see much, but sev-
eral nights of quivering in my flannel nightie in the dark
proved it wasn’t an isolated incident.
The girl I’d tackled was a stranger, not part of the show. I
heard and saw Arty’s door open and blurred figures moving
into the light several times before I recognized that it was
always a different girl.
I crawled into my blankets smiling, slept well for the first
time in days, woke as cheery as a pinhead, went joking and
grinning around all day. Arty wasn’t having a love affair. He
was just ‘fucking around,’ as the redheads called it. What had
been a blowtorch blackening my brain with sick, helpless jeal-
ousy was now just useful information. A love affair would
have shut me out. This gave me an opening. I could tease Arty
in private. Keeping mum to everybody else would be evidence
of my discretion and encourage him to have confidence in me.
If a trickle of puke still riled my throat at the thought of Arty
with the long-limbed norms, it was at least tolerable. I needed
all the ammo I could get.
Zephir McGurk was a do-it-yourself electrician from the same
independent school of thought that spawned Papa’s medical
hobby. McGurk made do. He read journals and magazines and
catalogues from supply houses to feed his ingenuity, but he was
an innovator. Even if a thing had been invented and perfected
thirty years before, McGurk was inclined to build his own
246 12/01/2015 12:07  247
rather than buy the gimmick from somebody else. McGurk was
valuable. His pay was minimal cash and what Arty called the
‘overflow’ of curious females.
He slept in the back of the old but well-kept safari car. He
did his work in the utility trailer that housed the power tools
and spare parts. He set up a compact and efficient workshop.
If he wasn’t in the workshop he was asleep or in Arty’s show
tent. He never socialized in the midway or dropped in on any
other act. Zephir was a focused man. Arty was his apple. Arty
was the work he’d been given to do.
‘It would be good to have some way to spell out my mes-
sages in lights,’ Arty might say.
‘Maybe,’ McGurk would say slowly, his head already tum-
bling possibilities.
Arty went to visit him in the workshop. This flattered
McGurk deeply. If Arty was in an energetic mood he’d have
me strap him into one of his treads and would lead the way to
the workshop with me trailing. He’d go up the step and climb
up on the workbench and talk companionably with McGurk.
Other times he’d stay in his chair and sit outside the door
with McGurk perched on the step to talk. McGurk had
stowed his prosthetic legs in a trunk. He’d gone over to fancy
strap-on pads on his thigh stumps. He wore blue or brown
leather for his workaday stumps, but he got a pair made of iri-
descent green satin, embroidered with silver vines, for wearing
in the control booth at the top of the bleachers where he
worked the sound-and-light board for Arty’s show.
It was McGurk who invented Arty’s speaking tube – a plas-
tic form that fitted over Arty’s nose and mouth. When Arty
tongued the button inside, a rush of air expelled the water
247 12/01/2015 12:07  248
from the face mask so Arty could breathe and talk into the
mask at the same time. The thing stuck up against the front
plate of the tank on a long gooseneck that linked it to a gaudy
(but phony) console in the bottom of the tank. It actually
hooked into the sound system. Arty talking under water was
an astonishing improvement over propping his chin on the top
of the tank to rap into the microphone. The crowd loved it.
When McGurk built the button receiver that hid in Arty’s
ear and let him hear the sound system, the crowd, and mes-
sages from McGurk in the control booth, Arty offered the
electrician his own van and a good raise. McGurk shook his
tidy head and politely turned it all down. ‘I’ve got my routine
set,’ he said. He went on sleeping in his station wagon.
McGurk cooked for himself. He was a fussy vegetarian. He
was roasting carrots in an oven in the workshop the day
he came up with what we later called ‘The Singing Buttock.’
He was peering through the oven window at the sliced carrots
in a dish. ‘What if,’ he asked, ‘every board in the bleachers
was wired for sound?’
Arty was lolling on top of the workbench looking at a sheet
of McGurk’s doodles for a new colored-light plan. He rolled
back his head and squinted at McGurk’s broad shoulders.
McGurk with his back to you was an imposing specimen even
with his shirt on. The oven pinged and he tooked the dish out
with a mitt.
‘Why?’ Arty wanted to know. McGurk dropped the mitt
beside the carrots and leaned his big brown elbows on the
workbench. He had his private knife and fork wheeling
through the carrots and whipping quick chunks of steaming
root into his mouth. He always ate standing up. Three bites
248 12/01/2015 12:07  249
went through methodical milling and swallowing before he
finally let his eyes drift up to Arty.
‘Sound is physical. I’ve been watching Miss Oly . . . ’ He
nodded to where I perched on his work stool. ‘Her ticket talk-
ing got me thinking. Sounds is a vibration. It carries through
matter. When you hear, it’s not just with your ears. A sound
actually affects every cell of your body, making it vibrate and
pass that vibration to all your other cells. That’s why they say
a sound if “piercing” or a scream “goes right through you.” It
does. It actually does.’ He stopped with his fork in midair and
looked at Arty. Arty was watching him, waiting. Arty didn’t
say anything. McGurk sighed and took a piece of carrot from
the fork and chewed it. I watched it go down his thick-muscled
gullet.
‘I was thinking,’ McGurk said, finally, ‘that you use your
voice real well. I was thinking, what if your voice wasn’t just
coming at ’em from the air but was vibrating up from the soles
of their feet and through their asses up their spines. I was
thinking what it would be like if they felt what you had to say
because the boards they were standing and sitting on were
wired to carry that vibration of your voice.’
Arty’s eyes were almost bulging, looking at McGurk. His
face was frozen for a long instant and then it folded into a
smile and then broke at the mouth and Arty’s whole body
shook toward his mouth, laughing.
‘I love it!’ he howled. ‘I love it!’
The bleachers are empty and singing around me. Arty is chant-
ing in the boards. I sit on the fifth tier and stare straight at the
tank, at Arty, his mouth and nose in the black cup of the
249 12/01/2015 12:07  250
speaking tube. Wires are taped to my wrists and to the insides
of my knees and to my hump, next to the spine. They lead up
to the control booth, where Zephir McGurk is measuring my
physical responses to the sound that he has wired to feed
through every board in the bleachers.
Arty’s body floats straight out from the speaking tube, glint-
ing mysteriously in the bright green water.
‘Peace,’ says Arty, and the speakers above the tank lift his
voice to the canvas peak of the tent roof. The bottoms of my
feet say ‘Peace,’ and the padded bones of my pelvis whisper
‘Peace’ to my bowels. A shiver passes upward into my stom-
ach, and my spine feels ‘Peace’ like fear curling upward to my
skull with my shoulder blades flinching around it.
‘As I am!’ shouts Arty, and my heart nearly stops with the
shock of the sound in my body.
Arty pulls away from the face cup and wriggles toward the
surface. McGurk is hopping down the steps from the control
booth. He is beside me now. Only slightly taller than me on his
stumps, he is watching the wires as he rips the tape off my skin.
Arty’s head appears on the rim of the tank, grinning at us.
His face is pale and doesn’t look as though it’s connected to his
body, which is golden, with slowly flexing flippers gleaming
through the glass.
‘That seemed a lot better!’ chirps Arty. ‘That flat zone
makes it even more effective!’
‘Yes.’ McGurk holds the ends of all the wires together in
one hand like the leashes to a pack of dogs. He examines the
sheet of readout graph in his hand. ‘Yes. With just the upper
and lower register you can make them dance to whatever tune
you like.’
250 12/01/2015 12:07  251
14
The Pen Pal
It was Earlville, on the Gulf of Mexico. One hundred windless,
muggy degrees. Mosquitoes drowned in your neck creases. The
only industry in town was the federal penitentiary. The mid way
was jammed and the show tents bulged with sweating, stink-
ing, bad-tempered drawls. It got dark but it didn’t cool off.
The fat woman surfaced at Arty’s last, hottest show for the
day. She was young but her colorless hair was scraggled up
into tight separate curls with so much scalp between them that
she looked old and balding. She was crying as she stood up on
the fifth tier of the bleachers and pushed her clasped hands out
toward the tank where Arty was deep in his pitch.
‘You, darling,’ Arty said, and the feel of ‘darling’ rose up
through her puffy ankles and through every buttock in the
bleachers. The crowd sighed. The fat woman sobbed.
‘You feel ugly, don’t you, sweetheart?’ and ‘ugly’ and ‘sweet-
heart’ thrummed the crowd, and they all gasped and she
wasn’t the only one nodding.
251 12/01/2015 12:07  252
‘You’ve tried everything, haven’t you?’ said the bright float-
ing spirit in the tank. ‘Everything,’ murmured the bones of the
people.
‘Pills, shots, hypnosis, diets, exercise. Everything. Because
you want to be beautiful?’
Arty was building it up now, winding them tight.
‘Because you think if you were beautiful, you would be
happy?’ He had the timing pat. Arty was a master of tone and
timing. I leaned on the last steel strut of the bleachers in the
aisle and smiled, though I’d seen him do it all my life.
‘Because people would love you if you were beautiful? And
if people loved you, you would be happy? Is it people loving
you that makes you happy?’
Now the pitch drops a full octave into the groin groan. I can
feel it even in the support poles. The asses on the seat boards
must be halfway to orgasm.
‘Or is it people not loving you that makes you unhappy? If
they don’t love you it’s because there’s something wrong with
you. If they love you then it must mean you’re all right. You
poor baby. Poor, poor baby.’
The place was full of poor babies. They all sighed with
tender sympathy for themselves. The fat woman’s nose ran.
She opened her mouth and cried, ‘Hoooh! Hoooh! Hoooh!’
Now Arty was gentle and low as a train a mile off in the
night.
‘You just want to know that you’re all right. You just want
to feel all right.’
And now he dives into the sneer. Arty’s sneer could flay a
rhino.
‘That’s all you need other people’s love for!’
252 12/01/2015 12:07  253
The crowd is shocked into stillness. Arty grabs their throats
while they’re down and starts pumping the tempo.
‘So, let’s get the truth here! You don’t want to stop eating!
You love to eat! You don’t want to be thin! You don’t want to
be beautiful! You don’t want people to love you! All you really
want is to know that you’re all right! That’s what can give you
peace!
‘If I had arms and legs and hair like everybody else, do you
think I’d be happy? NO! I would not! Because then I’d worry
did somebody love me! I’d have to look outside myself to find
out what to think of myself!
‘And you! You aren’t ever going to look like a fashion
queen! Does that mean you have to be miserable all your life?
Does it?
‘Can you be happy with the movies and the ads and the
clothes in the stores and the doctors and the eyes as you walk
down the street all telling you there is something wrong with
you? No. You can’t. You cannot be happy. Because, you poor
darling baby, you believe them . . . Now, girl, I want you to
look at me and tell me, what do you want?’
Arty expected her to stay tongue-tied and blubbering so he
could say the next line. That’s the way it always worked. But
this fat woman was so used to blubbering that it didn’t slow
her down. She opened her mouth wide and, though I’ve never
really stopped hating her for it, I have to admit she was just
saying what all the rest of the damp, wheezing crowd was
thinking. She screamed, ‘I want to be like you are!’
Arty stopped dead still. His flippers froze and he began to
sink slowly with his face pressed into the speaking mask and
his eyes close to the glass staring out. There was sobbing in the
253 12/01/2015 12:07  254
crowd. Soft voices murmured, ‘Yes, yes.’ Arty was silent for far
too long. Had he had a stroke? Was it a cramp? I started for-
ward, ready to run around behind the tank and up the ladder,
then his voice came.
‘Yes,’ he said. ‘Yes, that’s what you want.’ And I could hear
his breath go in, Arty’s breath. Arty could control a mike and
he never breathed so you could hear it.
‘And that’s what I want for you.’
He didn’t go on with his usual talk. He said that he’d have
to think how to give this gift to her. He said they should all
come back the next day – though he knew few of them
would – because he would have something to say to them.
McGurk didn’t know what to do with the lights. He was
flickering a rainbow that made Arty almost invisible in the
water. Finally Arty himself hit the switch that blacked out the
tank.
The crowd started to trickle away as I ran to the back of the
tank. Arty was already out on his platform and rolling in his
towel.
‘Arty, what’s wrong?’ I whispered as I scrambled up the
ladder.
‘Not a thing,’ he said. His face popped out of the towel and
he grinned hugely, excited.
‘Let’s get over to the shower quick. I want to see Doc P.
right away.’
The woman who wanted to be like Arty came back the next
day. The crew had just finished sweeping down the bleachers
in Arty’s tent and were raking the sawdust. The first show had
done as usual and it was an hour until the last show began.
254 12/01/2015 12:07  255
I was next door in the ticket booth of the twins’ tent snag-
ging the take out of the till drawer into a bag, and punching in
totals. A finger tapped the SOLD OUT sign in the barrel
window in front of me.
‘All sold out!’ I hollered, and locked the cash bag.
‘There’s a dame in Arty’s tent!’ It was the crew foreman,
shrugging at me. I took the cash bag and went with him.
She was sitting up on the fifth tier, where she’d sat before, but
now she was the only one. The heat in the tent was heavy and
dead. She had a shopping bag beside her and she looked ready
to collapse. Her face was dark red. Her eyes were blood-spatter
over yellow. She had a little face set into a big pillow of a head,
and her arms and legs stuck out of a dress that would have
been loose on a linebacker but looked like cheap upholstery on
her. She was just sitting, staring at the unlit tank, listening to the
gurgle of the pump that aerated and filtered the water.
I climbed up toward her. She looked at me, got a ripple of
fear on her face, and grabbed at her shopping bag.
‘Hi,’ I said. She clutched her bag and nodded, warily. She
expected to be chased. I expected to chase her. ‘I work with
this show, can I help you?’ I stood still at the end of the tier
and didn’t go any closer. She flapped her jaws and then came
out with a tiny shrill voice.
‘I’m just waiting for the Aqua Man. I’m going to pay but
there wasn’t anybody to sell tickets. I’ll pay when the ticket
booth opens.’
Her eyes ran over me cautiously. I was wearing one of the
blue sailor dresses that Lil made for me. The blue matched the
lenses of my sunglasses. I wasn’t wearing a cap so the woman’s
eyes spent a lot of time on my bare skull.
255 12/01/2015 12:07  256
‘I’ll sell you a ticket right now so you won’t have to worry
about it,’ I offered, helpfully. I had a roll of tickets in my
pocket, and I needed to make sure she wasn’t going to pull an
automatic out of her shopping bag and perforate Arty. She
fumbled out money.
‘You were here yesterday, weren’t you?’ I asked.
‘He spoke to me,’ she said, counting out coins. ‘He said to
come back. He would help me.’
I sat down next to her and watched the heat rash on the
insides of her elbows and the backs of her knees and in the
folds of her chins as she talked. She had got herself into a ter-
rible jam, she said, and it had made her realize . . . She was
from Warren, Ohio, and her mother was a schoolteacher but
had died last year. She took a photo album out of the shopping
bag and showed me a picture of a fat old woman.
‘What kind of a jam are you in?’ I pushed. If she had stran-
gled her old mother I was going to have her escorted to the
gate, heat rash and all.
‘It’s a man,’ she said coyly. I couldn’t help looking at her
with suspicion. She bubbled into tears right away. I looked at
the photo album in her lap. She had drawn pink daisies on the
cover. I figured she was the type who would doodle LOVE in
big, loopy letters and dot her i’s with hearts. Her name was
Alma Witherspoon. She was twenty-two riding hard on fifty-
five. It seems she was a pen pal. She’d always been a pen pal.
Seems she’d got the address of a twenty-to-life bank blaster a
year or so before. He was up the road in the Earlville Federal
Pen. She’d sent him a photo of one of the cheerleaders in her
high school. After her mother died she moved down here so
she could send him fresh cakes and cookies.
256 12/01/2015 12:07  257
‘We’re in love,’ she said. It sounded like L♥VE. ‘He wants
to marry me!’ she moaned. ‘And the warden has agreed! But
I thought we’d do it by telephone and now the warden says I
have to go out there and do it in his office and Gregory will see
how I really look!’ So she needed to see the Aqua Man. She
didn’t know anybody in this town. She had no relatives left to
turn to. Her heat rash looked contagious. I gave her a show
ticket and got away from her. ‘You just wait here for the show.
Nobody will bother you.’
I took the cash bag to the safe and went over to help Arty
get ready. I told him about Alma Witherspoon while I greased
him. He lay on the massage bench and nodded. His eyes were
eager. He had a funny half smile the whole time.
‘She’s probably been spinning whoppers to her pen pals for
years about being beautiful and popular.’
‘No relatives? No friends?’ he asked.
‘So she says.’
‘Good,’ grinned Arty. He stretched and rolled his back
under my kneading fingers.
I was doing my talk in front of the twins’ tent. ‘Siamese beau-
ties linked in harmonious perpetuity . . . ’ I always had a great
time with ‘perpetuity’ – it was a word you could play like a
flute, rolling it up a full octave and whistling ‘Dixie’ on that
last syllable. The crowd was pretty good and most of them
were already inside; the last twenty were shuffling in line for
tickets.
That’s when I saw Alma Witherspoon go by with two of the
redheads who helped out in Arty’s tent. The tall women beside
her made Alma look even wider. She rolled along with her
257 12/01/2015 12:07  258
shopping bags and her purse and her photo album all folded
sweatily into different rash-angry creases of her dreary body.
Alma couldn’t have made a penny as a pro. She didn’t weigh
as much as a single leg of ‘Eleven Hundred Pound Jocko!’ or
‘Pedrita the Plump!’ but she wasn’t healthy. Jocko and Pedrita
were the proudest people who’d ever worked for the show,
according to Papa. Alma Witherspoon had the pride of a
squashed possum.
‘ . . . Twin musicians! Twin miracles!’ I rolled on, watching
the redheads gently guide the wobbly Alma up the ramp to the
shower van parked behind the Games of Chance. She put her
foot on the top and heaved lopsidedly upward as the door
opened. I could see the startled jerk of Alma’s wispy head as
she saw the staunch white-clad figure in the doorway. Dr.
Phyllis nodded, her white mask flashing glare into her thick
glasses, her white glove lifted, beckoning. Alma Witherspoon
stepped into the shower.
‘There is no shock. There is no danger of infection. Young
Fortunato’s techniques eliminate that entirely.’
Dr. Phyllis watched Arty as she talked; her eyes swiveled
behind her pool-deep lenses, probing for an argument that
would change his mind.
Arty was looking through the glass window at the sterile
infirmary where Alma Witherspoon lay sleeping, with Chick
perched beside her on a three-legged stool. Chick was wrapped
in one of Dr. P.’s white coats with the sleeves rolled up. His
glowing face was bent toward the pillow. His eyes grazed lov-
ingly over the sodden grey folds of Alma’s cheek and chins.
‘Did you look at that chart I gave you? The healing rate on
258 12/01/2015 12:07  259
that spiral fracture was triple the normal expectancy for a
patient that age . . . Arturo? Are you able to comprehend what
I am conveying?’ Dr. P.’s thin perfect diction entered the ear in
a surgical manner. Arty, who had been absorbed in his view of
the lumpy sheets and the doughy mound on the pillow, turned
to her calmly.
‘Doc, I know you can cut her down all at once. I know it
would be more efficient. But I want her to have a lot of
chances to change her mind.’ He turned to look through the
window again. He relaxed against the back of the wheelchair.
His face was easy as he looked at the creature asleep in the
next room. His mouth looked soft. There was a sleepy pleas-
ure about him, almost peaceful, almost warm. There was,
oddly, a look of Chick on Arty’s face. Arty was happy. He was
deeply happy and it was, in some way I didn’t grasp, all
because of moldy Alma Witherspoon having had all her toes
cut off and then when she’d recovered from that, having
begged for the privilege of having her feet and legs nipped
away as well.
Dr. P. and Chick kept Alma in the infirmary. Arty went fre-
quently to park his chair in the observation room at one end
and sit staring through the glass at her bandaged body lying on
the second bed from the end.
Once a week, on Sunday mornings, Arty would flick on the
intercom and watch Alma’s face through the glass as his voice
pumped at her from the speakers. She was always overjoyed to
hear him. She called him ‘Aqua Man’ and said she was fine
and when could she have more of herself taken away? ‘I can’t
tell you what it means to me each time they clean a little more
259 12/01/2015 12:07  260
away, even a little toe. Once it’s gone I feel what a weight of
rot it was for me. Oh, Aqua Man, you are so kind to me. I
thank the stars in heaven for leading me to you . . . ’ and so on
like that. She’d blubber away, a pen pal to the core. Her mes-
sage was always How soon would they take her feet off?
When would they take her hands? Could she, by a special dis-
pensation from His Wateriness, skip the feet and have Doc P.
just take off her whole legs one at a time? They were such a
burden to her and she was in such a hurry to be like HIM .
Arty didn’t talk about it but I could see it meant a lot to
him. The whole thing had me fuddled. Why should this Alma
make him happy? He’d never been that way about any of his
visiting night girls – at least not by the time I brought in his
breakfast the next morning. He was working harder than
ever, reading more, vomiting nervously before each show –
‘To clear my head,’ he claimed. He schemed and planned with
McGurk for hours every morning, playing with lights and
sound. But I’d never seen him smile the smiles he smiled in
those days, great soft openings of his face with no biting edges
at the eyes.
We were up in Michigan when Alma started testifying. She
was down to her nubs by then. Her legs were gone from the
hip and her arms ended at the elbow. She looked better. Her
front still flopped but she’d been eating Dr. P.’s Vegetarian
Nutri-Prescription for months. Her skin had some tone and
she’d dropped a few chins along with her limbs. More of her
face was visible and her wispy hair seemed to have less
expanse to drift away from. She was chipper, and she proved
that ‘feeling good’ about herself, as she called it, didn’t make
260 12/01/2015 12:07  261
her any less irritating than being pathetic. There was a differ-
ence, though. Where she had been wetly repellent she was now
obnoxious.
‘I should say she might feel good about herself, the great lazy
lump,’ said Lil. ‘Lying up there being fed and waited on. When
does my Chick get to play? A child his age needs frolic and
silliness, not mooning about spooning green gruel into that
blob and worrying over her every minute for fear she might
feel a twinge of pain! All my other children had time to play
even though they worked every day.’
I had nothing to do with Alma. To my recollection I never
spoke to her directly after the first time in Arty’s tent. But I
watched her. To give them both credit, Alma was terrified of
Doc P. and said nothing but yes’m and no’m whenever the
good doc was around. And Alma worshiped Chick. But Chick
was her painkiller so I figured her love for him had the same
virtuous weight as an addict’s for his drug.
Alma’s testimony started in the Michigan factory towns.
The redheads would wheel her out onto the stage beside the
tank before Arty made his appearance. Alma’s twittering bat
voice fed down through a button mike on her white robe and
McGurk bled a little timbre in before he shot it out through
the speakers.
‘My name is Alma Witherspoon,’ she’d begin, ‘and I just
want to take one minute to tell you all about a wonderful
thing that happened to me . . . ’
The rodent squeak chittered in her chest and her stump
arms waved in the white spotlight and the bright green tank
261 12/01/2015 12:07  262
gurgled, huge, beside her on the dark stage. The funny thing
was that it worked. By the time Arty exploded in a rush of
bubbles from the floor of the tank, the folks in the stands were
ready for him, dry-mouthed and open. And those certain few
in the bleachers, those stone-eyed kettles boiling with secret
pain, received her message. Those who had been waiting
finally found a place to go.
That’s the way it began. It was Alma ‘Pen Pal’ Witherspoon
who actually founded what came to be known as ‘Arturism’ or
the ‘Arturan Cult.’
There were just a few converts at first, but Alma took over
the process of organizing with a smug zest that made me want
to kick her.
She was all humility and worship to Arty – a kind of ‘Kiss
the Ground on which Your Blessed Brown Balls Drag’ smarmi-
ness. But with the converts she reigned as a high priestess,
prophet, and mega-bitch. She originated the concept of ‘Artier
than Thou.’ She ordered, organized, and patronized. The red-
heads, who had to wait on her and wheel her around in a
replica of Arty’s chair, hated her. Soon there were enough of
the ‘Admitted’ to give Alma a full-time staff. The redheads
went thankfully back to balloon games, popcorn, and ticket
sales.
Not that Arty was ever less than In Charge. Though he
appeared only in his tank and did no trivial fraternizing, he
knew everything. Most likely the whole thing in all its details
was Arty’s invention. He gave orders to Alma by intercom.
She sat in her commandeered trailer office chirping earnestly
into the box on her desk and listening reverently to replies. Her
262 12/01/2015 12:07  263
method of passing orders on to the lesser members was as
snooty as that of any conveyor from on high.
She set Arturism up like a traveling fat farm for nuns.
Though she herself had lucked onto Arty while flat broke, all
who came after paid what she called a ‘dowry.’ Arty said, in
private, that the scumbags were required to fork over every-
thing they had in the world, and, if it wasn’t enough, they
could go home and get their ears pierced or their peckers cir-
cumcised and see what that did for them.
The thing grew. Arty’s fans – or the ‘Admitted,’ as Alma
insisted on calling them – began to trail after the show in cars
and vans and trailers of their own. From a half-dozen simple
characters wandering the midway with white bandages where
fingers or toes had been, there grew a ragtag horde camped
next to the show everyplace we stopped. Within three years the
caravan would string out for a hundred miles behind us when
we moved.
Papa hired more guards and had the Binewski vans wired
for security. After a month of phoning and looking and asking,
Papa bought the biggest tent any of us had ever seen and set it
up around Arty’s stage-truck.
Dr. P. got a big new surgery truck with a self-contained
generator. Two of the big trailers were converted to post-
operative recovery wards. Chick was with Dr. Phyllis from
early morning until supper every day. He was getting thinner
and he fell asleep at the table leaning on Mama night after
night.
‘When does he play?’ she would ask, her eyes blinking at the
air directly in front of her.
263 12/01/2015 12:07  264
Papa talked to Arty and Arty passed the word to Doc P.
Dr. Phyllis didn’t like it, but two hours each day, one after
breakfast and another before supper, Chick was ordered to
play where Mama could see him. She started reading fairy tales
to him during the morning hour. In the afternoon he dutifully
pushed toy cars around the floor of the family van, making
motor noises, so Mama could hear him as she made supper.
Having established the chain of command, having petrified
two dozen finger-and-toe novices into doing all the paperwork,
Alma shed her left arm to the shoulder. She spent hours croon-
ing to herself on her infirmary bed with the screen drawn
around her for privacy. Her voice grew frail and she stopped
testifying.
She was replaced immediately. Dozens clamored for a
chance to testify at Arty’s shows. There were thousands wait-
ing, willing to pay, for the right to see and listen.
I was walking by when Dr. P. walked out of her big new sur-
gery truck and heaved the plastic bag containing Alma’s last
flabby upper arm into an ice chest for Horst to dispose of. She
dusted her white gloves against each other and nodded to me.
‘Well, that’s finished,’ she announced through her mask. ‘It
took a year and a half. I could have done the whole job in
three hours.’
After a while, Alma wasn’t around anymore. Arty laughed
when I asked about her. ‘She’s retired,’ he said. ‘She’s gone to
the old Arturans’ home to rest in peace.’ I thought he meant
she was dead.
264 12/01/2015 12:07  265
15
Press
As their seventeenth birthday rolled past, the twins were
fogged in by some musty hormonal mist. They were goofy,
aloof, and up to something. Their bickering graduated from
intermittent to constant, but the dignity that they felt appro-
priate to full-fledged bleeders dictated that the running
argument be carried on in whispers.
The twin’s piano teacher, whom Lil had hired by mail, was
the greasy Jonathan Tomaini, with his one shiny-assed suit and
two pairs of slightly mismatched socks. He took frequent
opportunities to explain how temporary this ‘post’ was for him
and how thrillingly adventurous it was for a concert performer
and graduate of fine New York music academies, such as him-
self, to doss down on a cot in a trailer shared with twelve
sweaty, spitting, cursing, chortling roustabouts who viewed him
as one rung lower than last night’s beer farts. He gushed at how
brilliantly gifted the twins were – ‘a privilege to spend this brief
hiatus in my career molding and influencing such talent.’
265 12/01/2015 12:07  266
The twins claimed – Elly loudly and Iphy with demure
embarrassment – that Tomaini never bathed, only washing his
hands up to the wrist and his face and neck as far down as his
collar. He was, they said, no fun to share a piano stool with.
He had things to teach them, though, and they endured the
piano stool for hours every day.
Mama was slipping away from us. Her pill intake was up and
her body was changing. Large bones came close to the surface
as her woman-softness withered. Her eyes were giving her
trouble, the focus softening and shortening. Her walk had
changed from a melodic flirt to a gaunt, uncertain lurching
with her hands extended in front of her, touching. She rattled
in endless detail about our various infancies. She forgot things.
She left jobs half done and didn’t notice when someone else
finished them for her. She cried easily and occasionally with-
out knowing she was doing it. She slept.
Papa had taken to antacid tablets for his stomach. He car-
ried half-consumed rolls in every pocket and chewed them
constantly. He dithered for eighteen hours out of every twenty-
four trying to lash his small winter crew into dealing with the
flush of business brought on by Arty’s increasingly specialized
popularity. The veins in his forehead threatened a stroke while
he supervised the production of the expensive and classy ‘Ask
Arturo’ poster series. He was happy, though. The work rush
let him forget that he wasn’t the boss anymore.
New people kept cropping up and latching on. We were a
road show and we lived with the ebb and trickle of faces who
appeared, hired on, stayed for a few thousand miles and then,
one day, were gone. We Binewskis kept to ourselves. Only the
266 12/01/2015 12:07  267
family stayed the same. Hanging out with the swallower’s kids
or making friends with the palm reader’s daughter always
ended in separation and forgetfulness. We were easy with
strangers but never close.
Arty’s growing flock, however, was different. I dreamed one
night that Arty cried them into the world. They came out of
his eyes as a green liquid that dripped to the ground making
puddles. The puddles thickened and jelled into bodies that got
up and hung around Arty.
But Dr. P. and the advance man and McGurk, and later
Sanderson and the Bag Man and the nebbishes and simps who
mooned and crooned around him, were all there because of
Arty, no matter what other pretext they might claim. They all
belonged to him.
The occasional television crews, doing thirty-second ‘Day at
the Carnival’ bits for the evening news, took a while to tumble
to what was going on in the center tent. An hour after the first
broadcast of a breathless on-the-spot reporter describing band-
aged stumps in a wheelchair, the newspaper people started
popping up.
After a few months reporters drove out to meet us on the
road. Squads with cameras and notebooks and tape recorders
waited for us on every new site as we tooled in and parked. A
few towns canceled our licenses before we even arrived. The
indignant slams just made Arty smile. ‘Those who want to
know,’ he shrugged, ‘will still get the message.’
It wasn’t until one of the redheads brought a copy of Now
to Arty’s door one morning that we realized one of the loiter-
ers in the journalistic pack was from that national news
267 12/01/2015 12:07  268
magazine. The guy in the lean tweeds had been puttering
around the midway for weeks. The ticket peddlers all knew
him because he’d flash his photo ID card and mutter, ‘Press,’
trying to slip into the shows without paying. ‘Press your
pants,’ the redheads would say – a stock Binewski reply – and
he’d laugh and pay up.
The Now story demonstrated his intentions clearly. The fur -
chested Norval Sanderson, with his cynic’s eye, bourbon voice,
and discreet tailoring, was with us so he could expose the ‘ruth-
less egotism that was exploiting the nation’s psychic undertow.’
‘Arturism was founded,’ wrote Sanderson, ‘on the greed and
spite of a transcendental maggot named Arturo Binewski, who
used his own genetic defects and the weakness of the unem-
ployed and illiterate to create an insanely self-destructive
following that fed his maniacal ego . . . ’
Within days, Arty, the clever boy, had turned the attack to
his own purposes by distributing ninety-second tapes to every
network proclaiming that he was, indeed, the Transcendental
Maggot, and that his power to thrive in the decaying frenzy of
the planet was available to all those who were willing to accept
it.
Norval Sanderson had covered wars, treaties, executions,
and inaugurations for two decades. He was sharp and he
lacked awe for anything, from earthquakes to heads of state.
He was clever, He spent days lounging coolly in the corners of
Arty’s life, and he published three explosively controversial
interviews with Arty in as many weeks. Arty liked him.
What now remains of Sanderson’s old spiral-bound note-
books, his collection of news clippings, and the transcripts of
his interviews with the people of Binewski’s Fabulon is
268 12/01/2015 12:07  269
wrapped in black plastic and locked in the trunk in my closet.
I take it all out when I want to think back. His fast, meticulous
script is fading from black to grey, and the paper is brittle in
my hands, but I can still hear his lazy drawl with its built-in
needle.
From the notes of Norval Sanderson:
. . . Suspected earlier that Arturo was being manipulated by
someone, probably the father, Al Binewski. I saw Arty as a
tool for some functional ‘norm’ who was raking in the cash
from the dowries. Spent three hours with Arty today and
completely revised my opinion. Arty is in complete control
of the cult, of the carnival of his parents, and apparently of
his sisters and brother – though there may be some small
spirit of resistance in the twins.
Arty is sporadically self-educated with wide lacunae in
his information. National and international politics are out-
side his experience and reading. Municipal power
relationships, however, are familiar tools to him. He has no
real grasp of history – seems to have picked up drifts from
his reading – but he is a gifted analyst of personality and
motivation, and a complete manipulator. His knowledge of
science is primitive. He relies on specialists in his staff to
provide him with effective lighting, sound technology, etc.
He is a skilled speaker on a one-to-one level as well as in
the mass-rhetoric situation of his performances. He has a
sharp awareness of personal problems in others . . . pro-
fesses no ethic or morality except avoidance of pain. Says
his awareness is such that he feels the pain of others and is
269 12/01/2015 12:07  270
therefore required to alleviate it by offering the sanctuary
of Arturism. Obvious horseshit.
His power seems to come from a combination of tech-
niques and personality traits. He seems to have no sympathy
for anyone, but total empathy. He is enormously self-
centred, proud, vain, disdainful of all who lack the good
fortune to be him. This is so evident and so oddly convinc-
ing (one finds oneself thinking/agreeing that, yes, Arty is a
special person and can’t be judged by normal criteria) that
when he turns his interest on an individual (on me) the
object (me) suddenly feels elevated to his level (as in – yeah,
me and Arty are too special and unique to be judged, etc.).
Just when you feel despicable, and that Arty’s disdain is
too great a burden to endure, he offers you the option of
becoming his peer. . . .
June 14:
Ticket count 11,724 for this show. Bleachers packed to the
top of the tent. Arty in tremendous form – his voice boom-
ing through your very bones:
‘I want you to be like I am! I want you to become what
I am! I want you to enjoy the fearlessness that I have! The
courage that I have! And the compassion that I have! The
love that I have! The all-encompassing mercy that I am!’
‘The ‘yes’ sighs up from the crowd like a night wind and
I myself nearly weep at being surrounded by pain. I become
convinced, for an hour, that Arty is not injuring them but is
allowing them to acknowledge the pain in their lives in
order to escape from it. A man who had to be a Certified
Public Accountant on my left – a big self-contained man in
270 12/01/2015 12:07  271
a decent suit and well-groomed beard. The wedding ring
glinted on his fingers as his hands gripped his knees. He
didn’t shout when the others did. He was silent, focused on
the tank and the venomous worm in it. During the ‘As I am’
chorus he was frozen so rigidly that I glanced at his face. He
was biting his lip and staring, unblinking, at the pale
squirming thing down there in the green-lit water. He didn’t
move. But when I looked again, a trickle of blood was still
caught in his teeth. There was a rollicking grandmother on
my right, wailing and whomping throughout. Her easy tears
didn’t touch me at all. It was this thick-wallet with his
gleaming well-kept air who shook me up.
For hours afterward, wandering through the crowds in
the midway, walking in the Admitted encampment, I am
swept by the idea, almost believe that having all my limbs
amputated will actually free me from the furious scourge of
my days. The midway finally shut down at midnight and I
recovered a little more sobriety as the lights clicked off. In
the dark, at last, I went down the road a half mile to the
Roamers Rest Tavern and contemplated my momentary
conversion ruefully through the amber lens of Resa Inne’s
(proprietress) corrupt bourbon. I kept feeling a tremor in
my shins and thighs and spine, from the voice of that
ruinous tadpole. I kept feeling the heat of solid thighs
packed against me in that sweltering hour on the bleachers.
I had another pull at Mother Resa’s treacle comfort and
remembered the Vesuvius coverage ten years ago. We’d
goaded the pilot of the big press chopper into getting us the
goods. As we bucketed crazily in the hot drafts around the
crater and cleared the lip with a gut-chewing swoop, old Sid
271 12/01/2015 12:07  272
Lyman dropped his beloved camera and fell to his knees on
the steel deck. Praying. ‘Good Old’ Sid, who cracked
abysmal puns while shooting mass graves in Texas, while
clicking away at the mutilated children on Cyprus, and
while filming six years’ worth of intimate war footage –
jungle and desert. There was Sid, helpless as his previous
equipment skittered out through the open door of the chop-
per. All Sid could do, aside from what obviously happened
in his trousers, was gibber infant prayers as he stared out
into that roaring pit of boiling stone.
What bothers me is my inability to recall whether I
laughed at Sid. If I snickered then, over the crater, I’ve a
hunch I’ll pay for it. I asked the flatulent Resa for another
tug at Aphrodite’s bourbon teat and hoped, with absurd
urgency, that I’d had the sense to bite my lip over Vesuvius.
This sheaf of news clippings was stapled into Norval’s
notebook:
NIGHT OF CRIME
AP: Santa Rosa, California
A sudden crime wave broke
out in this coastal city last
night, with looting of one large
supermarket and three smaller
grocery stores. All the thefts
took place in the three hours
between 1 A . M . and 4 A . M ., and
Police Chief Warren Cosenti
reports that foodstuffs were the
only items taken.
Spokane, Washington.
Eight suspects were arrested
inside McAffrey’s Stop and
Shop at 114 West Main by offi-
cers answering a burglar alarm
from the convenience store at
2:30 A . M . The suspects, five
272 12/01/2015 12:07  273
males and three females, were
apprehended while loading
cardboard boxes with food-
stuffs from the shelves. All were
unarmed, dressed completely in
white, and refused to make any
statement to police. One man,
evidently a spokes man for the
group, handed police officers a
note reading, ‘We have all
taken vows of silence. Do what
you will.’
Reports that several, or per-
haps all, of the suspects are
missing one or more fingers
or toes have not yet been
confirmed.
Spokane, Washington
County
Coroner
Jeff
John son affirmed, in a press
conference this morning, that
all eight of the burglary sus-
pects who committed suicide
last Wednesday night in the city
detention cells took cyanide.
None of the suicide victims
has yet been identified, and
neither police nor Johnson will
comment on the rumors that all
of the victims were missing
digits from their hands or feet.
Velva, North Dakota:
Police responding to a bur-
glar alarm at 3 A . M . Monday
found the big plate-glass
window of the Velva Coop
supermarket shattered and
whole shelves emptied of goods
in what appears to be . . .
This headline was cut from the Hopkins, Minnesota, Clarion:
GROCERY WAREHOUSE RANSACKED
Police Suspect Carnival Link
On a handbill circulated among Arturans and carnival staff,
Norval Sanderson had underlined this passage:
273 12/01/2015 12:07  274
. . . To eliminate food shortages arising from the increased
number of the Blessed, our Beloved Arturo has established
a special kitchen truck and mess tent to serve three whole-
some meals per day to each and every one of his followers.
Novices who have not yet begun Shedding must obtain meal
cards from their group leaders. Guests and visitors will be
charged a nominal fee for meals . . .
I laughed when I found this among Norval’s notes. I remem-
ber the tizzy we were in when this handbill was written. I
suppose we weren’t far from Hopkins, Minnesota, because it
was the Hopkins cops who were snooping around.
I was helping Lily pin up the hem on a new satin coat for
Arty. We were in the kitchen of the van. Lily had her sewing
machine on the table in the dining booth and Arty was sitting
beside it on the table. I was chalking the hem and Lily had her
mouth full of pins when the door jerked open and the twins
stormed in with Chick.
‘Cops,’ they said. The twin’s faces had matching looks of
thrilled horror. Chick nodded gravely. ‘Papa’s angry. The cops
want to talk to Arty.’
Arty had been stretching up tall for his fitting and he sank
back on his hips and got a pin in his rump. ‘Rar!’ He jerked
forward. Elly giggled, Iphy reached for him, and I fell off the
bench. The radiophone buzzed and it was Al from the office.
Chick was right. Papa was very angry.
That was the first we heard of the marauding that Arty’s fol-
lowers had been up to. It seems they were hungry. A lot of
them didn’t have any money left after turning everything over
to Arty. Trailing around after him they had no way to earn
274 12/01/2015 12:07  275
any. But none of us had given any thought to how they would
all eat. Some of them had been sneaking meals with the show
crew but that infuriated the cooks. The midway staff would
beat them up or, at the least, throw them out if they suspected
who they were. The cooks had stuck up signs on the mess tent
saying, ‘Midway Staff ONLY !’
The cops arrested five novices that day and impounded the
old school bus that they lived in. Behind its white curtains
the bus was stacked with cases of canned goods intended for
the good people of Hopkins. The police kept us there for a
couple of days before they let us go.
Al hired two more cooks and some kitchen helpers, bought
another kitchen truck, and relegated a couple of old tents to
the followers for dining halls. He fumed, and Arty too was
angry at having to spend the money to feed them all. Norval
Sanderson took notes and collected clippings and asked
questions.
275 12/01/2015 12:07  276
16
The Fly Roper and
the Transcendental Maggot
Norval Sanderson was a curious man. He wanted to know
everything. When he had exhausted all the Binewskis for the
day, or was bored with the antics of the Admitted, he would
stroll into the midway and continue his casually relentless
examination of every event, phenomenon, skill, artifact, and
personality that caught his eye. He wasn’t pushy. He was as
patient and flexible as water on rock.
He was fascinated by popcorn machines and by the way
cotton candy was spun. He charmed the redheads with his
attentive interest in their uncountable chores and their extrav-
agantly fascinating life stories. He was intrigued by the engines
of the simp twisters and he plagued the mechanics with his
probing about the drive lines and exhaust systems of the
machines.
Sanderson engaged the customers in conversation and could
discover astounding details about the truckers, lawyers, pea
pickers, sea cooks, insurance peddlers, students, and factory
276 12/01/2015 12:07  277
workers who happened to be pitching coins at the ring toss or
standing in line for the Roll-a-plane as he ambled by.
He never got tired of the midway. He scrupulously rode
each of the simp twisters once when he first started haunting
the show. After that he only watched them. But the games and
the acts, the booths and the vendors didn’t get old for him. He
turned the game managers into exuberant braggarts by inquir-
ing about the details of their work and expressing amazement
at their skills.
Al’s old front men told him how to find the district attorney
or sheriff or mayor or police captain in each town who could
be paid off with the proceeds of one fixed game, as a prophy-
lactic against investigations of the roulette wheel and the
baseball toss. They told him how to place posters, how to pry
a license out of a reluctant bureaucrat, how to rent a site for
a song, and all the comes and tells and scams of their craft.
The novice who handed out Arturan literature in the P.I.P.
(Peace, Isolation, Purity) booths could count on being quizzed
periodically about the reactions of passersby to each brochure
or pamphlet.
The snack-stand vendors reported the flavors of Sno-kone
or soda pop in vogue in a given locale and how the fashions
varied geographically.
Sanderson watched practice sessions and rehearsals and
then went to the shows to see the results. He knew the face and
name and temperament of every cat Horst owned. He knew
the blade capacity of each sword swallower and the octane
rating of every fire eater. He knew the geek boys’ favorite
philosophers and the brand of lotion that the tumblers rubbed
on their aching joints before bed.
277 12/01/2015 12:07  278
Whenever he could, he’d snag Horst or a Binewski to keep
him company, to turn on the lights in the Haunted Gold Mine
tunnel so he could see the springs and trip wires that triggered
the sound tapes and the swooping skeletons or gaping corpses,
or to walk him though the Chute describing the nature and
origin of each glass-encased specimen. I myself have perched,
embarrassed and bored, beside him in the stands of the vari-
ety tent, answering his endless questions as he gawked
delightedly at Papa’s miniature circus, with its single ring and
its dog act, jugglers, acrobatic clowns, and aerialists.
In the swallowers’ tent he watched gravely from the back
and asked questions afterward.
When the Death Tower motorcyclists joined the Fabulon, he
stuffed his ears with plastic foam so he could lean over the lip
of the huge metal cylinder for hours, watching the riders gun
their roaring machines against gravity.
He knew the twins’ repertoire by heart and could sing their
most difficult and popular tune, ‘She Was a Salt-Hearted
Barmaid,’ with all its grace notes.
Of course he studied every delicate nuance of Arty’s show.
He scouted the big tent well before Arty made his appearance
for each session. Sanderson watched as the ten thousand places
filled with the Admitted of varying status. The limbless lay on
their bellies in the sawdust in front of the Holy Tank. The leg-
less were behind them on the first slope of the risers. The
bandages got ostentatiously thick further up where the ankle
and knee crowd jostled each other. Beyond were the novices,
all dressed in white and crushed close on the benches, waving
their bandages proudly. Behind and above them in the highest
bleachers were the unscathed newcomers, the curious, the
278 12/01/2015 12:07  279
scoffers, the occasional reporter, all antsy and jiggling to see
Arturo the Aqua Man’s life-defying invitation to ultimate sanc-
tity. Sanderson sketched charts of the hierarchy and wrote
endlessly in his pocket-shaped notebooks.
But, of all the skims and grifts and skills and wonders of the
Fabulon, Norval Sanderson’s particular favorite was a fairly
new act housed in the smallish tent right next to Arty’s huge
one. It was the least-spectacular turn the Fabulon had ever
offered. Yet, though Sanderson would pump me or any other
insider for details about the act and the actor, he didn’t want
to meet the man himself or question him personally. ‘Some
mysteries,’ he’d drawl, ‘I’d like to preserve.’ And I never resis-
ted when Sanderson hailed me away from pumping septic
tanks or counting tickets to join him in a scholarly viewing of
‘Mr. Ford’s luscious lariat.’ I liked the Fly Roper, too.
His friends called him C. B. Ford. He was pot-bellied and bald
and he tucked his pants into bright red, rose-stitched, pointy-
toed cowboy boots with three-inch heels. There was a calm
twinkle to his humor. He had quick hands and no interest at
all in becoming an Arturan and tithing up his body parts.
What he wanted, and what Arty gave him was a permanent
lease on the number 2 tent in the fairway. ‘Your big show and
my little show,’ he told Arty, ‘belong on the same card.’
His gift was his ability to bulldog and hogtie houseflies. He
claimed to have learned it in the Shetland Islands, where the
girls came thirty lonesome miles over the moors to drink nickel
beer and see the flicks at the Coast Guard station. ‘But,’ he
laughed, ‘those girls were all set on getting to the States so you
had to be careful with ’em. Nothing they’d like better than get
279 12/01/2015 12:07  280
knocked up by a Yank and have Papa herd him to the altar like
one of their shit-dragging sheep.’
There isn’t much life in those dim latitudes, he would claim,
but there were plenty of flies. And he learned the nature of flies
from an old bosun who’d run away to sea from a meat-
packaging plant in Nebraska.
‘Now the fly,’ and he planted his heels and hooked out the
silver tabs on his suspenders, ‘is not unlike the helicopter.’ At
this point his lariat would lift, whirling lazily, and begin to spin
above his head in a convincing imitation of a fly’s orbit. ‘Your
mother no doubt told you that you’d catch more flies with
honey than with vinegar . . . But we all know what flies really
like best!’ With his free hand he would reach over to the
velvet-draped table and lift the domed silver lid off the shallow
chafing dish. The candle beneath the dish would flutter slightly
and the crowd would titter at the steaming pile of dung on its
silver plate.
C. B. Ford was particular about the brand of shit he used.
‘Cow flop,’ he once told me in confidence, ‘does not work
well. It draws the flies just fine, but the folks in the audience
can’t see it. It’s too runny and you can’t pile it so they can see
it from the ground. It’s no good to me at all if it’s dry enough
to stack. Dry I could pile it up like flapjacks halfway to the
moon, but the flies don’t take much interest in it. Horse shit,
of course, draws well if it’s just fresh, but it doesn’t have
enough impact on the crowd. Somehow people accept horse
shit. Nearly anybody would tell you that the smell is homey
rather than bad. We want that bit of shock that you get with
real shit shit. I won’t work with pig shit. Depends on what
they’re eating but they can be loose as a cow and even when
280 12/01/2015 12:07  281
they’re firm that pig smell is too much for me. I hate it. So it
comes down to either dog or human.
The rope’s loop would hover over the chafing dish excitedly
while the cord subsided and C. B. Ford took up his bumpkin
professorship. His timing was good and his chatter didn’t go
over anybody’s head. He’d play the rope and talk and it was
never long before the flies came. ‘There’s one now . . . That’s
the advantage of fresh bait,’ he’d say. He had a screen cage
full of flies – big bluebottles that were slow and easy to work
with and easy for the crowd to see and hear. He had one of
the boys behind the stage just crack the gate on that cage so
the flies would come out in a slow drip. Five or six was all he
wanted. and as soon as there were a couple of real flies
buzzing that chafing dish, his rope would disappear and he’d
get a long-haired girl up from the audience to giggle and assist
him.
The first fly was always a big to-do. He’d jump all over the
stage swiping wildly at the air, come within a frog hair of splat-
ting his fist into the chafing dish a dozen times, get the girl
volunteer to flap her arms to flush the little buzzers his way,
and all the while talking his talk about the similarities and dif-
ferences between Herefords and bluebottles until the audience
was half-convinced that he was never going to catch the fly but
was laughing anyway and jumpy as a drunk with a glass of
milk waiting for him to smack a bare hand into the pile of
warm dung.
Then, suddenly, he’d catch the fly and hold it, closed in his
fist, up to the microphone so they could hear it buzz. Then
he’d blow on his thumb knuckle and shout and shake his fist
hard, ‘to make the fly dizzy,’ and then snap his wrist as he
281 12/01/2015 12:07  282
flung the fly down hard onto the table. Now he’s out for a
second, but he’s just stunned and we’ve got to act quickly
before he regains consciousness.’
Whirling on the long-haired girl and drawing small stork-
shaped scissors, he would lift a strand of her hair, separate a
lone thread, and snip it close to her skull before she had time
to do more than squeak.
‘We’ll tie a slipknot here at one end and have this big fella
hobbled in a jiffy.’
The slipknot in the hair would slide over one of the stiffly
splayed legs of the fly and tighten. With a quick flourish a little
fluorescent paper sign was taped to the loose end of the hair.
While the first fly was recovering its wits C. B. Ford would
catch five more as easily as picking grapes and serve them the
same way, assuring his blushing assistant that her hair was so
thick and lustrous that she could spare six single threads for
the taming of half a dozen wild beasts.
Inside three minutes a flock of confused flies was bobbling
drunkenly through the air above the audience, trailing the tiny
winking streamers that read ‘ EAT AT JOE’S ’ and ‘ HOME
COOKING .’
The crowd would flush out through the flaps in a good
humor. Inevitably a group of young men would take it upon
themselves to swat the burdened flies out of the air or smash
them as they sagged down to rest. Also inevitable was the child
who was indignant at having the flies killed and did his best to
catch one alive to protect it, to take it home in a popcorn box
and revere it for having experienced something altogether
extraordinary in fly life.
*
282 12/01/2015 12:07  283
After two months of following Arty around in a rented van,
Norval Sanderson left us and took a leave of absence from his
distinguished magazine. He went home to West Point,
Georgia, as he explained, to see his aged mother and think.
For weeks he combed her long, thin hair each night and sat
drinking in the dark on the porch long after she went to bed.
When Sanderson came back to the Fabulon, Arty claimed it
was the cult that drew him. Lily was convinced that
Sanderson was bent on writing Arty’s biography, but I had a
hunch that the Fly Roper was, in some odd way, part of the
pull.
Norval caught up with us again outside Ogallala, Nebraska,
and knocked on the door of Arty’s van during breakfast. Arty
left the straw bobbing in his orange juice to smile at Norval.
I went on cutting up his ham.
Norval went to the stove and poured a cup of coffee, lifted
it in salute to Arty, and then set it on the counter without sip-
ping it. ‘I brought you something.’ His ironic rasp was as slow
and cool as ever. He reached into the unusual bulge in his
tweed jacket and pulled out a green glass pint jar crammed
with something. ‘A token,’ he sneered, ‘of my profound
respect.’ He set the jar on the table beside Arty’s plate. The
swollen thing inside pressed against the glass. It was thinly cov-
ered with short dark hairs. Norval grinned mischievously and
loosened his slim lizard-skin belt. The flannel trousers slid
down past loose silk shorts to his knees. ‘Excusing your pres-
ence, Miss Olympia,’ he mocked, and his thumbs pushed the
elastic waistband down and twitched his starched shirttail
aside to show the limp circumcised penis dangling in front of
a flat and ornately scarred crotch.
283 12/01/2015 12:07  284
‘The stitches are almost completely dissolved now, but I’m
still bowlegged,’ he complained.
Arty chuckled and nodded. ‘Don’t think that gives you a
head start on any other novice. You still have to go through
the finger and toe basics before you’ll get any credit for that
grandstand play.’
Sanderson hiked his pants back up, shaking his head with
mock woe. ‘I cut off my balls for the man and this is the
thanks I get.’
‘We all have to start somewhere,’ Arty grinned, as I slipped
a forkful of ham between his lips. Sanderson leaned on the
stove drinking coffee and regaled us with an urbane descrip-
tion of his search for a surgeon willing to perform the task. ‘I
ended up with an eighty-year-old veterinarian who was Grand
Wheezar of his local KKK congregation. I told him that my
mother had just confessed, on her deathbed, that she had gone
down with a pecan picker and I was actually sired by an
octoroon Catholic communist. The old gentleman agreed to
do the job immediately. He pats me on the shoulder and says,
“Yer right, son, you’d fry in the eternal oil for passing that
much taint on to another generation.”’
Arty was still laughing when Sanderson went out to move
his van into the Admitted camp. As the door closed Arty
hooked a fin at the pint jar and slid it into staring range. He
put his nose against the tinted glass, turned the jar for another
view, and then sat back with a frown wrinkling his bare scalp.
‘Goat? or calf?’ He might have been asking the jar. ‘Maybe
a colt or a big dog?’
I was scraping the plates and shaking my head. ‘You’re as
goofy as he is.’
284 12/01/2015 12:07  285
Arty gave me the look. ‘These are not Norval Sanderson’s
balls.’
That stopped me. I leaned to look at the crammed jar.
Arty tapped at the lid with his fin. ‘That network reporter
who was here after the first Now story told me about it.
Sanderson lost his balls to a landmine in North Africa years
ago. Fifteen years ago, maybe.’
‘Why didn’t you call him on it?’ My head was frozen.
‘He figures I don’t know anything. Probably put iodine or
something on old scars to make them look fresh. It’s kind of
cute. Let’s give him some rope and see what he’s up to. And
you keep your trap shut about it.’
‘You like him.’
‘He’s entertaining.’
Passing himself off as a convert didn’t seem to require that
Norval develop anything you could rightly call reverence. He
still sneered and took notes and interrogated anything with
vocal cords. But he also came up with the idea for the Tran -
scendental Maggot booth. Arty laughed and and let him do it.
The project earned Sanderson a modest income and kept him
close to Arty. The booth was small but it had the place of pride
at the pivot point between Arty’s tent and the Fly Roper. The
notion was simple and surprisingly popular. Sanderson col-
lected amputated parts from Dr. Phyllis and cut them into
small chunks in each half-pint jar. His maggot farm was
reliable and easy. He’d hang fingerless or toeless hands or feet
up on hooks behind his trailer for a few days and pick out the
worms as they hatched. He sold a lone maggot with its own
lifetime supply of guaranteed sanctified feed for five dollars.
285 12/01/2015 12:07  286
The ones that graduated to flyhood before he could sell them
went to the Fly Roper’s wire cage on a dollar-a-dozen basis.
Whatever his intentions, Sanderson was with us to stay. He
switched from tweed to twill. He talked casual business, reg-
ularly, with C. B. Ford. It took him two years just to shed four
toes – two on each foot – but he conscientiously deposited
each toe, as he dropped it, in its own jar with its own worm
and sold it for the usual price.
286 12/01/2015 12:07  287
17
Popcorn Pimp
The twins were counting the miniature tomatoes in each
other’s salads at dinner one night when Papa announced that
they were getting their own van, ‘like Arty’s.’ Lily was horri-
fied. They were too young at eighteen to live alone, she
protested, even in a T-shape set-up with the family van and
Arty’s. The swallowers would sneak in and rape them and
whatnot. The sword swallowers and the fire eaters were Lil’s
bogey-men at the time. She got hot thinking of the twins at the
mercy of the swallowers.
‘When they were tiny morsels, still trying to crawl away
from each other and getting tangled, up I said, “Blast the heart
that takes them from me!”’
Iphy looked scared, but Elly, cool and slow, said, ‘We’ll take
it. I know this is Arty’s idea. He’s got something in mind. But
we’ll take it anyway.’
*
287 12/01/2015 12:07  288
The twins ordered carpets and walls of sea green, and sky-blue
drapes and furniture, and a scintillating emerald bathroom.
Their bedroom and its huge bed were dusty rose.
In honour of my fifteenth birthday, Mama moved my
clothes and treasures into the twins’ old compartment in the
family van. I sat there sometimes, but I went on sleeping
beneath the kitchen sink because the open expanse of unshel-
tered bed seemed as wide and flat as Kansas.
The twins showed up in the family van for every meal. ‘See,
Lily,’ Papa said one night as the twins sat on the floor winding
Mama’s embroidery thread onto cards, ‘you’d hardly know
they moved.’
‘Who moved?’ asked mama.
Elly had hold of my sleeve and was giving me her ‘or else’
look.
‘O.K., Oly, I want you to do me a favor.’
Iphy’s gentle hand lay on my other sleeve and her voice was
desperate, ‘I don’t want you to do it. Oly! Please!’
‘What?’ I was flustered. Elly held out a white envelope.
‘Take this over to the judges’ stand at the other end of the
park.’
Iphy tried to reach the envelope but it was in Elly’s far hand,
out of Iphy’s reach. ‘I won’t like you, Elly! I won’t speak to
you!’
‘This is for one of the judges. A man named Deemer,’ Elly
continued, calmly fending Iphy off while tucking the
envelope into my hand and folding my fingers over it. ‘He’s
very tall and he’s bald except for brown rim around the
back. He’s wearing a suit and a name tag. Give him this and
288 12/01/2015 12:07  289
then run. Don’t say anything to him. Don’t wait for an
answer.’
Iphy flattened her hands over her face. Her fingernails were
nearly white. She wasn’t crying. She was hiding. I stood clutch-
ing the envelope and staring at Iphy’s long, thin fingers
covering her whole face and tangling with her dark hair.
I took Elly’s envelope on the long walk down the scream-
ing midway and through the barbecue smoke of the picnic
grounds beyond, to where rows of folding chairs creaked in
the grass under the fat behinds watching the crowning of
Miss Dalrymple Dairy or the Catfish Queen or whatever it
was.
I saw the guy on the judges’ stand next to the stage. He was
young to be so bald. He had the quiet look of a storybook
schoolteacher. He stood behind three fat ladies and a short
man with a big belly who was blatting into a microphone
hooked to a pathetic sound system. I circled behind and
scraped my arm climbing up through the warped plywood at
the back of the stand. The speaker’s podium and the wide folks
were in front of me. I don’t think the crowd could see me. I
just touched his damp, pale hand, saw the long face turn down
toward me and the eyes widening. Then I jammed the envelope
into his hand and scuttled back down to the ground and away
as fast as I could.
I saw the thin man once more, for a single minute in the
moon light in the twins’ doorway at three the next morning.
I was spying on Arty’s door when the crack of light from the
entry to the twins’ van five feet away. I slipped out onto the
platform and saw him almost clearly as he stepped out. He
289 12/01/2015 12:07  290
was wearing the same suit. He looked tired. The door closed
behind him.
I stared without moving, thinking to myself that the enve-
lope had been an invitation and that, wow, when I got my own
van there would be norm guys coming to visit me.
I’ve sometimes wondered if the Binewski view of the world
stunted my sympathy muscles. We were a close family. Our
contact with norms outside the show was in dashes and
flashes – overheard phrases, unconnected to lives. Outsiders
weren’t very real to me. When I spoke to them it was always
with a show motive, like a seal trainer using varying tones to
coax or command. I never thought of carrying on a conversa-
tion with one of the brutes. Looking back I think the thin man
was upset and confused. At the time I wondered if Elly had got
her way but had been murdered as a result.
He lowered his head to walk away and saw me. ‘You
brought the note.’ He said it flatly, his voice light and even but
unfocused as though he’d just waked up. ‘That was strange.’
He jerked his head back at the closed door leading to the
twins. ‘I don’t think I was right. I think I did something . . .
wrong. One of them didn’t want it. She cried and scratched at
me. The other one . . . did.’ He shook his head slowly, jabbed
his hands into his suit-coat pockets, and lurched down the
steps and away, leaving me with the sounds of his shoes fading
in the gravel.
I figured he’d killed the twins but my previous experience in
nabbing assassins to protect Arty made me cautious. I went
looking for the corpse before I gave the alarm. The door was
unlocked.
I could hear the shower water rushing but I thought he
290 12/01/2015 12:07  291
might have slit their throats in there so I leaned on the bath-
room door and hollered their names. The water turned off and
the door popped open. Elly was wrapping a towel around her
hair as she snapped, ‘What do you want?’ Iphy was red-eyed,
toweling their crotch.
‘That guy just left, I thought . . . ’
Iphy lifted her eyes to me like the ghost of a murdered child.
‘She just sold our cherry!’ she cried. ‘And I was saving mine!’
‘Aah, crap!’ growled Elly. I trailed them into the pink bed-
room and climbed up on the bed to look at the red streak on
the dusty rose sheets while they were rifling a closet for their
robe.
‘Anyway!’ Elly piped between the hanging clothes. ‘You
keep your toad yap shut about it, Oly!’
‘I will! Jeez!’
‘And Squeak-brain here is going to button up, too. Right?’
‘Elly, stop. Oly can know.’
‘You didn’t have to tell her.’
They were digging in their own sparsely furnished refriger-
ator with me peeping around the door before they got squared
away about my not being able to tell because Elly would put
red-hot needles in my eyes if I did and Iphy couldn’t stop her,
and Iphy couldn’t tell because she was just as guilty as Elly.
Their soft, bitter bickering was almost soothing if you didn’t
listen to the words. They came up with a jug of pink lemonade
and grabbed three paper cups and we all went in and sat on
the sea-green carpet in the living area.
‘So, was it fun?’ I asked. ‘Or did it hurt?’
‘Sure,’ shrugged Elly.
‘Awful,’ winced Iphy.
291 12/01/2015 12:07  292
‘I thought there’d be more blood.’
‘I thought he’d stay for a while afterward. You scared him
off with your blubbering.’
‘You don’t sound as if it was really fun.’
‘The redheads say it gets better.’
‘Do you think he enjoyed it? Wouldn’t it be awful if he
didn’t? Maybe that’s why he ran off so soon. It’d be terrible if
he gave us all that money and didn’t like it.’
‘Money?’ This last was me. Somehow it hadn’t sunk in
when Iphy said Elly had ‘sold’ their cherry.
‘Sure, money.’ Elly reached under the sofa and pulled out
that same envelope I’d delivered to the judges’ stand. He’d
come up to talk to them after their show the day before. He’d
asked if he could visit them, said he’d drop by after he finished
judging the beauty contest.
‘Is he a schoolteacher?’
‘We don’t know what he does. He was polite. Kind of
gentle. I thought he’d be good to start with. He didn’t seem
rich so I just said fifty dollars in the note and that he should
come after closing.’
‘I didn’t mean to hurt his feeling. It’s just that I was saving
mine and he was so heavy on me and it hurt.’
‘Iphy, listen. He wouldn’t have hugged us anyway. They are
never going to want to hug us or cuddle up afterward. They
are always going to get right out of bed and zip up still wet
and go away.’
Iphy looked down at their knees, her slender hand folding
a hunk of the bathrobe nervously in a movement so much like
Mama’s that I stared.
Elly peeped seriously into the envelope. ‘Maybe I was dumb
292 12/01/2015 12:07  293
about this. A virginity like ours could be worth a lot. Maybe
we should have taken bids. Kind of an auction. Maybe we
could still do that. We’ll get better. We can send out flyers. Put
it up in lights, “The Exquisite Convenience of Two Women
with One Cunt!”’
‘Arty will be mad. Arty will just die.’ Iphy pleated at the
robe. I saw how pretty she was and I hated her.
‘He won’t care,’ I tossed out. ‘He does it himself.’
‘Arty?!!?’ Their twin voices blended in a harmony of shock.
‘For money?’
‘Well,’ now I was confused, off balance. ‘I don’t think he
makes them pay, but . . . I’m not sure. Does he, maybe, pay
them?’
‘Who?’
‘All the girls who come to his door at night in shiny clothes.’
Iphy’s face stiffened. Elly hooted, laughing. ‘Norm girls?’
Iphy’s lips didn’t move over the words.
‘Yeah. All sorts.’
‘Arty the preacher!’ Elly looked up at the ceiling as she gig-
gled. I decided she wasn’t a bad sort. But I knew about the
pain in Iphy’s gut and was glad and ashamed of being glad. If
I couldn’t have him, she wouldn’t either. That was enough to
go on. At least I could work for him and be close to him. Elly
wouldn’t let Iphy do that. I decided I really liked Elly. Her chin
dropped down so she could look at me. ‘Do Mama and Papa
know?’
‘Don’t be silly.’
‘How long have you known?’
‘Months.’
Elly grinned at me. Iphy’s face suddenly relaxed into mild
293 12/01/2015 12:07  294
questioning. ‘Elly, we’re never going to do it with anybody old
or fat, are we? Let’s not.’
Sometimes just looking at Al and Crystal Lil I wanted to bash
their heads with a tire iron. Not to kill them, just to wake
them up. Papa strutted and Mama doddered and neither of
them had a glimmer of what seemed to me the real world. I
suppose I wanted them to save me from my own hurts and
from the moldering arsenic ache of jealousy. I wanted back
into the child mind where Mama and Papa lived, the old fan-
tasy where they could keep me safe even from my own
nastiness.
Sometimes when Mama put her arm around me and kissed
my smooth skull and called me her dear dove, I almost puked.
If I had ever been a dear dove it was in some dream. I still
wonder what she would have done if I had been able to tell
her. Maybe she could have helped. Maybe she could have
saved us.
I didn’t understand what Elly was up to with her whoring
but I was glad because it made Iphy dirty. I didn’t know what
Arty was building with his religious trappings but I was happy
that he had lots of work for me to do.
Arty in his tank flashing wildly from glass wall to glass wall
with the lights flaming on his gleaming body, light exploding
out of the rushing froth of bubbles he beat into being until his
whole tank roared with fire – then, suddenly, Arty motionless,
floating four feet off the bottom, caught in the soft gold light.
Arty talking to the people through the microphones set against
the glass. Talking until the people talked back, talking until
294 12/01/2015 12:07  295
they cried for him, talking until they called out his name, talk-
ing until they roared, stamping in the bleachers.
Arty in his golf cart, waving a flipper at the crowds on the
other side of the chain-link fence. Arty working in his van,
receiving guests while I hid quietly in the stuffy security room
behind one-way glass with a goofy little gun in my hand just
in case. Arty surrounded by books, tapping notes with one
educated flipper on a humming keyboard. Arty reading, mut-
tering into his phone transmitter, Arty reading all the way from
Mesa, Arizona, to Truth or Consequences, New Mexico, with-
out looking up, without noticing that the guy driving his rig
was battling a stripped gear box the last few hundred miles
because the brakes were gone.
Arty in his shower after the show, grey with the drain of
whatever was eating him. Arty lying back against the wall of
the shower as I scrubbed him with a brush, his eyes closed, his
face smooth and dissatisfied.
Iphy decided that if I delivered the messages to their prospects
I’d eventually tell Arty everything. The twins got their own
phone hookup. They also recruited their piano teacher,
Jonathan Tomaini, who protested that he was a musician! An
artist! Not a pimp! He announced solemnly that he would
inform Al immediately.
And, surprisingly, it was Iphy who sweetly, soothingly
explained that if he ever did such a thing they would be forced
to scream rape and point all four of their delicately accusing
index fingers at him as the culprit. He quieted immediately and
Elly gave him her line. He lay back on the blue sofa in obvious
defeat and took in every word.
295 12/01/2015 12:07  296
‘You know what the norms really want to ask?’ said Elly.
‘What they want to know, all of them but never do unless
they’re drunk or simple, is How do we fuck? That and who,
or maybe what. Most of the guys wonder what it would be
like to fuck us. So, I figure, why not capitalize on that curios-
ity? They don’t care that I play bass and Iphy plays treble, or
whether we both like the same flavor ice cream or any of the
other stupid questions they ask. The thing that boggles them
and keeps them staring all the way through a sonata in G is
musing about our posture in bed.
‘Believe me, some of them are willing to pay a nice price to
find out. The clincher is that you get ten points of the profit for
your efforts. That’s a little bonus for your salary, isn’t it? Won’t
that sweeten the smell just a little?’
‘Ten percent?’ he frowned.
‘Ten,’ Elly nodded.
‘Gross?’
‘Profit. But we’re not a cheap item. We’re setting a mini-
mum of a thousand dollars for two hours with additional fees
for any variations on the traditional.’
He couldn’t help showing his puzzlement. ‘I wouldn’t have
thought that you needed money. It would appear that you are
very comfortably provided for, and your concerts are always
well attended.’
Elly smiled. ‘At our prices we won’t be dealing with a wait-
ing line.’
‘They’ll be people,’ Iphy explained, ‘who are truly interested
in what we have to offer.’
296 12/01/2015 12:07  297
18
Enter the Bag Man
Arty always had a great skin – smooth and tight – never a zit
or a boil. Not so much as a wart. He claimed, and it was prob-
ably true, that it was all the hours he spent submerged in the
heavily chlorinated water of the tank. ‘I don’t even have itch
mites,’ he’d say. The time when Chick and the twins and I all
had ringworm from mucking with a leopard cub that Horst
had picked up cheap Arty didn’t get it and he wouldn’t let us
touch him until we were clean again.
But there were times over the years when Arty’s tank devel-
oped an odd, slimy moss that seemed immune to the chlorine.
It would start in a tiny patch on the glass behind one of the
pumps and spread. It also spread to Arty. I was the one who
helped him with his shower after each show. I always soaped
him and sponged him but he hated being tickled and he was
particularly ticklish directly behind his balls, so that was a
spot we often missed. When the galloping green caught on in
the tank it caught Arty by the balls and in the shady space
297 12/01/2015 12:07  298
behind them. I had to use a scrub brush to get the stuff off
him.
I hated to ask Chick for help. It infuriated Arty and made
it seem that I wasn’t worth anything at all since Chick could
do everything better than anybody. But on this night Arty
was roaring in the tub-shower and thrashing around
threatening to bite me as I tried to scrub his privates. I was
about ready to drop the brush and holler when Chick opened
the door and stuck his head in. ‘Oly . . . ’ he started, but I
jumped up and grabbed his hand and pulled him into the
bathroom.
‘Take the mildew out of Arty’s crotch!’ I snapped.
‘There’s a man outside that I don’t like,’ said Chick.
Arty wallowed irritably in the hot spray from the shower
and rumbled at us. ‘Do this shit-squirting job and then worry
about that!’
‘It’s on the back side of the balls, in the wrinkles, and behind
his balls almost all the way to his asshole,’ I said.
Chick looked at Arty. A thin trail of green smoke – almost
invisible – rose from the tub and hovered above the floor.
‘What should I do with it?’ asked Chick.
‘The toilet,’ I said.
‘No,’ growled Arty. ‘It might stay in the works and creep up
my ass again.’
‘Well . . . ’ said Chick. The smoke condensed into a distinct
pea-sized puff and wobbled in the air.
I chuckled. ‘Put it in Dr. Phyllis’s underwear drawer.’
Chick looked at me. ‘Now, Oly . . . ’
‘Take it with you! Get rid of it! Throw it into the middle of
the Pacific! I don’t care!’ Arty flicked the shower tap off with
298 12/01/2015 12:07  299
his flipper and lurched up, catching the rim of the tub with his
chin. I hoisted him out and started to towel him dry.
Chick leaned back against the door and crossed his arms to
look at us seriously. ‘The man outside wants to see you, Arty,
but I don’t think you should.’
Arty rotated his shoulders under the towel. He grunted.
‘He writes notes,’ said Chick. ‘He can’t talk and he’s lost his
face.’
‘Yah, yah,’ sneered Arty.
‘He stayed through both your shows and then went to talk
to Horst. Horst says he asked about the twins and Oly and
Mama and that he claims to have met you before.
Arty looked to see that I had the bottle of oil and then
punched the door open and rolled into his room with the
towel wrapped around him. He was climbing onto his massage
bench when he said, ‘Tell the guy to wait. Bring him in fifteen
minutes and then get yourself into the security room and keep
an eye on him. How big is he?’
‘Big,’ said Chick. ‘But slow.’
‘Oly will stay with me,’ said Arty, and he stretched and
wriggled his flippers and waited for me to start oiling him.
Chick’s face crumpled in sour worry from the chin up but
he turned and went out with the compressed pill of mold float-
ing behind him a pup.
Arty was sitting in his big chair, dressed in dark wine velvet
and sipping at the straw in his tonic water when Chick
brought the man in. He was as tall as Al and very lean. He
stopped just inside the door, his one eye fixed on Arty, and
dipped his knees in what must have been a bow. His face was
299 12/01/2015 12:07  300
covered by a grey cloth that fell from inside his baseball cap
and drooped into his open shirt collar. Only his right eye
peered out at us.
‘Mr. Bogner,’ said Arty.
I pushed up a chair for the big man and he moved toward
it and folded into it slowly and with great care. I remembered
a story about a miser who had a deep dent in the top of his
head. The rain had filled it with water and there were goldfish
in it. The miser moved very carefully and slept sitting up so as
not to spill his private fish preserve.
The masked man balanced a pad of paper on his knee and
looked at Arty. I stood close, fiddling with a spray can of
Paralyzer. The lamp on the bureau went on and I took half a
step back so Chick would have a clear view of the big guy
through the mirror.
I flinched when he lurched forward and began scribbling on
the pad. He ripped the sheet off and held it out to Arty. I took
it and held it for Arty to read. The script was a fast block print,
very legible. It said, ‘I’m glad to see you again. I shot at you in
a parking lot ten years ago.’ He was leaning forward, his one
eye sweeping its gleam over us both eagerly. His baseball cap
was dark blue and the bill was pulled down. The top of his veil
was tucked under the left side of the cap so he looked like a
game of peekaboo. The veil bulged at his neckline in a bag that
seemed to swell and fall back with his noisy breathing. He was
literally a Bag Man.
Arty was still and staring, no expression on his smooth,
wide face, only his eyes weren’t blinking and were wider open
than usual. He was holding his breath. I couldn’t read the Bag
Man’s eye. It moved and light came off it, but there was no
300 12/01/2015 12:07  301
flesh to crinkle around it and tell me what the eye meant. I got
a grip on the Paralyzer and dug my heels into the carpet.
Arty let his breath out. Then he took some in. In a half-
joking and familiar tone he said, ‘Now, why ever did you do
that?’
The Bag Man blinked and bent over his knee, writing fast
with his pen scratching and jumping in his big weathered
knuckles. He ripped the sheet off and handed it to me and then
kept on writing. The paper said, ‘Things were slipping on me –
oranges at first – then everything. My wife and kids had no
respect for me. I started going up to the woods with my old
man’s 30.06 on weekends but I never did any hunting. Just sat
by the fire and cleaned the rifle and had a few beers.’
He didn’t remember much of the trial, though he was quite
clear on being booked. The photographer and the finger-
printing struck him as dull. He felt that he should struggle or
shout, cry, anything to make the proceedings important. But he
was too tired, and looking into the faces of the uniformed men
going about their work made him anxious not to disturb or
trouble them. ‘Who knows what their wives are like?’ he
thought. Sitting in the cell alone, he decided that he had done
something that couldn’t be put right. He lay quietly on his
bunk and tried to think. On the second day a man came who
claimed to be Emily’s lawyer. Emily was filing divorce papers.
The trial was vague and boring. He remembered an old
woman, very neatly dressed and sharp-voiced. She was sitting
on the chair next to the judges bench and she said, ‘ . . . If you
ask me I’d say it was a charitable instinct for mercy. I felt the
same way. I’m not one who’d say it was a wrong thing to do.’
301 12/01/2015 12:07  302
Vern was confused about the charges. They tried to
convince him that what he had done was wrong and after a
while he pretended to believe them. But he knew that he was
being punished for his failure. After all, they had been lined
up. Absolutely in line, and he – the story of his life – had
missed.
He liked the State Hospital. He didn’t mind the steel mesh
on the windows. He had a room of his own and three sets of
green pajamas. He swept his floor every morning, ate the food
on the tray, and had a nap on his neatly made bed. When he
woke up the tray and the broom were gone and his room was
bare and tidy again. He slept a lot and managed to forget
nearly everything.
After a year or so he started thinking again, though he
didn’t much want to. What he thought about was children.
Teddy and Brenda had been six years old and five when he last
saw them. First he remembered their voices saying ‘Dad.’ He
dreamed that his only real name was Dad and the other things
that people called him were either aliases or insults. He
remembered seeing a whistle on the shelf of a variety store and
wondering if Teddy would like it, wondering if he should get
one for Brenda too.
Then he dreamed that he was in the open door of a plane
several thousand feet above the earth and he had to jump hold-
ing a baby in his arms. It was his baby. He jumped, pulled the
rip cord on the parachute, and it didn’t open. The emergency
release didn’t work. He was falling fast. The wind tore at him
fiercely. He was gripping the baby as tightly as he could but the
wind pried under his arms, strained at his muscles, and sud-
denly the baby was loose, falling beside him, just out of reach.
302 12/01/2015 12:07  303
He flailed and groped in the air, trying to reach it. The baby
was falling just a little bit faster than he was. It was below him,
falling away from him as he fell after it. The earth screamed up
at him. He knew that the baby was going to hit first and he
would see it, would know it for a whole fraction of a second
before he was smashed into a pulp himself. The terrible mil-
lisecond of that grief burst in him and he woke shrieking. He
couldn’t get the dream out of his head. He prayed that he
would have the dream again but that this time he would fall
faster and be allowed to die first.
The dream was not to be monkeyed with. It did not come
again and it would not go away.
Emily did not answer his letters. He got a formal letter
from a lawyer ‘reminding’ him that the divorce had gone
through and that he had been denied all communications with
the children.
That was when he remembered the freaks in the parking lot.
Their strange twisted forms danced viciously in his head. They
were cruel and jeered at him.
He decided that Teddy and Brenda were going to become
freaks like that if Emily was allowed to raise them.
About that time Vern’s mother visited him and he was
required to spend every morning and afternoon in the day
room with the other patients. His mother made him think of
the old lady at the trial. She never talked about why he was
there. She talked about her farm, the dairy that Vern’s dad had
built up and left to her when he died. She said she could sure
use a man around the place. The hired hands were shiftless
sneaks. She said Emily never let her see the children.
Vern hated the day room. He wanted to be alone again.
303 12/01/2015 12:07  304
Then he decided that he wanted to leave the hospital alto-
gether. He started paying attention to the doctors and nurses.
He was released from the hospital three years and six
months after he had entered it. His mother met him in the
lobby and walked out with him. She led him to a big car and
they got in. She drove him home to the farm where he had
grown up. Mrs. Bognor took Vern on a tour of the farm and
introduced him to the hands. It was spring and the garden
needed a lot of work. While his mother fried chicken, Vern sat
at the kitchen table and sketched a plan for the vegetable plot
on a scrap of notebook paper.
That was Thursday. The following day was a payday for the
hands. Mrs. Bognor stuck to the old ways and paid her men
and her bills with cash. Just after midnight Vern got out of
bed, put on the tan work clothes his mother had bought for
him, packed a brown paper bag with more clothes and shav-
ing gear, and eased out of his room. He slipped past the old
lady’s door and down the stairs. Vern’s father had always kept
the cash box in a drawer beneath the flour bin in the kitchen.
The key had always hung on a small nail in the door of the hall
closet. Vern’s mother hadn’t changed anything.
He was parked outside the grade school at 8:30 on Friday
morning. His mother’s car was newish and respectable. Vern
pretended to read a newspaper and smiled to himself as he
watched the kids straggle into school. A little before nine he
began to worry that they might have gone in another door. For
a moment he wondered if they might have changed so much
that he wouldn’t recognize them. Then he saw them. They
were together but arguing about something. Teddy gave
Brenda a push and she stamped her foot and yelled at him.
304 12/01/2015 12:07  305
Vern rolled down his window. His whole body was suddenly
flooded with sweat. His voice shook and came out too soft.
They didn’t hear him. Brenda tried to stomp on Teddy’s sneak-
ered foot and grab a book from him. Teddy laughed and held
the book up out of reach. Vern found his old voice. He disliked
their bickering. He always had.
‘Teddy! Brenda!’ The pair, caught in their quarrel, looked
guiltily toward him. He was calm again. He knew them well,
after all.
‘Dad?’ said Teddy. And Brenda, confused and not remem-
bering, looked at her brother and said, ‘Dad?’
Disneyland was fine. They drove straight through two days,
put up in a motel across the street from the enormous amuse-
ment park, and then spent three days from breakfast until
bedtime glutting themselves on the wonder of it.
Vern was calm and happy. The kids were in a daze of
ecstasy. They collapsed at night too tired to watch the televi-
sion in their motel room. After they were asleep Vern would
turn the set on, keeping the volume very low. Crouched close
to the set he would watch the late news, listening carefully for
mention of himself or the children. There was nothing. He
knew the police would be looking whether the news men-
tioned it or not. He sat up late watching the kids sleep.
When they climbed into the car on the day after they had fin-
ished with the amusement park they obviously expected to be
taken home. Brenda was bouncing a toy crocodile on a stick.
‘Mama will like this. I’m going to give it to her.’ Teddy
announced that he would give Mom the photo of himself in the
race car. Vern had sidestepped their questions like a bullfighter
305 12/01/2015 12:07  306
for days. Now he took a slow breath and said he thought they
ought to take a look at the Grand Canyon before they headed
back. Maybe ride some horses down the trails.
They kept talking about their mother. Brenda started to worry
about school. Her class had planned a roller-skating trip and
she suddenly realized that she had missed it. She came out of
a gas station toilet crying pitifully. Vern was convinced that
she’d been frightened by a molester and he roared through the
door marked WOMEN to find nothing but a little room with
cracked plaster, a damp, bitter smell, and a trail of sodden
tissue paper on the floor. When he got back to the car Brenda
was sobbing in the back seat with Teddy sneering at her and
the station attendant, a plump teenager with a red oil rag
hanging out of his hip pocket, was staring suspiciously at all
of them. Vern handed him money and slammed his way into
the driver’s seat. He flicked the engine on and whipped
around in the seat to stare at Brenda. ‘Why are you crying?
What happened?’
The child’s crumpled face opened. She wailed. She buried
her head.
‘She misses her friend Lucy,’ chortled Teddy.
‘Oh, for . . . ’ Vern put the car into gear, ripped out of the
station and into the road, just missing a trash can and a flashy
new motorcycle parked at the edge of the lot.
She cried for ten miles. When they stopped for lunch, Vern
took his first bite of sandwich and chewed twice before he real-
ized he was staring at a huge glossy poster of an armless,
legless, creature smiling out of a hairless head. Fish flickered
beside the worm thing and the wavering blue background
306 12/01/2015 12:07  307
made it appear to be underwater. Silver letters marched across
the bottom. ‘Q UESTIONS? ’ they glittered. ‘A SK A QUA B OY !’
Of course he must have seen those posters before, as well as
the red and silver ones of the twins that were scattered all
down the coast and in every desert town, but he hadn’t rec-
ognized them.
Now he saw it, flush in the window of the drive-in burger
joint – flaring out at the parking lot with fat girls and little kids
trailing past on their way in and out.
He made up his mind right then, changing directions, and
drove for two days without sleeping. The kids were silent now,
wary. He wasn’t talking, couldn’t talk. He stopped in Redding
and went into a sporting-goods store while they stayed in the
car. He came out with a long box, put it into the trunk, and
got back into the car and drove on. Teddy and Brenda were
very good. They didn’t ask questions. They didn’t fight. They
got out at gas stations to pee and didn’t ask for Cokes. They
said, ‘Chocolate,’ or ‘With cheese please,’ when he looked at
them in drive-in grub joints, but they said these things very
quietly and humbly.
When they passed the ‘ WELCOME TO SEAL BAY ’ sign on the
coast road Teddy’s voice came drifting up over the back seat.
‘Dad . . . ’ softly. And then, ‘Dad.’ Vern nodded at him in the
rearview mirror. He could see the boy’s pale, grimy face in the
early-morning light. They were both dirty. Brenda’s hair was
tangled, hadn’t been combed in days. The T-shirts and jeans he
had bought them in Anaheim were stained and wrinkled. A
tang of puppy smell filled the air around them.
307 12/01/2015 12:07  308
Vern had seen several posters now that he knew what he
was looking at.
‘Everything’s going to be all right, son,’ Vern nodded cheer-
fully at the road. ‘I’m going to fix everything.’
‘Dad . . . Are you taking us home to Mama?’ Teddy’s voice
was as shaky as a man with a snake on his chest. Brenda’s eyes
were huge in the rearview mirror and she didn’t say anything.
Vern scowled at the road. ‘No. She’s not good for you.’ And
then they were on their own street and every house and bush
was familiar to Vern except that the Bjorns had painted their
house blue and put a greenhouse on their side porch. Vern was
talking very fast.
‘You’re going to stay in the car and I’m going in to fix your
mother and then we’re going to see the Grand Canyon like I
said and you’re never coming back here again and you’ll stay
with me always. Now you stay right in the car.’ He pulled into
the driveway and Emily’s car was in the garage and the cur-
tains weren’t opened yet and she had let the grass go and the
milk and the paper were on the step and he didn’t even hear
Teddy’s voice saying, ‘Dad, what are you going to do? Dad?
Dad? Dad?’ or Brenda beginning a strange little song of ‘No
Dad, please Dad, no Dad, please Dad,’ because he was slink-
ing out of the car, leaving the door open so Emily wouldn’t
hear it close and he crept back to the trunk and opened it and
was taking the shotgun out of its box and breaking it and
shoving in shells from the box of ammo and he didn’t even
notice the two small bodies beside him, tugging at him, yelp-
ing, ‘No, Dad, don’t hurt her – no, Dad!’ and ‘Please please no
no please please.’ He swung his arms once to get clear and
then pushed through the door that led from the garage to the
308 12/01/2015 12:07  309
kitchen and he saw the plastic cabbage that Emily had stuck in
a frame on the kitchen wall as a joke years ago and he was
reaching for the knob on the bedroom door and when the
door opened Emily was there. She was pulling a pair of pants
up her thick legs and her blouse wasn’t buttoned yet and she
looked up at him with her hair flying around her head and he
saw her fear in her heavy face and he saw the fear spot just
where her neck joined her body – the deep dent where the life
eddied close to the surface and he brought the shotgun up and
it reached all the way to her, which made him realize she had
been right all those years when she complained that the room
was too small, and the tips of the barrels almost rested in the
hollow of her throat and he squeezed and one economical
barrel went off and a lot of Emily went out through her back
onto the unmade bed and all the way across to break the big
mirror over the dresser and spray the pale lavender wall with
dark splotches.
Vern offered Arty a tattered envelope crammed with news clip-
pings to fill in the gaps. Teddy and Brenda had run screaming
to the neighbors, a retired couple who had known the children
since they were born. Mrs. Feddig called the police while Mr.
Feddig held the hysterical kids in his arms. When Mrs. Feddig
got off the phone, she took the kids and her husband slid into
his gardening boots and was just opening the door to look out
when they all heard another blast, louder this time from the
yard next door. Mrs. Feddig had a good grip on Brenda but
Teddy got away and was right behind the old man when he
poked his head through the shrubs and looked into the
Bogner’s front yard.
309 12/01/2015 12:07  310
Vern Bogner was wandering around the middle of the over-
grown lawn. He was staggering – gently waving his arms.
When he wheeled around Mr. Feddig saw no face at all, just a
black and red fountain of jumping, bubbling meat with shreds
of what might be bone, and the whole front of the man’s tan
work clothes was covered with it. Teddy screamed until the
police came.
Vern was always a lousy shot. His aim had been a disap-
pointment to his dad in the woods and fields when he was a
kid. He’d been just that hair off true when he had the Binewski
bambini lined up in his sights. He managed to blow his
wife out through her own back by dint of a 12-gauge within
two inches of her breastbone, but when the final big shot came
due he stuck the second barrel of that same 12-gauge under
his chin and managed to blast of 75 percent of his face, includ-
ing his mouth, nose, larynx, one ear, and one eye, and still
miss – MISS , mind you – the vital areas that could have finished
him.
Certainly he would have bled to death soon if left to his
own devices, but the Seal Bay paramedics had been having a
slack season. They were full of enthusiasm and delighted at the
chance to use all their shiny equipment. Vern lived.
Vern never did have much sense of humor, and after he’d
transformed himself by this clumsy method, into what was
known ever after as the ‘Bag Man,’ he was downright
maudlin. He spent a year in the hospital and had a lot of sur-
gery. But there are limits to what even an imaginative plastic
surgeon can do.
310 12/01/2015 12:07  311
The ‘Bag’ moniker originated in the plastic pouches that
hung from the ends of various tubes into and out of what was
left of his head. Since he had no jaw left, neither upper nor
lower, eating, when he finally got off IVs, was a delicate liquid
process accomplished with various protein solutions and a
squeeze bulb attached to the appropriate tube. Breathing was
also tricky, and he dripped and gurgled into one of those plas-
tic bags all the time.
Later, when he was required to keep company with people
other than medical professionals, he wore a kind of heavy grey
veil draped from his forehead with only his right eye peeking
out. The bottom of the veil was always tucked into his collar
and the whole thing was bulgy and lumpy from the tubes and
bags inside. He had sight in that right eye and he could hear
with his right ear. He couldn’t talk or taste or smell. He had a
hard time if he caught a cold, and he needed more surgery and
constant medical supervision.
The murder trial was brief. He lay on a rolling cot in the
courtroom and pled guilty by writing the word on a pad of
lined yellow paper. He was sentenced to life.
He spent a while in a screened-off corner of a ward in the
State Prison Infirmary and made weekly trips by ambulance to
a hospital. Then he got evicted from jail. There were budget
cuts and congressmen complaining about how expensive it
was to keep the Bag Man. After a lot of heeing and hawing
they threw him out.
The Bag Man went back to his mother’s dairy farm. He
hadn’t got over the idea of the children. Teddy and Brenda
were living with Emily’s parents and he was not allowed to see
them. He wrote them long letters full of advice and apple-pie
311 12/01/2015 12:07  312
wisdom and complicated descriptions of his garden and what
to do for slugs and how marigolds related to bush beans and
how that was a lesson in being a man.
Emily’s mother picked those letters out of the regular mail
with her kitchen tongs and slid them into a big manila enve-
lope. When the envelope was full she sent it to the kids’
welfare office and started on another one.
The Bag Man sat next to his mother on the sofa every night
and watched the news.
It was 2 A . M . The last stragglers had been herded out of
the gates an hour before and the show was bedding down. The
midway was dark but all around us there were lights in
the trailers and vans. Horst was hosting a card game. The
candy girls’ barracks was full of redheads coming out of the
showers with their hair in towels, ready to put their feet up
and smoke a little weed and bitch about the townies and about
their men, old, new, used, broken. Al and Lil were winding up
the night’s count and having a drink together with their legs
tangled under the dinette table in their trailer. The twins would
be brushing each other’s hair and chattering on their bed.
It may seem odd that I have no idea what town we were in,
but when the show was alive and functioning – especially at
night – it felt like the whole world and it always looked the
same no matter where we were. In the daylight we might
notice that we were in Coeur d’Alene or Poughkeepsie, but at
night all we knew was us.
The Bag Man had scribbled and handed us s for an
hour and a half or so. I stood beside Arty, taking each sheet
and holding it up for him to read, reading over his shoulder,
312 12/01/2015 12:07  313
then adding the sheet to the pile that grew up on the console
table. Arty was silent, waiting, reading patiently. Occasionally
the Bag Man would pause while we read a certain ,
watching anxiously to see if we understood. When Arty
nodded at him he would go back to the furious scribbling.
Sometimes the print was so hurried that it was hard to read.
Once Arty read the  out lout and asked the Bag Man if
that was what it said. The Bag Man gurgled and bobbed gin-
gerly and went on writing. Twice Arty asked questions and the
Bag Man answered on paper. I had never seen Arty so patient
for so long with one norm. Finally the Bag Man stopped writ-
ing and sat back. He watched us read the final . It said, ‘I
keep my mother’s garden and watch TV.’
Arty edged around in his chair and took a sip from his
straw.
‘Well,’ he said finally, ‘what can we do for you?’
The Bag Man hunched forward and wrote. The  said,
‘Let me stay with you. Work for you. Take care of you.’
Arty stared at the  for a long time. Then he looked at
the Bag Man. ‘Take off your veil,’ he said. The Bag Man hes-
itated. His hands jigged hysterically in his lap. Then they rose
to his head. He lifted off the cap. The veil was tied on. He
pulled at a cord and the veil fell down over the front of his
shirt. Arty looked. I looked. It was pretty bad. There were a
couple of patches of hair growing on one side of his head. The
one live eye swiveled and jerked over us nervously. The rest
was raw insides bubbling through plastic. Arty sighed.
‘You’ll have to learn to type. This handwriting business
doesn’t cut it. We’ll get you a machine.’
*
313 12/01/2015 12:07  314
‘We didn’t go to his trial?’ I tried to remember but nothing
came. The last hard picture I had was the lady at the reception
desk staring at us as Al carried us out the door of the emer-
gency ward. Arty slumped against his throne and stared
moodily at Chick. Chick was lying flat on the floor watching
an almost invisible green thread weave intricate patterns in the
air three feet above his nose.
‘No,’ Arty finally grunted. He straightened and looked at
me curiously. ‘You must have been asleep when the guy from
the prosecutor’s office came.’
‘I don’t remember.’
‘We were hightailing it for Yakima. Al cancelled all the
shows between Coos Bay – where it happened – and Yakima.
He wanted to get far away from the parking lot and everything
connected with it. We were still in the thirty-eight footer,
remember. No add-on sections in those days. We pulled in at
one of the big rest areas, still on the Oregon side, to wait for
the caravan to catch up with us. They were strung out for fifty
miles, Al was going so fast. Lil was nervous and jumping up to
look at all of us every five minutes.’
‘This was just before I was born, right?’ Chick rolled his
eyes toward Arty and the green thread straightened into an
arrow.
‘A matter of days,’ said Arty. ‘There were only a half-dozen
rigs with us and Al was working the radio on the others, giving
out our location, when an official car pulled into the rest area
and the guy got out. A tidy beard and a three-piece suit. He
took a look at the line and tucked a clipboard under his arm
and headed straight for us.
‘Al was sitting in the pilot’s seat watching him. He just said
314 12/01/2015 12:07  315
the one word, “Police,” and Lily and I clammed up. The twins
were asleep and I guess you were too, Oly. Al got up and let
the guy in when he knocked. He sat down but he couldn’t get
comfortable with me there, across from him in the booth. Al
offered him coffee and the guy refused. He stuck to his papers.
He was in a hurry to leave. He wanted us to come back and
testify at the trial. Al refused. The guy left. Al started talking
guns and security systems. Not long after Chick was born, the
guard routine started. The whole thing made Al paranoid as
hell. And Lil was dipshit, naturally. I learned a lot from it
myself.’
Arty watched the green thread tie itself in knots in the air
and then slither out into a limp line. ‘I thought I told you to get
rid of that bastardly mold,’ he muttered.
‘I will.’ Chick lay quite still and the thread became a small
transparent bubble. ‘It’s nice stuff, though. Comfortable,
peaceful. I like it.’
315 12/01/2015 12:07  316
19
Witness
From the notes of Norval Sanderson:
Arturo Establishes the Aristocracy of Conspicuous
Absences and Superfluous Presences:
‘Consider the bound feet of the Mandarin maiden . . . and
the Manchu scholar who jams his hands into lacquered
boxes so his fingernails grow like curling death. Even the
Mexican welder sports one long polished nail on his small-
est finger which declares to the world, “My life allows
superfluity. I have this whole finger to spare, unnecessary to
my labor and unscathed by it.”’
— Arturo Binewski to N.S.
316 12/01/2015 12:07  317
Impressions:
Fortunato – aka Chick (origin of nickname?), 10-year-old male
child – blond, blue eyes. Totally normal physique of the tall, thin
variety. Withdrawn, introverted. Very shy except with family.
Occasionally referred to as ‘Normal Binewski’ by Arturo.
The youngest of the Binewski children, Fortunato evi-
dently serves as chore boy and workhorse for the others. He
is generally deprecated for his lack of abnormality and has
been made to feel dramatically inferior to his ‘more gifted’
siblings. A reversal of the position a deformed child occupies
in a normal family. The boy spends most of his time tagging
after Dr. Phyllis, the cult surgeon. The doctor, being a
normally formed person, may provide nonjudgmental affec-
tion lacking in the boy’s family. The Binewskis and all the
show folk in general seem to avoid the subject of Fortunato.
He is, perhaps, an embarrassment.
Why Only Red-Haired Women Work in the Midway of
Binewski’s Fabulon
Note: Male crew members – members of acts, booth ten-
ders, mechanics, etc., are not required to conform to any
dress or appearance code. Non-show wives and other
female relatives traveling with the show, but not appearing
in any way, are not required to meet an appearance code. –
ALL female performers and workers directly involved in the
Fabulon operation – whether snake dancing or selling pop-
corn – are required to have red hair of a particular bright,
though apparently (or possibly) natural shade. Dyeing hair
317 12/01/2015 12:07  318
or wearing a wig of the appropriate shade satisfies the
requirements as long as the individual agrees never to
appear in public without the wig, etc. The only exceptions
are the Binewski females themselves – Crystal Lil, platinum
blonde, Siamese twins, Electra and Iphigenia, black hair;
Olympia the dwarf, hairless, wears caps of various kinds.
Reasons given by those questioned:
Al Binewski: ‘Just a visual consistency, like a uniform. Kind
of cheerful look that holds the show together. Customers
can tell a show employee by their hair color.’
Crystal Lil: ‘Al always had a kindness for that color hair.
His mother had red hair. And in a crowd we can pick out
our girls easily.’
Olympia: ‘They always had red hair. I don’t know why.’
Redhead: ‘Story I got is that Al, the Boss, has a thing against
red hair and Crystal Lil makes sure he doesn’t fool around
on her by making every girl on the lot wear this damned
torch color. I’m a honey blonde naturally. You can probably
tell ’cause of my golden complexion. No blotchy redhead
skin on me.’
‘The truth is always an insult or a joke. Lies are generally
tastier. We love them. The nature of lies is to please. Truth
has no concern for anyone’s comfort.’
— Arturo Binewski to N.S.
318 12/01/2015 12:07  319
‘I get glimpses of the horror of normalcy. Each of these
innocents on the street is engulfed by a terror of their own
ordinariness. They would do anything to be unique.’
— Arturo Binewski to N.S.
Excerpts from transcript of conversation with Lillian
Binewski – mother – taping unknown to the subject:
‘Of course I remember, Mr. Sanderson. It started with a card
from my mother. I forget what holiday it was. Easter,
maybe. It was a sweet card with a little poem in it. Arty had
been talking to his audience from the beginning but – oh, he
must have been six or so – he saw that card and he read it
over and looked at me in this wise little way he always had
and he pipes up. “The norms will eat this up, Lil.” He used
to call me Lil like his Papa. And that night in his last show,
when he was on the rim of the tank near the end, he smiled
so sweetly and came out with this little poem. They loved it.
They went wild. Then, of course, nothing would do but I
must scour the card racks for him in every town we came to.
And he was PARTICULAR ! I’ll say this for him, he was
nearly always right. Knew this crowd.
‘Why, there have been times, when I’d slip in at the back
during his show and stand watching, that he’d even make
ME cry, the clever way he had.
‘Wait! The change you’re talking about! How could I? It
was this ghastly town on the coast. Oregon. Just before
Chick was born. It was a terrible thing and I always felt that
it must have scarred the children. A madman shot at us in
the town. It was terrifying. You can’t imagine what it is to
319 12/01/2015 12:07  320
realize that there are people at large whose first reaction to
the sight of your children is to reach for a gun. But offstage
Arty was withdrawn after that. Quiet. Chick was an infant,
too, and we were totally taken up with him. He caused a
furor in our lives, that Chick.
‘My teeth had been giving me trouble. Chick was three or
four months old and we were in Oklahoma. One week we
were in the same town with a faith-healing dentist and he was
getting our crowds. The midway was just dead until his serv-
ices were over every evening. Then we’d get the runoff but
there wasn’t much. The faith-healing dentist was pumping
them dry. They just went home and stared at the wall when
he was finished with them. Well, the third night in a row of
standing around looking at each other over the sawdust had
us all pretty peeved. And I’d been having these teeth pains
again so I decided to sneak over to this auction barn where
Dr. . . . I forget his name was having his healing service.
‘Arty had finished for the night. It was only eight o’clock,
but he had about seven people in his tent for the early show
and we decided it wasn’t worth the gas to run the lights for
another set like that. So I took Arty with me in his chair. Of
course I took guards. We didn’t breathe without guards.
They were brothers, big boys who had dropped out of col-
lege. I forget their names. But these were nice boys. One of
them wanted to geek for us. There was trouble with some
women’s clubs at about that time over cruelty to chickens.
But they were nasty white Leghorns anyway. Stupid things.
Now, I’d never give a Plymouth Rock or a nice Rhodie to a
geek. I love a nice Rhode Island Red. They are the finest
breed of chicken. They have character. We used turkeys for
320 12/01/2015 12:07  321
a while, too, and they’re even stupider than a Leghorn.
Albinos they were, blue and red wattles. Al tried out the
turkeys because their size made them easier to see in the pit.
And white, naturally. The albinos. They take a spotlight so
well, and the blood shows so vividly. Now that I think of it,
that boy had already been geeking. That’s why he wanted to
come along. He’d broken a tooth on one of the turkey
necks. The bones are so much bigger than a chicken’s you
know. He was the younger boy. He’d dropped out of Yale,
I think, and got Al to take him on. Then his older brother
came to get him to come back to college. They both stayed
on as boys will at that age. Especially the clean, well-bred
boys.
‘And they always want to strip down and crawl into the
blood and mud in the geek pit and scream around, chasing
the birds and tearing them to pieces. You could say, well,
that’s the quickest route. Any other act would take so
much time to learn, and that’s true. But those boys just get
such a kick out of it, you have to laugh. This boy, what
was his name . . . ? He was good. He had long blond hair
and a beard and he’d bury his face in the guts and then
snatch his face up and snarl and chatter his teeth at the
crowd with gore dripping from his beard. Oh, he had a
style about him. But he’d broken a tooth. Got carried
away, I dare say.
‘And poor little Arty had been so downcast since the
shooting I thought it would be a treat for Arty and I’d be
with him by himself. He always just flowered with individ-
ual attention, Arty did.
‘So we set out. One of the boys pushed Arty’s chair and
321 12/01/2015 12:07  322
I walked on one side and the brother walked on the other
side of Arty. We weren’t far from the main street. It was a
small town but a lot of farms in the area. Actually had side-
walks as I recall. We haven’t been back there. I can ask Al
what town that was. He’ll remember. But you know those
small prairie towns. Not much paint on the houses, not
much grass in the yards. The wind just blisters it off. But the
folks are nice, with soft drawls. It couldn’t have been more
than a couple of blocks to the auction barn. Summer
evenings you know, and most folks were up at the dentist’s
show. A few stayed out rocking on their porches. I remem-
ber the geek boy laughing – we none of us believed in this
prayer dentistry – that he hoped it worked because his dad
was so sore about him quitting school that he’d cancelled
his medical and dental insurance.
‘I always liked the cattle smells, hay and milk and dung.
We knew the place by the flies. And there was a crowd.
‘That dentist had ten little boys in a white-voice choir.
Very sweet and eerie. Remind me to let you listen to the
twins’ tapes when they were doing white voice. The tran -
sition was hard on them, getting the tremolo after their
blood flowed. They’re still good but their mature voices just
don’t have the purity and control that their white voices did.
Arty can still white voice if he wants to, but Oly never did
have a white time. I swear that child cried for titty in a full-
throated contralto. Chick still has a pure little white voice.
Sometimes I pass where he’s sitting or hear him in his shower
and I think for a moment that he’s still a toddler and I
should go make sure he isn’t drinking ammonia or some-
thing. Isn’t it odd that the girls should lose their white voice
322 12/01/2015 12:07  323
and both the boys can still use it? Sometimes I say to Al,
“Why is that . . . ?”
‘Oh no, Arty didn’t sing at the dentist. It was the choir
and a few witnesses. Older folks, big jolly men with guts
over their belts standing up next to the dentist showing big
gold smiles. It seems God doesn’t use porcelain or amalgam
or fancy plastic. He fills strictly with gold. And some big old
farm women who should have known better.
‘The dentist was down in the auction pit with his micro-
phone. Nice-looking man. White hair and spectacles and a
quiet suit. He had a wonderful voice. We stayed in the aisle
in the back because of Arty’s chair, which was good
because it gave us a better view than if we’d been up on the
bleachers. The dentist was asking questions. “Do you
believe God can heal?” and the crowd was nice and they
liked him and they said, “Yes,” a big yes. “Do you believe
God can heal YOU ?” and they said, “Yes.” “Do you
believe God can fill teeth?” And when the dentist asked,
“Do you believe God can fill YOUR teeth?” we all said yes
to be courteous. It was fun that it was somebody else’s
show and we could just go along like paying customers for
once.
‘Then everybody was praying wild with their mouths
open and their hands waving. The dentist had a good
backup line that it might not happen at that very moment.
It might take a couple of days or even weeks. Still there were
plenty of folks whooping right away that their big hole was
filling up with gold. They were bouncing around looking in
each other’s mouths and blessing Jesus. There was no
folderol about getting new teeth. God was a decent dentist.
323 12/01/2015 12:07  324
He’d give you a well-fitted denture but he couldn’t grow you
a whole new set.
‘We laughed all the way back to our lot but, actually, I
never did have any more tooth pain. Eventually all my teeth
went and this set of plates does me well. But I never had any
pain. Arty would ask me about it and we’d laugh but he
seemed to think about it. He had Oly letter a little card that
he taped on his wall. The thing read, “The only liars bigger
than the quack are the quack’s patients.” Arty used to just
keep me in stitches. Eleven years old he was then.’
Arturo to N.S.:
‘Why? You’re asking me why? You tell me, Mac! I’m not
really in a position to know. You are. Me, I have suspicions.
I suspect people are suckers for a prick. I suspect folks just
naturally go belly-up for a snob. Folks figure if a guy acts
like he’s King Tut and everybody else is donkey shit, he must
be an aristocrat.’
Arturo to N.S.:
‘Consider the whole thing as occupational therapy. Power
as cottage industry for the mad. The shepherd is slave to the
sheep. A gardener is in thrall to his carrots. Only a lunatic
would want to be president. These lunatics are created delib-
erately by those who wish to be presided over. You’ve seen
it a thousand times. We create a leader by locating one in the
crowd who is standing up. This may well be because there
are no chairs or because his knees are fused by arthritis. It
doesn’t matter. We designate this victim as a “stand-up guy”
by the simple expedient of sitting down around him.’
324 12/01/2015 12:07  325
ARTURISM : A quasi-religious cult making no representa-
tion of a god or gods, and having nothing to say about life
after death. The cult represents itself as offering earthly
sanctuary from the aggravations of life. Small chalked graf-
fiti, said to be the work of the Admitted, are found in many
locations after the Binewski carnival has passed through.
The phrase ‘Peace, Isolation, Purity’ (or sometimes initials
P.I.P.) seems to be the slogan. Many commercial posters dis-
tributed in advance of the show read, ‘Arturo knows, All
Pain, All Shame, and the Remedy!’
A fee, called a dowry, is required for entering the novice
stage. The sum varies depending on the novice’s resources
but the minimum seems to be around $5,000. Novices are
required to serve for at least three months and sometimes as
long as a year as workers for the cult. Typists, bookkeepers,
and organizers are given longer work periods than labour-
ers. One of the most important tasks of the work period is
serving and caring for cult members who have already had
major portions of their limbs amputated.
The Admitted must furnish their own travel and living
arrangements. All that is offered in return for the dowry is
free access to Arturo the Aqua Man’s shows, and the surgi-
cal amputations performed by the Arturan medical staff.
Since the medical staff travels with the carnival, the Admit -
ted must follow the carnival.
The camp of the Admitted is separated from the carnival
camp by a portable electric fence and a series of manned
sentry posts.
The administration is loosely conducted in a large
camper perched on the back of a pickup truck.
325 12/01/2015 12:07  326
The medical facilities consist of a well-equipped surgery
in a large truck trailer with its own power supply. Two large
truck trailers are equipped with monitoring devices and fur-
nished as post-op recovery rooms. Each trailer has ten beds.
A smaller eight-bed infirmary trailer is always parked near
the doctor’s mobile living van, which houses an examining
room.
Only one surgeon on the staff, reportedly aided by a
skilled anesthesiologist. Am currently trying to locate cre-
dentials and licensing for the surgeon, a woman who goes
by the name of Dr. Phyllis.
Most nursing chores, feeding, bathing, linen changes,
bedpan provision, etc., are performed by novices in the
order.
‘The more people we exclude, the more people will want to
join. That’s what exclusive means.’
— Arturo to N.S.
INELIGIBLE FOR ADMISSION GROUNDS
Convicted Felons Already freaks
Mentally Deranged or
Retarded Unable to make informed
decision
Under Age 21 (later 25) Unable to make informed
decision
Over age 65 Already freaks
Chronically Ill Already freaks
Congenitally Deformed Already freaks
Accidentally Mutilated Already freaks
326 12/01/2015 12:07  327
Also excluded, unconditionally, are any who can’t provide
minimum dowry.
Judgments of degree of deformity that prevents admission
are made by administrative staff. Borderline or ambiguous
cases (correctable by cosmetic surgery, etc.) may be
appealed by applicant for judgment by Arturo, whose deci-
sion is final.
ADMITTED WHO BECOME INELIGIBLE FOR FURTHER PROGRESS:
Mentally impaired
Chronically ill
Physically weak,
deteriorating
Unable to make informed
decision
Already freak – poor surgical
risk
Already freak – poor surgical
risk
REST HOMES : Theoretically all the Admitted end up at the
Arturan rest homes. Administration claims two in existence
with plans for twenty more.
Those who become ineligible for progress are sent there
quicker but are pitied for having lost access to P.I.P. Those
who complete progress (are reduced to head and torso) go
to the rest homes with full honors – living, no doubt, the
lives of gold-plated pumpkins: bathed, fed, and wheeled
around by servants.
Questions: Check death rate (seems unlikely they’d want a
thirty-year-old to live out the allotted twoscore more while
being supported by the organization).
327 12/01/2015 12:07  328
Life expectancy?
Numbers of Admitted vs. applicants?
Recidivism, rates?
Attended Policy Meeting: Arty in his office, listening on
intercom to conference in the administrative camper. He
interjects an occasional remark – hits a button that lights
a red bulb in the conference camper. All talk stops in
anticipations of HIS voice. Arty, meanwhile, laughing, mim-
icking the committee members cruelly, with me as his
audience. He is constantly informing me that he takes none
of it seriously.
The debate is over glands. Should mammaries and testi-
cles be included in progress? (Should they be amputated?)
And if so, at what stage of progress, as a final liberating ges-
ture or as preliminary preparation . . . ?
Different committee members present arguments, pro
and con, then Arty decides.
Today’s conclusion – glands should be included in
progress. Order to be taken under advisement by Arturo –
decision to be handed down later.
Case of Admitted # 264: Logan M., thirty-four years old –
has tithed smallest fingers on each hand. Personal history:
Second son of moderately successful insurance salesman and
a nurse, raised in Kansas, town, pop. 850. Midwestern
University and Chicago. Master’s degree in social work. Six
years as welfare case worker, no advancement. Three years
as juvenile counselor. Two children. Wife (now living in
Grand Rapids with kids) has filed for divorce.
328 12/01/2015 12:07  329
Arturan Administrator Theta Moore says Logan M. was
rational when admitted but has slipped during progress.
Logan M. lives in a seven-year-old Chevrolet sedan,
leases wheelchair. Appears daily at 9 A . M . in show camp
with big plastic bag full of day-old bread, used and dis-
carded burger buns, pie crusts, etc. He goes to the cat
wagon, parks in front of the screen, and spends an hour or
more watching the tigers, leopards, and lions. He scatters
the pastry leavings on the ground in front of the cat cage.
Logan M. no longer communicates verbally except to
sing – in a cracked falsetto – ‘Up to the Land of Kitties!’
repeatedly.
CASE DISPOSITION : Arturo says Logan M. will go to
the Missouri Arturan rest home (Camp # 2 near
Independence) and will be denied further progress because,
Arty says, ‘He’s off his nut.’
Conscious decision making is a requisite for progress.
Arturo Binewski, in conversation with N. Sanderson:
‘ . . . if they hang around in groups and avoid outsiders it’s
not my doing. People generally stick with those who agree
with them, anyway.
‘ . . . Isolation is a standard cult technique but I don’t use
it. It’s standard procedure to get the poor buggers in a low
moment, hustle them off to the boonies, and surround them
with a strong-arm/soft-spiel combo. How could I do that?
I’m a traveling show! Do I seal them into trains and add
cars as I make converts? Colonies or communes or reser-
vations are expensive and hard to manage. I’ve got a weird
329 12/01/2015 12:07  330
civil service-style bureaucracy taking hold as it is, and it’s
a pain in the ass. I don’t mind being lord of all I survey but
I don’t want to have to work at it. It just wouldn’t be
practical.
‘As it is, I don’t need all that crap. For what I’ve got to
say, the more exposure the folks have to the outside world,
the better. Feed ’em newspapers, TV, world reports. Tell ’em
about terrorist attacks, mass murders, disease, divorce,
crooked politicians, pollution, war and rumours of war!
Then go ahead and tell ’em that only fools and half-wits join
my outfit. The first half of the news cancels out that partic-
ular message. Let the relatives and lovers loose on ’em. All
they can stand. Because it’s the world that drives them to
me. You news guys are my allies. Those soggy wives and
cheating husbands and nagging, nutso parents are my best
friends.
‘Didn’t you, yourself, turn your back on the whole
caboodle? Say the hell with it, and walk away? Truth is, I
don’t need tricks and traps and brainwashing because I’m
giving the poor sorry sonsabitches what they crave more
than air.
‘See, there’s a difference between advertisin’ and prose-
lytisin’, Norval honey. All I have to do is let ’em know I’m
here and what I stock – corrective surgery! and cheap at the
price!’
Arturo Binewski, in conversation with N. Sanderson:
‘ . . . No. No children. My minimum age limit is twenty-
one and I’m thinking about raising it to twenty-five very
330 12/01/2015 12:07  331
soon. Once in a while we get some maniac who wants his
nine-year-old son or his four-year-old daughter enrolled. No
indeed. Not my meat.
‘Figure it this way. You will anyhow. You been hanging
around politics long enough. I was brought up in a country
that claims you’re innocent until you’re proven guilty. We
protect children because they have not yet proven them-
selves to be hamstrung shitholes. Granted, the odds are
lousy that they’ll turn out any other way but it’s been
known to happen. Isn’t that how you figure it? Seeing how
you think I’m punishing all these folks anyway?
‘But here, I’ll tell you another way to look at it too, just
for fun. I figure a kid doesn’t choose. They don’t know
enough to choose between chocolate and strawberry, much
less between life and limblessness. Say, just for argument’s
sake, that I’m really serious in my own mind about what I
offer. Just say I really think this is a sanctuary. Well, the
whole deal depends on choice. I want people who know
what life has to offer and choose to turn their backs on it.
I want no virgins unless they’re sixty years old. I want no
peach-cheeked babes who may be down tonight but will
have a whole new attitude after their morning bowel move-
ment. I want the losers who know they’re losers. I want
those who have a choice of tortures and pick me.
‘I counted up the converts two nights ago and we’ve got
a Fully Blessed roll of 750 in three years and another 5,000
who have worked past their first ten digits. You got to figure
there’s something going on here. We’ve got something the
folks want.’
331 12/01/2015 12:07  332
20
The Fix Unfixed
Dr. Phyllis had been working all morning. Arty had given out
promotion certificates like cookies all week long. The novices
were singing in the hospital trailers, where they watched over
the ones who had been promoted that day. Arty was sun-
bathing on the roof of our van and I sat beside him watching
the gentle stir of the midway waking. The awnings were
pumped out. The lights all went on at once. The redheads were
everywhere, starting the popcorn machines, blowing up bal-
loons at the helium tank, leaning into the greasy vitals of the
Mongoose & Cobra ride to make sure the music was syn-
chronized with the lashing of the chairs that the norms would
jounce in. The gates were open and the first townies were
gawking in at the booths.
On the other side of us, the show camp spread. A line of
delicate laundry tossed transparent frills from one of the trail-
ers that housed the redheads.
Far down at the end, where the Arturan camp began, was
332 12/01/2015 12:07  333
Doc P.’s white van near the infirmary. All morning there had
been a line at the infirmary door as the promoted waited, with
their certificates of advancement rubber-stamped in blue ink,
for their turn with the Doc. The line was finally gone.
Arty saw her before I did and made a flapping fart-sound of
his lips. He was on his belly with his head lifted. I swiveled to
look along his line of sight. Dr. Phyllis was marching toward
us. She had a straight alley ahead of her and her eyes were
fixed on us. Arty ducked his head and lay flat. I watched the
cloth of her mask suck in and out against her mouth as she
strode along.
‘She knows you’re up here,’ I muttered spitefully. Arty
rested one cheek on his blanket and glared at me. She was
beside the van now.
Arty sighed. ‘Send the elevator for her.’
I scuttled for the small platform and stood on it. ‘Coming,
doctor!’ I called. I waved at Arty as I pushed the descent
button.
I hopped off into the dust and Doc P. stepped onto the plat-
form. I tried to look up her white uniform skirt as she went up.
I couldn’t see past the murk at her knees. Her voice started
before the platform stopped.
‘Arturo, it’s crucial that you reconsider this totally inefficient
method! Do you know how many individual digits I did
today? Forty-seven!’
I went off for a stroll. There was a clear division between the
Fubulon camp and the followers. The show rigs were all tight,
tidy, and workable. The followers had strange outfits: pup
tents, pickups with campers, tiny trailers that folded out into
tents on wheels, several station wagons with bedding and
333 12/01/2015 12:07  334
bandages in back, decrepit cars, a converted ice-cream wagon,
a bread truck, a pair of ancient Harley-Davidson motorcycles
with sidecars. One of the sidecars was shaped like a wooden
shoe and the other like a submarine. They belonged to a pair
of hard-nosed old thugs, who slept in their sidecars and insisted
on having the tattooed skin peeled off their arms and legs as
they were removed. They tanned the tattoos and kept them in
scrapbooks in their saddlebags. Arty said privately that they
would never have joined if they hadn’t been old and afflicted
with the chickenshits about riding hard in groups. They stuck
together and helped each other, scaring off the fawning novices
who wanted to suck up to them. Arty was bitter because they
were more loyal to each other than to him and because they’d
spent a wad on having their cycles converted to tongue-and-
jaw controls before they showed up asking for salvation. He
was suspicious of them for thinking that far ahead.
I was leaning on a dusty car listening to the soft song from
the hospital trailers when the door of the infirmary opened
and Norval Sanderson stepped down with a bundle wrapped
in a plastic garbage bag. He closed the door behind him
and was sauntering coolly away when Horst appeared from
behind another van. The big cat man’s eyes squinted as he saw
Sanderson. ‘Well, I swan there, Norval,’ hollered Horst.
Sanderson eased to a halt and turned graciously. ‘Looks,’ said
Horst in a companionable tone, ‘like you’ve got yourself a
tidy-sized chunk of something!’
‘Horst, my fine fellow!’ cried Sanderson, his fastidiously
creased shirt and trousers emphasizing the delicate demon-
stration of pleased surprise. ‘I was just thinking of looking you
up for a soothing session over the checkerboard!’ Sanderson
334 12/01/2015 12:07  335
lifted a pint bottle of bourbon from a rear pocket and offered
it. Horst walked all the way around Sanderson slowly, eyeing
the plastic-wrapped bundle. Then he stopped beside the
reporter and took the bottle. Sanderson was calm and genial.
‘Checkers, hunh?’ said Horst, unscrewing the cap.
‘Outdoors, perhaps,’ said Sanderson, ‘where can I sit
upwind of you.’
Horst slanted a blue glance at Sanderson and tilted the
bottle to his lips. ‘Aah,’ he sighed, and handed the bottle back.
‘Now it seems to me that there’s some question as to who sits
upwind.’ Sanderson tipped the bottle, courteously neglecting
to wipe the neck on his sleeve. ‘By my thinking,’ mused Horst,
‘a poacher outstinks a cat man any day, and if you’ve got any-
thing less than a whole thigh in that bundle, I’m a pig’s ass.’
Sanderson raised his eyebrows in mock surprise above the
angled bottle. He swallowed and looked solemnly over Horst’s
lanky frame.
‘It is an offense, sir,’ said Sanderson, ‘to justice, to reason,
and to the tender female who brought you forth and nurtured
you to your present stature, to even consider that you might
bear any resemblance to a porcine posterior.’ Sanderson
nodded gravely at the bottle, shifted the bundle under his arm
and took another swig.
‘That’s my opinion,’ said Horst. ‘But look here, I thought
we had an understanding that you could make do with the
bony bits. You get all the fingers and toes anyway.’
Sanderson’s shoulders lifted in helpless resignation. ‘You
have me at a loss. What can I say? Laziness, my dear Horst,
will be my downfall.’
They strolled out of earshot as Sanderson handed Horst the
335 12/01/2015 12:07  336
bottle and the bundle. Horst tucked one under his arm and the
other against his teeth as they disappeared behind a van.
This was their standing argument. Horst wanted the big
chunks for his cats. Sanderson had promised to leave the arms
and legs and be content with the hands and feet, which were
more plentiful anyway. Sanderson hung the bits up on the out-
side of his van for his maggot crop. It was, he claimed, easier
to whack a big chunk on a single hook than to painstakingly
string up a shish kebab of small pieces. Horst would carefully
explain that hands and feet were useless to him. ‘Nothing’s
surer than my cats would choke on all those little bones. But
they’ll collect worms just fine.’
Sanderson countered with mild reminiscences of domestic
cats stripping fish spines.
Sitting in the dark next to our van on a summer night with the
midway roar muted a little way off, Mama was almost invis-
ible in her folding chair. Her hair caught the glow and
sometimes a scratch of light hit her long legs as she shifted,
folding one leg over the other. It was the after-supper lull, with
the chores done and the last shows of the night causing the big
tents to glow and billow with the crowd’s breath.
I had ushered in Arty’s crowd, collected the tickets from the
booth, and could sit, waiting for the tent walls to spangle in
the rainbow finale of Arty’s act. That was my cue to run for
the stage exit and help him out of the tank. Mama, after all her
years as duenna to the twins’ act, had semi-retired. The red-
heads helped the twins with costumes. Jonathon Tomaini
supervised the props. Mama sat outdoors in good weather,
crossing and recrossing her legs.
336 12/01/2015 12:07  337
Beside Mama, in my own folding chair, with my feet stick-
ing straight out in front of me, I thought about my innards.
Just a few months before I’d had no idea whether my repro-
ductive equipment worked. There was no evidence. But that
week I had become a fully-fledged bleeder and was still
absorbed by the first change in myself that I had ever noticed.
The click and buzz of my synapses kept making the same con-
nection. If you can change, you can also end. Death had
always been a theory to me. Now I knew. The terror hurt good
and I nursed it and played it like a loose tooth.
‘No mosquitoes,’ murmured Mama. ‘A blessing.’
‘A creep!’ The shout was from Elly somewhere in the dark.
‘Creep! Creep! Creep!’
‘Please, just leave us alone,’ pleaded Iphy. ‘We’re quite all
right alone.’
‘Stay away from us! Don’t follow us! Don’t wait for us! We
don’t need your help and we don’t want it!’ The twins came
fast around the end of the van and headed for the low deck
that joined the three Binewski units. Behind them, shuffling
steadily, wheezing and gurgling, came the stooped figure of the
Bag Man.
‘Mama, tell him to leave us alone!’ The twins swooped past
us to their door. The light spilled out of their trailer in a wedge
and then disappeared as they slammed inside. The Bag Man’s
big shadow stopped in front of Mama, hauling in noisy wet air
and bobbing in place. The veiled head bent toward the twins’
van.
Mama tipped back to look up at the dim hulk. Her hand
slipped out to touch my arm. ‘Does he understand English?’
she whispered. I grunted and she leaned back. Her silver-cloud
337 12/01/2015 12:07  338
head nodding slowly in the murk. The Bag Man took in a bale
of air and let it out in what might have been a sigh. He lurched
over to the deck and sat down with a grunt. He looked ready
for a long wait.
Beyond the dark backs of the booths the Ferris wheel
started turning. Its flashing bulbs threw a pulse of light over
Mama’s face. She stared at the wheel.
‘That Bag Man,’ she murmured. ‘He seems so familiar. I’ll
remember soon.’
Arty laid down the law on the Bag Man. No one but Arty
himself and I were to know that the Bag Man was the shootist
from that long-ago parking-lot incident. Chick knew the Bag
Man was scary, but Chick was resigned to being scared as well
as uninformed. As far as anyone else knew, the Bag Man was
just another one of Arty’s followers.
I was not amazed. It seemed unremarkable that if you failed
to murder someone you should become that person’s guardian
slave. The Bag Man worshipped Arty. Arty did not worship
the Bag Man but he made an effort to keep the big lump busy
and feeling useful.
I wasn’t jealous of the Bag Man even though he took over
some of my chores and magnified them. I had been the usual
guard in the security room while Arty entertained. The Bag
Man set up his residence there. Where I had fidgeted, cramped,
sweating resentfully onto the idiot gun, the Bag Man sat on a
flimsy cot staring rapidly through the mirror glass hour after
hour. As long as Arty was in the room. When Arty went out,
the Bag Man trailed after him, looming and snorking like some
asthmatic mastiff hypnotized by his master’s scent. He waited
behind the tank during Arty’s show. He lumbered after Arty’s
338 12/01/2015 12:07  339
electric cart on the way to and from the stage. Where Arty
went, there was the Bag Man. When he wasn’t looming he
dusted and vacuumed, took out trash, emptied waste tanks,
and left the more intimate service to me.
I still served Arty’s food, took care of his clothes, acted as
masseuse and towel brigade for the shows. Arty could give
orders to the Bag Man but he could talk to me.
One day in late spring Arty had tried interrogating me: ‘What
are the twins up to? Why are they so stuck-up lately?’
Arty lay on the rubbing bench, eyes folded to slits watching
my face as I pummeled lotion into his ribs and belly.
‘I don’t know. Maybe they figure you’re busy.’ I avoided his
eyes, concentrating on the rope of muscle above his pelvis.
‘I am busy. Are they taking advantage?’
‘Don’t ask me. I’m busy, too. Roll over.’
He flopped onto his belly and I poured lotion down the
deep ditch of spine between his banks of muscle.
‘Their gates have been good this year.’
‘Not like yours. You’re breaking three-ring records every
week.’
‘They’re getting the slops and doing good business. Have
they changed their act?’
‘Iphy says they’re dancing less, and they do play one of their
own songs.’
‘What are they up to?’ His head is cranked up to glare at
me.
‘Don’t twist like that! You’ll tighten up on that side!’ I could
feel the Bag Man’s eyes on me from behind the mirror. I started
work on Arty’s neck and he let the subject drop.
339 12/01/2015 12:07  340
He could have made me tell if he’d pushed. Instead, he
sicced the Bag Man on the twins.
‘There are more weirdos around all the time,’ Arty
explained. ‘They need their own guard in addition to the gen-
eral security. Beautiful girls like that. You don’t know what
might happen.’
The following day the Bag Man had knocked at the door of
the twins’ domain and handed Elly a small slip of paper torn
from his notebook. Iphy leaned to read it:
Arturo the Aqua Man loves you and has sent me to protect
you. I will be your guard.
Elly’s mouth set thinly. Iphy tried to smile at the Bag Man.
‘That’s very kind, but . . . ’
‘Arty means to kill me entirely,’ snapped Elly. ‘Go away. Tell
Arty we don’t want you or anyone else guarding us.’ Elly
closed the door as Iphy called out, ‘But it’s a kind thought!’
After that the Bag Man followed them everywhere. Elly
glared at me accusingly when we met. As Arty’s ally I was
suspect. One thing about Elly, you were for her or against her.
She didn’t recognize neutral zones. I sat on the hood of the
generator truck polishing Grandpa and wondering what
would happen when Arty found out about their paying
visitors.
Elly was crying. Iphy looked barely conscious, like a beaten
fighter absorbed in the consolations of shock. They were
sprawled on the rosy bed, drenched in pink light. Their intri-
cate separateness and unity seemed luxurious in the satin
340 12/01/2015 12:07  341
sheets. The nightie was short and sheer and their big, four-
armed robe hung in clownish embarrassment, covering the tall
mirror on the wall.
Elly grimaced and shook Iphy. ‘We’ll run away. There are
other shows. We’ll just go!’
Iphy’s eyes opened calmly and I had an uncomfortable feel-
ing that we had been wrong, that Iphy was the strong one. Her
placid face quirked at the mouth.
‘Don’t be stupid. You’re panicked. We don’t know how to
drive. We’re too noticeable to sneak.’
‘We could go to Mama’s sisters in Boston! We could hide in
a freight car!’ Elly’s desperation pumped her from fear to
anger.
Iphy backed off gingerly. ‘Take a breath, Elly.’
The Bag Man had been following the twins for weeks. This
had disrupted their once- or twice-a-month visits from con-
noisseurs of sexual novelty. But Jonathon Tomaini, who had
felt himself defiled by pimping, urged them to take on one spe-
cial client despite the risk. He had become addicted to his
percentage of the profits.
‘This is not just the state governor, believe me. The man’s
fortune is legendary. When I realized who he was – I mean, he
came to three shows on three consecutive days. The man is
utterly fascinated. In LOVE. I knew his face but couldn’t place
him. He understood immediately when I approached him. A
gentleman. A man of refined sensibility. He did everything to
spare me the humiliation of specific explanations. He made the
offer himself, without urging. Ten thousand! Don’t tell me it’s
not worth a little effort on our part!’
341 12/01/2015 12:07  342
It was sheer cantankerous defiance in Elly that made her
accept. She wasn’t interested in the money or the millionaire.
She just hated having Arty cramp her style.
It took me days to figure out what happened that night. The
twins had planned carefully. They went to bed early for a solid
week to lull the Bag Man into complacence. On the fateful
night they turned out the lights at the usual time and waited.
Tomaini was supposed to distract the Bag Man by taking
him to the bachelor quarters for a beer and a long talk.
‘Get him to tell his story,’ Elly ordered. ‘He writes so slowly
it will take hours. Get him drunk.’
The distinguished visitor arrived at the appointed time, was
welcomed, and was settling into some serious exploration.
‘He’d had his shower and we’d got him onto the bed and
were just getting really friendly when the door broke open,’
explained Iphy. ‘I was facing the mirror. I saw the whole thing
in the mirror. That’s why I threw our robe over it.’
‘How was I to know he couldn’t hold his liquor?’ asked
Tomaini. The truth was that Tomaini couldn’t hold his beer.
Instead of getting the Bag Man to tell his story, Tomaini dwelt
on his own favorite subject, himself. The Bag Man recounted
the whole episode to Arty. I found a few of the crumbled sheets
from his note pad in the trash.
One read: ‘He said he could do very special hand jobs
because of his piano training. I thought he was going to offer
to give me one of these special hand jobs so I got up to leave.
He started to cry. He said even if he was ugly he wasn’t a freak.
Something made me suspicious.’
Another sheet of the notepaper had been torn in two. I
pieced it together and read: ‘The key worked. I heard sounds
342 12/01/2015 12:07  343
behind the bedroom door. A man’s voice. I went in. They were
on the bed. He was kneeling. Elly was sucking his cock while
Iphy licked and kissed his ass. His hands were twisted in their
hair.’
I must have known, even then, what my time would be like.
I saved these scraps from the Bag Man’s hand. I have them
still, brown and fragile on the table beside me. Their value to
me doesn’t come from the blighted hole who scratched the
words, it is that they describe mysterious acts by my people. I
wonder, for example, if the twins’ piano training had given
them the Tomaini brand of dexterity with hand jobs? Could a
non-musician learn it? Could I?
Children stumble through these most critical acts with no
real help from the elders who are so anxious to teach them
everything else. We were given rules and taboos for the toilet,
the sneeze, the eating of an artichoke. Papa taught us all a par-
ticular brush stroke for cleaning our teeth, a special angle for
the pen in our hand, the exact words for greeting elders, with
fine-tuned distinctions for male, female, show folk, customers,
or tradesmen. The twins and Arty were taught to design an
act, whether it lasted three minutes or thirty, to tease, coax,
and startle a crowd, to build to a crescendo and then disappear
in the instant of climax. From what I have come to understand
of life, this show skill, this talk-’em, sock-’em, knock-’em-flat
information, is as close as we got to that ultimate mystery. I
throw death aside. Death is not mysterious. We all understand
death far too well and spend chunks of life resisting, ignoring,
or explaining away that knowledge.
But this real mystery I have never touched, never scratched.
I’ve seen the tigers with their jaws wide, their fangs buried in
343 12/01/2015 12:07  344
each other’s throats, and their shadowed hides sizzling, tip to
tip. I’ve seen the young norms tangled and gasping in the
shadows between booths. I suspect that, even if I had begun
as a norm, the saw-toothed yearning that whirls in me would
bend me and spin me colorless, shrink me, scorch every hair
from my body, and all invisibly so only my red eyes would
blink out glimpses of the furnace thing inside. In fact, I
smelled the stench of longing so clearly in the streets that I’m
surprised there are not hundreds exactly like me on every
corner.
The ten-thousand-dollar john was a prime norm with only
a little sag as evidence of his age. His face was wind-dried and
his chest had begun the droop that had not yet reached his
belly.
He made a speech from the shower, a short, cheerful speech
about himself. He’d been poor and he’d made money, he said,
he’d changed laws in his time, and killed men and fathered
children. He’d seen five million people lining up to punch his
name onto a ballot, he’d seen regiments turn and halt and fire
because he nodded. ‘And I figured I’d come to the end of being
amazed. Run out of it, like you’d run out of sugar. But when
I saw you lovely girls I thought to myself, maybe there’s more
to life yet.’
‘He said that,’ explained Iphy in quiet pleasure, ‘as though
he were really happy to be here with us. He’s the first we ever
had who wasn’t ashamed and afraid of himself.’
When the Bag Man burst in, Iphy screamed at the mirror.
Elly almost vomited on the ten-thou cock and the john leaped
clear and snatched at his pants with his eyes alive. He had a
gun in those pants, fortunately, and he held it on the wobbling,
344 12/01/2015 12:07  345
arm-waving, snorking Bag Man. The Bag Man was horrified.
The john was fast with his trousers, and steady with his gun.
He shook his head as he circled to the door. ‘You don’t need
shakedowns or badger games, ladies. You could do very well
on your own.’
Then he was gone and the Bag Man bent over the foot of
the bed and raised his fists and pounded again and again in
gurgling voicelessness on the pink and flopping sheets. Elly and
Iphy cringed on the pillows at the other end. They heard the
car start and the crackling gravel as it rolled away.
The car in the gravel awoke me. It was too close to the
vans. I peeked out as the Bag Man began his hammering on
Arty’s door. The twins’ van gaped open with that bright spill
into the blackness that always means disaster. I ran in and saw
them. Elly was crying. Iphy looked numb. What scared them,
what had unstrung Elly, was not knowing what Arty would
do.
When Tomaini was doused awake with ice cubes down his
shirt front, he talked. He stood, clinging to the back of the vis-
itor’s chair in Arty’s big room. He gabbled at the floor, the
ceiling, the walls, his eyes shifting mightily to avoid the stone-
grog form of Arturo, and the menace of the Bag Man at the
door.
‘I’m a mess! A mess!’ yelped Tomaini, his special hands
twitching and jumping at his collar, at his buttons, at the stiff
strands of his hair.
‘How long? Why, months! For many months! Well, since
they . . . well, I forget how long . . . I’m in such a state! They
coerced me. They threatened to tell Mr. Binewski that I . . .
forced myself on them! I was trapped! They were ruthless. Oh,
345 12/01/2015 12:07  346
they seem so sweet! Everyone thinks Iphigenia is . . . You all
do! Miss River-of-Light Iphigenia!’
I watched from behind the mirror in the airless reek from
the Bag Man’s medicated sheets and saw Arty’s face move at
last, a small twitch to thaw his lips before trying to speak. He
tipped his head at the Bag Man.
‘Get his clothes. Some money.’ Arty’s face closed back up as
Tomaini babbled on and the Bag Man flipped open his note-
book for a quick scribble. He passed the  to the console
table and Arty glanced at it. No more expression on his face
than on a grape. Arty nodded.
‘The relentless pressure! Like living at the bottom of the
sea,’ Tomaini was saying as the Bag Man took his elbow and
led him gently to the door. ‘It’s actually a relief that it’s over.’
When the twitter lost itself in the distance, Arty was still
sitting motionless. I slid off the stool and hit the button that
shut off the lamp on his bureau. By the time I got to him his
tears were falling. He made no sound at all as I lifted him
down from his throne and dragged him over to the bed. He
lurched up and rolled onto his belly with his face away from
me. I crawled up beside him and patted him but I felt miles
away.
‘Go.’ His voice came, muffled by the coverlet. ‘If Chick and
the folks are awake tell them everything’s O.K. and I’ll explain
later.’
I went by the console on my way out. The Bag Man’s note
read: ‘Let me break his hands. I’ll be careful.’
Mama and Papa were snoring. Chick was sitting up in his bed
staring at me when I eased his door open. I put my fingers to
346 12/01/2015 12:07  347
my lips. He nodded and I leaned close to him. ‘Did you
dream?’
He shook his head and touched my arm. ‘Want me to stop
you hurting?’
‘Nah!’ I jerked away from him. ‘I mean,’ I whispered, ‘I
don’t hurt. I don’t feel anything.’
‘That’s weird,’ he muttered. He rolled over onto his pillow.
His kid face, with a jelly stain on his ear, yawned. ‘Seems like
there are a lot of people hurting. Seems like I should put them
to sleep.’ His hands scrabbled at the sheet. He slept.
‘Is my face clean? No boogers?’ Arty tipped his head back so
I could look up his nose. ‘Okay. All right.’ His eyes were
swollen and as red as mine. ‘Arty, let me put some ice on your
eyes.’
‘I want to go now.’ He was halfway across the room, hump-
ing fast to the door, waiting for me to open it. He brushed past
my knee to the platform, turning to the twin’s entrance.
‘Don’t knock. Go in.’
He led the way across the deserted living area, his reach-
and-pull locomotion soundless on the carpet. He lunged
upright and shouldered the bedroom door open.
Elly glared out of bruised eyes and sneered, ‘If it isn’t His
Holy Armlessness! What an honor!’ The twins were sitting up
against their bed pillows with their hair wild. The breakfast
tray I’d brought was untouched on the table. Iphy looked stern
but Elly looked like a mad bat, teeth bared as she peered out
from under her eyebrows. Iphy sounded tired and bored.
‘What do you want, Arty?’
He leaned there, propped against the door jamb, looking at
347 12/01/2015 12:07  348
them. I figured he’d have a set speech ready to flay them with.
He’d stare for a while until they were off balance and then spray
them with icy words. But when he finally opened his mouth it
was the private, alone-in-the-dark Arty who spoke in a thin,
scared voice. ‘How come?’ he asked. ‘How come you did that?’
The twins, wide-eyed and wary, were startled too. They had
expected ‘God’ Arty. This feeble and betrayed mortal was a
shock. Iphy frowned. Elly’s teeth parted but no sound came
out.
‘I mean,’ Arty’s forehead folded in peaks of bewilderment,
‘you didn’t have to do that.’ Seeing him like this I was scared.
Had the blood exploded in his head? Had his temper triggered
some spasm of the brain that changed him? Our fanged
armadillo was suddenly peeled, shell-less.
Elly took a breath and got back on her high horse. ‘You
don’t run us, Arty.’
‘Oh, hey!’ His voice high and ragged.
‘We don’t worship your ass, Arty. Not at all.’
‘Is that it? Iphy, tell me. Did she do it to keep you away
from me?’ He leaned forward, his flippers slipping on the door
frame. A blue vein beat like an angry worm above his ear.
Iphy’s shoulders, held tight and high near her neck, relaxed.
‘No,’ she said. ‘I wanted to.’
Arty was back in his van by the time I caught up with him. He
swung up into his throne and hit a button on the console with
his flipper. He shooed me out. Said he wanted to talk to the
Bag Man. I knew when he looked at me that this was our reg-
ular Arty, ready to kick ass by remote control.
*
348 12/01/2015 12:07  349
‘Arty!’
It was a duet shriek that made me drop Lily’s favorite cup
onto the counter, cracking off the handle.
The twins were standing in their open doorway with
mouths open and arms spread. ‘Arty!’ they screamed.
The Bag Man’s face swam up from the room behind them.
His hands closed on Elly’s shoulder and Iphy’s arm. Iphy
looked straight at me with disgust smeared across her face, as
the Bag Man pulled them inside.
I followed and saw the twins collapse onto the sofa and the
Bag Man standing in front of them writing busily on his
notepad. He must have already been there for a while. Slips of
paper were strewn on the sofa and on the low table in front of
it.
‘Arty’s in the surgery watching Dr. Phyllis.’ I bent to pick up
some scraps of paper from the carpet. ‘I will be very good to
you,’ scrawled the Bag Man’s hand.
‘Oly,’ Iphy’s tired voice made me look up at her. ‘Oly, would
you please go get Arty?’ The Bag Man bent toward her, hand-
ing her his most recent note.
‘What’s going on?’
‘He gave us to the Bag Man,’ tittered Elly. ‘We’re supposed
to marry the Bag Man to keep us out of trouble.’
I looked at the wad of notes in my hand. I saw, ‘Arty loves
you. He knows that I love you.’
‘Creepy, hunh?’ asked Elly. She grinned at me, and suddenly
the twins were giggling hysterically, holding each other’s arms,
rocking on the sofa. Their two long, lovely feet pointed
straight out and tapped the floor in hilarity.
They didn’t care how the Bag Man felt, standing there with
349 12/01/2015 12:07  350
his bulging veil fluttering around his one blinking eye. They
laughed at him, at the idea of him.
Looking at him, I was afraid. When he turned toward me I
yelped. His big warm hand clenched softly on the back of my
neck and he raised me until my toes barely touched the floor.
A high whine pulled out of my throat as he carried me to the
door, put me firmly outside, and shut it behind me.
I found Arty in the dark little five-seat theater above the sur-
gery. His silhouette showed against the hot light pouring up
out of the glass circle in the floor. I leaned beside him, feeling
his coolness as I let my hand brush his bony flippers. He
stared, with his chin propped on the rail, down into the sur-
gery. Directly below, a long-haired woman with a white plastic
tube mask over her mouth and nose stared up at us. What she
saw was a mirror in the ceiling, intensifying the light from the
lamps that surrounded it. The woman lay on a white table and
was covered to the neck by a white sheet. Next to her head, the
small figure of Chick sat, swathed in white, a mask over his
nose and mouth, a cap pulled so far down over his hair that it
bent his ears out. He wore surgical gloves and was slowly
trickling his white plastic fingers through her long brown hair.
At the other end of the table was Doc P. in white, hugely fore-
shortened, her arms heavy in white sleeves that moved in
deliberate twitches as she worked. The woman on the table
stared serenely at us without seeing.
‘She’s not asleep,’ I muttered at Arty’s ear.
‘She chose not to. He can stop the pain without putting
them to sleep. He says most of them like to sleep because
knowing and seeing are painful.’ Arty stuck his lower lip out
350 12/01/2015 12:07  351
and slid it along the railing. ‘It kind of goes along with what
I’m always spouting, doesn’t it?’
‘The Bag Man says you gave him the twins.’
Arty’s eyes swiveled at me. ‘Just to fuck.’
‘The Bag Man says “marry.”’
‘He’d call it that.’
Below us the long-haired woman’s eyes turned away from
us, her head tilting slightly to look into Chick’s masked face.
Doc P. was bobbing vigorously at the other end, grabbing tools
from the hands of the Admitted nurse, who stood just outside
the charmed circle, invisible to us except for the delicate jug-
glery of glinting tools. Arty watched intently. The climax was
evidently approaching.
‘A toe?’
‘Whole foot.’
With a sweep of her arm, Doc P. flung a messy something
toward the bucket on the floor, and accelerated her twiddling
of the winking tools.
Arty’s eyes focused on the woman’s face. Chick’s gloved
hand rested on her cheek, a small hand. She smiled at Chick.
The smile crept slowly from her eyes, its crease sliding under
his stubby fingers.
‘Does Chick know we’re up here? Can he tell?’
‘Don’t know. Never asked. Probably.’ Arty let go of the rail-
ing and flopped into the plush chair behind him. His eyes
closed tiredly.
‘Arty?’
‘Hnnh?’
‘It was dumb.’
‘Mmm?’
351 12/01/2015 12:07  352
‘You shouldn’t have done that to the twins, Arty. I know
you’re sore, but it was stupid. Throwing out the come with the
scum, like Papa says.’
His eyes stayed closed and a seedling smile sprouted around
his mouth. ‘Elly will shit bricks to Mars.’
‘So will Iphy. Maybe worse.’
‘Not Iphy. Iphy can like anybody. That’s why she’s so pow-
erful. It’s easy to fuck up in reading Iphy. Most people don’t
read her right at all.’
I leaned on the railing, watching him. His eyes were closed
again. I tried to think about Iphy being strong.
‘But you’re right.’ He screwed his mouth into the shape of
a belly button and then let it fall back. ‘It was stupid. Because
you know who is going to puke strychnine over it? Me.’
‘Yeah,’ I said. The light pool was deserted now. Only the
long, empty table lay below us. Arty was grinning at me. A
floppy bean-shaped smile with eye crinkles to complete the
effect. ‘How old are you, Toady? Sixteen?’ I nodded. My heart
was beating at my lungs.
‘You bleeding yet? You need a boyfriend? I don’t want you
running me through this same grinder, you know.’
I could feel the hot pleasure pumping into my face and
couldn’t keep myself from grinning back at him.
‘Nah, I’m your girl, Arty, even with the warts on your
ass. ’
We giggled and he leaned forward toward me. I caught him
in my arms, his chest warm against me, his shoulder blades
sliding in my hands. He rubbed his head against my cheek as
I squeezed him. ‘You always did have shit for brains,’ he
chuckled. I felt the convulsion of his chest against me with his
352 12/01/2015 12:07  353
laugh. ‘Think you can still carry me, little sis? Those stairs
bruise my ass going down.’
‘Oho! That’s your trick, is it? Butter me up?’
I propped him and turned around so he could flop onto my
hump, clinging to my shoulders with his flippers.
‘Don’t dig your chin in; that hurts!’
‘Your hump is bony! Take it easy!’
I carried him down the narrow stairs to the back of the sur-
gery van, where he’d left his chair and his entourage.
Miz Zegg was waiting with her hands on the push bar of
Arty’s empty chair. A couple of the administrative novices were
hovering with her and they all started to twitter when they saw
Arty. Miz Z. came scuttling at me, flapping her hands and nat-
tering, ‘Let me help you, Role Model Arturo!’ but I spun
around and grabbed the chair arms so it wouldn’t jump away
as I leaned back and spilled Arty into the seat. The novices
squeaked and grabbed their long white nightshirts at seeing
Arty treated so roughly.
‘Don’t call me Role Model!’ he snapped. ‘It’s disgusting!’
Miz Z., the latest of Alma Witherspoon’s successors to com-
mand the administrative office, took a step back and hid her
hands in her big sleeves. Arty winked at me and said he’d see
me after the show. I gaped in surprise.
‘Aren’t you coming back to see the twins? They really want
you!’
‘No.’ He shook his head, smiling at me. ‘I’m not going to
lay eyes on them for as long as I can manage.’
‘Arty! You rectum!’
Miz Z. hustled her novices off a few yards so they wouldn’t
353 12/01/2015 12:07  354
be subjected to the interfamilial indecencies that the Great One
allowed to his siblings. Miz Z. didn’t know it, but she was
going to wait a long time for her turn to get her toes nibbled
off. She’d taught business-machine classes in high schools for
years and Arty liked the way she ran the office. Arty reached
for his chair controls to follow them but I grabbed his ear and
glared at him.
‘They sent me to get you. What am I gonna tell them?’ He
blinked and looked back up the narrow staircase leading to the
small room on top of the surgery truck.
‘Well, I figure the Bag Man is still sort of unpredictable.
Why don’t you tell them not to struggle too much, not to fight
him. I wouldn’t want them to get hurt.’ He rolled away from
me, and the three office ghosties scurried after him. He was off
to another meeting, or a visit to the post-op wards, or an inter-
view with some pipsqueak reporter.
I couldn’t stand to go back to the twins. The idea of look-
ing at them and telling them ‘no hope’ made me sweat. I
trotted through the morning cool. The sun wasn’t high enough
yet to fill the shadows between the lines of vans and trailers.
Mama was at the dinette table in our van, deep in one of her
assembly-line projects. Twenty-six blue-spangled aprons and
matching headbands for the redheads. Glittering cloth ran
between her long white hands to its fate under the chattering
needle of her sewing machine. I patted her elbow as I came in
and she stretched her neck down, offering her cheek auto-
matically for a kiss. A solitary blue sequin was imbedded in the
makeup goo next to her nose. I kissed her and picked off the
sequin.
354 12/01/2015 12:07  355
‘Those twins don’t eat breakfast anymore?’ she asked. ‘They
worried about fat? I hardly see them.’ The needle gobbled at
the cloth and Lil’s voice murmured on as I went back toward
the big bedroom at the end. The sliding door was half open
but the window shades were drawn and the room was heavy
with half-filtered heat and the suffocating weight of tobacco.
I went for the shelf on Papa’s side of the bed. Two books slid
aside and I latched onto Papa’s blunderbuss pistol. I looked at
the safety catch and then stuck the thing into my skirt top, let-
ting my blouse fall loosely over it. The barrel dug me in one
spot and the butt gouged me in another. The metal was heavy
yet surprisingly warm. I went out past Mama but she didn’t
look up.
The twins were rehearsing. I could tell because the Bag Man
was standing at the back steps of their stage truck. As I walked
toward him I decided Arty had sicced the Bag Man on the
twins just to get the big lump off his own back. The Bag Man
started bending and bowing at me while I was still a ways off.
I raised a hand and nodded and went up the steps and through
the door.
The twins were alone. Another hour before the redheads
showed up for fanny-kick practice. Dance, they called it. I saw
the dark, gleaming heads bent over the matching sheen of the
baby grand. At least they were staying calm enough to comb
their hair and do their work.
‘The whole cadenza should be written. I don’t want any
two-bit piano player fucking with improvisation in the middle
of my work.’ That was Elly.
‘All we have to do is place it at the beginning of the
355 12/01/2015 12:07  356
movement so that it’s clearly an integral part.’ That was
Iphy.
‘I’d rather put rude remarks on the score. Here’s Oly!’
They both looked up from the music paper, which was
spread out on the rack in front of them, and stared past me,
eyes flickering anxiously.
‘Where’s Arty?’
I went close to them, one hand reaching to touch Elly’s arm,
my eyes glued to Iphy’s face. I couldn’t look away from her.
When she saw what was in my face her eyes began to die.
Their violet deepened to night purple, dull black.
‘He’s not coming.’
Elly’s hand clipped hard to my wrist. ‘Did you tell him?
What’d he say?’
I wanted to be a street sweeper working nights in Rio, or
maybe a florist in Quebec.
‘He said the Bag Man is dangerous. Don’t struggle. Don’t
fight him. Arty said he wouldn’t want you to get hurt.’
They didn’t need to look at each other. They looked at me.
Their four hands wandered into a complicated knot in their lap.
‘Shall I go to Papa? Maybe Horst? Let me get them.’
The twins were quiet for identical moments like one girl at
a mirror. When they spoke it was with the echoing, simulta-
neous voice that came to them in their rare moments of unity:
‘Try, but it won’t help.’ I nodded, digging under my blouse.
‘You remember how this works?’
I set the chunky gun on the shining wood of the piano. It lay
there, quiet and nasty. They stared at it. I left before they
moved again.
*
356 12/01/2015 12:07  357
Papa was in the refrigerator truck counting cases of ice-cream
sandwiches. I hollered at him that the twins wanted him and
he handed his clipboard to one of the lunks who was loading
the case. He came down off the truck with an arthritic creak
that drowned out my fantasy of him rescuing anybody. I told
him where the twins were and went off to visit Grandpa for a
while.
Chick was asleep on the hood of the generator truck. His face
was in the small green pool of shade cast by Grandpa’s urn.
The rest of his knobby little body sprawled flat on his belly
with his coveralls rucked up to his knees and his socks
rumpled down over his sneakers. The skin on his smooth
calves looked angry. He must have been asleep there for a
while. I pulled his pant legs down to keep the sun off him. He
twitched and his baby mouth smacked slightly at the air. The
surgical sessions tired him out. The tinkle of music started on
the midway. I could hear the whir of a simp twister starting
up.
‘Chick.’
His eyes opened and his lips closed but the rest of him didn’t
move.
‘Chick, you’ve got to help the twins.’
He blinked and sat up.
‘Did you know Arty gave them to the Bag Man?’
He nodded, stretching and scratching.
I slid over to where I could lean on the urn. ‘Wow!’
Grandpa was too hot to touch.
Chick licked his lips. ‘Arty says the twins are getting
married.’
357 12/01/2015 12:07  358
‘They don’t want to, Chick. They hate the Bag Man. Arty’s
just doing it to punish them for something. He’s got no right
to give them to anybody.’
‘He gave me to Doc P.’ Chick was calm, stating a fact.
‘Not the same. You’re just with her for a little while to learn
stuff.’ He didn’t answer. ‘I sent Papa over to see the twins but
he won’t be able to do anything. Not when it’s Arty’s idea.’
‘No.’ Chick lay down with his sweating face in the tiny
pool of shade next to me. The metal hood was burning me
through my clothes. A little wind came by and touched my
ears.
‘Is it nice wearing sunglasses all the time? Is everything
green?’ He was blinking, getting ready to yawn.
‘Chick! Chicky! You could sleep in the twins’ van on that
pretty sofa. Listen! If anybody tried to hurt them you could
stop him. Chick!’ His eyes popped open, a puzzled crease came
into his forehead.
‘Oly, I can’t. Arty doesn’t want me to. Arty already said I
wasn’t to do anything. It’s like when Mensa Mindy, the Horse
with the High I.Q., was scared of the fire hoop and Papa said
I mustn’t help her. Whatever this is, it’s like that for the twins.’
The patient, solid explanation drove me, sliding on my belly,
down the fender to the ground. He didn’t call after me. I
looked back once but he was curled up there on the hot metal
with his face in the shade of Grandpa’s urn, sleeping.
Papa shook hands with the Bag Man. ‘You’re going to be join-
ing the family!’
The Bag Man grunted and gurgled and milked Papa’s hand
with enthusiasm.
358 12/01/2015 12:07  359
‘Fine! Fine!’ Papa chanted, trying to pull his hand away and
looking around for help. ‘My little girls in there? I’ll just go
speak to them! There! Excuse me! Thank you! Splendid to
have you aboard! Talk soon!’ and Papa escaped into the stage
truck.
Iphy and Elly, listening frozen at the keyboard, shared a
drooping weight of resignation in their common gut. ‘We
knew it was no use,’ Iphy explained later.
‘Ah, there you are, doves! My sweet birds! I just met your
betrothed outside! Unusual fella!’
He was too loud, too fast. He flung his arms around them
and squeezed them together, planting kisses on their pale
matching foreheads. Iphy clutched his hands and spoke softly.
‘Papa, please! Don’t let Arty do this! Help us!’
‘There, dreamlet! Of course I’ll help! Nothing but the finest!
We’ll look at the calendar! Shut the whole shebang down for
a day! Have a fabulous wedding!’
‘Papa, listen! No. No. We don’t want to marry him! We
hate him! We’re afraid of him! Arty is trying to force us – to
punish us! Papa, don’t let him do it!’
Now Papa, imprisoned in the four white arms, was wrig-
gling to escape.
‘Oh, my sweetlings! You’re mistaken! Your brother talked
the whole thing over with me early this morning. He means the
best for you. Given it a lot of thought! This Bag Man – Vern,
is it? Don’t know him, myself. Seen him tagging after your
brother, of course. Arty swears by him! Solid as Gibraltar!
Loves you dearly! Do right by you! Natural fears, girlish hes-
itation! Even your mother! Thought of doing a bunk on our
wedding day! Where would I be? I ask you!’
359 12/01/2015 12:07  360
He was a large, determined man with many years of expe-
rience in slipper maneuvers. They couldn’t hold him. He was
still talking fast in the bombastic shorthand of the huckster as
he sidled toward the exit.
‘Papa,’ they chorused, ‘help us!’
‘Adore! Adore you, my butterflies! Your mother will be so
proud!’ and he was gone.
The twins sat back down on the piano bench. Iphy, who
told me this later, says they were both thinking about the gun.
‘We didn’t really expect any help from Papa. But we’d stuck
that gun into the storage space in the piano bench. You know
how the top lifts up? We were sitting on that gun and the idea
of it seemed to crawl up inside us like a snake between our
legs.’
I hid, sulking in my cupboard under the sink with Mama’s
sewing machine gabbling a few feet away. Mama was not
alarmed at my hiding in there with the door shut. She was glad
of the company and talked fitfully to her hands, needing no
answers. She was mainly preoccupied with lunch and the way
the meal symbolized the breakdown of the family.
‘Nobody shows up. They wander in three hours late, snif-
fling and expecting . . . But I am not running a short-order
house . . . That Chick is ill and I know it and Al and all his pills
and potions can claim to heaven that there’s nothing wrong
but you cannot fool a mother about her own . . . drifting . . .
caught up in alien currents leading mercy knows where . . .
Next thing we’ll get a telephone call and never even notice they
left.’
I was going over the list of possibilities. I wondered about
360 12/01/2015 12:07  361
Horst or a few of the old wheelmen, or even the redheads.
Papa’s cronies, Horst included, would never interfere with
Binewski’s business. If I went to the redheads they might do
something. I fantasized marching legions of angry women in
high heels and bulging blouses. Then I imagined Papa stand-
ing in the dust of the midway with his arms crossed on his
chest watching them come toward him and waiting for the
exact moment to bellow, ‘You’re all shit-canned! Pick up your
checks!’
What made me really sick was that I didn’t want the twins
to be rescued. I was glad Arty was mad at them, delighted that
he didn’t want to see them, cock-a-hoop delirious at the
thought of them utterly out of the running for Arty’s attention.
Big, festering chunks of my heart glowed with a dank cave
light of celebration at their lovely talented lives trapped by the
Bag Man.
The Twin Club girls who collected the Elly and Iphy
posters, autographs, and photos, the duos of vapor-skulled gig-
glers who showed up in souvenir twin shirts and homemade
twin shirts, what would the twin fans think of their glamorous
idols being humped by the tube-faced Bag Man? Gross!
Gawwwd!
But I hated myself for that gloating. The pleasure terrified
me. What if I were really a monster? What if they were really
miserable and I didn’t do my best to help? What kind of thing
would that make me?
‘One-thirty, dove!’ called Mama. I crawled out of the cup-
board and went off to the dressing room to grease Arty for the
two o’clock show.
*
361 12/01/2015 12:07  362
‘He must have shut down all the alarms and had Arty give
the high sign to the guards. Elly grabbed the gun when we
heard the outside door. We sat there in bed waiting for the
bedroom door to open. She was ready to use it, but he
knocked.
‘It was a shy knock . . . three gentle taps . . . and then the
door opened slowly and he peered around it. He waved hello.
I felt sorry for him. He seemed so shy. Elly waved the pistol
and hollered that she’d shoot. But he just came in slowly, kind
of bobbing and bowing apologetically with every step. He sat
down at the foot of the bed with his veil puffing in and out and
his one sad eye peeping at us. He took out his note pad. There
was a message ready on the first sheet. He tore it off and
handed it to me. It said, “I love you. Please let me be tender to
you.”
‘While I was reading it he was writing another. The new
note said, “If you would rather kill me, it will be O.K.” Elly
looked at the note and drew a bead on his head. His hands
came up and opened his shirt at the throat. He pulled it open
and patted his bare chest. The veil came untucked and I could
see the plastic bag that hung there and a section of hose hang-
ing down. Elly sat with her elbows propped on our knee, both
hands aiming the pistol. She waited a long time. The Bag Man
was very still, waiting. Finally she just dropped the gun and
looked at me. She said, “I wish he hadn’t knocked. I could
have done it if he’d just opened the door without knocking.”
It was a lot worse for Elly than it was for me. She isn’t used to
doing things that aren’t her idea.’
Arty heard the shot and was clambering into his chair when
I roared in.
362 12/01/2015 12:07  363
‘Mama’s in there! With the twins! She just went in!’
‘Quick! Push me! It’s faster!’
Rushing, terrified, I jammed a wheel on the door and nearly
pitched Arty out on his head. The cry came, high and thin. The
twins were screaming as we leaped through their living room
and rushed the bedroom door.
Mama stood calmly beside the big bed. The soft pink light
from the gauze lamps made her look lovely. Her face was
bright and tender. Her hair drooped charmingly. Her robe and
fluffy high-heeled slippers were oddly tidy; the sash of the
robe, for example, was tied in a neat bow.
The twins were hunched in one corner of the bed. Iphy was
blinking dazedly at Mama and wincing as Elly heaved her pri-
vate sector of their guts out onto the carpet.
The Bag Man lay dead and pantsless on the filth-smeared
bed. His long naked legs looked bony and floppy at the same
time.
‘Mama,’ Arty said. She turned and nodded at us.
‘I finally remembered where I’d see him before.’ She looked
down at the dark gun in her hands. ‘Oly, dear, this looks like
your Papa’s gun. Would you be so kind as to check the shelf
next to my bed? And would you ask . . . Oh, here’s Al now.’
I’d been asleep when I heard the creaking. Peeking out of my
cupboard I saw Mama, white hair glowing in the moonlight,
passing through the twins’ unguarded door. I was pulling on
a robe to follow her when I heard the shot. I jumped to get
Arty.
363 12/01/2015 12:07  364
From the files of Norval Sanderson:
Crystal Lil’s story, as told to investigating officers (tran-
scribed from tape):
‘I couldn’t sleep. The moon affects me. I was sitting up in
bed, looking out through the small window on my side. Al
has always insisted that I sleep on the inside, and he sleeps
nearest the door in every bed we’ve ever shared. It’s his pro-
tective instinct. He feels that if an intruder were to come
through the door he, Al, you know, could defend me. But
I had lifted a corner of the curtain so I could look out.
‘The moon throws a new and sometimes more attractive
perspective on familiar objects, I’m sure you know. But that
was how I happened to see this person approach the steps
up to the platform. He strode past the window fairly close
and the silver light of the moon on his shoulders let me
really examine his gait. Gait and carriage, I always tell the
children, are such powerful indicators of character.
Suddenly I recalled where I had seen this man before, with
his stooping head crouched down on his bent neck.
‘I thank the merciful stars I was in time. My poor girls.
But there, they’ll be all right. Quite a miracle that the gun had
fallen to the floor where it caught my eye. The Bag Man must
have stolen it. Imagine threatening those helpless girls. I
meant to strike him in the heart, but it was an awkward angle
with him on top of the girls, naked below and his shirt unbut-
toned so it flopped and I couldn’t tell where to aim, exactly.
I had to shoot from the side or risk the bullet piercing him
and going on to injure the twins. Al always loaded a soft slug,
though, for stopping power. Al was right as usual.’
364 12/01/2015 12:07  365
Papa hunched over his hands as though his chest was ready to
explode.
‘Son, Arty, did you know that this was the guy who tried to
kill you all? Did you know this was the guy from Coos Bay?’
Arty, grey-faced even under the warm gold light of his read-
ing lamp, shook his head. ‘Of course not, Papa. We’re very
lucky Mama remembered him.’
‘Sweet, frosted globes of the virgin,’ breathed Al. ‘Imagine
him haunting us all these years. I’ll go batso thinking. All that
time. All those chances. Me and my half-assed security.’
Arty leaned against his chair arm, head drooping in fatigue.
‘Well, Mama was just in time.’
Elly’s face, twisted by revulsion: ‘But she wasn’t in time! He
came when she pulled the trigger. He spurted like a cockroach
oozing eggs as it dies!’
Iphy, calmly: ‘Normally we use a spermicide in our
diaphragm, but we weren’t ready for him and he wouldn’t let
us put it in.’
The police wore green wool uniforms. They came in large
groups. The ones who were not actually taking notes,
photographs, or fingerprints, or asking questions, took the
opportunity to stroll the colorless midway at dawn. When
two patrolmen discovered the redheads’ dorm trailers, three
more cops sailed in to question these ‘important corroborative
witnesses,’ who happened to be making large pots of coffee
while wearing various interpretations of the nightie, negligee,
shortie pajamas, and so on.
The coroner drove away in the back of the ambulance with
365 12/01/2015 12:07  366
the medical examiner and the Bag Man’s body. The officer in
charge of the investigation was a heavy, deliberate man with
more cheek than neck, and small, steady eyes. He spent a long
time with Crystal Lil in the sea-green/sky-blue living room
of the twins’ van. Lil sat, ladylike and calm on the sofa, while
the plainclothes officer leaned over his knees on the chair in
front of her, listening, nodding, taking notes on a small spiral-
bound pad. Speaking very little, checking his cassette recorder
occasionally.
When a uniformed kid came in to hand him a typed sheet,
the big man read it slowly, folded it carefully, and tucked the
thin paper into his breast pocket.
‘Mrs. Binewski . . . ’
‘Lily, please, Lieutenant.’
‘Thank you, Lily. We’ve just received confirmation from
Oregon. The fingerprints match those of Vern Bogner, who
was convicted of attempting to murder you and your children
almost ten years ago. My report will say that Bogner was
killed while attempting felonious assault, specifically rape. No
charges will be brought. Oregon’s been looking for this guy for
eighteen months. He left his mother’s custody and didn’t report
to his caseworker.’
‘Is this Utah?’ Lil asked. ‘Are we in Utah?’
‘No, ma’am, Nebraska.’
‘Why, I could have sworn Utah to look at your troops. So
tidy. So disciplined. I would have thought Utah, with their
boots polished just so. You must be very proud.’
366 12/01/2015 12:07  367
21
On the Lam
Papa, old in his chair, and Mama, crocheting and dreaming
with her eyes open, as we all pretended that this was a night
of children and stories like the old days. Only Arty was miss-
ing, off alone in his van. The twins held Chick, who was
reading aloud to them, and I sat on the floor with my hump
warm against Papa’s bony leg.
‘“What makes you look so white?” said Files-on-Parade.
‘“I’m dreadin’ what I’ve got to watch,” the Color-Sergeant
said.’
Chick’s voice, sharp as glass in its chanting, stopped
abruptly as he sprang off the twins’ lap and whirled around to
look at them.
‘Did a pin stick you?’ The twins’ surprised faces opened.
Chick shook his head, frowning.
‘Ah, the boy’s tired of hanging Danny Deever. Too glum!’
growled Papa. ‘Let him cremate Sam McGee instead. Come,
367 12/01/2015 12:07  368
boychik, begin, “There are strange things done!” and give it a
roll this time! Breathe from your crotch up!’
But Chick wouldn’t recite and he wouldn’t crawl up on the
twins’ lap anymore but came and sat by me while Papa
boomed through Sam McGee and we all did north-wind
noises, dog-team yappings, and the ghostly voice saying, ‘Close
that door!’
Papa tottered off to bed soon afterward and Mama went
in for her shower. That’s when the twins pounced on Chick.
He blushed and stammered. He hadn’t meant to hurt their
feelings.
‘But why did you look like that?’
‘I just didn’t know you had that little guy in there with you.
It surprised me. Then I didn’t want to lean on him. I thought
it might hurt him.’
The matching faces were as grey as old meat. ‘What little
guy?’
‘That one, asleep there,’ and Chick pointed. Which is how
the twins discovered that they were pregnant for sure.
‘We’re not going to sit waiting in that fucking infirmary tent
with all those slimy norms drooling at us!’ So Elly said. Iphy
pointed out that Doc P. refused to see them otherwise, and
they had no choice.
‘Come with us. Oly. Stay with us when she examines us.
We’re scared of her.’
So we sat on folding chairs against the sunlit canvas wall
and listened to the flies buzzing high up around the center
pole, and to the twittering of the dozen or so amputees who
were waiting in wheelchairs (if they were past the foot stage)
368 12/01/2015 12:07  369
or on folding chairs if they were still working on fingers and
toes. Chick came and sat beside me with an exotic-bird col-
oring book and a handful of coloring pens, whiling away his
free hour by filling in the eyes on the peacock’s tail with slow,
painstaking blue. ‘Doc P. says this is good for my hands,’
Chick explained. None of Arty’s followers spoke to us but they
all looked at us out of the corners of their eyes. I sat counting
the fading yellow grass blades dying beneath the chairs.
When Doc P.’s nurse finally led us up the steps to the exam-
ining room of the clinic, Doc P. was not pleased to see us.
‘If Chick says you’re pregnant and you’ve missed your
period, there’s no use wasting my time. You’re pregnant.
Anyway, I’m a surgeon, not an obstetrician. Your father is the
one you should talk to. He’s got experience in this field.’
The twins leaned on the examining table, looking humble.
She didn’t ask them to sit down. She sat, thick and puffy white,
masked and gloved, behind her white metal desk, doing spider-
mirror pushups with her fingers touching. I was afraid and the
twins were afraid. Doc P. was not our turf at all.
‘What they wanted,’ I croaked, ‘was to get rid of it.’ The
twins nodded on alternate beats. Doc P. rose up slowly, her
white masked face pushed forward, her thick glass lenses
winking intently.
‘Presumably these talented singers can speak. You have
tongues?’
I glanced at the twins, half-expecting them to shove their
tongues out in dutiful demonstration.
‘Rid of it? Rid of it?’ Doc P. crooned.
The twins nodded in miserable syncopation.
‘And Papa wouldn’t like? Papa wouldn’t do it? No. Papa
369 12/01/2015 12:07  370
would want you to hatch the monster, wouldn’t he? It’s been
years since poor old Al has had a baby to play with, hasn’t it?’
The seeping acid in Dr. Phyllis’s tone wore at my bones,
peeling my teeth. I tugged at Elly’s hand, wanting to leave, but
they were staring at her as she sat back down and clasped her
hands on the desk in front of her.
‘No. I could nip it out of you in five minutes and no harm
done. Don’t think I couldn’t. But I’m not going to, and I’ll tell
you why. I have a contract with your Arturo, and young
Arturo does not wish it. He is looking forward to being an
uncle. It’s not for me to deny Arturo this pleasure. And it’s not
for you to defy him. Drink milk. Eat greens. Your abdominal
muscles are strong. It will be months before you show. And
one last bit of healthful advice. Whatever you’ve been doing to
make Arturo angry, stop it.’
We slogged out past the blank-eyed patients waiting to have
their stumps examined.
‘It’s odd,’ Iphy said as we went towards the Chute, ‘that’s
the first time we’ve ever spoken to her.’
‘You never said a word,’ I pointed out.
‘We’ve never had anything to do with her or Arty’s crowd.
Don’t they make you feel strange? They’re always around,
underfoot. That slum camp stretches for acres, but we don’t
really know what they’re doing or why. Should we find out?
Are you going to vomit? Elly?’
And Elly did, in the dust between the refrigerator truck and
the cat wagon.
‘I was going home for lunch,’ said Chick, ‘when the twins went
boo from behind the cat wagon. I didn’t know they were there.
370 12/01/2015 12:07  371
They got mixed up with the cats in my head. Elly said I would
pick that little guy out of their belly. Iphy too. They wanted me
to. I felt kind of surprised thinking maybe I could help them,
do something for them, not just moving furniture. Then I felt
around, reached in to see what it was like inside, see if I could
do it. I try not to go inside people. Sometimes it happens by
accident, like sitting on their lap that little guy came out at me!
That’s what I do for Doc P. and I try not to do it the rest of the
time. But the little guy is there, all right. I told them I couldn’t
do anything to the little guy, that you’d told me specially not
to, not to do anything to get the little guy out of them. Iphy
went away into herself but Elly scared me.’
‘How?’ asked Arty. ‘Did she yell? Or think hate thoughts?
She didn’t hit you, did she?’
‘No. She pushed OUT, like a thing that won’t die.’
‘Did you ever get any lunch? No? Those girls in the office
made pie. Cut me a slice too. And let’s see if you can tell
whether I want banana cream or chocolate.’
‘Arty, I can’t do that.’
‘Try.’
‘You know I can’t.’
From the files of Norval Sanderson:
Chaos rules – midway shut down for the first time in years –
Arturo in a genuine frenzy – sweating heavily at the radio
transmitter in his van – speaking calmly while his whole
body twitches, jerks and writhes in his chair. His shorts and
a green velvet shirt, sodden black with sweat, the vinyl of his
seat smeared with sweat, Arty’s bald pate dripping sweat
371 12/01/2015 12:07  372
into his eyes. Little Oly stands by with an endless supply of
tissues to mop his face, wipe his eyes. She runs errands. His
voice stays clear, unhurried, precise as it goes out over the
transmitter.
Big Binewski pops in and out with his mustache tan-
gled – the mother’s collapsed in bed with a redhead in
attendance – the youngest, Chick, is out with the posse –
Arty, at the radio, is in direct contact with fifteen vehicles
full of Binewski guards and other show employees – all
looking for the twins, Electra and Iphigenia, who have run
away from home.
Oly, the faithful watchdog, insists that the twins have
been abducted. Oly keeps trying to shoo me out of the van,
away from Arty, but I see enough. For example – Arty is
sending the posse to clinics and doctors – the addresses
found for him by Oly, who leafs through a stack of local
phone books that may cover three states. Oly is getting testy
at not being able to get rid of me and Arty evidently doesn’t
care. I decide to let her shoo me. This looks like an all-day
session.
Finally she nods me off to the door as though to give me
a private word. Turns out she is changing tactics – wants me
to go check on Crystal Lil, see if the old broad is still alive,
and then – Oly the cool one – would I just drop in on the
Admitted Office and see that the Arturans stay calm in the
face of this unexpected interruption of routine? Arty is
saying, ‘Chick, are you hearing me? What about the nurse
practitioner service I gave you? . . . Should be within a mile
of where you are now . . . ’ with the voice of men discussing
mild weather.
372 12/01/2015 12:07  373
Standing on the step, I look down at Oly – teasing her
that I may change my mind and come back in after all. Tell
me, Oly, why is Arty so upset? I’ve never seen him like this!’
She shrugs her hump and twists her frog mouth into a
pained grin, ‘Family. The Binewskis are big on family.’
I stroll over to the redheads’ dormitory trailers. They are
deserted except for buxom Bella, with a chaw in her jaw,
perched in an open door so she can spit at the next trailer
while painting her toenails.
Bella snorts at the twins’ absence – explains that they’ve
gone off with Rita (the redhead) and Rita’s sweetie, McFee,
in McFee’s elderly pickup. The twins are knocked up,
explains Bella, ‘probably by that pus sack, the Big Man’ –
and the girls are looking to get ‘scraped out’ (searching for
an abortion) despite ‘His Armlessness, His Almighty
Leglessness’ having forbid it.
****Redheads reading magazines in the Binewski van say
Crystal Lil is asleep on pills.
****The Arturan office queen, Miz Z., unperturbed, has her
battalion of campers contemplating their stumps and med-
itating on P.I.P. (Peace, Isolation, Purity) – generally
lollygagging in the sun and oblivious of the situation on the
other side of the fence. As long as lunch and supper happen,
they won’t notice.
****Randy J. – a Binewski guard and ex-Marine who was
driving the van when the twins were located. Randy says it
was an OB-Gyn office – Chick spotted the pickup and the
Rita redhead smoking a cigarette out front. The vigilantes
busted in . . .
373 12/01/2015 12:07  374
‘They were up on the table on their hands and knees,
bare ass sticking up in the air kind of pitiful with the nurse
getting ’em ready. See us, they about go to the moon, jump
down screaming, try to break out the window. I scared
they’d hurt themselves, catch hell from the boss. But, Jesus,
that little bugger, Chick, steps through and looks at ’em,
down they go to sleep in a pile on the floor. We just sort
through for arms and legs, tote ’em out to the van and the
nurse and the doc dithering behind us. Rita and McFee
gone. Jumped in that beat-up old Dodge and gone. Know
they’re in up to their ass, see?
‘Them twins sleep sweet in the back all the way here.
That boy Chick did something. Some hypnotism, maybe.
Tell you, it scared the shit outa me. You shoulda seen it!’
Which I assume, means that the twins fainted. They’re
locked in their trailer under guard now as we move on.
Arty is laid up. He’s staying in his trailer van. He’s got a
bandage across one ear and on the cheek on the same side,
and a thick dressing on his neck just below that ear. A thin
scratch on his chest is visible – just the end of it – at the edge
of his shirt collar. He is NOT explaining the damage. He’s
moody – an anger that alternates with what I suspect is grief
All very controlled, of course. He discusses philosophy.
Talks Arturism. Nothing personal allowed.
Oly, his maid of all work, is running constantly between
Arty’s van and the twins.
The twins are jailed in their van, incommunicado.
The redheads say (buxom Bella, jouncing Jennifer, and
Vicki) that Arty went into the twins’ van just as they were
374 12/01/2015 12:07  375
coming around – waking up from their capture at the
doctor’s office.
‘His Armlessness, the Mighty Fin, was gonna read ’em
the riot act. He’s all high and mighty and they flipped out on
him.’
‘Just Elly. She went for him. Tried to bite out his jugular.
Iphy couldn’t stop her. That Elly’s a rocket to Reno when
she’s rolling.’
‘He’s in there alone, see. Just the pinky, Oly, to wheel his
chair. Oly screams for the guard and jumps on Elly, trying
to pull her off. You catch her without her sunglasses you’ll
see. Oly’s got a doozy of a shiner.’
‘A week off is what they’re saying. First time this show’s
been closed down that long in more than eighteen years. I
can use it. Fine by me.’
Caught Chick crushing ants today in the dust. Shocked me.
He’s very gentle, usually. I’ve seen him watch his feet not to
step on a bug. Feels terrible if he kills one by accident. I
went out to check on the fly farm and heard a muffled
thumping around back. There was Chick, dancing and
stamping on a small anthill. His face red, eyes glaring, res-
piration fast. When he saw me he stopped, stood still,
looked down at the ground around his feet and burst out
bawling. Scrawny ten-year-old kid, wailing like his heart
was boiling out through his ears.
I picked him up and took him over to the water tank.
Dabbed my hanky under the tap and washed his face and
waited for the storm to ease. He leaned on my knee and
375 12/01/2015 12:07  376
tried to get a grip on himself. Touched my own crusty heart,
I admit. Brave little bastard. Finally started asking questions
but got little out of him.
Total gist: He tries ‘to be good and help but it seems like
everything turns out wrong’ and he’s ‘no good to anybody
and ends up hurting instead of helping people.’ Pretty heavy
load for a tyke.
I beat the bush, working around some of the wild stories
they tell about him in the midway. He got embarrassed.
Clammed up. At last he says, ‘They can’t figure out why all
the other kids are special and I’m not. They make stuff up,
crazy stuff, so I’ll seem special too.’
Maybe this crew is getting to me. Maybe I sat too close
to too many big explosions and the miniature ruptures in
my brain are spreading over to dementia pugilistica. Maybe
it’s just me being contrary.
The hell of it is, Chick’s explanation was a replica of what
I’ve been telling myself all along. But, when he told me pre-
cisely that, I didn’t believe a word of it. What the hell does
he do with that fat spider Doc P.? How come a ten-year-old
kid runs the anesthetic for every operation? Some of the
stump folks claim it’s just air coming through the mask and
that the real painkiller is Chick himself. How many times
have I heard people claim that their pain disappears the
instant Chick comes near them? I’ve had no discomfort
during my surgery but I never noticed anything about Chick.
He’s just there. I’ll pay closer attention next time.
Here I am trying to make a case for healing powers or
mental fingers or some such hog wallop. The kid’s a color-
less little drudge with an inferiority complex at not being a
376 12/01/2015 12:07  377
freak like his brother and sisters. He overcompensates with
an idiot sensitivity halfway to martyrdom. The perfect
patsy. Anything to please. Christ knows, anybody with
Arty for a brother is in deep water trying to preserve his
self-esteem.
So – the kid says he thinks when he dies all the crea-
tures he has ever hurt will be waiting for him, looking at
him, still hurting from the hurt he laid on them . . . Says he
was walking along ‘just now’ and stepped on a lone ant
before he noticed it ‘Failed again as usual’ seems to be his
feeling. So he flips off the rails and goes beserk on the
anthill.
Ike Thiebault, the guard, sits on a folding yellow plastic
deck chair next to the door of the twins’ van. He nods
peaceably at everyone entering or leaving the Binewski van
or Arty’s van. The portable ‘porch’ or platform on which
Ike sits has steps at one end, a ramp for Arty’s chair on the
side, and is supposed to have a reticuled flex tunnel over it
to keep out the weather. The Binewskis never get around to
setting up the tunnel.
Today – 10 A . M . or so – jouncing Jenny, the redhead
who complains about having to color her ‘honey-blond’
hair, comes up the step with an armload of magazines and
catalogues.
‘Ike, honey, these are for the twins. I got to deliver ’em,’
she says. Ike, who is halfway through a self-help book
promising him a method for making money in his spare
time, stands up, embarrassed.
‘Nobody goes in, Jenny. That’s my orders.’
377 12/01/2015 12:07  378
‘These are catalogues that just got here in the mail bag.
It’s just clothes and knickknacks. No harm. The twins want
’em to shop from.’ Jenny is rolling her bare golden shoulder
at Ike and being gently provocative. Ike is far from immune
but locked into his duty.
‘Only ones can go in or out is Miss Oly and Mr. Arty.
That’s my orders.’
‘Well, Ike, you take ’em in. It don’t matter. The girls want
them catalogues. Ordered ’em six weeks ago. You take ’em
in.’
‘Jenny, you’ll think I’m a fool but I can’t. I can’t go in
myself.’
‘You can’t knock on the door and stand outside and hand
in a few catalogues?’ Jenny’s eyebrows, plucked to whispers,
are expressing delicate but scornful disbelief. Ike takes
offense.
‘Listen, you knock on Arty’s door and ask him.’
Jenny backs down immediately. ‘I’ll just leave ’em here,
Ike. If Miss Oly goes in you ask her kindly would she take
these catalogues to her sisters.’
2 P . M . Midway swinging noisily in background.
Crystal Lil trips eagerly out of the door of the Big B van
with a hunk of sea-green cloth in her hands. Lil has recently
gone over to ‘sensible walking shoes’ as part of her
‘Grandma’ image but she hasn’t adjusted to the low heels
and still tends to tiptoe. This is the first time I’ve seen her
wear her spectacles out of the van. She looks energetic and
cheery and has, no doubt, just popped an upper or two. She
378 12/01/2015 12:07  379
reaches to knock on the twins’ door and poor Ike, the
guard, hauls himself out of his deck chair stuttering.
‘Beg your pardon, ma’am . . . ’ and the rest I can’t hear.
It’s obvious he won’t let her in to see the twins. She’s incred-
ulous. He’s embarrassed. It’s one thing to turn away a
redhead and another thing entirely to refuse the Boss Mom.
Her body stiffens as his message becomes real to her. She is
suddenly very old, three hundred years’ worth of iron-
spined Bostonian motherhood. He withers, shuffling, unable
to look at her, apparently referring her to Arty. She marches
to Arty’s door with the blue-green cloth trailing, revealing its
form as it flaps behind her – a two-necked, four-armed
maternity dress, its hem pitched sketchily in place, its seams
unfinished. Arty’s door stays closed. No answer. Lil bunches
the dress in her fists and lurches back to her own van. Her
hair strikes me as grey today, rather than white.
379 12/01/2015 12:07  380
22
Nose Spites Face, Lip Disappears
Arty ordered the twins’ tent broken down. Zephir McGurk set
to figuring how to use the materials to enlarge Arty’s tent. The
twins’ stage truck remained, closed up for travel. The big
piano gathered dust.
Crystal Lil was upset. Papa spent hours trying to calm her.
She said the twins had been ‘closed down’. He used the word
‘sabbatical’.
‘They’ll have their hands full with the baby.’ He’d say,
‘Remember how tired you got? They’re strong enough, but,
Lily, they’re beginning to show. They can’t be on stage with a
bulging belly. We’d have riots in the tents. Investigations.’
‘Al, they’re not yet nineteen years old. If they stop working
now, they’ll drift. They shouldn’t be idle. And why can’t I see
them? They need me.’
‘It’s an adjustment period for them. Settling to the idea of
motherhood.’
‘Sounds like something Arty would say.’
*
380 12/01/2015 12:07  381
The security booth looking into Arty’s big room was my
responsibility again. The cot had been moved out and only the
tall stool and the gun occupied the bare cubicle. I could still
smell the medicine and sweat and the faint reek of decay that
the Bag Man had left behind. I arranged myself on the stool
and stared through the one-way glass into Arty’s big room.
Gradually my legs, in fact my whole ass, went to sleep. Numb
and useless. But I was lucky. It was spewing rain outside and
Arty’s cuddler for the evening was sitting on the propane tank
under his window holding a soggy hunk of newspaper over her
hair. By the time he let her in she would look like a smeared
possum rather than the tight-bunned little cunt notcher she
was. I forget her name. They were all Didi or Lisa or Suki in
those days. He’d pick them out of the norm screamers at the
gate when he came through after his show. They’d be jumping
and howling for a look at him as he came out the back of the
stage truck in his golf cart. He’d lean back, grin lots of teeth
around the control bulb in his mouth, and drive past the chain-
link fence to let them see him. If he stopped the cart I, or one
of the security guards, would get his instructions.
‘The one in the pink halter top,’ he’d say. Or, ‘They’re all
cows in this town. Where are we again?’
‘Great Falls,’ I’d say.
‘Well, get me that rhino in the sequined jump suit and the
ostrich in the red skirt.’
I’d stump over to the fence as he drove off to his van.
‘Me?’ they’d squeal when I waved for them to come up to
the fence.
‘Me?’
I’d leave them to wait, either in the ‘green room,’ as Arty
381 12/01/2015 12:07  382
called McGurk’s station wagon, or on the propane tank out-
side Arty’s window. It was the only chore for Arty that I
preferred letting someone else do.
This particular Lulu was stuck in a filthy January rainstorm
for three hours by my reckoning, because Arty was in confer-
ence with his chief technical advisor, Doc Phyllis.
‘What I’d really like . . . ’ Arty was wallowing on his satin
bedspread, wearing only cotton briefs. His fins plucked and
smoothed the satin. He rolled the bare skin of his head against
the slick, warm fabric and arched his back, digging his shoul-
der blades into the softness.
‘Do tell,’ murmured Doc Phyllis. She lounged in her chair,
one white-stockinged leg and her squeegee shoe flopped over
the arm. Her glasses glittered between her white cap and her
surgical mask. She had a straight shot at Arty and was prob-
ably dissecting his hip and shoulder joints in her head.
‘I’m curious about the possibility of separating the twins,’
Arty said. Dr. Phyllis grunted.
‘Can’t be done. I told you that years ago.’
Arty yawned, wiggling. ‘Well, I thought you’d be keeping up
with new techniques and developments.’
Doc P. was not to be goaded. ‘Nothing to do with tech-
nique. It’s the way they’re built.’
Arty flipped over on his belly and looked straight at her.
‘What if I was willing to sacrifice one twin to keep the other?’
‘Which one?’ inquired Dr. Phyllis sweetly.
Arty smiled. ‘It doesn’t matter.’
Miz Z. was leaving as I came into Arty’s place a few days later.
She waved a folder at me by way of hello and I caught the
382 12/01/2015 12:07  383
words ‘Dime Box’ on the fly. Arty was in his crisp young exec-
utive mode but I asked him about it when she was gone.
‘You remember Roxanne? The motorcycle mechanic in
Dime Box?’
‘Horst’s leather-tit girl with the laugh?’
‘She’s managing the P.I.P. home in Texas. Nine acres outside
of Old Dime Box. It’s only been open to guests for three
months but it’s already getting popular.’
Doc P. and Chick were on their way over so I went into the
security room. I arranged myself on the stool and tried breath-
ing through my mouth to dilute the medicinal smell.
Doc P. was sitting so straight that her plump white spine
never touched the back of the dark padded visitor’s chair.
Chick was lolling on the carpet with one shoe untied and both
socks crumpled down. A small pencil stood on its pointed tip
on his bent knee. The pencil rocked steadily like a metro nome,
broke rhythm for a tiny jig, and then lapsed into a four-four
waltz in the space of a thumbnail on his denim- covered knee.
Arty leaned forward against his desk and examined Chick
thoughtfully. Arty in his grey vest, Arty in his white collared
shirt and black silk tie. Arty with his slim fin bones touching
the gleaming wood of the desk. Arty with his pure round skull
clearly visible beneath the skin and a blue vein ticking above
his ear. He spoke tenderly to Chick.
‘Dr. Phyllis tells me that you aren’t happy about my plan for
the twins.’
Chick’s eyes flicked briefly away from the dancing pencil to
Arty’s face, then back to the pencil. Arty lowered his own
eyes.
‘Tell me about it, Chick.’
383 12/01/2015 12:07  384
Doc P., with her white-gloved hands asleep in her big lap,
blinked calmly at the wall behind Arty and sat very straight in
her chair. The pencil fell off Chick’s knee to the carpet. Chick
sat up and hugged his knees.
‘Not good. Not good, Arty. You know.’
Arty’s face was hot and still with knowing.
‘If you do that,’ Chick stared, amazed, as though he had just
discovered a wonder, ‘I’m not even going to like you, Arty!’
What amazed Chick was no surprise to Arty. Not being
liked was familiar ground and all his usual contrivances went
into gear. His face slid smoothly into a cartoon of sympathy.
‘Why, Chicken Licken, my boy, that’s O.K. That’s quite all
right. Of course your little sensitivities are offended. You can’t
help being a norm, and I sympathize. But it doesn’t matter at
all. No, it doesn’t matter whether you like me or not, my
Chick. Because I like YOU!’
After Chick and Doc P. left I asked Arty what the hell he was
letting Doc P. do to the twins anyway. He answered in an off-
hand, easy way that she was just going to ‘get rid of the
parasite.’ I assumed he meant an abortion and that it was
killing the baby that bothered Chick.
I told him about Chick feeling the baby reach out. Arty
leaned back in his chair and gave me a dose of silence. When
I remember it now I think he was laughing inside as he
watched me argue in a half-assed and maybe halfhearted way
on the wrong track entirely.
‘Go away, Oly,’ he said. He turned to the pile of papers on
his desk with an exhausted look designed to put me lower than
slug slime. It made me mad.
384 12/01/2015 12:07  385
‘Are you swallowing your own line of shit, Arty Binewski?
Aren’t you forgetting that you’re just a two-bit freak with a
gimmick?’
‘Get out,’ he ripped back at me.
I went.
Chick explained sadly that he could not talk to me about the
plan for the twins. Could not and would not. ‘You can make
me cry,’ he said, ‘but you can’t make me talk about that.’
Ashamed, I left him alone.
Arty wouldn’t let me in for a solid week. Miz Z. or one of
her apprentices would come to the door and tell me, ‘Arturo
does not wish to see you.’
The guards wouldn’t let me see the twins during that time.
When I brought their meals, Ike or Mike, or whoever was
perched in front of the twins’ door, would take the tray from
me and give me the dirty tray from the last meal. The notes
that I slipped under the plates, and once actually into a
turkey sandwich, were methodically searched for and found
before my eyes – handed back to me without a word. One of
the Arturan ladies was inside with the twins. The guard
would knock and the ghostie would open the door and trade
trays.
Finally I wrote ‘Uncle’ on a piece of paper and gave it to the
novice who answered Arty’s door. She came back and told me
to go in and make sure the twins were eating and not flushing
their food.
Arty let me do chores again. He didn’t talk to me, though.
He was completely taken up with his ass-sucking followers. I
didn’t try to push him. It struck me hard that he didn’t need
385 12/01/2015 12:07  386
me, that he could shut me out permanently and completely
and never miss me. He had all those others dancing for him.
For me there was only Arty.
He didn’t need us.
I watched that message sink deeper and deeper into the
twins. Elly had always known it but it was news to Iphy. Not
that they talked to me. They didn’t.
I tried to warn them at first. ‘Listen,’ I begged, ‘he’s planning
an abortion.’
They looked at me. Elly barked. A harsh mock of a laugh.
‘Fat chance,’ she said. That was the last she spoke to me.
I was the enemy, or as close to the enemy as they were able
to get for the time. They were silent when I was there. Elly
never spoke. Iphy said ‘please’ and ‘thank you’ when I brought
food and did the cleaning for them. They never ate in front of
me. They were getting very thin. Their eyes had a bludgeoned
depth, burrowing into purple caverns in their faces. They
didn’t dress. They wouldn’t bathe. I didn’t tell Arty. I didn’t
want to bring more trouble on them. As far as I could tell, all
they did was to sit up against the pillows in their big bed all
day. They didn’t read or practice or study. But I saw knowl-
edge grow in Iphy’s face and harden in Elly’s. They knew more
than I did.
I never thought about how wide the twins would be, lying side
by side. A regular stretcher would leave their heads and shoul-
ders dangling off the sides. Doc P. sent four novices to take a
rear door off a van.
We were strapping them onto the door when Elly opened
386 12/01/2015 12:07  387
her eyes and looked at me. A fearful question pushed her dark
eyebrows high. Her pupil contracted in the purple iris but her
lids were heavy and sank, pulling her grooved forehead
smooth as they closed. Doc P. bent over to touch Elly’s throat
with a gloved hand.
‘I wonder,’ I piped nervously, ‘if this is the same door you
did that horse on.’
Doc P.’s white-wrapped head swiveled toward me like a
turret gun.
‘You remember that horse with the rotten feet?’
She nodded at the novices. With one white-robed man at
each corner of the door, they moved forward. They had to tip
the door onto its side to get it out through the door. The twins
hung slack, hair trailing, as they left the van.
Arty was outside, waiting in his chair with a guard beside
him in the dark.
‘Wait. Put the light on them.’
A flashlight clicked a cool white cone into the blackness.
Arty leaned forward to look at the sleeping twins.
‘What’s wrong?’ His voice was harsh. ‘They look terrible!
They’re sick!’
‘What did you expect?’ snapped Doc P. ‘They’ve been
locked inside for months!’
‘But their hair. They could bathe.’ He sounded shrill and
fragile. The novices looked at him anxiously.
‘Arty.’ I touched his shoulder and his face turned away from
the sprawled sleepers. The light went out and then reappeared
further on. Doc P. led the jostling novices down the ramp.
Arty’s chair followed them and I went along.
*
387 12/01/2015 12:07  388
We waited outside while they tipped the twins again to slide
them through the surgery door. Doc P. stepped down for a last
word.
‘I’d like to state again that I consider this an improper
hour for work of this type. I prefer to work at nine or ten A . M .
These predawn hours find the vitality of most patients at its
lowest.’
‘Yeah, well, I wish you hadn’t cold-cocked them!’ Arty’s
voice was ragged.
‘Sedatives.’
‘Get on with it.’
The door closed behind her and Arty’s chair began to roll in
the dark.
‘They’ll take a while to scrub up and get ready,’ he mut-
tered, ‘but I want to get up in place so I can watch the
preparations.’
‘Ah, Arty!’ I groaned, hobbling behind. ‘We can’t watch!
Not this!’ I was still thinking abortion. ‘I can’t watch.’
But he’d rammed his chair wheel into the truck bumper and
was clambering up onto the first step of the narrow stairs that
led to the little theater above the surgery.
‘You don’t have to. I do.’ He hurried upward.
I went away and paced round and round the home vans,
wishing for Mama and Papa, who were snoring in deep coun-
terpoint. I could hear them through the closed windows. I’d
slipped the same drops into their bedtime cocoa as I’d put into
the twins’ milk glasses.
388 12/01/2015 12:07  389
From the personal journal of Norval Sanderson:
Lovable Dr. Phyllis is quite undismayed at having bungled
Electra’s lobotomy. Having reduced that bright creature to
a permanent state resembling the liquid droop of a decayed
zucchini, the good doctor is inspired rather than chagrined.
Dr. Phyllis has a voice like the breeze of Antartica but it is
a young voice – younger than her body, perhaps from being
used so little and so carefully. Now she is talking more often,
to more people. She’s become a glacial evangelist in her new
cause. I see her stalking the Arturan office staff, lecturing stiffly
to the novices, delivering admonitions to the more elevated.
Her message is succinct and pithy: Lobotomy is the ulti-
mate shortcut to P.I.P. Arturo, she claims, is torturing his
followers with prolonged, expensive, gradual amputations.
He is denying, to those who have striven to emulate his
ideal, the efficient, painless, virtually instantaneous access to
Peace, Isolation, and Purity that it is in her power to bestow.
Why wait? asks Doc P. Why itch in places you’ve no longer
got? Cut once! Cut deep! Cut where it counts!
And I’m damned if she isn’t kicking up quite a ruckus.
The novices are mumbling bewilderedly. The elevated are
waving their stumps and asking belligerent questions. Doc
P. is fomenting radical schism in the Arturan Church.
Arty has a revolution to contend with and where is he?
Mooning over his lost love – not Elly, but Iphigenia. He’s
subtle about it. He only inquires half a dozen times a day
about her health and whereabouts. The binoculars set to
swivel on the tripod in his window are, he claims, for keep-
ing an eye on the flock. Never would he use them to watch
389 12/01/2015 12:07  390
the pale Iphy in her painful progress down the row toward
the Chute with her swollen belly pulling her forward while
she struggles to balance the flabby monster that sprouts
from her waist. She sticks one arm straight out for balance
and drags that unreliable leg on the other side.
General opinion about Arty varies, from those who see
him as a profound humanitarian to those who view him as
a ruthless reptile. I myself have held most of the opinions in
this spectrum at one time or another. Watching Arty pine for
Iphy, however, I come to see him as just a regular Joe – jeal-
ous, bitter, possessive, competitive, in a constant frenzy to
disguise his lack of self-esteem, drowning in deadly love,
and utterly unable to prevent himself from gorging on the
coals of hell in his search for revenge.
The estimable Zephir McGurk informs me, in his laconic
way over checkers (a game at which his plodding method-
ical integrity reveals itself unassailable), that Arty had him
design a bugging system that tapped the twins’ van into a
recording device in Arty’s console. He can hear every word,
every move.
I find this depressing. The idea of Arty sitting and listen-
ing to hour after hour of footsteps, s turning, toilet
flushing, comb running through hair. Elly’s conversation had
been reduced to the syllable mmmmmm and Iphy is not in
the mood for song. Her piano is covered with dust (accord -
ing to McGurk) and Arty is listening to her file her nails.
Doc P. is frustrated by the inefficiency of Arty’s method. I
mentioned Arty’s theory of acclimatization and continually
renewed commitment. ‘One respects,’ I said, ‘Arturo’s desire
390 12/01/2015 12:07  391
for complete understanding on the part of the Admitted.
Each elevation being a voluntary step, a considered step,
allows those with hesitations to back out at any time.’
But she started up on how many hours she’d spent
already just taking off my four toes, and she would be hours
in surgery on those remaining, and that would bring me
only to the first level of elevation, while, if she were allowed
to be efficient, she could take me ‘all the way there inside a
single hour on the table.’
Her face became quite damp with her effusions, and her
final outburst fogged her glasses. ‘Now he wants to add on
lobotomy at the end! He’s talking about sending for all the
completions – bringing them back from the rest home a few
at a time so I can do yet another job on them! I’m spending
eight to ten hours every day in surgery. I’m getting an aller-
gic reaction to my gloves – unless it’s the soap. My hands are
scaling and my knuckles are swelling.’
I knew better than to suggest hiring another surgeon to
help her.
She says Iphy is enjoying a fairly normal pregnancy but
may be carrying twins. I asked about Chick, who looks ter-
rible lately. She says he’s depressed and she’s dosing him with
B complex, zinc, and jumping jacks. ‘Exercise is the ultimate
panacea . . . Oxidation of impurity and so on,’ says she.
I talked to Chick in back of the cat wagon this morning. An
old tire lay flat in the dust and he was bouncing on it, his
bare feet planted on opposite sides, his hands on top of his
head, his coveralls flying loose on his thin frame. The
coverall straps lay on his bare shoulders, emphasizing the
391 12/01/2015 12:07  392
skinniness of a neck the size of my wrist. He was polite as
always but thinking of something else. His face turned up to
me had a starved, ancient look. He said he was ‘waiting for
Iphy.’ No, he didn’t have to work today because Doc was
having meetings and giving speeches. (This is the first word
I heard of Doc’s Surgical Strike.)
I wanted to question him about some of the ‘Chick sto-
ries’ going around but Iphy sagged up, lugging the drooling
Elly. Chick hopped off the tire, said ‘So long’ and ran off to
her. He threw an arm around her, tucked his shoulder under
Elly’s armpit to help support her dead weight. They strolled
off, the three. Two? Or do we count the ballooning belly
and call it four?
I saw Arty’s squad marching down the camp so I went
through the fence to catch up. The way he leans forward
gives an illusion of speed as the chair hums and groans over
the dry ruts and dead grass in the Arturan encampment. His
solemn novices don’t dare touch the chair unless he asks
them to.
He stopped at the open door of a dusty sedan with white
rags draped out of the windows to dry. Inside, on the back
seat, lay an elevated male with his arms ending in white-
wrapped bulges at the elbow and one leg ending at the knee.
The plush upholstery of the car lifts a puff of dust every time
the man shifts slightly in the seat.
Arty nodded in at the shadowed face. ‘Do you have what
you need?’
The stump man wriggled, surprised, craning his neck,
‘Arturo, sir?’ His eyes showed their whites in the dimness.
392 12/01/2015 12:07  393
Arty’s scalp was bright in the sunlight. ‘Are you well
treated? Do you need anything?’
‘Well, that boy that’s s’posed to help me . . . not meaning
to whine but he’s always gone. Yesterday, I couldn’t hep it,
I wet myself, and by the time he showed up, damned if I
didn’t have a diaper rash.’
Arty chuckled, nodding. ‘Sounds like you need a replace-
ment. What’s that boy’s name?’
‘Jason. But he’s a good boy. Just young.’
Arty swiveled in his chair and eyed his entourage. A
dozen backs straightened and a dozen faces tried to look
bright and eager.
‘Who’ll serve this elevated man?’ Arty asked. The hands
shot up – all five fingers spread to show their service status.
‘Miss Elizabeth,’ Arty nodded. The woman stepped for-
ward, her white dress bunching over her thickening body.
Her hair bunned on top of her head. Thirty-five. Something
burnt out of her soft face.
‘As you hope to be served?’ Arty asked.
‘In my turn,’ breathed the fingerful, toeful Miss E.
‘When that Jason boy shows, send him to me.’
Miss E. detached herself from the group, climbed into the
front seat of the sedan, and started sorting through a paper
bag full of clothes for clean and dirty.
The elevated man, flat on the back seat, waved his stump
arms and strained his neck in the shade of his washed band-
ages hanging on the windows. ‘As you are!’ shouted the
elevated man. Arty nodded and his chair turned and moved
on.
Doing his rounds, he calls this. It’s a recent development,
393 12/01/2015 12:07  394
probably triggered by the Doc and her agitating. I followed
him from tent to van to pickup trucks with mosquito nets
and sleeping bags in back.
He scolded, sympathized, made peace, moved people
from one job to another, from one campsite to a more
peaceful spot. He talked to the cooks in the big mess tent to
make sure a vegetarian menu was available for those who
wanted it. He sent runners from his platoon of disciples to
give orders or deliver messages. He spent a good three hours
rolling around among the chinless ninnies, the whiners, the
leeches, the simps, and the good people in his congregation.
He ended up back at his own trailer looking very tired and
young. I shoved his chair up the ramp to the deck and
opened his door for him.
‘So you have a strike on your hands,’ I said. He smiled
going in and I followed him. He rolled straight to the desk
and started pushing through papers. ‘I’ve got one rebel on
my flippers,’ he grinned, ‘but I always knew she’d turn one
day. I’m not all that put out.’
‘She’s got you over a barrel if she won’t cut anymore.’
Arty looked at me with a flat smile. ‘I’m not such a fool
as that. I’ve had her training her own replacement for years.’
Iphy braided Elly’s hair so she wouldn’t drool on it. Iphy with
hands like angel wings, combing and polishing the long gleam-
ing strands while Elly lay against her. Elly’s head drooping
forward on the too long, too thin neck, her face blinking emp-
tily at the sofa cushions.
Iphy would wind the long braids into coiled black shells and
pin them over Elly’s ears and then do her own. Then Iphy
394 12/01/2015 12:07  395
would turn the blank, soggy face toward her and sponge it
carefully, brushing the eyebrows smooth and propping the
lower jaw closed with one hand so that, for an instant, it
looked like Elly. Until Iphy let go and the face fell down again.
Horst drove us to the meadow and parked the small van in the
dust-white grass. Mama helped Iphy out and I handed around
the plastic pails.
‘You twins always have flying fingers,’ Mama was chatter-
ing. ‘Flying fingers, but Oly and I will do our part as best we’re
able.’
Horst leaned against the bumper with a stick in case we saw
a snake, but he was soon asleep in the sun like one of his cats.
Mama stood against the dust-covered blackberry banks,
reaching high into the rasping tangles of the thorns and hum-
ming. Iphy’s fingers were not flying. With the arm supporting
Elly she held the bucket against their swollen belly and reached
out with her other hand, dutifully nipping off the warm, dark
berries and ignoring the ragged red lines scratched on her arms
and their legs by the thorns. She was careful with Elly, holding
her away from the bush, staggering awkwardly, catching their
bare ankles in the vines, working slowly. I plodded along, pick-
ing and getting scraped.
The sun pounded down and the dust drifted up, and after a
while Mama’s thin scat voice was far off. Iphy called to me: ‘I
need to sit down.’
She was hanging on to a thick, drooping stalk of vine when
I got to her. I took the bucket and tucked myself under Elly.
The lolling blank face rocked against my head as Iphy slowly
turned. We made our way out of the brambles.
395 12/01/2015 12:07  396
‘On the grass would be fine,’ Iphy said. But I steered her
around past Horst to the narrow shade beside the van. She
sank down and pulled Elly’s head over to lie on her shoulder.
‘I’ll just rest a little. Standing up in the sun . . . ’
Horst was wide awake, blinking and tapping his stick in the
dust, pretending he’d never been asleep. I went back to find
Mama.
Later, at the sink in our van, Mama rinsed the blue stain and
the odd spiders, caterpillars, and stems from the bucket.
‘Not what we usually start with, but we can go again
tomorrow. And this will set up nicely in about six, eight jars.’
The berries were beginning to simmer in the big pot on the
back burner. Mama pushed her dark wooden spoon into the
foaming berries and circled the wall of the pot slowly.
I leaned my hot arms on the table and said, ‘Iphy better not
go tomorrow. She got tired today.’ I was smelling the berries
and Mama’s sweat, and watching the flex of the blue veins
behind her knees.
‘Does them good. The twins always loved picking berries,
even more than eating them. Though Elly likes her jam.’
‘Elly doesn’t like anything anymore.’
The knees stiffened and I looked up. The spoon was
motionless. Mama stared at the pot.
‘Mama, Elly isn’t there anymore. Iphy’s changed. Every thing’s
changed. This whole berry business, cooking big meals that
nobody comes for, birthday cakes for Arty. It’s dumb Mama.
Stop pretending. There isn’t any family anymore, Mama.’
Then she cracked me with the big spoon. It smacked wet
and hard across my ear, and the purple-black juice sprayed
396 12/01/2015 12:07  397
across the table. She stared at me, terrified, her mouth and eyes
gaping with fear. I stared gaping at her. I broke and ran.
I went to the generator truck and climbed up to sit by
Grandpa. That’s the only time Mama ever hit me and I knew
I deserved it. I also knew that Mama was too far gone to
understand why I deserved it. She’d swung that spoon in a
tigerish reflex at blasphemy. But I believed that Arty had
turned his back on us, that the twins were broken, that the
Chick was lost, that Papa was weak and scared, that Mama
was spinning fog, and that I was an adolescent crone sitting in
the ruins, watching the beams crumble, and warming myself in
the smoke from the funeral pyre. That was how I felt, and I
wanted company. I hated Mama for refusing to see enough to
be miserable with me. Maybe, too, enough of my child heart
was still with me to think that if she would only open her eyes
she could fix it all back up like a busted toy.
A redhead went tripping by, red heels stabbing the dust. She
looked at me. Her mouth opened to say something, but then
she looked away and minced on.
I decided I would go down to where the swallowers were
parked and talk to the Human Pin-Cushion. I’d been watch-
ing him for weeks. I was nursing this fantasy that maybe he
would like to run away with me and join up with some other
show, some simp-twister, spook-house show that wintered in
Florida and took life easy. I could talk them in for the Pin Kid
and do his cooking and his costumes, and run the light-and-
sound board for his act. A young Pin-Cushion, just striking out
on his own, could do worse than have me for a partner. And,
if I worked hard, he’d let me sleep with my arms and legs
wrapped around him all night. The Pin Kid seemed to like me
397 12/01/2015 12:07  398
too. He laughed at my jokes and actually came looking for me
once when I was rubbing Arty down.
You’d think dwarfs and midgets would have drifted through
the Fabulon all my life. It was actually, though accidentally,
very rare for me to see anyone like me. We’d had the usual
monkey girls and alligator guys and an endless migrating herd
of fat folks and giants.
Mama often said that fat folks went out of style because
every tenth ass on the street now was wider than the one in the
tent. Folks could see it free on any block. Giants were also out
of work owing, according to Mama, to basketball and the drugs
they fed to babies to make them tall enough to play the game.
‘It goes in streaks. But some things never go out of fashion.’
Hunger artists, fat folks, giants, and the dog acts come and go
but real freaks never lose their appeal.
It so happened that the Pin Kid who had joined up with our
current pack of swallowers was a hunchback. He had regular
arms and legs and a great torch of red hair. He was fragile as a
glass swan, fine-skinned with freckles, brown eyes, and a clear,
honest face. His name was Vinnie Sweeney. He was only twenty
years old and he’d been working for years with other acts,
trying to save enough money to get his own tent and trailer.
From the journal of Norval Sanderson:
Lily is winking conspiratorially at me. She proceeds to dust
and polish the lids and jars on the counter. The maggots
appreciate it, no doubt. An old line comes to me: ‘Lovely
you are, and kind to the tender young of ravening lions.’
398 12/01/2015 12:07  399
She took a walk with Iphy today, she says. She seems to
be ignoring the existence of what remains of Elly – doesn’t
mention her at all. Is completely taken up with ‘my grand-
child,’ and its current protuberant form.
‘I swan!’ says Lily, making me think of times past when
she must have, in fact, swanned. Crystal Lil ‘swans to good-
ness’ that Iphy’s child is twins and wouldn’t it be a miracle
and a blessing if it was Siamese twins? She (Lily) says Iphy
is far too big for a six-month pregnancy. Iphy says the only
thing she wants is to see Arty. Lil asks if I will speak to Arty
about it. ‘The boy’s so busy I don’t see him myself except
across the camp or if I should peep in at showtime and
catch his act.’
399 12/01/2015 12:07  400
23
The Generalissimo’s Big Gun
From the files of Norval Sanderson:
(Iphigenia, pregnant, hugging the lobotomized Elly on the
sofa in the twins’ van – conversation with N.S.)
‘Oly has a boyfriend? Oly and the Pin Kid? How could
she have time for that? She’s always with Arty.
‘I almost had a boyfriend once. Elly would have let me.
She thought it was O.K. She shut down when I talked to him.
Whenever he came around, she’d cut her voltage way back
and stay quiet. She wanted me to go ahead and love him.
‘He was just a geek. He was clean between his shows.
Laundry, hospital corners on the sheets when he made his
bunk up. He was a poor boy, he said, so he knew how to
take care of himself. I thought how good it would be . . . like
you’d be proud to clean and cook for a man who knew how
to clean and cook. It would feel right taking care of a man
who could take care of himself.
400 12/01/2015 12:07  401
‘But he was a norm. At first I thought he was pretty even
though he was a norm. But it grows on you. After a while
it was his being such a norm that got to me, touched me . . .
I don’t know. Like colors or a spring tree against that kind
of blue sky that pulls your heart out through your eyes.
Pretty things will swarm you like that, like your heart was
a hive of electric bees. He was like that, the geek boy. He
made normal seem beautiful to me. And Elly said it was
O.K. She wanted me to. So I did. I saw him and was happy.
Then I wanted to talk to him and she let me. Then I
couldn’t be happy unless I was near him, unless he was talk-
ing to me.
‘He laughed a lot and told silly jokes and was going away
to college in the fall He had such a wonderful time being the
geek. And he had long, perfect teeth. The redheads called
him a darling.
‘He started paying attention to me. He would come and
find us and talk to me. Not to Elly but to me. He’d bring his
lunch in a bag and sit by us. He’d wait outside in the morn-
ing and walk us to practice. But he talked just to me. He
told me things about himself. Sweet, sad things. And Elly
damped herself way down.
‘And a terrible thing happened. He seemed to forget
about her. He forgot she was part of me. That was what
we’d meant to happen. Elly was glad. She’d crow in bed at
night. He touched me. He’d put his hand on my hair, gently.
He took my hand. I saw it in his eyes, so I stopped it. Elly
was mad. She bit me on the inside of my arm until we both
cried. But she wanted to get me away from Arty. She didn’t
care about the boy at all. She wanted me to love somebody
401 12/01/2015 12:07  402
else than Arty. You know Elly. She figured I was going to
love somebody whether she liked it or not and she decided
she could handle anybody but Arty. Arty is too much for
her.
‘She was mad when I stopped. I couldn’t help it. It was
a thing that cracked and spilled in my head. Elly understood
but she was mad. I know better now. I’ll never let it happen
again.
‘He started to love me, you see? He was so pure, like that
leaf against the sky. I don’t mean he was naive or innocent
or a virgin or even a virtuous boy, though he was nice, but
that he was purely, from tip to toe, from nose to tail,
absolutely what he was. That was normal with a big N.
That was what I loved. But when the look in his eye
changed, I realized, if there’s one thing a healthy, beautiful,
utterly normal boy does not do, it’s fall in love with half a
pair of Siamese twins.
‘That’s how I learned. It’s O.K. for me to love a norm
like that. But if he comes to loving me it’s because I’ve
twisted him and changed him. If he loves me he’s corrupted.
I can’t love him anymore. I won’t pretend it didn’t hurt.’
(Arty – conversation with N.S.)
‘There are those whose own vulgar normality is so appar-
ent and stultifying that they strive to escape it. They affect
flamboyant behavior and claim originality according to the
fashionable eccentricities of their time. They claim brains or
talent or indifference to mores in desperate attempts to deny
their own mediocrity. These are frequently artists and per-
formers, adventurers and wide-life devotees.
402 12/01/2015 12:07  403
‘Then there are those who feel their own strangeness and
are terrified by it. They struggle toward normalcy. They
suffer to exactly that degree that they are unable to appear
normal to others, or to convince themselves that their aber-
ration does not exist. These are true freaks, who appear,
almost always, conventional and dull.’
(Arturo in response to critics)
‘It’s interesting that when these individuals choose – and
it is their choice always – to endure voluntary amputations
for their own personal benefit, society professes itself
shocked and disapproving. Yet this same society respects the
concept that any individual should risk total annihilation in
war, subject to the judgement of any superior officer at all
and for purposes ranging from a promotion for the lieu-
tenant to higher profits for the bullet company. Hell, they
don’t just respect that idea, they flat expect it. And they’ll
shoot your ass if you don’t go along with it.’
N.S.: If you could make it happen by snapping your fingers,
wouldn’t you want your whole family to be physical and
mentally normal?
Oly: That’s ridiculous! Each of us is unique. We are
masterpieces. Why would I want us to change into assembly-
line items? The only way you people can tell each other apart
is by your clothes. (Miss Olympia begins to giggle and
refuses to answer seriously to further questions.)
Zephir McGurk’s love life took place in his safari car with the
khaki canvas shades pulled down all around. If surplus females
403 12/01/2015 12:07  404
arrived on Arty’s doorstep, or if one didn’t appeal to Arty
(whose taste, when you come right down to it, was for stan-
dard pneumatic types with commercial grooming products), he
would send her on to McGurk. Arty’s line wasn’t particularly
imaginative. He would give her the old ‘If you would do me a
great service, console my trusted lieutenant in his spartan ded-
ication’ routine.
It evidently worked often enough to keep McGurk healthy
and even-tempered. McGurk was such a gent that nobody
who went tap-tapping at his windshield in the dark after the
midway was closed ever went screeching in fear or pain or
shame through the camp before dawn. There were occasional
exits like that from Arty’s van, but the guards would catch
them and calm them and give them hush money.
McGurk’s little trysts were always discreet. He was never
seen with female company and he was never late to work. We
figured he escorted them to the gates and kissed their hands
adieu before first light. Arty claimed that McGurk actually fed
them to Horst’s cats, but that was Arty. McGurk was silent on
the subject and would not be baited.
Once, when I was in trouble and pacing the camp in the
dark, I did hear something. But I had maggot brains that
night and may have imagined half of it and misunderstood the
rest.
I’d gone to cool my face on Grandpa’s urn. I was lying on
the hood of the generator truck with my face against the silver
loving cup that held the old Binewski ashes and served as a
hood ornament. Whoever drove the generator truck would
always complain that the wind whistled through the urn’s
404 12/01/2015 12:07  405
handles like a siren at any speed past thirty-five. Al just said,
‘Tough’ and that was that.
On the hottest night Grandpa seemed to cool off before
anything else. Leaning a cheek or my forehead against the urn
felt like packing ice in my burning brain. So there I was, fin-
ished blubbering but still half loony, leaning my face on the
urn, when I heard something. It came from McGurk’s safari
car, parked just ahead of me. I could have spit on his bumper.
It was a rough, strangled sound and I figured it must be
McGurk’s climax song. But it kept going on. It scared me. I
thought someone was dying. I remembered what Arty said
about McGurk’s feeding his women to the cats, and I thought
he was strangling somebody. Then I heard a word in his own
voice. ‘Please,’ he said. Then the ropy, gurgling sound started
again. He was crying. For a minute there was another voice,
softer and smooth – quick. I couldn’t tell what she was say -
ing. Then McGurk again, desperate, almost shouting. ‘Don’t
you see? There’ll be nothing left of you that I can get a grip
on!’ Then the soft woman’s voice drifted monotonously
among McGurk’s ugly sobs. I got down and went away from
there.
There were promotions scheduled for next morning. Four
women were due to ‘complete their liberation.’ All had aban-
doned their legs entirely and were left with arms only from the
elbow up. They were ready to shed their arms at the shoulder.
These liberations were supposed to take place between 8 and
11 A . M . Dr. Phyllis would spend the afternoon whittling on fin-
gers and toes.
I figured McGurk’s lady had to be one of those who were
doing arms. I thought about going to the line outside the
405 12/01/2015 12:07  406
infirmary early to try to figure out which one it might be. I
decided against it. I didn’t want to know.
McGurk seemed the same as usual that day and every day
afterward. That’s why I say I may have misunderstood or
imagined the whole thing.
Up on the roof of the van, Arty flopped in exhaustion. ‘Hey,
oil me, Oly. Will you?’
It was scary to have him ask. I crouched over him, rubbing
my fingertips into the knotted tension of his neck and
shoulders.
‘You’re ugly, brother, and you’ve got rigor mortis from the
nipples up.’
His eyes closed and his face relaxed slightly.
‘Silence, anus,’ he responded ritually. He took a long, slow
breath and held it before he spoke again. ‘I think Elly’s coming
back some, don’t you?’
‘She doesn’t flop as much. Maybe not as limp as she was?’
‘Yeah. I think she’ll come back some. Not like before,
though.’
‘Maybe Iphy’s just learning to handle her better. Balance
and support.’
He shook his head against the mat, eyes clenched shut.
‘No. She’s coming back. Just takes time. She’ll be able to
help take care of the baby.’
‘Maybe. You know, Chick could help you sleep nights. You
look about three hundred years old.’
‘Chick doesn’t like me. I wouldn’t want to tempt him.’
‘He’s still sore about Elly.’
‘And other things. Another chore. He’ll do it, though. And
Papa’s mad at me. He says we’ll kill the whole outfit by hanging
406 12/01/2015 12:07  407
it all on one novelty act. That’s what he’s calling my show
lately. A novelty act. He says my “fans” will pass away when
some new fad hits the air. Mama is mad too but she pretends
not to be.’
‘You’re a creep, I guess.’
‘Did you ever wish you were dead?’
‘Not lately.’
‘Guess it’s you and the Pin Kid, hunh?’
I stopped kneading his spine and looked at his shadowed
profile. He looked like a sleeping hieroglyph against the blan-
ket. I forced my thumbs to rotate so he wouldn’t notice.
Down the line I could see Mama outside the Chute. She was
folding a dust cloth and talking to someone still inside the
door of the Chute. It was Iphy, walking out huge and awk-
ward. Elly’s head tucked into Iphy’s throat, the cloth billowing
around the frail legs beneath them, the belly balanced in front
of them.
‘I can see Iphy. She looks like an old car.’ Mama and Iphy
tottered out of sight.
‘The Pin Kid seems O.K. You could do worse. Do you
reckon you’ll leave?’ His eyes were open now, his neck twisting
to let the eyes touch me. His eyes were grey, very pale. I pinched
his round, hard buttock, slapped his back sharp and loud.
‘Trash! Stuff it, Arty.’
He closed his eyes again. ‘I’m gonna cut down to three
shows a week. Saturday, Sunday, Wednesday, eight P . M . Flat.’
‘Papa will flip.’
‘That’ll give him his carnival back the rest of the time.’
‘Mama will think you’ve fallen to the vilest depths of
leisure.’
407 12/01/2015 12:07  408
‘Oly . . . stick by me. How about it?’
His eyes were open again, looking straight at a fold of blan-
ket in front of him. The big chain-link fence was below us on
one side of the van. It stretched a long way and the Arturan
camp sprawled out from it in a refugee confusion.
‘I’m gonna stick a broom,’ I muttered grimly, ‘up your ass,
brother, and peddle you as an all-day sucker.’
Massaging the twins on the sea-green carpet of their front
room, crawling around on my knees to reach the peculiar junc-
ture of the split spine, the small of their backs that was actually
much wider, nearly two backs wide.
‘Sorry I can’t quite lie on my stomach.’
‘It’s O.K., Iphy. Does that hurt?’
‘Hurts good.’
Elly stretched limply away from Iphy, folded oddly across
Iphy’s side.
‘No wonder your back’s bitching, getting pulled in different
directions by Elly and the belly.’
Iphy’s pale face softened in pleasure. ‘Elly, belly, weak as
jelly.’
‘Arty thinks Elly’s coming back some,’ I said.
‘Does it make him feel better?’
‘Do you think she is?’
‘Sometimes. For a second. No more. That’s good. Now
work on Elly.’
I inched slowly up Elly’s arms and shoulders, probing,
stretching, lifting, rotating but feeling how much of her muscle
was gone into soupy flab like the dismal mush in her skull.
‘Iphy?’
408 12/01/2015 12:07  409
She blinked awake.
‘Having that baby inside . . . ’ I held Elly’s neck in my fingers
and felt the strong hammer of her blood. ‘Is it bad or good?’
Iphy blinked again. ‘Good. Inside me is good. The bad is
outside.’
‘Arty’s not happy.’
‘I know.’ Her tone was peculiar. Something familiar made
me look up. She was absolutely twinkling. She pulled her lips
flat, widening her grin grotesquely. She tipped her head back,
let her eyes droop to slits. The colored beads of her eyeballs
slid from side to side and her voice rolled out in Arty’s
pompous, patronizing bell of power: ‘Happiness! Happiness,
I tell you! Are you listening? Happiness? You Poor Paralyzed
and Constipated Dung Chutes! Happiness is Not the POINT!’
I fell down laughing and Iphy laughed and we rolled gig-
gling and kicking on the thick softness of the carpet, tangling
hilariously with the flopping, laughless Elly until I hurt all over
from laughing and kind Iphy stretched away from her drag-
ging belly trying to breathe but was caught by the laughter
again and again.
‘Whyever,’ she gasped, hee-heeing. ‘However,’ she ha-ha’d,
‘could we love??’ which set her off again and me with her,
chortling, ‘love him!!’ and screaming with the sunburst air of
laughter and pounding our heels on the carpet and kicking our
heels toward the ceiling until we both collapsed, exhausted,
into feeble titters. Only Iphy had the strength at last to shout,
‘He’s such a SIMP!’ which set us off again.
I went to tell the Pin Kid that he and I were washed up. Kaput.
Finito. He was lounging on his bed of nails while he worked
409 12/01/2015 12:07  410
some new spots around his belly button with the needles. I
hunkered beside him, watching him lift a flap of skin and
shove the big pin through, then hold the flap in one hand,
twiddling the knob at the needle head idly as he waited for the
thin trickle of blood to dry up.
‘Ya know, Vinnie,’ I said, ‘I decided to stay with my
brother.’ It was hard for me. A swallower girl was hanging
freshly laundered curtains on the backdrop nearby. Some of
the kids were throwing things into the air and not letting them
hit the ground, juggling practice, with a scratchy tape blaring
Mozart or something.
I watched the gem-sharp face of the Pin Kid absorbed in his
own white skin. I looked hard to see if I’d hurt him. Maybe my
whole life was set in that instant. I was a sixteen-year-old freak
brat. If he’d said anything – a word might have been enough,
‘Don’t,’ or a crease of the brow, a shadow of pain in his eyes
could have seduced me. The pain I was looking for in him
would have been my excuse, my motive, my escape tunnel to
the world beyond the Binewskis.
But he half smiled in puzzlement. His eyes felt the pebbled
gut of a fast creek, bright and open and empty but willing to
be full.
‘Well . . . sure,’ he said. As though he’d never imagined any-
thing else for me.
‘I mean,’ I said, frowning until my glasses slipped and my
bare pink eyes popped into the light at him, ‘I mean always.’
I stopped because he was rolling off the nails and he’d for-
gotten to pull the big needle from his belly skin and the thin
red blood was spattering his cut-off jeans. When he turned
away from me, reaching for a shirt, I could see the rash of tiny
410 12/01/2015 12:07  411
pockmarks from the nail points reddening his lovely arched
back, his curving graceful hump with the brightness of blood
barely restrained at the surface of his white skin.
‘Well, Oly . . . Well, sure . . . Hey, Arturo, he needs you.’ This
Vinnie, the Pin Kid, was a nice boy. Even half-choked with dis-
gust he tried not to hurt me.
That’s when it clicked that the mechanics of my life were
not going to run on the physics that ruled the twins or Mama
in her day. If I bled it didn’t mean what Iphy’s blood meant. If
I loved it wasn’t the same as Iphy’s love or the love of bouncy
girls in the midway.
Arty had done his best to teach me this all along but I had
seen him as a special case, not governed by the prosy gravity
that held the rest of us. Vinnie, the Pin Kid, tried to keep me
from knowing that he’d never thought of me the way I’d
thought of him. His kindness scalded me awake.
My new eyes saw the old things. He’d felt the needle in his
belly as he’d pulled the shirt over his head. Now his big hands,
cleverly knuckled, slid out the needle, dropped it into a tall jar
of alcohol, dabbed antiseptic on the two small holes above his
belly button. He pulled the shirt down and tucked it into his
red-spattered jeans.
‘You’re lucky, Oly,’ looking gravely out from his deep eye-
holes. ‘My ma cried a lot just looking at me. You’re right to
stick by your family.’
He stacked his props in his trunk and slid the nail bed out
of the way. His legs were longer than me. His narrow shoul-
ders nipped up near his tiny ears with the swirl of hump
arching behind him. He moved as though he were all legs, a
smooth bobbing in his gait that poured in through my eyes
411 12/01/2015 12:07  412
and settled in my right lung like a pool of ice. I got up while
his back was turned and crept away.
From the journal of Norval Sanderson:
Went with Arty this P . M . to watch the Pin Act. It’s one of his
new days off and he showed up in disguise, dark green blan-
ket up to his neck. Green stocking cap, dark glasses
probably borrowed from Oly. The guard was in civvies and
there wasn’t a novice to be seen. He rolled up to my booth
and nodded and it was a full minute before I realized it was
the Worm. It delighted him to fool me.
I’d been raving about the Pin-Cushion but it was the first
time Arty had seen him. We stood in the back of the swal-
lowers’ tent and waited for the Pin.
We were in time for the swallowers’ finale. A blustering
logger in front of us explained to his wife how the whole
thing was collapsible swords and tricks.
‘They always think the real thing is phony and that the
tricks are the McCoy. Never stops amazing me,’ whispered
Arty.
I told him the guy got his money’s worth feeling like he’d
refused to be suckered. Feeling like he’d outwitted them.
Showing off his worldly skepticism to his lady.
The old swallower did his Ta-Da with five hilts coming
out of his mouth in a glittering bouquet and the skinny son
did his with the lit fluorescent tube going down his gullet as
the lights dimmed and the whole tentful went ‘aah’ seeing
that pale blue glow shimmering through the jagged shadows
of his ribs.
412 12/01/2015 12:07  413
‘Clever bastards, ain’t they?’ said the logger.
When the Pin came on, nobody left. The logger looked a
bit pale but stuck it out. Arty was fascinated. ‘Nice timing,
nice,’ he murmured once while the young Pin latched a big
chrome hook into the permanent hole through his tongue
and did a little ragtime step with a twenty-five-pound weight
dangling on a chain from his tongue. The Pin walked up
the blade ladder, danced on the bed of nails, then started
with the pins and needles. Two of the kid swallowers were
juggling fire steadily behind him and the Pin timed every
move to build the heartbeat. He works with chrome knitting
needles, ten and eighteen inches long. Impressive, through
the thighs, through the skin of the chest. He’s working on
a new place on his belly, and the blood trickling out and
running down his pale skin to the loincloth is effective. He
was quite a sight by the time he started punching the needles
through his cheeks and lips. We slipped out before the finale
so Arty wouldn’t get caught with his chair in the crowd.
‘Not from a show family? Sure?’ he asked as we picked
our way back through the midway crowd.
‘Just the apple farmers.’
‘He could use a good talker to lead them through. That
pantomime stuff is O.K. but a good talker would add a lot.’
I didn’t answer. He was thinking about Oly, young
Olympia. I was surprised at the note of pain in his voice. As
though he were afraid to lose her.
‘I don’t care. It doesn’t do any good to care, so I won’t.’ Chick
was as dry and flat as a cow pie. Arty flicked his eyes at him
suspiciously and then looked at me. We three were in the
413 12/01/2015 12:07  414
Chute for our secret meeting. The guards stood outside in the
night mist while, in the deepest room, in the soft yellow glow
of the lit jars that held our dead brothers and sisters, Arty told
us what we had to do.
Chick slumped against a glass case. I leaned against him,
watching Arty shift slightly in his chair, thinking. I tried to read
the clenching of Arty’s jaws and the tilt of his gleaming head
on his thick neck.
‘I don’t usually mind what you think, Chick,’ purred Arty.
His chin jutted at us, intent, ‘As long as you do your job. But
this time you’ve got to understand. It’s just us three in the
pinch. Mama and Papa can’t deal with it. All the guards, all
the simps, the Arturans, the show folks, even Horst – they
could turn in a flash. They all have their own machines to
ride.’
We listened. I could feel Chick’s child bones vibrating
against me, shaking to the tune of Arty’s song. ‘It’s just us three
now. The twins have other things to deal with.’ Arty waited a
beat to see if we’d react to that, complain or accuse. When we
didn’t he went on.
‘You’ll take three guards. I’ll use the rest. By the time you’re
ready to start I’ll be up there watching. O.K.?’
We nodded. Arty hit the start switch on his chair motor
with a flange of his right shoulder fin. ‘I need you bad, now.
Don’t fuck me over.’
Chick held my hand as we walked through the dark camp. The
big men moved silently behind us. Arty and his crew of fifteen
guards had gone through the gate into the Arturan camp.
When we came to Doc P.’s van we stopped at the door.
414 12/01/2015 12:07  415
My mouth was dry and my hands were wet. Chick’s fingers
gripped my palm hard. We stood staring at the white glow of
the big van in the moonlight. I could just make out the twined
snake emblem with the communication grid caught in the open
mouths of the snakes.
Chick sighed. ‘She’s asleep,’ he whispered. He moved to the
door, tugging me along as he opened it and climbed into
the dark stench of antiseptic. The light went on and I saw the
inside of Doc P.’s van for the first time in the years she had
traveled with us. White and stark. No cushions on the metal
benches. Chrome on the outsize sink. A metal desk against
the wall, the white doors of cabinets glaring in the hard white
light.
Chick moved surely. He’d spent chunks of his life here. The
bedroom took up the end and the sliding door opened as we
soft-footed toward it.
‘It’s O.K.,’ Chick said. ‘Tell them to bring the stretcher.’
When I got back he was standing by her head, stroking her
short grey-brown hair. I came close to look. Without her white
wrappings and her glinting specs she looked soft and dissatis-
fied. Set grooves of disapproval curved down around her thin
mouth. Her nose was shapeless, her skin thick.
‘No wonder she wears a mask,’ I whispered. Chick laid his
hand on her cheek. I noticed that his hands were getting big
and bony on his kid-spindly arms. He trailed a finger across
her lips. ‘She’s always constipated,’ he said. The guards set the
stretcher down and I stepped back to make room. Her cot was
narrow, not built in, and it had a thin pad instead of a mat-
tress. I peeked into the white closet as they took her out. It was
full of books. The shelves filled the closet from top to bottom
415 12/01/2015 12:07  416
and the books were each wrapped separately in a clear plastic
bag. I used two fingers to flatten the plastic across a book spine
so I could read the title. Some kind of surgical text. I checked
a few more. All surgical texts. Chick looked in at me.
‘That’s what she taught me from. That’s how she learned.
The journals are in the cabinets up front.’
Chick showed me how to wash up while the guards moved her
to the operating table.
‘Are you gonna lose your dinner?’ he was looking at me
sharply.
I hung on to his eyes. They were as chilly and soothing as
Grandpa’s urn. I giggled greenly, nodding. His mouth twisted
in dry exasperation.
‘Jeez. Arty just wants you here to make sure I do it. You
can’t really help anyway. Go over there.’
He spun me with his mind and I knew it. I was moving into
the latrine cubicle and falling to my knees. My stomach came
all the way up and out, then snapped back like a frog’s tongue.
Then I was back at the sink with liquid soap covering my arms
to the elbow and a white mask tying itself over my face and an
itchy cap sliding down over my eyes. I giggled, watching
Chick’s hands under the rushing tap. ‘This is why you never
have dirty elbows, hunh?’
His eyes grinned at me over his mask but he didn’t say
anything.
‘Mama thinks it’s weird that your fingernails stay so clean
and you never get a crust behind your ears.’
He was busy with the gloves. ‘Just sit on that stool with the
back. You won’t feel a thing.’
416 12/01/2015 12:07  417
But I was terrified. I thought she would wake up. I thought
she would rise off the table roaring and take us in her thick
hands and break us, and I thought Arty was sitting up above,
looking down through the mirror in the ceiling, and he would
watch Doc P. eat us and he would chuckle and come down and
make a deal with her because that was what he’d meant to
happen all along. I was hanging on to the seat of my stool with
both gloved hands, being scared that way, when suddenly I
started being scared that she wouldn’t wake up and that this
other thing would actually happen. I opened my mouth to
speak. ‘Arghi,’ I said, and my little brother Chick looked up at
me, frowning between his mask and his cap, and I went to
sleep.
‘Why did I have to be there? All I did was get in the way and
have to be put to sleep and fall off onto the floor in the middle
of everything. I didn’t help at all.’
‘Sure you did. You kept Chick from thinking too much.’
‘Why didn’t you just put a clothespin on his nose?’
‘Trust me, Oly. You were useful.’
From the journal of Norval Sanderson:
‘In the night, while they slept, he went among them and
took their swords and shields and stacked them in a ditch by
the road. He bound their hands and feet as they lay dream-
ing. They woke lying in rows on the death cart and their
first sight was the body of their leader spread and bound on
the great wheel before their eyes, his many wounds dripping
in the dust . . . ’
417 12/01/2015 12:07  418
Which is the way all coups and counter-coups should be
accomplished – fast and quiet with only the guilty suffering.
I have to hand it to young Arty. He might have made a
grand South American general. He went fast and hard
through the Arturan camp last night, checking off their
names on his ‘disaffected’ list. Seventy people left the camp,
escorted by the guards and handed a refund check for what-
ever they’d paid as an admission fee. Down the road they
went, grumbling in their vans and station wagons. But, if
they have any sense at all, they know they got off light and
lucky.
If I hadn’t been at the road myself to watch them go I
might have speculated otherwise. There will certainly be
rumors that Arty was less than fastidious in his techniques –
that some were brutalized or even murdered. I might, I say,
have considered the possiblity myself. But the angry frus-
tration on those faces wasn’t fear. Miz Z. handed out the
refund envelopes at the gate, and Arty parked his chair by
the Arturan Administration Office (the camper on the green
Dodge pickup) to supervise – a guard beside him and others
trotting up and away again for instructions or to report.
Altogether an orderly and discreet process. When I wan-
dered up to him he greeted me calmly. ‘Just quelling this
little revolt, Norval,’ he said.
‘What about the high priestess? Won’t she fuss?’ I asked.
It seemed unlike the good doc to give up just because she’d
lost her army. The primary weapon she held was her own
surgical strike.
‘Dr. Phyllis has been taken care of,’ he told me. A guard
ran up to say, ‘That’s the lot,’ and Arty headed for the
418 12/01/2015 12:07  419
operating theater. I tagged along but he made me wait out-
side by his chair with the guard while he went up. I stood
around listening to the surgery generator hum. Eddie, the
guard, sat down in Arty’s chair and dozed. I wandered
home, composing imaginary coverage of Arty’s repression of
the Great Lobotomy Schism. I didn’t discover Doc P.’s fate
until this morning.
I took a tour of the Arturan camp early and watched the
holes in the line close up. All the gaps left by the deserting
schismatics – tent spaces, parking spots – that called atten-
tion to their emptiness like missing teeth have been sponged
away. Miz Z. simply walked the lines and told everyone to
move over and fill them. One fight broke out when a novice
backed his scrofulous Volkswagen into one of the Harley
sidecars, leaving a discernible dent. The other Arturans
quickly subdued the irritated Harley owners and the rest of
the morning proceeded in untrammeled harmony with
much delighted gossiping: ‘That Arturo! He’s a pisser!’ ‘He
showed ’em the road and told ’em they were welcome to it.’
‘A relief really. They were disruptive, arrogant. Definitely
interfered with my P.I.P.’ ‘Them types wouldn’t be happy
anywhere.’ ‘They’ll be causing trouble in some hallelujah
bin next . . . ’
Miz Z. came clapping her hands down the line around
noon saying there would be a special Aqua Man service at
1 P . M . They all scurried for clean bandages, barking at the
novices to get ready.
It was a short service with only the Admitted admitted. Arty
came in to a tape of ‘The Ride of the Valkyries’ and a roar
419 12/01/2015 12:07  420
of bubbles that subsided to reveal him floating in a hot-pink
spotlight. He had a lot of gleam glunk on for the occasion
and he made one of his more dynamic impressions. His talk
was actually a chant – rhythmic: ‘She served us – she served
us all – now we serve her,’ while an honor guard of one-
fingered novices rolled out a wheeled cot with what
remained of Doc P. ensconced in white satin. Chick tagged
along behind. When the cot stopped in front of Arty’s tank
and the white spot hid it, Chick stepped up and peeled back
the top sheet.
The crowd of amputees took a minute to catch on to
who it was lying trussed like a leg of lamb. No mask. No
cap. Only the spectacles glinting over her closed eyes were
familiar. A short mop of grey hair spread around her face.
She was still completely out. Those glasses were as useful to
her as shoes, right then, but Arty, the clever little snot, knew
the folks would need something to pin her identity on. Arty
waited while the murmurs started and spread. Finally some-
body down the front yelled, ‘Doc P.!’ and the joint went up
like an ammo dump.
When the roar died down, the spectral voice of Arturo,
from the glowing tank above the cot, introduced Doc P.’s
replacement.
‘The Apprentice – the Student – the Assistant. Now come
into his own with his first act, this, the ultimate service to his
teacher!’
Chick was charming – flushed pink and gold – his child
body bobbing in an embarrassed bow to the storm of
applause. Funny how all the Arturans adored him. They’re
delighted that he’s now the surgeon.
420 12/01/2015 12:07  421
24
Catching His Shrieks in Cups of Gold
I’d expected Chick to fume endlessly about nipping Doc P. but
he surprised me. In the act he was businesslike. Afterward he
was gently nostalgic. He stood very close to her until the
ambulance took her off. She was going to an Arturan rest
home near Spokane. Chick also blossomed, as Mama would
say, in his new fame as full-fledged surgeon. Arty claimed not
to be surprised.
‘That blush-and-shucks game of his was a dead giveaway.
The kid always wanted an act of his own.’
An act he had. The Arturans treasured him. On his eleventh
birthday he was in the surgery for fifteen hours straight. He
had a talk with the nurse on the day he was named successor.
That cool and efficient personage became his dog and priestess
on the spot. She’d never cared for Doc P.’s bullying. The Artu -
rans pestered him constantly. I’d laugh, seeing some patriarch
in a wheelchair rolling madly to catch up with the barefoot
towhead kid in the dusty coveralls, or the two hard-bitten
421 12/01/2015 12:07  422
motorcycle vets sitting on a trailer hitch so this scrawny runt of
a kid could peer into their big spongy ears or lift up an eyelid
to examine the exploded blood map underneath.
‘Well,’ Chick confessed, ‘I don’t need to touch them or even
look at them to tell what’s wrong. But they like it, so I do it.’
They gave him no rest. Mama grumbled about his health
and his lost childhood as she sewed baby clothes on her
machine in the dining booth of the van.
‘When does he climb trees? When does he sneak candy from
the booths? Where are his friends to coax him into teasing the
cats or giving Horst a hotfoot? They’ll drive him into the
ground. They’ll suck him out of his natural growth. Look at
his wrists and elbows! He’s knobby!’
Arty was pleased in a guarded way. He kept an eye on
Chick in case delusions of grandeur should beset him, but pri-
vately Arty was convinced that with Chick as ‘The Knife’ he
was safe from revolutions. ‘He’s a loyal little insect,’ Arty
would grin. But Arty was intent on keeping the Arturan act
solid. He toured the camp every day, supervised the office
work, did his shows three times a week, conducted interviews,
sent out advance men, advised Papa about the midway, and
stayed away from Mama and Iphy.
Papa expected to assume Doc P.’s supervision of the twins’
pregnancy but Arty slid Chick into the job. Papa sulked and
spent more time drinking and playing checkers with Horst.
Iphy didn’t bother to look up from her book when we came in.
Chick sat on the floor and wiggled his toes in the carpet. I went
my rounds with the dust cloth and made the bed and sorted
the twins’ laundry. Iphy read all the time. She liked mysteries.
422 12/01/2015 12:07  423
Every week’s mailbag brought her a new lot of paperbacks.
She took her daily walks and did her exercises grudgingly,
wanting to get back to the book of the moment.
I came out of the bedroom with the laundry basket and
looked at Chick. He hopped up and waved goodbye to Iphy as
he opened the door for me.
‘You’re getting so used to doing things with your hands!’ I
said as we went down the ramp. He chirped, ‘Elly is coming
back some.’ I felt myself swerving an inch above the ground
giddy and happy.
‘Put me down!’ My feet touched and my stomach dropped
into place. ‘Are you sure?’
‘Iphy knows but she’s scared Arty will find out. Don’t tell,
Oly. Promise?’
‘Are you doing it?’
We were near the laundry truck by then and Chick stopped
and looked at me, startled. His hair was hanging down around
his ears, I noticed. Mama would be wrapping him in a towel
soon, making him sit on a stool in front of the van, and step-
ping around him with scissors as she prattled and he squirmed.
‘Are you doing it?’ I repeated. He blinked and shook his
head.
‘I never thought of it. Do you think I could?’
‘How do I know? I thought you could do anything.’ I was
impatient with him. It was one thing to be eleven years old
when you were memorizing geography, but this was supposed
to be the region of his gift, the terrain of his purpose.
‘Well, I mainly take things apart. I can take anything apart,’
he said. An amazed wideness settled on his eyes as he stared
blankly at the door of the laundry truck.
423 12/01/2015 12:07  424
Watching his possibilities dawn on Chick, I decided to ask
the question that I’d been carrying for weeks. Ever since I’d
realized how limited my own possibilities were.
‘Chicky, listen. Remember how you used to pick pockets?
Well, you know the sperm in Arty’s balls?’ I had his attention
at least. ‘Could you move that sperm – the wiggly little things –
could you move them into me and get ’em into the egg thing
in me so I could have a baby like Iphy?’
That, Miranda, was how I came to ask. Chick was hesitant,
scared at first. He was afraid of botching the job. He insisted
on trying it on the cats first.
The next week he managed to impregnate an elderly and
irritable tigress whom Horst had never successfully mated. She
had such a nasty attitude that she sliced up any male who
propositioned her. Chick accomplished the miracle of Lilith,
the tigress, early one morning while sitting on an overturned
bucket in front of the cat wagon. I paced and fidgeted, ready
to warn him if any of the Arturans should come along to dis-
tract him. He took what seemed like a long time. His hands
clenched in a knot at his knees, his face flushed and beaded
with sweat.
The male, at one end of the row of cages, slept through
the process. Lilith, who had been named after Mama, paced
and coughed and glared and switched her tail at the other
end.
There was nothing to see. I was getting bored when he
finally let out a long cautious breath and looked at me. He
rubbed his eyes with his fists. ‘Wow,’ he said, ‘I think it
worked.’
I went hopping and celebrating around, patting him on the
424 12/01/2015 12:07  425
shoulders and rumpling his hair. I was as happy as if it were
my own stunt he’d just pulled.
Chick agreed to be ready to do it whenever my time came
around if he could be sure of having both Arty and me still and
in the same room, preferably for some time.
‘Maybe I could do it without seeing you both, but some-
thing might go wrong. It’s tricky.’
It happened one night in Arty’s front room with Norval Sander -
son there. Arty and Sanderson were talking their endless talk,
Arty drawn up to his desk in the wheelchair and Sanderson
stretched out in a soft chair with his legs ending in the loose
sandals he wore to accommodate the bandages on his feet.
Chick was lolling on his belly on the carpet, pretending to
read a big picture magazine about foreign lands. I was curled
in the corner on a built-in bench, listening.
My pulse filled my head as though the heart had punched its
way up my throat and was stuck beating between my ears. I
couldn’t take my eyes off Arty. He was in his wrangling mood.
He loved to talk to Sanderson. He seemed to relax and enjoy
the winding stalk of argument. Sanderson, the camouflaged
hunter, pretended a casual indifference but secretly struggled
to catch Arty unawares, skewer him on his own words.
Arty chuckled delightedly, ‘Such a sadist! You go unarmed
because you’re sure you can make me turn my own weapons
on myself! You don’t want to dirty your delicate paws with my
blood! You want me to rip out my own guts so you can tsk
and sigh and write prize-winning features on the tragic flaw.
The self-destructive vortex at the core of greatness! You do see
greatness in me. Admit it!’
425 12/01/2015 12:07  426
Sanderson, with his head tipped in cartoon contemplation,
would tap his lip slowly with his thumb and question, always
question: ‘Is elephant gas great? Is it great in the pain that it
causes the elephant? Or in the relief it affords when expressed?
Or perhaps it is only great if it is ignited on farting and the
resulting explosion is used to power a turbine? Is an elephant
fart great in and of itself? Or only in its effect?’
‘Ah! So now we’re down to fart jokes! But you’ll notice that
I am sitting here with all I was born with, Norval, my lad,
while you are being whittled away. How do you account for
this?’
On and on they went, having such a good time. I loved Arty
when he really laughed, and Sanderson made him roar. I
watched, knowing this was my moment as Arty tipped back
his smooth skull and rippled his belly in waves of pleasure that
bounced out through his wide mouth and creased his grey eyes
shut in the wild dance of his whole twitching, rocking body to
the tune of the glitter inside his skull.
I sat very still. Chick had assured me that the thing in me
was ripe and waiting.
There was Chick, on his belly with his bare feet kicking
slowly in the air. His water-white hair hung in his eyes as he
turned the s slowly, revealing the mysteries of Tibet and
the banner wall of the palace in Lhasa. His head turned
slightly, one eye peeking at me. I grinned near convulsions. Do
it. Do it now, while he’s laughing, I thought. And Chick nod -
ded slightly, turning back to his book as Arty said, ‘Con sider
how protected our lives are. Never seen a movie, never set foot
in a school.’
‘But there’s no reason for not seeing movies and whatnot,’
426 12/01/2015 12:07  427
protested Sanderson. The redheads have a portable set. It’s
sheer cantankerousness and barbarism,’ he drawled.
‘Early training!’ barked Arty. ‘Hatching habits!’
‘Poor feller, try this . . . ’ and Sanderson pulled a flat steel
bottle out of his tweed pocket and poured a golden dollop into
a drained lemonade glass on Arty’s desk. Sanderson pulled a
long swig from the bottle, capped it, and sighed, ‘Am-fucking-
brosia!’ while Arty cautiously nipped at his straw and made
wry mouths at the taste.
‘If that’s your idea of pleasure, it’s no wonder you need
religion.’
Chick was flapping his magazine closed, pulling in his
knees, getting to his feet with a stretch and a yawn, twisting to
look at me. I stared anxiously at him. He winked.
‘G’night,’ he said to the room.
‘You’ll start on Miz Z. in the morning? I promised her,’ said
Arty.
Chick nodded and slid over next to the chair, looping an
arm around Arty’s neck, pulling his face close. Chick planted
a kiss on Arty’s bare, flat cheek and then went to the door and
out. As he closed the door after him, my cap slid down my
nose and then back up to its proper place again.
That was it. I didn’t feel anything. But I believed it. And I
didn’t want to leave. I wanted to go on watching Arty at play,
knowing he would talk for hours longer, until Sanderson’s
flask was empty and the black sky turned green and fleshy in
the first seep of dawn. But I also needed to crawl back into my
cupboard and feel miraculous. So I went home.
This, Miranda, is how you were conceived. Don’t ever
doubt that it was an act of love. Your father was as happy then
427 12/01/2015 12:07  428
as he was capable of being. Your uncle Chick, the dove, was
delighted to do it, to be able to do it. And I was a seventeen-
year-old dwarf, pink-cheeked, rosy-humped, scarlet-eyed. I
was beside myself with glory. Understand, child, that my idea
of you was as a gift to your father, a living love for Arturo.
And that’s not bad, Miranda, considered as a motive for your
existence.
Eleven days later the twins gave birth to Mumpo. It was a long
labor, twenty-six hours, and a difficult delivery. Chick did a lot
but Mama and Papa helped. I wasn’t allowed in the van. I sat
with Arty all night and most of the day. He was sick with fear.
I was sick myself. The Arturans were buzzing on the intercom
constantly. I took messages and shunted them off. Miz Z. in
her proud bandage (one little toe’s worth) appeared at the door
twice with a sheaf of papers, but I shooed her away. Arty
wouldn’t eat. He insisted on playing checkers, hour after hour,
game after game. He beat me fifty times and he would have
gone on forever except that I accidentally won a game and he
threw the board off the desk in a fury. He rolled off to his bed-
room and locked himself in.
When Papa finally came to the door with the news, Arty
wheeled out of his room to hear. A boy. Twenty-six pounds,
five ounces. The mothers were doing fine.
Papa looked young again, leaning in the doorway to shout
the news; his mustache bristled with power and pride, which,
he used to say, ‘are the same except that pride leaves the lights
on and power can do it in the dark.’
Twenty-six pounds?’
‘Thought it was twins, did you?’ He chortled. ‘Fat little! A
428 12/01/2015 12:07  429
natural! Twenty handsome inches long and twenty-six of the
babiest pounds! What do you think, uncle? Cheeks like a
politician! Ten chins right out of the oven! That Iphy! Took
one look and says, ‘Mumpo.’ His name, see? Lily went to lay
him on Iphy’s breast and she like to die! Couldn’t breathe,
he’s so heavy. Got to tell Horst; he’s been sucking the bottle
for two days worrying!’ Then a sudden change, a confiden-
tiality, a secret wondering, near whisper as he put one foot
inside to keep it among us. ‘That Chick, Great Christo, he’s
good. I would have popped it with a knife myself after so
long. I was scared to death with the kid so big. Not Chick. He
pumped in air somehow, don’t ask me. That baby breathing
easy for hours and still inside. That Chick, sweet lollyballs of
the prophet!’ And he was gone, thumping down the ramp,
hailing people in the line, hollering, ‘A boy . . . Fine . . . All
fine . . . A boy! Yes! By the bouncing melons of Mary! I’m a
grandpa!’
Arty sat petrified in his chair, staring through the open door.
Miz Z. appeared, heading for us, a clipboard in hand.
‘Scare her off,’ said Arty. He looked deflated and a little
damp. ‘Then go get the baby, will you?’
‘What for?’ I felt a fist of fear in my gut.
‘I just want to see him!’ He spun his chair away with a last
look at my face. He disappeared into his room. I had hurt him.
I tried to feel the little thing in my own belly. Nothing. But it
was there. I’d make it up to him.
Mumpo changed people’s names. Suddenly Iphy was Little
Mama to all the redheads and wheelmen, booth rats and
429 12/01/2015 12:07  430
artistes. Lily and Al were Gramma and Grampa. Even uncle
and auntie jokes made the rounds along with Papa’s licorice-
marinated stogies and the bottomless keg on tap in Horst’s
van. But Mumpo himself lay like a big sagging pumpkin in the
blankets. He was a bottomless craving and he was cunning.
Arty saw it immediately. Iphy knew. I knew. Lily and Al
refused to notice. Chick knew and didn’t care. Chick loved the
big glob.
That first day I poked my head through the twins’ bedroom
door and saw everything covered with white sheets and
smelling of disinfectant. Lily hunched over the baby where he
lay, naked and huge in soft, unmoving mounds on a wheeled
metal table, as she sponged him, cooing. Chick was watching
Iphy. He sat on the edge of the big bed and held her hand and
Elly’s pale useless hand, the arms overlapping so he could hold
them both.
‘How are they?’ I whispered. He grinned the kid grin at me
as though he’d walked on his hands or found a frog.
‘Bushed. Pooped out. Beat.’ They were asleep. Iphy as
bloodless as a rain-drained worm. Elly with her mouth ajar
and a thin trickle of saliva shining on her jaw.
‘I could have made it quicker but Mama said it was impor-
tant to labor. It didn’t hurt them, though. I didn’t let it hurt
them. Did you see him?’ His eyes glanced toward the flesh
mound. I shook my head and moved over to where Mama
could smile at me. She reached out an arm and hugged me.
‘Isn’t he amazing?’ His eyes were open, filled with black. The
eyes blinked and squinted suspiciously.
‘Could you take him over to Arty? Arty is anxious to see
him.’
430 12/01/2015 12:07  431
Chick said it was O.K. and Lily chirruped and twittered
excitedly, wrapping the baby to travel fifty feet, and exclaim-
ing over his weight when she hoisted him across her chest.
In Arty’s van she laid the big clump on Arty’s desk and
Mumpo’s eyes went sharp and narrow, looking at Arty, and
Arty glared at Mumpo and the two male things looked at each
other with hate. Lily claimed that Mumpo couldn’t focus his
eyes yet but it was wonderful how he seemed to look right at
you, though he’s only an hour old and ought to be so tired he’d
sleep, and she laughed at how excited Papa was thinking up
‘Mumpo the Mountain’ and other fat-man tags for Mumpo’s
show, though you couldn’t be sure with a baby and for all we
knew he’d be skinny by the time he was two.
Arty stared at the flesh that oozed from the blankets and
finally broke in. ‘O.K. Take him away. He needs to sleep.’
Lily took him out and that was the last time Arty ever
looked at Mumpo.
The stick hit my ear and I yelled into the blanket as I woke up.
My right arm jerked and the stick jabbed my elbow and the
sting from my ear and my elbow pulled the plug on my nose
and eyes so I looked wildly through the swimming murk of my
watering sinuses as the white beam from a flashlight in the
dark blinded my naked eyes and the stick whapped out of the
blur again. ‘Waa!’ I yelled.
Then I heard the unmistakable rasp of Arty, angry, sputter-
ing behind the stick, ‘Cunt! . . . Slimy! Twisted bitch!’ as the
stick wavered toward me and I curled in my cupboard with my
arms shielding my eyes, yelling, ‘Arty!’ and the stick kept
coming and I got a foot tangled in Mama’s old white satin
431 12/01/2015 12:07  432
robe, which I used as a top blanket, and Arty’s voice screeched
in the light-smeared liquid blackness, ‘I’ll break you, you stink-
ing . . . ’ and the stick was on its way again and I grabbed for
it snatched at the end as it passed my eyes and was amazed as
the whole stick came loose in my hands with a slight tug and
Arty wailed ‘Shiiit!’ and I saw the rubber bulb at the other end
of the stick and felt a laugh trying to choke its way past my
thumping heart because Arty was hitting me with a toilet
plunger.
Then the lights went on and Papa was there, hairy-bellied in
his pajama pants and Mama blinking and fuzzy behind him.
I scrambled for my glasses and jammed them on so I could see
Arty crying naked in his wheelchair with the blue veins pump-
ing through the fine skin on his head and the flashlight on the
seat beside him with its lens glowing a feeble yellow against the
ceiling light.
‘What the fuck?’ Papa was gasping, and Mama fluttered
and I stared through my safe green lenses at Arty, gibbering
with frustration in his chair because he couldn’t keep a grip on
the stick with his flipper even though his belly rolled in crevices
of muscle, though his chest was a plate of bronze, though his
ribs jutted with the wings of muscle, though he could lift a
hundred and fifty pounds with his neck, he still couldn’t hold
the stick to hurt me when he needed to.
‘She’s knocked fucking up!’ howled Arty. Papa had his
gentle hands on the smooth gold skin of the Aqua Boy, hold-
ing him against the back of the chair, saying, ‘For Christ’s
bloody sake, son,’ and wouldn’t let go.
Mama brought a blanket to put around Arty. I crouched
deep in my cupboard with the old white satin robe pulled up
432 12/01/2015 12:07  433
to my eyes because Arty knew. But he knew and was angry.
The stomach thing happened, as though the baby, the tiny frog
babe, Miranda, was trying to crawl out and escape by any
route possible from his fury. I sat there holding in everything,
clenching my ass and my cunt and my jaw and my eyes and
praying the broadcast prayer of the godless, ‘Please, please, no,
please.’
Arty got his jaw back in order and resigned himself to
draining his anger in words. He told them. ‘Ask Chick. He told
me. She’s stuffed. Knocked up. The stupid traitor.’
Then I saw that Chick hadn’t told him everything. Arty was
leaning back in his chair and Papa sank down on the bench by
the door trying to get it straight. ‘Oly, what’s he saying? Is this
true?’ I never opened my mouth but sat there, curled in amaze-
ment at Papa being Papa again for this one groggy moment.
‘But that’s no reason! There is no excuse,’ rapped Papa, ‘for
attacking your sister physically!’
Arty rambled bitterly, ‘That hunchback bastard redhead
guy, the Pin Kid. Moving in on the shit-sucking show, knock
up the boss’s daughter . . . work his way in . . . get his claws on
the money.’
I saw Arty shaking in his blanket, so hard that the wheels of
his chair squeaked in minuscule quivers on the floor as he
talked.
‘He’s drunk or stoned,’ came Mama’s voice.
‘Drunk? Have you been hitting that stuff?’ Papa wheeled
Arty away through the door to his own van and I lay down
and watched the door close and pulled the white robe up to
my chin as Mama folded up on the floor beside my cupboard
and looked in at me. Her soft face was crumpling with
433 12/01/2015 12:07  434
weakness and the loosening of her fiber, but her hands reached
in and touched my face, long, cool fingers stroking my cheeks
as she whispered, ‘Did he hurt you dove?’
When I shook my head she took a deep breath and went on,
‘Tell Mama now, are you pregnant?’ and I nodded, staring at
her through my green lenses, and she nodded seriously back at
me. Her pale hair floated raggedly around her head. ‘Are you
glad, dream? Or is it something you don’t want?’ Her whole
body smelt of cinnamon and vanilla as she leaned forward,
asking.
‘Glad,’ I croaked, and she leaned in to lay her cheek on
mine.
Papa came back and patted my head and took Mama back
to bed. I lay in the dark listening but they kept their voices low
and I couldn’t make out what they were saying. It was prob-
ably my roaring blood that drowned them out. I was happy.
Arty was hurt. I imagined him clambering through the door
alone in his chair with the flashlight and plunger to punish me.
To hurt me for hurting him. I swelled with enormous love for
him. See, I thought, how he has scared us all these years, and
he can’t even grip the plunger in that strong, awkward flipper.
He needed to hurt me and couldn’t.
He must love me, I thought, amazed. A faint whiff of
nausea hit me at seeing pain as proof of love. But it seemed
true. Unavoidable.
Afternoon. The midway music clanking faintly nearby. Every -
body at work but me. I was alone in the van, sick in my
cupboard. I was swamped hot and cold with the vicious swim
of nausea. The cupboard doors hung open so I could see the
434 12/01/2015 12:07  435
gleaming linoleum. Orange brick pattern. I wanted the floor to
be blue or grey so it would cool me. The white sunlight
through the window hit the bricks with a terrible heat splash
that burned through my dark glasses. If I closed my eyes, my
head spun and my stomach did its tumbling act. If I rolled over
to face the back wall, I smothered. I hugged my knees over my
cramped belly and felt sorry for myself. I was almost dozing
when I heard a step outside. Chick came in quietly.
‘Should have told me, Oly.’
I grunted and stared at his bare, dusty feet kicking the bot-
toms of his ragged coverall legs. He pulled the curtains and the
light greyed mercifully. ‘You seen Arty?’ I asked as his legs
reappeared. He crouched on the floor beside me. He stuck out
a grubby hand and touched my forehead. ‘That’s better.’ I felt
cool and quiet suddenly, as though I’d been floating motionless
in a pond for hours.
‘He’s working. Still mad.’ Chick looked down at me
curiously.
I put a hand on my chest where mad Arty had left a ball of
sick snakes knotted and jabbing each other poisonously. ‘This
too, please.’ Chick frowned at me and the pain narrowed to a
single vibrating spot like a bee sting. I tapped my fingers on the
pained spot, impatient. ‘Go on. Keep on. Do the rest, please.’
‘I could put you to sleep. Want me to?’
‘No. Did you tell him?’
‘He didn’t believe me. He thinks I’m just trying to smooth
him down. And the Pin Kid is gone.’
I got up right away and went to the swallowers’ stage, drag-
ging Chick along. We poked our heads in through the rear flap
435 12/01/2015 12:07  436
and watched the scuttling shadows on the backdrop as the
swallowers went through their act. Their chatter was marked
by silences as the swords went down. The swallowers’ oldest
girl finished her turn and came rushing out, sweating. I
snatched at her arm. ‘Where’d the Pin Kid go?’
She shrugged, reaching to scratch under her sequined vest.
‘Gee, Oly, I don’t know. Daddy’s mad at him. They were
supposed to do a turn together. They’ve been rehearsing. But
he was gone this morning when we got up. He took his knap-
sack and bedroll but left his trunk.’ She rolled her eyes,
perplexed. ‘He’ll have to come back for the trunk. And he
knows we’re breaking down tonight. Maybe he’ll be back
before we leave. Maybe he’ll catch us in St. Joe?’
I could see the buckled trunk, drab in the dusty grass against
the tent wall with swords and torches collapsing against it. The
swallower’s girl tossed her hair back and waved as she made
off to the other side of the stage for her second entrance.
Chick was staring at the trunk. I could feel him thinking.
The trunk looked abandoned, like letters in an attic, to and
from the dead.
‘We better go see Arty,’ I muttered. Chick nodded, still look-
ing at the trunk.
‘Tell them to come back tomorrow.’ It was Arty’s voice seep-
ing through the door crack. The bald novice who answered the
bell left us waiting so he could see ‘if the Master has a moment
for you.’ The shaved head appeared again, smirking con -
solingly. ‘I’m afraid the Master . . . ’ he started. But I jumped
forward, shoving the door wider, hollering, ‘Arty! You pig shit!
Arty!’ bursting past the gasping novice with Chick behind me,
436 12/01/2015 12:07  437
trotting toward Arty’s desk while I watched his face set in
anger and his voice boom, ‘Get her out! Out!’ and the novice’s
three-fingered hands closed on my arms, but it was really
Chick who lifted me. I knew by the softness, the easiness as I
sailed back out through the door and landed on the deck.
Chick leaned out and looked at me. ‘I’ll talk to him. Wait,’ he
said. Arty’s door closed and I stood waiting. Angry myself, for
a change. It was a relief from feeling sorry for myself.
As we moved that night in the dark toward St. Joe, Papa drove
with Mama in his co-pilot’s seat. Chick and I huddled in the
dining booth and he told me.
‘O.K. Now he really does believe me, kind of, because he
talked to Horst about the tiger being pregnant and Horst told
him it couldn’t happen because she hadn’t been with anybody.
But he’s still pretending he doesn’t believe me. He won’t admit
anything. Besides, he’s scared his juice isn’t good. He’s afraid
he can’t plant babies. But he says he’s sick of the novices slim-
ing around and he’ll let you come back to work for him.’
‘But what about the Pin Kid?’
I couldn’t see Chick’s face in the dark. He waited a few sec-
onds before he answered. A dozen heartbeats.
‘He just says, ‘What Pin Kid?’ and then won’t listen. That’s
another thing. You’re not to mention the Pin Kid or your baby
or any of this to Arty. He wants you to act like always.’
I took Arty his breakfast in St. Joe. I cleaned and dusted and
carried messages and shut the novices out of his van com-
pletely. I rode on the back of his golf cart to his show tent and
waited behind the tank listening to the big St. Joe crowd
437 12/01/2015 12:07  438
roaring and sighing like the tide. I scrubbed Arty after the
show and rubbed him down and painted him for the next
show. I did all the usual things. He was sullen and moody at
first but then he forgot and was just like always.
The Pin Kid never came back for his trunk. We never heard
anything more about him. When I did think of him it was a
pleasure – a fool’s pleasure – that Arty had got rid of him, run
him off, scared him away, for fear of losing me. I don’t think
Arty had him killed.
Elly was coming back. Iphy tried to hide the change but I sat
for hours watching Mumpo twitch and Iphy crooning over
him. I saw the differences. When Iphy used both hands to
change Mumpo, or to turn him or wash him, Elly no longer
collapsed like a spent balloon. She was holding herself upright
without Iphy’s arm supporting her. There were also moments
when I could have sworn that Elly’s eyes were focused, look-
ing at Mumpo, looking at me, or following the movements of
Iphy’s hands. Elly’s mouth stayed shut for longer periods. She
drooled less. Once I saw her hand lift deliberately to her
swollen, seeping breast.
‘I use this little pump on Elly and put the milk into the
bottle,’ Iphy was explaining. Mumpo lay beside her on the bed
sucking noisily at the rubber teat on the bottle. The pale blue
milk sloshed and bubbled in the glass as the pull from his
mouth drew the level down fast.
‘He’s so hungry all the time. It takes both of us to feed him
but it’s so awkward holding him and Elly so he can nurse
straight from her titties . . .’
Iphy stole a look to see if I believed that she still had to
438 12/01/2015 12:07  439
hold Elly. Elly’s mouth opened and she said, ‘Greedy, greedy,
greedy.’
It was as clear as pizzicato. ‘Ha ha,’ said Iphy, staring at me
intently. ‘She’s been making more sounds lately. Ha ha.
Sometimes they’re almost words.’
Perched at the foot of the bed with my feet over the edge so
my shoes wouldn’t dirty the sheets, I nodded and said nothing.
The bottle ran dry and the deep voice of Mumpo rocked out
an echoing belch. The lips of Elly closed primly and her eyes
wandered again, soft, not looking while Iphy looked at us all
so fast that her eyes must have ached with the whip of their
nerve stalks.
Papa ordered signs painted for ‘Mumpo, the World’s Fattest
Baby’ and tried to talk Iphy into arranging a schedule so the
baby could nap in a show booth and tickets could be sold.
Iphy insisted on waiting until his first birthday. Papa was indig-
nant. ‘This is a working outfit! No moochers! No parasites!
And what about yourself, young lady?’ he demanded. ‘How
about a turn in the variety tent? You can work around Elly.
There must be some way!’
Iphy bristled and reminded him of all the money she’d made
for him the years she worked with Elly. She told him to wait.
Papa left her alone. Iphy wasn’t worried about it.
‘Papa’s just trying out old reflexes. He’s not the boss
anymore.’
My belly grew. It hung at an odd angle and gave me a lot of
back pain. The veins in my legs threatened to rupture until
Chick took care of them.
439 12/01/2015 12:07  440
I spent time with Iphy and became convinced that Elly was
almost all there, almost all the time.
‘She’s lying doggo, Iphy, don’t lie to me.’
Elly’s face was frozen on Iphy’s shoulder but her arms were
coming back. Their dead flabbiness was turning to muscle
again, and I could see it rolling thinly beneath the white skin,
filling out the sleeves of her blouses.
‘Elly? You’ve been exercising in secret, haven’t you?’ I’d ask,
coming up close and staring into the unfocused eyes. She never
reacted.
‘Buzz off, Oly,’ Iphy would snap, and I’d wander away,
speculating about Iphy too, and how much more like Elly she
was now. Stronger. Meaner. She never cried anymore. Never
sang. She cleaned. She fed Mumpo, lying down beside him
because she couldn’t lift him. She gave up on bottles and
turned so he could reach Elly’s breast when he had flattened
her own. She urged him toward solid food and he gobbled
that, too, spilling nothing, sucking it all in, then demanding tit.
In Santa Rosa a Twins Fan Club came to the door. They were
sixteen-year-old girls who had started dressing the ‘Twin Way’
when they were twelve or so and were still wrapping two
waists in one big skirt like potato-sack racers. They dyed each
other’s California hair to the blue-black gloss of the twins.
I went to the door. The pair in front tried to look past me
into the trailer. ‘We just love them! Is it true they had a baby?
We wanted to give them a present.’
The bouquet came in, passed from mock pair to mock pair
and finally to me. I said Elly and Iphy were sleeping or maybe
working. I took the green paper cone of flowers and thanked
440 12/01/2015 12:07  441
them and shut the door. Iphy watched through the curtains as
the troop hobbled and giggled away, four pairs of twins with
their arms around each other. Iphy absent-mindedly hugged
Elly, who flopped from the squeezing.
‘We used to have a lot of fans in this part of the country,’
said Iphy. She put the flowers in a big jug of water and they sat
on the table for days.
It was easy for me and it could have been much harder for the
twins. We had a small world, peculiarly unalarmed by nature.
We had no worries about food or shelter, the opinions of the
family, or the hardships of lone child rearing. There were
Mama and Papa and Chick. There was an inexhaustible reser-
voir of obliging redheads.
Part of being pregnant is that you think about it so much
that you’re seldom bored. Terrified often enough, but rarely
bored. There was some disappointment in my mind occasion-
ally. I’d sit in the sun next to Grandpa’s urn on the generator
truck and drift into lip-sucking melancholy.
Life for me was not like the songs the redheads played. It
wasn’t the electric clutch I had seen ten million times in the
midway – the toreador girls pumping flags until those bulging-
crotched tractor drivers were strung as tight as banjo wire,
glinting in the sun. It wasn’t for me, the stammering hilarity of
Papa and Lil, or even the helpless, dribbling lust of the Bag
Man rocked by the sight of the twins. I have certainly mourned
for myself. I have wallowed in grief for the lonesome, delib-
erate seep of my love into the air like the smell of uneaten
popcorn greening to rubbery staleness. In the end I would
always pull up with a sense of glory, that loving is the strong
441 12/01/2015 12:07  442
side. It’s feeble to be an object. What’s the point of being loved
in return, I’d ask myself. To warm my spine in the dark? To
change the face in my mirror every morning? It was none of
Arty’s business that I loved him. It was my secret ace, like a
bluebird tattooed under pubic hair or a ruby tucked up my ass.
Understand, daughter, that the only reason for your existing
was as a tribute to your uncle-father. You were meant to love
him. I planned to teach you how to serve him and adore him.
You would be his monument and his fortress against mortality.
Forgive me. As soon as you arrived I realized that you were
worth far more than that.
Lily collected Mumpo’s castoffs and washed them and folded
them into the drawers next to my cupboard. She moved the
dish towels and the knives and forks and her plastic-bag col-
lection and sewing scraps as well as Papa’s junk tools. ‘These
will be your little hope chest,’ she said.
Lily was delighted to have me swelling close to her, not cut
off and strange as the twins had been. She would hug me dis-
tractedly in the kitchen or as we did the laundry together.
‘Now hope hard!’ she’d whisper, squeezing me, with her
watery blue eyes blinking in filmed pleasure. An odd, warm
scent of her favorite spray warmed by sweat and a faint bite of
rot had begun to drift around her. I would lean against her,
watching her hands, her crumpled-paper skin rustling as she
stroked my face. ‘You won’t tell . . . ’ she whispered once, ‘don’t
ever breathe it . . . I don’t like Mumpo . . . I love him . . . I’d tear
my heart out for him . . . but there’s something about him I just
can’t like.’
*
442 12/01/2015 12:07  443
Mumpo was eating the twins. ‘Mama, he only shits once every
three days and then not much. Is it O.K.?’ Iphy fretted and Elly
had frozen into an intelligent frown that bobbled perpetually
against Iphy’s shoulder. They grew frail and bony except for
the four breasts that ballooned every three hours in time for
Mumpo to wake. He bellowed before he even opened his eyes,
roaring until the gap was crammed with raw tit. Then he vac-
uumed the bag until it draped flat over the protruding ribs of
his mothers, and bellowed for the next tit until all four milk
bags were drained and limp. He would sleep for three more
hours before beginning again.
‘Every baby is different,’ Mama would say diplomatically.
But later, in the home van, she’d shake her head at me and
crackle, ‘Greedy! Takes it in. Won’t let it go. Keeps it!’
Mumpo grew, spreading around himself in looping, creased
pools of pinkness that pulsated with his breathing.
Chick checked me over each morning before he ambled off to
the Arturans for the day. He was ragged, growing out of his
clothes. Mama was too distracted to notice. He missed Dr.
Phyllis.
‘It was easier when she was here,’ he explained. ‘I’m scared
a lot now. Almost all the time.’
He came in for meals with his hands bloated like a drowned
corpse’s from the perpetual washing followed by the airtight
gloves of surgery. He sank into a doze if he sat still for more
than a few minutes. He worried about the ritual wrangling of
Horst and Norval Sanderson.
‘It’s fair, isn’t it?’ he’d ask me. ‘That’s the way Doc P. set it
up. Horst gets the legs and arms and Mr Sanderson gets the
443 12/01/2015 12:07  444
fingers, toes, and hands and feet. It’s because the little bones
are bad for the cats. That makes sense, doesn’t it? Why does
Mr. Sanderson keep trying to cheat? I had to ask a novice to
guard the thighs in the refrigerator truck the other day because
Mr. Sanderson kept sneaking them away in garbage bags.
Horst threatened to let Lilith, the Bengal, loose in Mr.
Sanderson’s trailer some night if he doesn’t stop. Horst is
drinking all the time now. He might do it. And Papa goes over
there to drink with him. They sit inside with the checkerboard
and argue and drink and forget whose turn it is to move.’
Chick talked to me more all the time because he had no one
else.
‘Arty doesn’t like the hometown surgeons getting in on the
Arturans. He doesn’t like the rest-home doctors setting up. But
I do. I can’t do it all. They can’t all travel with us. Arty wants
it all where he can see it but it’s too big now. There are too
many.’
Arty got a new folder of clippings every morning. The office
novices would comb papers and magazines from all over the
country for any mention of Arturism and for anything that
might affect Arty. He subscribed to a broadcast-monitoring
outfit that provided video or sound tapes of any news item,
comment, discussion, or joke that mentioned Arturism on tel-
evision or the radio.
‘Here’s another imitator in California, the Reverend Raunch!
That’s three in one state!’ he snarled as I brought in his break-
fast tray. ‘And there’s that brain-slice scam in Detroit, a takeoff
on Doc P.’s trip. The silly cocksuckers are getting hauled in
front of a grand jury. Ass lickers will screw us all!’
444 12/01/2015 12:07  445
Arty didn’t need to worry about the tadpole competition
but he did. His tent was the biggest ever made on this conti-
nent, and it was always full, with a crowd as live as a
hurricane wailing for him. But Arty sulked over every ten-cent
Baptist, sneered at the plastic surgeons, turned green at ads for
weight-loss clinics and alcoholism programs.
He’d gloat sometimes. ‘I have the best tools. I talk to Doc
P.’s keeper every week, you know. And my little brother did a
much tidier job on Doc P. than Doc P. ever did in her life.
Smartest thing I ever did was tuck Chick in her pocket.’
I didn’t pay much attention. I was caught up in the amazing
contents of my belly. Everything else was insignificant. As the
time got close, though, I got scared. I wasn’t afraid of dying.
Chick wouldn’t let me die. I wasn’t afraid of the baby dying.
Chick would make sure it stayed alive. Still, a sick grey fear
sat in my chest, nameless. Chick kept offering to put me to
sleep.
‘Hey, it’s good. Doc P. is happy. I’d like it myself. I’d put
myself to sleep only there’s nobody to do my job.’
When my labor started Mama gave me tea and Chick put me
into one of the Arturan wheelchairs and took me to his sur-
gery. It was late in the afternoon. The Ferris wheel lights were
bright against the dusk and I could smell popcorn and hear the
talkers hollering, ‘Show the little lady what you’re made of!’
It didn’t hurt. I sat up against pillows and slept for a minute
at a time between squeezes. There was no pain but it was
exhausting work. I remember looking at Chick and Mama and
trying to tell them why it was called ‘labor.’
445 12/01/2015 12:07  446
I remember seeing Miranda’s head for the first time between
my legs. She looked so silly, like a red turtle’s head stretching
on its spindly neck and turning, blinking, wobbling, I nearly
laughed. And I remember Chick’s smile as he reached for her.
She slid out onto the white cloth he held for her, and he lifted
her dripping, squirming little carcass and put it on my col-
lapsing belly. ‘I like this!’ he said. This was his second delivery,
of course, and he told me later that Miranda was easy com-
pared to Mumpo, that he’d worked much harder to suppress
the twins’ pain.
Mama and I examined her amazing body and found only
that ridiculous tail. My heart died. Arty would despise her. But
Mama told me to go on hoping. ‘Go ahead and love her,’
Mama said. I’ve wondered since whether those were Mama’s
last sane words, the final sizzle of her synapses.
Then the real fear began. With the baby outside me and vul-
nerable, I suddenly saw the world as hostile and dangerous.
Anything, including my own ignorance, could hurt her, kill her,
snatch her from me. I wanted to cram her back inside where
she’d be safe. I was too weak to protect her. I needed the
family. Arty had to care about her. Iphy had to help me. Papa
had to be sober and brave, and Mama had to lay off the pills
and be wise. But there was really only Chick, and I was terri-
fied whenever he was out of sight. I scared him with my
clinging but I couldn’t trust the baby to anyone else.
She had Arty’s face and I named her Miranda because
Miranda’s father loved her.
Arty did not love my baby. He never asked to see her. When I
finally went to see him – took him his breakfast a few days
446 12/01/2015 12:07  447
after she was born – I left her with Chick. I was testing the
water and I found it cold.
‘How kind of you to call,’ Arty sneered. ‘Good of you to
take the time. I suppose you won’t be working anymore. Gone
into retirement like Iphy.’
I felt my lungs ice over. I couldn’t snap back at him. I went
back and hid in the cupboard, holding Miranda, careful not to
press her bottom the wrong way for fear her tail would be
twisted or pinched.
I always slept curled around her in my cupboard. It made
Mama nervous but there was no room for me to turn over so
I thought there was no danger that I’d crush or smother her. I
didn’t dare put her in a box or drawer separate from me.
‘He doesn’t hate her,’ Chick said. ‘How could he?’ Chick was
holding Miranda in the sink as I bathed her. His arm looped
behind her flat little back so she wouldn’t topple over and
crack her perfect skull. I was afraid to trust myself bathing her.
Her five-month-old fingers grabbed at his moving lips and he
kissed them, making slurpy noises. ‘Mama and the redheads
say you should be getting better now, Oly. Not so afraid.’
My arms disappeared below the elbows, covered by the
warm grey water in the sink. Across the lot, Leona the Lizard
Girl was floating, still and silent, in the green murk of her jar.
Miranda could chortle and hurl a spoonful of pablum at the
wall but she would be as helpless as Leona against Arty. I
wanted Chick to believe me, to be frightened and watchful as
I was.
‘Baby’s no threat to him.’ Chick spoke as though he were
answering my thoughts. A bubble of light swelled in me. He
447 12/01/2015 12:07  448
was right. That puny tail of hers was no threat to the Aqua
Man.
‘Besides,’ Chick protested, ‘he keeps after me to bring Elly
back. He says it would be good if she could help with
Mumpo. I’ve been working on it but it’s tricky in there. In her
head.’
My bubble fantasy sank into a chilly puddle. So that’s why
Chick was so sure of Arty’s benevolence. ‘Guilty,’ I said.
Chick nodded agreeably, his shiny head bobbing on his
scrawny neck above Miranda’s unfathomable curls. ‘He feels
bad.’
I sponged her puffing cheeks and she opened her gums and
clamped down on the sponge, squeezing it happily. ‘I thought
she was coming back.’
‘It’s slow,’ he nodded. ‘It was starting anyway. But I’m
trying, a little bit every time. You should go over more. They’re
lonely, the twins. It helps if things are busy, exciting around
them. Elly notices more.’
‘I help Iphy with the cleaning.’
‘You don’t like Mumpo. You think he’s bad, but he’s not.
Take Miranda to play with him.’
‘He doesn’t play. He just lies there and eats.’
Chick’s golden face fell into a shadow of hurt. ‘He’s a won-
derful baby. He’s different from Miranda.’ His face drooped
down to rub against her damp hair. ‘But he’s wonderful.’
I reached for a towel. ‘Let’s get her out now.’
She rose, dripping, straight up from the water and swooped
into my arms, crowing.
‘She likes to fly.’ I smiled up at Chick, ashamed of insulting
his other child.
448 12/01/2015 12:07  449
‘I have to go to surgery now.’ He wouldn’t look at me. His
face was flushed.
‘We’ll come with you.’ I started dressing her quickly.
‘No, Oly. Don’t. It’s hard for me to concentrate when I have
to take care of you. I have hard things to do.’ I watched him
through the window as he walked away. The ragged straps of
his coveralls rode his bare bony shoulders as though nobody
loved him.
Miranda was just learning to walk. She traveled from Papa’s
big chair to the built-in sofa bench where Chick slept at night.
Then she fell, face first, and split her lip. I was crying. She was
bleeding and screaming. That was when Arty decided to come
calling. It was the first time he had ever seen Miranda.
It is true that I’d been useless to him since she was born. She
changed me. When I did work I was afraid to be close to him
because I had something to lose.
After he wheeled out in disgust, I ran, with the baby still
bleeding in my arms, and burst through the door of the sur-
gery. The nurse grabbed my shoulders and hustled me into the
waiting tent. Chick was severing a thigh. A critical procedure.
She gave me a swab for Miranda’s lip and went back to the
surgery.
He came out in his green scrubs and I flung myself on him.
He was thirteen years old. I was nineteen. Miranda was one.
He looked at her and she stopped crying. Her lip stopped
bleeding. She reached up to him and he lifted her. She sighed
and let her head fall onto his shoulder.
‘He called her a norm,’ I stormed. ‘He says he’ll feed her to
Mumpo! He wouldn’t even look at her tail! Iphy will laugh all
449 12/01/2015 12:07  450
crazy and Mama will pop a pill and Al will swig on his bottle
and nobody, nobody can help me but you!’
His child face rumpled in puzzlement. ‘I don’t understand,’
he said.
At once a coolness swept over me. A woods-pond stillness
filled me. ‘No!’ I shrieked. ‘No! Don’t!’ But it was too late and
the anger and pain were small and hard in me, not gone, but
distant.
‘Now explain, please,’ Chick pleaded. And we walked
calmly out through the tent flap and strolled up the grass
behind the midway booths, and Miranda fell asleep in Chick’s
arms on the way.
I believe Chick tried. When he came out of Arty’s van he
looked a thousand years old. He was the one who had to tell
me.
Dear daughter, I won’t try to call my feeling for Arty love. Call
it focus. My focus on Arty was an ailment, noncommunicable,
and, even to me all these years later, incomprehensible. Now
I despise myself. But even so I remember, in hot floods, the way
he slept, still as death, with his face washed flat, stony as a
carved tomb and exquisite. His weakness and his ravening
bitter needs were terrible, and beautiful, and irresistible as an
earthquake. He scalded or smothered anyone he needed, but
his needing and the hurt that it caused me were the most life
I have ever had. Remember what a poor thing I have always
been and forgive me.
He saw no use for you and you interfered with his use of
me. I sent you away to please him, to prove my dedication to
him, and to prevent him from killing you.
450 12/01/2015 12:07  451
The Arturan Administrative Office arranged everything.
They located the convent school. They deposited a lump sum
of money in a trust fund to be doled out to the nuns.
My job was to take you to that cross-cursed old woman –
who, don’t forget, had given up children for her God-love long
before you or even I came along. I had to take you to her and
come back without you.
My job was to come back directly, with nothing leaking
from beneath my dark glasses, to give Arty his rubdown and
then paint him for the next show, nodding cheerfully all the
while, never showing anything but attentive care for his mus-
cular wonderfulness. Because he could have killed you. He
could have cut off the money that schooled and fed you. He
could have erased you so entirely that I never would have had
those letters and report cards and photos, or your crayon pic-
tures, or the chance to spy on you, and to love you secretly
when everything else was gone.
Arty could have done worse, but he chose not to.
451 12/01/2015 12:07  452
25
All Fall Down
Hopalong McGurk smiles with pearly dentures because my
perfect Binewski teeth went down the spout with everything
else. Yet the day we lost it all was nothing special. Miranda
had been gone a year or so. Late in the morning I was in Arty’s
dressing room as usual, coating him with grease as the tent
filled and the ropy voice of the crowd came through the wall,
thickening the air. Arty lay on his belly on the massage table
while I painted him. He watched me in the big wall mirror.
‘Thick in the creases, please. I want to shine.’
I pushed the rolled flesh at the back of his neck and
slathered a handful of grease over the smooth skin. He put his
forehead against the bench and arched to pull the rolls out flat.
I smoothed and rubbed and the sheen came up onto the back
of his skull and crept toward his ears.
‘Do you want the tips on your flippers?’
‘I like it. The whole crowd breathes in when I go like
this . . . ’ He spread his flippers and winked into the mirror.
452 12/01/2015 12:07  453
I slid a hand under his chest and heaved. His back muscles
rolled in cut slabs, every knob of his incredible spine visible as
he bunched to help me. When he was balanced upright on his
rear fins, I worked on his forehead and pulled the grease down
onto his long eyelids and the flat cheekbones.
‘I want a straight stroke of the white under each brow,
down the nose, and under my lower lip. Not too blatant for
the folks up close to the tank.’
I opened the jar of deli-white and spread his right fore-
flipper. The pale glitter was already dry between his web
creases. I painted brushfuls of soft gleam onto the fine fan of
bones that were almost a hand sprouting from his shoulder. He
flexed and spread and the light danced on the webbed flap.
The flippers on Arty’s hips were graceful. Nearly flat, twist-
ing at their short joints like swans’ necks, smooth and
powerful and extending with asymmetrical purpose. The little
toelike thing that never had grime beneath its square nail could
grip or scratch or turn a . He twitched as I stroked on
white, sending ripples through his whole body.
‘Good. Go ahead and grease it now,’ he said.
The undercoat caught the light in a subtle prism. When it
was set, the final greasing had a sheen of its own and kept the
white on even through the hour under water with Arty squirm-
ing his wildest. The white tipping and streaking were new
touches. Arty examined himself in the mirror and his wide
mouth wriggled from corner to corner.
‘My, my. Won’t they just lick my jizz today?’
The sky above Molalla was aching blue but I walked from
Arty’s tent to our van in the same air I’d sucked all my life. It
453 12/01/2015 12:07  454
was a Binewski blend of lube grease, dust, popcorn, and hot
sugar. We made that air and we carried it with us. The
Fabulon’s light was the same in Arkansas as in Idaho – the
patented electric dance step of the Binewskis. We made it. Like
the mucoid nubbin that spins a shell called ‘oyster,’ we
Binewskis wove a midway shelter called ‘carnival.’
It was noon and the crowds were building. Arty was in his
tank holding elevation services for the Admitted in the big
tent. Sanderson was hawking maggots in his elegant kudzu
grammar. The redheads threw daring looks from every ticket
booth and candy stand. Two dozen simp twisters did their
best to shake, shock, and dizzy the change out of all the local
pockets. I strolled down the midway, ready for lunch. I
thought Crystal Lil was brewing Scotch broth for all her
children.
But then I saw Lily in front of the twins’ van. She opened
her long face and yelled, ‘Chick!’ just as Chick pelted past me,
elbows and knees pumping toward her. His white hair lashed
behind him and I began to run. ‘It’s Elly!’ howled Lil.
The bedroom door was open. The pink bed was filled with
thrashing. One bare leg bent, beating its hard heel into the
limp thigh of its mate. A long arm arced out of the snarling
hair and flesh and whipped downward, clenching scissors.
‘No!’ said Chick, but the glinting fist landed and the heel
went on kicking its other leg. ‘No!’ Chick pounced on the bed
and two frail arms jerked up out of the long black hair. The
furious leg straightened and fell down on the sheets. Iphy’s red-
smeared face tipped up between the raised arms and she lay
quietly down beside Elly. The bubble pumping red from Elly’s
breast flattened and then ceased. The two shining eyes of the
454 12/01/2015 12:07  455
scissor handles sat straight up in the shadowed socket of Elly’s
left eye.
‘No.’ Chick reached for Elly while Lily, on her knees beside
the bed, moaned, ‘Baaaby.’
‘Elly?’ said Chick.
I could see the thing on the floor in front of Lil, the bloody
diapered heap of Mumpo.
‘I can’t find her!’ The creak of fright in Chick’s voice. A long
thin tone whined from Lily’s open mouth.
‘I killed her,’ said Iphy calmly. She looked up at the ceiling
from between arms stuck to the sheets by Chick’s mind.
‘I can’t fix her!’ Chick was crying.
‘She killed my little boy.’ Iphy’s voice was flat as Kansas.
‘Mumpo,’ said Chick and he lunged off the bed and saw the
mess on the floor at Lily’s knees.
‘Oh no,’ Chick whispered. ‘I didn’t feel him go. Mumpo.’
Lily keened. ‘I did it,’ sobbed Chick. ‘I brought Elly back.’
‘Arty,’ said Iphigenia. Then she died.
Rooted to the carpet, I stood and watched her go.
Chick whirled to look at her, his tear-slimed face broke. He
threw himself on her, his hands grabbing her face. He jammed
his face against hers, screaming, ‘No!’
Lil rocked on her knees beside the cooling pile of Mumpo.
The high whine came and went with her breath. Chick’s face
and hands were buried in Iphy’s dark mane. He said, ‘Arty.’
I broke for the door. Arty, I thought. Tell Arty. I hit the ramp
as Chick passed me, his blond body hurtling barefoot to the
dirt. I chased him. He stopped when he hit the midway. He
stamped his feet into the sawdust, gathering himself, staring up
the line to where the big tent loomed fifty feet above the
455 12/01/2015 12:07  456
booths and rides. ‘Arty,’ he said, and I heard him through the
wheezing music from the Mad Mouse as he stood, clenching
his fists in the midway, stretching his neck with his eyes closed.
No sign appeared around him. The air did not quiver. But
silence came off him and the stretch of his neck cords made
him old, and the veins blue and hard against his skin, and far
down the line Arty’s tent, full of Arty and his cripples, blew
upward, incinerating.
The white rocking air hit us before the sound. I heard noth-
ing, but raised my hands against the rushing air, and the fire
came, toppling toward us in falling blocks like the wave in a
child’s dream, huge, though the torches were booths and tents
no taller than a man could touch with his hand. It came bil-
lowing, scorching toward us, and the Chick, in his pain, could
not hold himself but reached. I felt him rush through me like
a current of love to my cross points, and then draw back. I,
with my arms lifted, felt his eyes open into me, and felt their
blue flicker of recognition. Then he drew back. He pulled out
of my separate self and was gone. He turned away – and the
fire came. The flames spouted from him – pale as light – burst-
ing outward from his belly. He did not scream or move but he
spread, and my world exploded with him, and I, watching, bit
down and knew it – bit down with a sense of enormous relief,
and ground my teeth to powdered shards – and stood singed
and grinding at the stumps as they died – my roses – Arty and
Al and Chick and the twins – gone dustward as the coals rid
themselves of that terrible heat.
Many died. Many burned. Babes snuffed to grease smears in
the blackened arms of their charcoaled mothers. Sudden
456 12/01/2015 12:07  457
switches, lean and brittle, had started as dancing children only
seconds before. All the dark, gaping corpses, in their fire-frenzy
ballet, flexed and tangled in the dreams of the finders. The fire-
fighters and ambulance shriekers who had worked arson-struck
tenements and the crashes of jumbo jets puked and retreated,
or quit their jobs to grow lettuce, but still dreamed, after
wading the ashes of Binewski’s Carnival Fabulon.
For me there were only Arty and Al and Chick and the
twins snatched into nothing – and I with them – grinding, for
relief, my teeth into powder.
The cats were lost but Horst made it. He took care of busi-
ness while I was in hospital. He brought me the papers to sign
but he made the decisions. I didn’t object. He sent what he
could find of Zephir McGurk home to his sons. He cleaned
and polished the Fly Roper’s stork-shaped scissors before mail-
ing them to the ex-wife in Nebraska. Horst was the one who
identified Arty’s boiled body, no longer beautiful, in the dark
char left when the big tank vaporized. He gathered the torn,
soggy jar kin from the remnants of their shattered jugs and
ushered them, with the rest of the Binewski dead, through
what he called ‘decent’ cremation.
The family living vans weren’t touched by the firestorm.
Horst took out everything personal and then sold the vans.
Norval Sanderson died in the Transcendental Maggot booth
near Arty’s tent, but his van was safe. Horst was quick enough
to get the papers, tapes, and journals out and away before the
reporters got hold of them. He stored everything and rented a
shabby room for himself near the hospital. He was occupied
for months with the dismantling and bankruptcy of the Artu -
ran rest homes. He visited me every day except Wednesdays,
457 12/01/2015 12:07  458
when he trekked down to the state mental hospital near Salem
to visit Mama in her padded room.
He brought me from the hospital to a small rented room
across a dark hall from his own.
‘We might as well say here, in Portland,’ he said. ‘Every
place is the same now.’
The Binewski name stank and drew flies. Horst gave my
name as McGurk when he rented my room. ‘Zephir was a
good man,’ Horst told me. McGurk loved Arty so I kept the
name.
Horst was the one who found Crystal Lil after the firestorm.
It was a year or more before he told me about it. By then I had
a job recording books for the blind. I had begun building a
small life in the strange, stuck world. Horst had met a woman
with strong thighs and a Siamese cat. He was moving in with
her. He took me to McLarnin’s bar for our goodbye. Horst
had a few extra jolts and then told me.
‘I was looking for your papa. It was all over but the scream-
ing. I came around the end of a van and saw him on the
ground. He must have just stepped down from the generator
truck when it blew. Your grandpa’s silver urn was lying in the
gravel beyond him, battered. There was blood on it. I think it
was Al’s.’
Horst couldn’t look at me. He wound his thick fingers in his
grey mustache and glared into his glass.
‘I knew he was dead and I stayed back. I couldn’t go up
to him. I sat down in the gravel by the urn but I couldn’t
touch that, either. Then here comes your mama, calling
‘Al’ like it was suppertime. She was off her head. Out of it,
you understand.
458 12/01/2015 12:07  459
‘She runs to where he’s lying and rips off her blouse – pulls
her skirt down – hikes her underpants tight against her crotch.
She’s saying, “Al . . . broken . . . just completely broken . . . we’ll
have to start over.” She crouches over Al’s body, straddling his
thighs, fumbling at his belt, opening his zipper, yanking those
white jodhpurs down to his hips and talking softly. She settles
herself over his limp penis and she rocks, rubbing her crotch
against him, stroking his chest, not noticing the half of his face
that isn’t there anymore – not noticing the handless stump of
his arm smoldering, but rubbing herself slowly like a cat
against him and running her hands inside his shirt against his
chest hair and saying, “Broken . . . Al . . . after all our work . . .
we’ll start again . . . Al . . . you and me . . . Al.”’
Mumpo was not quite three years old when he died. And you,
Miranda, were two, stringing beads and eating vanilla wafers
in Sister Lucy’s nursery. But you were nine years old before the
doctors let me bring Crystal Lil home to the house on Kearney
Street.
I was full-grown before I ever set foot in a house without
wheels. Of course I had been in stores, offices, fuel stations,
barns, and warehouses. But I never walked through the door
of a place where people slept and ate and bathed and picked
their noses, and, as the saying goes, ‘lived,’ unless that place
was three times longer than it was wide and came equipped
with road shocks and tires.
When I first stood in such a house I was struck by its terri-
ble solidity. The thing had concrete tentacles sunk into the
earth, and a sprawling inefficiency. Everything was bigger than
459 12/01/2015 12:07  460
it needed to be and there were so many shadowed, dusty cor-
ners empty and wasted that I thought I would get lost if I
stepped away from the door. That building wasn’t going any-
where despite an itchy sense that it was not entirely
comfortable where it was.
That was when I first recognized a need to explain myself.
That was the time when I realized that the peculiar look on
people’s faces when they saw me was not envy or hatred, but
could be translated into one simple question: ‘What the hell
happened to you?’ They needed to know so they could prevent
it from happening to them.
My answer was simple, too. ‘My father and mother
designed me this way. They achieved greater originality in
some of their other projects.’
For a while I told people this. I was proud of it. It was the
truth. Only a few folks ever actually asked – little children,
drunks, or people so old that they exempted themselves from
the taboos of courtesy by pretending senile irresponsibility. I
got interested. I’d throw the answer even when the question
wasn’t voiced but was only lightly etched in the flesh around
the eyes. I’d smile calmly and announce it to the kid at the gas
pump, or the garbage collector, or a lady with a shopping bag
at a street light.
Some, particularly women, would turn away as though I
hadn’t spoken or they hadn’t heard me. They thought I was
crazy. They didn’t want to encourage me. Next thing I’d be
asking for money.
I worked on polishing my story and my delivery. To excuse
them for wondering, to make them feel all right about it. I felt
exhilarated by each explanation, but still they shut me out.
460 12/01/2015 12:07  461
‘Shit!’ some would say. Or ‘Do tell!’ The best I could hope
for was ‘Born that way eh?’ Were they bored by it? Or embar-
rassed? Did they assume I was lying?
This mystery appeared when I first stood in a rooted house.
I hadn’t understood before that anything about me needed
explaining. It’s all very well to read about houses, and see
houses from the road, and to tell yourself, That’s where folks
live. But it’s another thing entirely to walk inside and stand
there.
Al always laughed at the stuck houses. He hauled out his
only bit of scripture to deal with houses. ‘The birds of the air
have their nests,’ he would announce as though it were a nurs-
ery rhyme, ‘the foxes of the ground have their holes.’ And he
would raise one finger and jut his eyebrows forward in his
teaching way, ‘But the son of man hath nowhere to rest his
head.’
461 12/01/2015 12:07  462 12/01/2015 12:07  463
BOOK IV
Becoming the Dragon 12/01/2015 12:07  464 12/01/2015 12:07  465
26
NOTES FOR NOW
The Swimmers
I, the dwarf whose ears are separated only by an oozing hem-
orrhoid, am now being punished for sentimental collapse
during my swimming lesson. It was the soft flab over Miss
Lick’s neck that broke me. The firm way she has of pushing
her jaw down into the cushions of her multiple chins as she
smiles at me in the water. I had set myself up with a splurge of
vanity for my own malignant resolution. Then the mere sight
of Miss Lick’s neck tipped me off my perch. I blubbered all the
way down and damned near gave the show away.
There I am, soaking in the green air above the water, keep-
ing tabs on the lifeguard who is fluttering winsomely at a
golden-brown boy wearing, apparently, three pounds of grapes
stuffed down the front of his wet swim trunks. The room
echoes flatly, and four little girls are huddled in the water on
the other side of the pool, swearing to each other in whispers
that they have seen me in the dressing room without my swim
cap and my green-tinted goggles. They are assuring each other
465 12/01/2015 12:07  466
that I am as bald as a baby’s ass and that my eyes are bright
red.
With my eyes closed I can feel the children looking at me.
They have stopped their games for a moment in the shallow
end where they can watch me. I too am at the shallow end, sit-
ting on the steps in water up to my nipples. Miss Lick is
plowing up and down the pool in her ponderous and dutiful
laps. The children’s eyes are crawling on me. If I opened my
eyes they would smile at me and wave. They are just old
enough to be embarrassed at their normality in front of me.
Because I am Olympia Binewski and am accustomed to the
feel of eyes moving on me, I turn slightly on my submerged
seat and reach down as though examining my toes under
water. This angle will allow the children a clear profile view
of my hump. I have never claimed that my hump is extraor-
dinary in size or conformation, but it is a classic of its kind,
rising in a clean arc and pulling my shoulders up, pinching my
chest out in a narrow wedge. The top of the hump, if I bend
at a certain angle, is as high as the back of my head. Now I
will bring both hands out of the water and remove my gog-
gles. There is some splashing from the children. They are
impressed at the size of my hands on the ends of my short,
thin arms. I smile and open my eyes so they can tell in the
dapple reflections on the water that my eyes are a deep rose
pink rather than red.
But Miss Lick is standing in the shallow end, glowering
down at the children. I can hear her harshness. ‘Are you swim-
ming laps or fooling around?’ And four little creatures do not
speak but kick off from the wall and chase each other down
the far lane of the pool to escape.
466 12/01/2015 12:07  467
The light is pale green and moves on Miss Lick’s enormous
shoulders and chest. She turns and nods at me – a quick twitch
of tension at her mouth that stands for a smile. She is telling
me that she has saved me from the stares of idiots and that I
am safe with her to guard me. Then she plunges back into the
water and moves forward, beating the surface with the sound
of a hiccuping cannon.
The children turn and come back but they won’t dare stop
at this end again. Miss Lick doesn’t like children. She hates
beautiful female children. These four ten-year-olds are long
and absurdly slim, with clean faces. They are frightened of
Miss Lick but not of me.
Maybe it’s because I am so old. They would worry if I was
their age and they could imagine being me. They tell each
other that I was ‘born that way,’ which is reassurance for them
and comfort for me. Nothing could make me hurt them.
But they are wise to fear Miss Lick. She could lose control
for an instant and grind them to paste.
Miss Lick is giving me a swimming lesson. She holds me in her
arms and mutters, ‘Tip your head back, arch your spine.
Good. Now kick from the hip.’
Her face is big and serious, watching me carefully. Her arms
and hands are warm beneath me. I lie on my back and squint
up into her bulging face and know that she is the only friend
I’ve ever had. We are in water that would be over my head if
she let me go. I can hear the thrum of other swimmers beating
the water around me. The light bounces off the walls and is
broken by the water. Miss Lick holds me up. ‘Good, Oly,’ she
says, and she smiles at me.
467 12/01/2015 12:07  468
Miss Lick is six feet two and a heavyweight athlete. She is
not quite 40 years old and has 20-inch biceps. I have 7-inch
biceps. I am 36 inches tall. I weigh 64 pounds and I am very
old at 38. My arthritis is actually 110. But Miss Lick is even
older because she is closer to death. Miss Lick has her arm
around the bomb that will kill her and she is dickering to buy
it.
‘Kick!’ she barks, grinning down at me. Suddenly the sting
of grief spurts from my sinuses to my belly. This is all Miranda’s
fault, I tell myself in rage. If my daughter weren’t such a fly-
brained slut I wouldn’t be in this position. I could be a quiet,
pleasant old dwarf, curling into a dry and sanitary death in my
own blankets without ever having injured a soul. But here I am
rocking in the arms of the creature I intend to slaughter. When
I stop kicking and double up in pain, Miss Lick is worried.
‘Water in your nose?’ she asks, pumping her huge pillow
hand gently against my hump. ‘Did you swallow some?’
Looking up through my smeared green lenses I see a roll of
fat covering the artery in Miss Lick’s throat.
When I refuse to go to dinner at her house Miss Lick wants to
carry me up to my apartment and tuck me into bed. ‘God, I’m
so thoughtless!’ she groans as she wheels the big sedan through
the dark streets. ‘I act as though you’re a goddamned moun-
tain like me!’
‘Not at all.’ I squawk, with my fingers clutching the soft
leather of the front seat. ‘Not at all,’ I repeat, grabbing with
one hand at the dashboard and the other at the armrest to
keep from hurtling into the dark well of legroom as Miss Lick
stops for a light.
468 12/01/2015 12:07  469
‘You’re sure you don’t want me to come up with you? I
could make you some soup. I know you don’t eat.’
‘Not at all,’ I fiddle with the door handle, and the door eases
open at last and a crack of cool air slips in, dulling the hot reek
of her chlorine flesh in the car. ‘I’m going to unplug the phone
and crawl right into bed. I’m recording early tomorrow.’
‘Her big hand touches my hump as I slide toward the pave-
ment. ‘Let me give you a lift to the radio station in the
morning,’ she urged.
‘Not at all.’ I can barely think anymore. If I don’t get away
from her I will disintegrate and ruin everything.
‘Thank you so much. I’ll see you in the pool tomorrow
evening,’ and I grab the car door with both hands and slam it
on her goodnight and turn away, steering at top speed for the
lobby entrance because she never pulls away from the curb
until she sees me safe inside.
This building is new and Miss Lick could put a fist through
my front door as easy as belching, which she does glibly. Miss
Lick can belch every syllable of the name ‘Harry Houdini’ on
demand and enjoys being asked. Still, I lock the flimsy veneer
behind me and then unplug the phone, I told her I was going
to bed and I can’t risk a busy signal if she rings to check on me.
It is garbage night for Crystal Lil. I have to go home. Taxis
are expensive for moderately employed dwarfs who rent extra
apartments, swim at private clubs, and fancy themselves as
righteous assassins. I use the footstool to stare into the mirror
over the sink in the all-new bathroom. Straightening my wig,
adjusting my glasses, I smirk at myself because it serves me
right for being such a flabby clot as to lose my nerve. Getting
all choked up with sympathy for Miss L. A good two-mile
469 12/01/2015 12:07  470
walk in the dark and cold will teach my knees and ankles a
little respect for discipline and self-control.
Fatigue makes me giddy. By the time I get to the alley
behind Lily’s house, my head is floating several feet above my
body and I have a bitter tendency to giggle. I can see myself
and the view is pathetic. I don’t dare use the front door in case
Miss Lick is pursuing her surveillance hobby.
The old dwarf rolls up the cat-shit dark stairs of the decrepit
garage to get to the roof. Her feet hurt and her knees are
pleading for a transfer to Bermuda. ‘Eeh,’ grunts the frog-faced
albino. Her hip joints have gone past red-hot to a temperature
unfamiliar even to the flap-titted hunchback. ‘Hunh,’ says the
bald-headed mother of morons, as she stops to lean against the
open door to the roof.
The air is grey, lit by a street lamp at the end of the alley.
The garage roof is flat and attached at the rear to the tall wood
house. The rain pops and silvers on the slimed pool of water
that fills the center of the roof. The house fire escape sinks its
feet in the roof tar. Miss Oly, the third or fourth Binewski
child, depending on whether you count heads or asses, takes
off her blue-tinted spectacles and rubs the sweat from under
her bulging pink eyes and off the bridge of her wide, flat nose
and then hooks the glasses back over her ears and settles them
in place. Raising the entire flesh of her forehead and skull for
lack of eyebrows, Ms. Binewski proceeds, with anxious care,
to roll bowleggedly away from the cat stench of the stairway,
around the edges of the rain pool, making for the first length
of the cast-iron fire ladder. There she goes, humping up the
damp, sooty rungs. She stops climbing and hooks her chin
over the rung in front of her to rest for three breaths, thinking
470 12/01/2015 12:07  471
it may be time to get a cane. Or maybe a pair of canes hefty
enough to help a burst toad of an elderly cretin up such flights
of carpenterial fancy as those cat-slimed stairs in the garage
without having to reach out and touch each sodden step with
a hand.
She, this Oly, has reached the first slat landing of the fire
escape and is hauling her thick carcass onto it with her spider
arms and resting again – or, more accurately, peering through
the dirt-fogged window of the room that looks out of this arse-
alley backside of the noble West Hills, and, if those are tears
puddling in the bottom of those wire-framed glasses she’s
wearing, then this flabby old douche bag will be too blind to
stay on the platform and will drop and crack like a beetle on
the garage roof, next to the ornamental pool.
No, she claims she’s not crying, though her sinuses are
trying to squeeze out through her eyeballs. She is, however,
feeling sorry for herself because this is ‘her’ window and the
big dusty room on the other side is ‘her’ room and Oly misses
it and would like to crawl in and shut the window and never
leave it again, but she cannot because instead of a brain she
has been blessed with a flame-purple hemorrhoid and she is in
miserable, though voluntary, exile until her little project is
finished.
There, is she crying again? Or is she only realizing that if she
had washed that smog-clogged hunk of glass anytime in the
last three years she might actually see her reading chair and her
hotplate sitting on the cupboard and the cupboard doors that
open into the blanket nest where she sleeps with the doors
snugged shut and her knees tucked up to her chin. This failure
in the service of transparency is disheartening to the delicate
471 12/01/2015 12:07  472
mucous linings of the amphibious Miss Oly. Picturing her
cranky joints curled in her own warm nest causes further heat
and discharge from her cherry-pink eyeballs.
Quietly she slips the lock, pushes the window upward,
snakes through into the warm dark, and feels the cushion-
thick carpet beneath her brogans. She smiles her frog smile and
considers calling a taxi for the trip back since surely she has
punished herself sufficiently for what was, after all, an under-
standable weakness. Next time, she muses, I’ll simply stick my
hand in boiling water.
I go downstairs and yell, ‘Garbage!’ three times at Lil’s open
door before she sits back from her magnifying-glass approach
to the evening game show. Her white head moves, groping
with ears and nose more than her sad, jellied remnants of eyes.
Each time I look at her the white hair is paler and thinner, like
spun glass above her mummy-grey scalp.
‘Garbage?’ she screams.
‘Garbage!’ I bellow.
She launches from her chair, leaping upward, neck extended,
the tender underside of her jaw exposed in a flesh wedge aimed
at heaven. Sailing the room, tacking from chair to table to cup-
board, hand over hand, she locates her two waste-baskets and
the tidy, plastic-wrapped bundle beneath the sink, clutches
them to her breast, and turns toward the doorway, searching
for me. I step in just far enough to grab the stuff. She opens her
arms, letting it all go down to me. This is our Thursday ritual.
To complete it, she will nod and turn away silently. I will lug
the stuff to the junk closet at the end of the hall, where the big
black bags of garbage from the roomers sit. Then I will drag
472 12/01/2015 12:07  473
all the bags out to the sidewalk, stacking them in the plastic
barrels that sit there all week. That is all. We’ve done it this
way for years. By the time I climb the stairs back to my room,
Lil will be resubmerged in her struggle with the magnifying
glass and the TV screen. Beyond the chant of ‘Garbage’ we
never speak. But tonight she cracks the mold. She follows me
to the door of her room, leans there, waiting as I drag the big
sacks past her. As I open the big front door onto the wet night,
she calls out, ‘Thank you,’ in a clear, unbroken voice.
I look back. She is poised, her milk-veiled eyes aimed in my
general direction, her head tilted back, listening. ‘You’re wel-
come,’ I say, and she goes back into her room.
I climb all the way up to Miranda’s door and knock. Then I
hear a soft male voice laughing inside and turn away. She opens.
‘Miss McGurk!’ smiling. ‘You’re sent by fate to try munching
Gorgonzola and artichoke-heart salad while listening to . . . ’
As she tries to pull me in, I try to pull her out into the hall.
‘Could I just speak to you for one moment?’ She shrugs and
steps out, folding her arms, looking down at me with her eye-
brows pinched in concentration. ‘Something is wrong with
Lily.’
Her eyes spring open and she sets to move quickly, ‘Is she
hurt? Shall I call an ambulance?’
Gratified, I pat her arm, ‘No, no. She’s acting a little odd.’
Miranda hoots. ‘How can you tell?’
‘No. She’s acting strangely. I can’t be here for a bit. I have to
work. Could you keep an eye on her? Tonight? Just stroll down
and listen for her breathing. You can hear her in the night if you
put your ear to her door. She has a heavy sigh in her sleep. And
if you can’t hear her, or if she sounds strange . . . ’
473 12/01/2015 12:07  474
Miranda hoists her eyebrows at me in surprise. ‘Sure. I’ll
check on her. I’m not working tonight. Don’t worry.’
Nodding and waving, I retreat quickly. She stands looking
after me. As I go down the stairs I hear the soft male voice call,
‘Miranda?’ and then her door shuts quietly.
I stay in my room for a few hours, arranging the papers in
the big trunk. At around eleven I hear Miranda on the stairs.
Her footsteps pass down to the ground floor and pause for a
while at Lily’s closed door. Then she goes back up. I find
myself smiling as I listen.
I go down myself an hour later. The wheeze and bubble
beyond Lil’s door is regular and strong. I use the wall phone
to call for a cab and wait for it on the front steps.
I sulk all the way back to the tinhorn apartment. I want my
own moldy room with its pale stench and its frail, maniac
noise. The new building seems lifeless, incapable of decay. Its
halls are narrow and pharmaceutically bright. Each floor is the
same as all the rest. The only sound is the faint hum of the ele-
vator. The orange carpet from the hall spills under my door,
flooding the whole apartment. The rooms are low and square
and it feels rented because I refuse to actually live here. In my
home the air reeks of dust and jumbled layers of life, and it is
dim unless you are right next to a window.
Here the telephone is white and has its own table. Where I
live the phone is an ancient black-and-chrome wall box with
coin slots and numbers scratched into its paint. It rings often
but few people ever use it to call out. It is too exposed there in
the grease-brown entryway. Whenever it rings, Lily answers,
though it is never for her.
474 12/01/2015 12:07  475
27
NOTES FOR NOW
Getting to Know You
and Your .357 Magnum
What a bouncer she would have made! Shy as an egg, but so
disguised. I can’t help it. She charms me. To see her hunched
over her plastic tray – chin shoved straight at the big screen,
her paw pokes a fork in the air, and she laughs, ‘Hu-hu-hu,’
through her bulging cheeks.
‘Smart little shit, I’m tellin’ ya!’ she says after cleaning her
cheeks with a gulp. ‘Lookit ’er drive that sucker!’
The young woman on the screen is bent over a com -
plicated hunk of shiny machinery. The driving Miss Lick finds
so admirable is a surefingered dial-twiddling and button-
tapping.
Miss Lick scoots back in her chair and lunges for another
flabby forkful of limp turkey from her compartmentalized
supper.
She loves this – carrying our Lickety Split food trays back
475 12/01/2015 12:07  476
through the discreet door in the big bathroom to her home-
movie theater, perching on straight chairs with the trays on our
knees, watching the screen full of Miss Lick’s girls. She adores
the reruns, and nearly cries at the ‘before’ footage, angry griev-
ing for the misery of their lives before she rescued them. She is
hypnotized by the surgery or treatment flicks, chewing slowly,
nudging me with an informative elbow and a nod when a par-
ticularly smooth bit of scissor or saw work is goring its way
across the screen. Now that she allows me to see these seg-
ments, she is anxious to impress me. But her joy is in the work
shots of the ‘successes.’
‘Look at that! Know what she’s doing? Reading the rings of
rat-assed Saturn! Can you imagine? Six years ago the only rings
she knew were for slipping over limp cocks to make ’em rise!’
The young woman in the white coat reaches for the paper
that is spewing from a printer. She turns toward us and the
light to read. She smiles, a sudden grin of utterly cheerful mis-
chief flashing out of her intense flesh.
I want to ask what it is that she hasn’t got anymore. The lab
coat hides her chest. Was it breasts? Two new figures appear –
a plain woman and a spavined boy, twenty and twenty-one
years old. They stand at attention in front of Miss Lick’s girl
as she speaks.
‘Teaching ’em! See that? She’s got these fuckers trailing after
her!’
Miss Lick’s big hand bunches and jabs my thigh sideways in
hilarious friendship. ‘Eh? Eh?’
My tray flips forward, spewing goo, and she’s on her knees
choking with apologies as she plucks up the gobs and wipes up
the smears. ‘Creeping Christ! I’m such a clod! Are you all
476 12/01/2015 12:07  477
right? Hey, I’ll have a fresh new one for you in thirty seconds
flat. Just sit. No, no, I’m going to.’
She tears me up. I sit here laughing at her. She is a galumph-
ing dugong, an elvish ox, a sentimental rhino.
‘They’re like my kids, all of them.’ She sniffs, her thick fore-
head creasing, anxious that I should understand and approve.
‘Did you, no offense now, but did you ever wish you’d
had kids? Not the man bit, but the kid bit? No? Well, you’re
right, I know it. You’re right. But you want to make a differ-
ence. A person wants to feel as though they’ve accomplished
something.’
She mooches around for my approval. She’s a sullen buffalo
with the world but she’s a child to me. She is bigger than Papa.
She could break me with two fingers. But she can be small
around me. She can chatter to me though she sticks to brusque
efficiency with everybody else. Oh, she is solicitous and pro-
tective with her girls, but never childlike. It’s because I like her.
Arty was right. She soaks it up like booze and it turns her to
water, makes her defenseless.
Am I the first person who’s ever liked her? It makes me sad.
She’s pretty lovable, after all. She knows how to enjoy things,
and she’s so decent it’s scary.
There she sits, sprawled in a hard, straight chair, hour after
hour. It never occurs to her to drag in a soft chair for herself.
She thought about cushions for me, though. Draped my
straight chair with towels from the bathroom because one day
in the pool she saw red lines on my hump. I’d been leaning
on a locker. She never forgot. She always makes sure I’m
comfortable.
477 12/01/2015 12:07  478
‘So why don’t you bring in an armchair for yourself?’ I
asked her.
‘What? Too much trouble. I don’t need it. I’m padded.’
She’s wearing flannel pajamas and a floppy bathrobe. Her
potato feet stick out, the soles jammed against the tile floor,
propping her in the chair as she reaches, sorting through the film
disks. Her chubby toes sprout, wiggling, from the main tuber.
‘Got a new scout flick today.’ Her approach to the scouting
tapes of potential recruits is different, intense, questioning, crit-
ical, analytical, running them again, backing them up to replay
a gesture, a frown, a smile.
‘This slut tried a one-handed pigeon drop on me. As soon as
she discovered this bag, brown paper bag, under her ass on the
park bench, I smelled old tuna. She screeches “For heaven’s
sakes!” I sat there watching the real goddamn pigeons crap-
ping on the lawn, listening to her go on about “Where could
all that money have possibly come from?,” and then finding a
little brown envelope of snapshots. Twelve-year-old sucking a
Doberman’s dick, and she’s miscarrying with righteous indig-
nation and trying to get me to pay attention and all the time
I’m thinking, “This is where I’ve got to at last. I’m looking like
a gobbling pigeon, just like all the drooling biddies shuffling on
the mall.” It makes me bitter. I reached in my wallet and pulled
out a hundred. “Now, honey,” I says, and I hand it to her,
watching her eyes freeze as she shuts up. “You take this so you
don’t get your ass kicked when you get back to the slimy pimp
that runs you. Save us all trouble and time.” She starts up
protesting, waving this lunch bag of funny money at me.
“Believe me, sweetheart,” I says, “you’re not cut out for this
business.” I went back to the office and crabbed at people all
478 12/01/2015 12:07  479
afternoon. Anyway, I saw her again in the Park Blocks while
I had the equipment.’
The frail, colorless girl on the screen is far away and small
on a park bench. She sits, twisting her shirttail edgily and look-
ing nervously around. I can’t make her face out clearly.
‘What do you think?’
I squint through my glasses, trying to see the wispy features.
‘Isn’t she like an “after” already?’
Miss Lick slaps her knees. ‘True enough!’
‘I mean,’ I try to see the outline of the girl’s breasts under
her shoddy shirt, ‘she’s got nothing to sell you.’
‘Oly! What do you think I am?’ Miss Lick is hurt. ‘She
could use some schooling and a decent job. Those skinny mice
have got nothing. All they can do is latch onto some man or
die.’
‘I didn’t mean . . . ’
‘Sure. Forget it. Here’s the bang-tail filly again. I’ll think
about that con sharper. Maybe something can be done. The
bang-tail has me flummoxed, though.’
I clench my teeth and telescope my head downward between
my shoulders. The ‘bang-tail’ is Miranda. I’ve already spent
hours watching replays of Miranda lounging on the steps of
the art school, eating ice-cream as she walks down the street,
waving her tail on a velvet-draped stage during one of the
Glass House private showings. Here she is again, flirting with
her Binewski eyes, stretching her wide Arturan mouth to loll
a tongue suggestively around the ice-cream cone, alert to the
effect she’s having on the guy in the coveralls waiting beside
her for the traffic light to change. It screws me up totally to see
Miss Lick’s films of Miranda.
479 12/01/2015 12:07  480
‘What’s she about? Hopeless, you think?’ Miss Lick is sen-
sitive to my moods. ‘Say it, Oly, is she useless?’
‘No!’ I snap and then wave my hand weakly, trying to
soften it.
‘I haven’t heard a peep out of her in weeks. There’s one
month left to her school year. She’s supposed to go straight in
to surgery the week after the semester ends. But you’d think
she’d call. I have a bet with myself that she’ll hit me up to
double my cash offer. The hell of it is, I don’t know if it’s worth
it. Art types. But I made the offer and I’ll stick by my word.
She’ll do the tail and then we’ll see. Thing is, she’s made the
tail erotic rather than a disfigurement. Maybe I’ll stop with
that. I’m soft but I’m not nuts. No use wasting money and
time and energy on a stupid cow who can’t benefit . . . ’
‘She’s not stupid.’ It slips out before I could stop it.
‘Yeah, she is, but I can never resist . . . ’
‘Not stupid!’ Miss Lick looks at me with her mouth poised
for a word, her clever eyes calm on me, waiting. I feel every-
thing slipping away from me, all the care and planning, and
volunteer misery. ‘I don’t know! Don’t mind me. I feel sorry
for her.’
Miss Lick always melts at ‘feeling sorry.’ ‘Hey, don’t I
know? Don’t I just know precisely?’
‘I mean,’ I dig my fingertips into my knees for control, ‘she’s
already in school. Where’s the percentage?’
‘The men like that tail. I could subtract that distraction for
her as a start. That’s what I had in mind.’
I take a taxi back to my alien apartment, crawl under the
bed with two blankets, and huddle there on the orange carpet.
*
480 12/01/2015 12:07  481
‘So the nutso wants to sell me a nine-millimeter full-auto
with a clip as long as an elephant’s dong and he won’t let up.
He’s revving his tonsils and I’m standing there staring at
him, thinking what he’d look like with that clip rammed up
his . . . ’
Miss Lick is lolling on the fir-needle sponge beneath the
trees. She stretches out on her belly, arms stuck out in front of
her, hands clasped warmly around what looks like a small gun,
just the tip of the barrel showing beyond her puffy knuckles.
The thing blaps like a knife in the eye when she squeezes. A
dark blotch appears on the sheet of typing paper tacked to the
tree fifty feet away. She milks off four shots and then pushes up
to her knees and breaks the pistol open, its barrel lifting at the
root like a shotgun as she nips the casings out with a sturdy
fingernail.
‘Hot!’ she winces. ‘Want to look?’
By the time I reach the shredded target paper, she’s reloaded
and caught up with me, the ground snapping and hissing
under her weight. She flicks the paper scraps away and fingers
the yellow splinters that look as though somebody small and
very rough had busted out of the old fir. ‘Nice tight pattern.’
She looks at me for praise.
I nod, though it’s too high up for me to see inside the
teacup-sized crater. I don’t tell her for fear she’ll lift me up to
look.
‘So I walked out,’ she continues the tale. ‘If the silly sucker
had just sold me what I wanted he could have made his money
and saved his breath.’
She sticks the gun into the holster under her left arm. I hear
a small snap as she buckles the gun nest closed.
481 12/01/2015 12:07  482
‘Ready for work?’ she claps and grins and reaches for the
heavy machete leaning at the foot of the tree.
She gives me thick gloves and I follow her all afternoon as she
chops at the saplings and brush and blackberry vines that clog
the back acres of ‘the homestead’ as she calls it.
The big brick house with its turrets and diamond-paned
windows sits close to the road, surrounded by civilized green
and leased to the regional director of a major computer man-
ufacturer. ‘He always invites me to his sociable dos on the
terrace,’ says Miss Lick, ‘and his wife tries to maroon me in
the library with one of the firm’s middle-aged bachelors or get
me drunk and show me pictures of starving babies to make me
blubber before she tells me how much the firm contributes to
famine relief. She’s inventive, I have to admit. And he’s subtle.’
The wooded acreage isn’t included in the lease. ‘I get my
firewood here,’ she explains. She just likes it out here. She
wears boots and a wide tweed bag of a skirt with her hooded
sweatshirt to wallop around in the woods. She calls it ‘tending
the park’ or ‘minding the homestead.’
She cuts brush and I drag it out and throw it on a heap that
rises and spreads in the small clearing.
She’s rambling on about guns. ‘I used to carry my old man’s
.45 but the bastard was built for a hip holster. Barrel was too
long to be discreet in a lady’s suit. The poor broad that makes
my clothes got old suddenly every time I walked through her
door. So I got this little bitch of a COP. Stands for Compact
Off-duty Police. Fires a .357 Magnum round. Has a rotary
hammer like the old Sharps and Brownies. Guy, when I
bought it, tried to sell me a little automatic. Told me a lady
482 12/01/2015 12:07  483
needed more than four shots. I says to him. Well, if I shoot
some sonofabitch I’m not gonna miss, ya know. And he shuts
up like a bank on Sunday. I think it’s a cute gun. I like those
four big barrels looking down on anybody who’d give me a
hard time. Little gun, big bite. Always liked a .45 though. Cut
my teeth on them because my dad always had them. He
taught me to shoot.’
She talks and swings the heavy blade, tearing the cuttings
away with her gloved left hand and pushing them behind her
to where I plod.
Thomas R. Lick seems to have been the only man in her life.
Her tongue is modeled on his. Without ever having known
him or heard him speak, I know she mimics him. She moves
like him. She looks like him. Her politics and prejudices and
pride are almost certainly his. And I look like Arty.
I am thinking about Arty and throwing an armload of
spider-and-scratch onto the heap when she hollers, ‘Hey! Shit-
for-brains!’ in her jollying-the-help tone. ‘Boss is gone! Break
time!’ She comes red-faced from the dark of the trees. I sit
down, suddenly nauseated.
‘Hey! Don’t faint.’ She is patting me clumsily, smoothing my
hump, pressing my head down so my wig slides to my glasses.
I start giggling helplessly and bat at her to get free. ‘I’m all
right.’
‘You were pink and sweaty and then boom, your face
was . . . ’
Laughing, I flop back on the heap so I can look up at her. ‘I
had a brother who used to call me shit-for-brains.’
She grabs at the ancient wheelbarrow that lugs the tools and
drags it toward me. ‘Brother? That’s something. Is he dead?
483 12/01/2015 12:07  484
You never mention family. Kind of figured you for an orphan.
Born of joy and mirth, like. Something like that.’
She’s reaching under my arms to lift me like a child. I hate
having her lift me. She does it too easily. She folds me up tidily
in the wheelbarrow and I lean back, trying not to be angry.
Her chin stretches like the prow of a Buick as she shakes her
head. ‘Hang on for the ride!’ and she runs, trundling me and
the barrow, the branches whipping the sky above her and her
pink and blinking face grinning like the hilarious moon, all the
way to her car.
‘If I could think of a way to seal her asshole, I’d do it. And
maybe stitch her mouth shut and feed her with a tube going in
under her chin.’ Miss Lick is half-joking in the elevator. Her
hands are shoved flat into the pockets of her suit jacket and
she rocks back on the thick heels of her crocodile shoes and
rolls a chuckle at the mirror-bronze ceiling of the rising cubi-
cle. ‘You’ll see what I mean. This little broad hasn’t a hair left,
bald as you are. A double mastectomy. And she’s still got that
sex thing. If I let her walk from her room to the can, three men
would climb out of the light sockets on the way and find holes
in her to cram their dicks into.’
The elevator stops and the door sighs open. Miss Lick
lowers her voice and mutters down at me, ‘I’ve been thinking
testosterone. You’ll see what I mean.’ A silvery grandma-nurse
passes us in the hall, nodding her little grey bun and her perky
white cap and twinkling, ‘Good afternoon, Miss Lick!’ with
only a slight hesitation in her smile for me.
We are visiting Miss Lick’s latest, a nineteen-year-old
gymnast with a bent for engineering and a yen to get into
484 12/01/2015 12:07  485
the space program. Miss Lick likes the idea of producing an
astronaut but is hampered in her efforts by the requirements
of the work. ‘She’s got to be physically functional all the way.
It’s a nuisance.’
Jessica H. is in Miss Lick’s favorite nursing home, recuper-
ating from the relatively minor surgery that closed her vagina
and removed her clitoris. The girl has pushed her sheets off
and is languidly stroking her firm, golden belly with one finger.
The bandages look like a diaper. Her chest is blank and nipple -
less but the scars are almost invisible.
‘Jessica!’ booms Miss Lick from the doorway. The girl’s
smooth, oval head turns casually on the pillow and she looks
at us with long, oval eyes, the lids as hairless as sea shells. Then
her lush, wide mouth opens slightly in a smile and she is look-
ing at me as Miss Lick bustles with the flowers and rumbles
awkwardly, ‘Want you to meet Miss McGurk. Olympia
McGurk. A good pal of mine.’
The girl is smiling gently with cheekbones that could cut
your throat and a nose and chin from some old painting that
I can’t quite remember. While this face is delicately smiling, the
long throat and the flat muscular chest and the round shoul-
ders begin to shake with laughter. With this laugh still going
she says to me, ‘How much did she pay you? A few million, I
hope!’
485 12/01/2015 12:07  486
28
NOTES FOR NOW
One for the Road
Miss Lick watches me surface and blow. She grins as I scrab-
ble for the guttered side of the pool. ‘It’s amazing that you and
I are so much alike, isn’t it?’ I kick off on my back, paddling
away from her, grinning.
She’s right. We each appear totally alone in our lives. I’m the
shy, isolated dwarf creeping in and out of my shabby room,
living only through my throat and my inherited work. She is the
muscular monolith, cut off by brass, stalking around in her old
man’s ambition, too imposing in finance and physique for the
regular commerce of talk and touch. We choose to seem barren,
loveless orphans. We each have a secret family. Miss Lick has
her darlings and I have mine. All we’ve really lacked is some-
one to tell. Now she tells me, and I tell all to these bland,
indifferent sheets of paper. The only point where our narrow
tracks converge is her bid to turn my darling into one of hers.
Does she lie to me? She keeps things from me. She wouldn’t
let me watch the surgery or treatment sections of her home
486 12/01/2015 12:07  487
movies for a long time. Does she keep more aside? Hide more
of herself? Horrors she doesn’t trust me with? Titillations she
is ashamed of? I sail along thinking she is perfectly open. Her
eyes are as wide as a child’s when she talks to me. But maybe
I’m the fool. Maybe lying so constantly has burnt my view.
Believing that she is fooled, I consider her too simple to lie.
We are alone in the pool. The lifeguard has gone for the
night, trusting Miss Lick to lock up. Miss Lick sits on the side,
her huge legs drooping into the water. She shudders as I stop
to breathe at her end.
‘Do you ever,’ her eyes circle the echoing green of the big
room, ‘do you ever get the feeling somebody’s watching us?’
My head swivels, searching automatically, though I know
that the watcher is me. ‘You’re just tired and spooky. You need
your supper.’
She shrugs it off. Forgets. But does she really know? Is she
playing me while I play her?
It rains every night now and the air is soft in the morning.
Almost warm. A faint haze, not quite green, softens the iron
branches of the trees. Miranda’s anatomy drawings are fin-
ished. She has mounted them on cardboard and she stores
them in a huge plastic binder.
‘I want you to look at them.’
‘I can’t.’
‘All this time you’ve never looked.’
‘Just not at the ones of me. I don’t want to see myself.’
‘You look in mirrors. I’m better than any goddamned mirror.’
‘It’s not your work. I like your other drawings. This just
scares me.’
487 12/01/2015 12:07  488
‘I take it personally. This is my best work. The best I’ve
ever done. I don’t see you as ugly. I see you as unique and
wonderful.’
‘It’s hard dealing with you seeing me at all.’
‘Miss-fucking-steerious! I’m handing the whole mess in
tomorrow morning. The competition results will come out in
two weeks, the day before I go into the hospital.’
‘Hospital.’
‘Or whatever. I don’t know where Miss Lick has that work
done.’
‘I have to get back to work now.’
‘The semester ends Friday.’
‘Thank you so much for the tea.’
‘I’m calling Miss Lick today to arrange things.’
‘See you soon.’
‘I may not come back here afterward.’
I trotted down the hall with her leaning out of her doorway
to talk to my back.
‘I’ll be in a nursing home for a while and then I’ll probably
move away.’
I’m not even tempted to anger. Time is a rap on the ear with
a brass knuckle. I’ve been letting it ride. Having my little
cake – chummy with Miranda over tea, chummy with Miss
Lick over home movies – snuggling down in a thick-headed
fantasy that what little I was doing would make the difference,
as if putting across the lie was success. All I had to do was
accept mild discomfort in a strange room, sneak up the fire
escape to visit Lily and Miranda, and this puny martyrdom
would miraculously obliterate the problem.
*
488 12/01/2015 12:07  489
The next morning I get to the club an hour before the lifeguard
arrives and use the key Miss Lick has given me to get into the
pool locker room. I lug two gallon jugs of concentrated ammo-
nia in a shopping bag into the dressing room, stack the plastic
bottles in my locker, and cover them with the bag.
The door from the locker room into the footbath is solid
wood hung in a steel frame. The auger is an ancient handcrank
from the landlord’s tool kit in Lily’s basement. On my knees on
the cold tiles I open the door slightly to slide a single sheet of
the Oregonian underneath. The door swings shut, leaving half
the paper on each side to catch the wood dust. I drill the hole
under the lowest hinge and within a quarter inch of the frame.
The bigger bit enlarges the hole to a one-inch notch in the
door’s edge. I wrap the dust in the paper, ready to carry away
with the auger.
The clear plastic tubing slides easily through the hole. On
the footbath side of the door a few inches of tubing droop
toward the chlorine reek of the blue surface. I bend to suck air
through it. The tube is clear, not pinched by the door closing.
With the tube gone the hole is in the dark below the hinge,
hardly visible unless you are on your hands and knees.
I work the narrow end of the funnel into the end of the
tube, coil the arrangement tidily, and tuck it under the bag in
my locker. As I walk out through the big glass doors in the
front lobby I see the glossy young lifeguard putting her bicy-
cle into a stanchion.
Miss Olympia Binewski McGurk, the albino dwarf, takes two
steps to the average one because her mystic breastbone has
spent thirty-eight years trying to increase its distance from
her agnostic spine. Those two steps carry our Miss Oly, the
489 12/01/2015 12:07  490
hunchback, into the tidal stench of corned beef and cabbage
filling the dim cove of McLarnin’s at ten o’clock on a Tuesday
morning when Jimmy McL. himself is steaming the where-
withal for the famous eleven-to-four buffet. The bar is clean.
The glasses wait, glittering in their racks.
Miss Oly hoists her twisted frame onto the least spinnable
bar stool and nods encouragingly at Jimmy. The mirror is
obscured by bottlenecks, leaving shards in which Miss Oly
catches a flicker of her blue-tinted spectacles and goat-grey wig
bobbing over the waxy wood. Her big, soft voice is deeper
than the tenor McLarnin’s.
‘A shot of Jameson’s please, Jimmy,’ she says, and McL.
sways toward her, wrapped in cabbage mist from the kettles
and flapping a bar towel in front of his red knob nose to clear
the view.
‘Celebrating, are we?’ gurgles Jimmy in sympathy with the
tall, tipping bottle.
‘You too?’ asks Miss Oly, squinting her rose-pink eyes
behind the sapphire lenses.
‘Thank you,’ McL. deliberately misunderstands. ‘I’ll stick
with Murphy’s though. I was weaned on it.’
‘Is that so?’ Miss Oly would like to know.
Jimmy gives a slow, thoughtful swipe at the bar with his
towel and raises his crisp white eyebrows. ‘True enough. I was
colicky as a babe and my mother’d send me off to sleep with
a rag-tit tied up in thread and soaked in Murphy to suck on.
She swore by it for a whole night’s rest.’
‘I was thirty-eight years old,’ muses Miss Oly, ‘before I ever
felt the burn of whiskey on my lip. But I knew it right away for
what it was.’
490 12/01/2015 12:07  491
‘The virgin’s arms,’ nods Jimmy. ‘God’s breath.’
‘I am amazed at all the years I spent without whiskey,’ says
Oly.
‘Just as well. It takes a lady of a certain age to contain the
stuff. Particularly the Irish. No offense but a bit of weathering
and experience are required not to go right off the edge with it.
I would hesitate to serve Irish to a green schoolgirl. Mixes and
vodka are enough for them to go wrong on. I couldn’t look at
myself shaving if I poured Irish for the young.’
‘Don’t tell me you look?’
The diplomat McLarnin senses a delicacy about mirrors in
Miss Oly, and deftly switches his bulk to block her exposure
to the jolt of her own image reflected in shreds behind the bar
bottles.
‘You’ve a voice like mulled toddy, Miss O,’ grins Jimmy. ‘I
cried like a busted banker at your story on the radio this
morning.’
‘Hush,’ grunts Oly, ducking a peek into the empty darkness
behind her. ‘The Story Lady of Station KBNK isn’t supposed
to be boozing at ten A . M . Today’s show was an old tape. I called
in sick. Besides, McLarnin, I have the voice of a baritone kazoo
and your real name is Nelson. You were born in Nebraska.
Admit it.’
‘You’re bitter this morning, Miss O. And it leads you to
grievous error. I was born up the street at Good Sam, fifty-six
years ago, and I’ve lived in the sound of its sirens ever since.
Not unlike yourself, I imagine.’
‘I was born in a trailer. No idea where it was parked at the
time. But I was conceived here.’
*
491 12/01/2015 12:07  492
At 5:30 I am sitting on the windowsill of a deserted conference
room on the fourth floor of the TAC Club, watching the circle
drive inside the entrance gates. Miss Lick’s sedan blows in on
time and the lackey in the club uniform opens her door for her.
He takes her keys and tools the car out to her private parking
space as she heads for the entrance. I get down off the sill and
settle into an armchair to watch the wall clock.
I can feel her in the building. With my eyes closed I can see
her crossing the lobby, nodding to the woman at the reception
desk, clumping down the carpeted corridor to the elevator. I
know exactly how she will stare at the elevator door, waiting
for it to open, with her big hands folded in front of her to pre-
vent fidgeting.
Usually I am in the locker room when she walks in. Today
her face – ready to smile as she pushes through the door – will
lift in puzzlement. She will skin down and get into her tank
suit wondering about me. I can almost hear her splashing into
the footbath and feel the air move as the locker door hisses
closed behind her. I can smell her heat mingling with the metal-
lic green fumes of the chlorine in the unventilated cubicle.
There is no bulb in the ceiling fixture of the footbath. The
only light is the grey murk that comes through the small
diamond-shaped window in the door to the pool. She will be
standing there, ankle-deep in chlorine water, peering through
the thick, wire-reinforced glass. She will be searching the pool
for me.
She stands, rotating her big shoulders, her elbows flapping
like wings. She bends, hiking a foot out of the blue water, run-
ning her fingers between her toes, trading feet for the same
ritual.
492 12/01/2015 12:07  493
Planting both feet in the soup again she takes the plastic
quart jar of chlorine from its niche in the tiled wall, opens it,
and, ignoring the measuring scoop, sprinkles a goodly pinch of
the sea-green crystals over the surface of the water.
The plan is simple. She is always the last one out of the pool.
The lifeguard locks up and leaves as Miss Lick begins her second
mile of laps. The respected Miss Lick has her own keys and can
come in to swim at 3 A . M . if she wants to. She can certainly
swim alone with her dwarf pal and lock up behind herself.
I, pale thing, always climb out before Miss Lick, and have
showered and dressed before her pork palms slap the pool
deck to hoist her out. Sitting on the bench in the locker room.
I can always hear her sighing and swishing for long peaceful
minutes in the footbath before she comes in to scour herself
under the shower. Miss Lick never gets enough of that chlorine
footbath.
There is plenty of time to empty the full chlorine jar into the
water of the footbath. It’s simple to close the footbath door to
the locker room and turn its deadbolt, and then slip out to the
corridor and down to the hall door opening onto the pool.
I stand, silent, behind the tall stack of paddleboards until
Miss Lick emerges from the pool, cascading water, and stomps
over to the footbath door. As the door wheezes closed behind
her I am there to twist the deadbolt.
The monster is caught in the closet with her eyes stinging in
the rising chlorine. She is pounding the sides of her fists on the
door to the locker room as I scuttle for the hall, run the few
silent yards to the other entrance, and gasp my way in with my
heart screaming hide-and-seek in my ears.
Her pounding fills the room. I race to my locker, scatter it
493 12/01/2015 12:07  494
empty, an ammonia jug in each hand, dragging toward that
little hole in the door.
‘Oly!’ she bellows beyond the wood slab. The name freezes
my lungs. The skin all over my body rises in pimples of fear.
‘Oly! Are you all right?’
Now she is pounding on the poolside door. The drum wave
moves away from me as I shove the tip of the hose into the
hole. The stink of chlorine is strong from the small hole and
my eyes water from bending close to it.
‘Ahoy!’ she roars at the far door. The pounding wood is like
the beat of fists on my spine. With the jug under one arm, I
carefully pour ammonia down the mouth of the funnel, watch
it sear downward through the clear plastic tubing and rush
through the door, toward its mingling with the chlorine and a
new toxic identity.
‘Ahoy! Ahoy!’ Mary Lick would never yell ‘Help!’
A bubble of hysteria giggles up through me, rocking the jug
tucked under my arm. A smack of ammonia fume hits my nose
and the roof of my open mouth, burning. I turn my head,
gasping. Almost spilling.
I hear splashes beyond the wood, and the pounding rips out
again above my head. ‘Oly! Oly! Oly!’ she screams. Her voice
is harsh and ragged now. The ammonia jug is nearly empty. It’s
taking too long. The pounding stops. In the silence I can hear
the faint trickle of the last ammonia running out of the tube
and into the chlorine water on the other side. A weight hits the
door, inches away from me, and slides, squeaking downward.
Silence. Then the whisper. ‘What the fuck?’ The words rush
out of the funnel into my face with a strange sick breath that
sets me coughing. She’s found the tube. The funnel jerks from
494 12/01/2015 12:07  495
my hands, whips wildly through the air, smacks the wall, hops
and twists on the floor. The funnel’s open mouth shrieks,
‘What the fuck?’ in a whisper. The end of the tubing spurts out
of the hole beneath the hinge. The tube and the funnel fall
dead to the floor. The whisper comes from the hole, ‘Daddy?’
as I scramble away from the hole on my knees, coughing as the
whisper comes again. I choke and hold my breath to hear as
the hole says, ‘Please . . . Please.’
I know her locker combination. Scuttling for the lock I can
hear the hiss of the whisper but I can’t make out the words
that press themselves through the hole. The dial sticks and
clogs and I can hardly see through my tears. I miss and try
again, with a high whine coming out of my own throat. The
lock falls to the floor.
The holster is under her suit jacket, on the hook. I yank a
bench close and climb to reach the gun. Jump back to the
door on tiptoes with the fat gun heavy in one hand. I reach for
the knob to twist open the deadbolt and dodge as the door
gushes open against me. The gas comes out and I choke and
fall to my knees with fire in my eyes and a rake in my nose
and throat.
She is huge, lying across the doorway. Her breath sounds
high and it bubbles. Her white arms have tumbled over her red
bloated face. She moans, a small sound from the wet heap of
her chest. I drop the gun and pull her long arm by its wrist,
crying, ‘Mary! Help me. Mary, move. Come on, Mary. Oh,
Mary, I’m so sorry.’ And I am sorry and I don’t care if she
wakes and kills me if only she will wake up and move. I never
meant this. I never wanted to hurt her. I only needed for her to
die. Not this pain. Not this fear.
495 12/01/2015 12:07  496
‘Mary!’ I yell, yanking on the heavy arm. ‘I didn’t mean it
like this.’
Miss Lick’s eyes pop open, staring upside-down and furi-
ous. Her wrist flicks loose from my hands, swatting me,
groping for me as I fall clattering against the forgotten gun on
the floor. Her hand snaps onto my throat, hot and hard. A
white light comes on behind my eyes as she lifts me above her
with my right hand fluttering at her fingers on my throat and
my left hand heavy with the gun. I am rising, until my ears
explode and I begin a long, slow fall at the end of her arm,
toward the tile floor, watching the sudden black hole where
her right eye was, her big legs flopping in the footbath and the
sputtering roll at the crotch of her tank suit as a dark liquid
runs onto the tile. Her hand is still huge on my throat, but
she’s gone. I’m alone.
News article from the May 18 Portland Oregonian:
Two women whose bodies
were found huddled in the foot-
bath of the Thomas R. Lick
indoor swimming pavilion of
the Timber Athletic Club fol-
lowing a hazardous fume alarm
this morning were apparently
victims of murder and suicide.
Portland Police Detective M.L.
Zusman, directing the onsite
investigation, told reporters
that both women had appar-
ently died of gunshot wounds
and that a gun had been found
at the scene. The exact cause of
the deaths will not be con-
firmed until the completion
of postmortem examinations
by the Multnomah County
Medical Examiner.
Investigation at the scene
was delayed by the presence of
irritating fumes from an
unidentified gas present in the
496 12/01/2015 12:07  497
pool and locker-room area.
The gas is currently undergoing
laboratory analysis for identi -
fication. Fumes were first
noticed by a janitor who
entered the pool area for
regularly scheduled cleaning
at 8 A . M . Firefighters who
responded to the alarm discov-
ered the two bodies.
‘At first we didn’t know who
did what to who,’ said
Detective Zusman. ‘But a note
was found on the scene. Or
rather a notebook which seems
to give an account of the inci-
dent up to a certain point.’
Contents of the note have not
been revealed. The names of the
victims are being withheld
pending notification of their
families. It is not known
whether the victims were mem-
bers of the prestigious private
athletic and social club. TAC
spokesmen refused to discuss
the incident until more infor-
mation is available. The Lick
Pavilion will be closed until
the police investigation is
completed.
Earlier reports that one of
the bodies was that of a hand-
icapped child have since been
contradicted. Police confirm
that both victims were adults.
Delivered by regular mail, May 19:
My dear Miranda,
Since you were a year old you’ve been told you were an
orphan. This was not true. Your father died when you were
very young but I, your mother, have been watching over you
until now. I am your mother, I, the dwarf in Room #21.
Your name is not Miranda Barker but Miranda Binewski.
Barker was the ironic label chosen by the Reverend Mother
Aurora when you were still in diapers and first entered the
convent school.
497 12/01/2015 12:07  498
You will have a lot of questions. Enclosed are two keys.
The long key is to my room, #21. On the floor in the
closet is a big leather trunk. The short key will open the
trunk. The top tray inside is full of your school records,
photographs, sixteen years’ worth of letters from Reverend
Mother Aurora and Sister Lucy. They’re addressed to
me and they report on you. That should be enough to
convince you that I’m not imagining our relationship out
of drugs or lunacy.
The big manila envelope in the top tray of the trunk
contains the deed and tax records for the house and all my
financial papers. The deed is in your name. You can
withdraw from, or write checks on, the trust account. You
will also find the papers for the vault where all the other
Binewskis currently rest. Please note that cremation is a
family tradition. Beneath the tray is all the record there is of
my history and yours.
Please take care of Crystal Lil. Her medical records and
prescriptions are in the white folder in the big envelope. The
trash goes out on Thursday nights and her bills need to be
paid on the fifth of each month. She is your grandmother.
After twenty careful years of not revealing myself to you, I
find it hard to reverse the process. For all you lacked in a
parent, I hope you can eventually forgive me. I can’t be sure
what the trunk will mean to you, or the news that you aren’t
alone, that you are one of us. Yet I hope that someday you’ll
come to collect us all from the shelves of the vault. Take
down Arty and Chick and Papa and the twins, and all that’s
left of the Jar Kin, and, by then, Lily and me. Open our metal
jars and pour all the Binewski dust together into that big
498 12/01/2015 12:07  499
battered loving cup that first held only Grandpa B. Bolt us to
the hood of your traveling machine and take us on the road
again.
With love,
Olympia Binewski
(Known as McGurk)
